NuttX Release Notes
===================

This file contains are the release notes for the NuttX (and apps) packages
for every release.  The text is just as was written at the time of release
(with perhaps some corrected typos).  Over the course of time, NuttX has
used several different repositories:  CVS, two SVN repositories, and
currently a GIT repository.  Therefore, revision information specific to an
older repository may not be meaningful today.

To make it easier to track there older versions in the current GIT
repository, a GIT lightweight tag has been applied for each release.  The
tag name is the release name (for example, the release 6.27 has tag name
"nuttx-6.27").

NuttX-0.1.0
-----------

This is the initial.  This initial includes the complete NuttX RTOS
with support for the Linux user mode simulation and the TI TMS320C5471
(Arm7) processor.  Partial support for the 87C52 is included.

This release has been verified on both the Linux user-mode and C5471
platforms using the test program under examples/ostest.  Test results
for the C5471 can be found in arch/c5471/doc/test-results.txt.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 9,2007.

NuttX-0.1.1
-----------

This is the second release of NuttX.  This release includes the following.
See the ChangeLog for more detailed description of the changes.

(1) General OS bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details),
(2) bugfixes for the TI TMS320C5471 (Arm7) platform (see
    the ChangeLog)
(3) Complete support for the 87C52. (However, the 87C52
    release is not stable enough for general usage).
(4) Added the beginning of a shell call NuttShell (nsh)

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode platform, the
Spectrum Digital TMS320C5471 EVM, and the PJRC 87C52 development board
using the test program under examples/ostest.

STATUS: The development status remains as ALPHA until further testing
is performed.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 14, 2007.

NuttX-0.1.2
-----------

This is the third release of NuttX.  This release is
primarily a bugfix release with minimal new features.  See
the ChangeLog for a more detailed description of the
changes.

(1) Several important OS and ARM7 bugfixes,
(2) opendir(), closedir(), readdir(), etc. added
(3) Added C5471 watchdog timer.
(4) Created a shareable, serial driver.
(5) Added 'ls' command to NuttShell (nsh)
(6) Added a test of the round robin scheduler

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode
platform, the  Spectrum Digital TMS320C5471 EVM using the
test program under examples/ostest.

This tarball contains a CVS snapshot from March 19, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.1
-----------

This is the fourth release of NuttX.  This release adds adds
support for a new platform, restructures many header files,
and adds a few new features:

(1) Support for Neuros OSD / DM320
(2) Restructuring of header files for better POSIX compliance
(3) Added kill()
(4) Added POSIX timers
(5) bugfixes and documentation updates

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode
platform, the  Spectrum Digital TMS320C5471 EVM, and the
Neuros OSD  using the test program under examples/ostest.  Because
of the stability of these tests, the project status
has been upgraded to 'beta.'

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 22, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.2
------------

This is the fifth release of NuttX.  There is no major new
functionality in this release.  This release adds support
for new pthread barrier APIs, changes the directory
structure, to better handle different board configurations
using the same processor architecture, and corrects a few
defects.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode
platform and the Neuros OSD using the test program under
examples/ostest.  There are no known, critical defects but
the project development status remains at 'beta' status
pending further test and evaluation.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from
March 26, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.3
------------

This is the sixth release of NuttX.  This release is
primarily a bugfix release.  Numerous problems were fixed
as detailed in the change log.  New functionality includes
support for timed message queues.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode
platform and the Neuros OSD using the test program under
examples/ostest. The results of the testing is available in
the source tree under configs/ntosd-dm320/doc/test-results.
There are no known, critical defects but the project
development status remains at 'beta' status pending further
test and evaluation.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 29,
2007.

NuttX-0.2.4
------------

This is the 7th release of NuttX.  This release is only to roll out
build changes to better support different SoC's that use the same
processor architecture.  In particular, the two existing ARM architectures,
c5471 and DM320 were combined into a single ARM directory.  This was done
in preparation for an LPC2148 port that is currently in progress.  There
is NO new functionality or significant bugfixes in this release.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified on the Linux user-mode platform
and the Neuros OSD using the test program under examples/ostest.
The results of the testing is available in the source tree under
configs/ntosd-dm320/doc/test-results and under configs/sim/doc/test-results.
There are no known, critical defects but the project development status
remains at 'beta' status pending further test and evaluation.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from April 28, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.5
------------

This is the 8th release of NuttX.  This release includes:

(1) Several bug fixes
(2) Initial support for FAT filesystems.  Testing has not
    been exhaustive and some functionality is missing
   (mkdir, stat, unlink chmod, and rename functionality is
    not yet implemented).
(3) Support for the NXP lpc2148 processor is included but
    is untested as of this writing.  The current
    implementation includes only support for serial console
    and timer interrupt.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Linux user-mode
platform.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from May 19,
2007.

NuttX-0.2.6
-----------

This is the 9th release of NuttX.  This is primarily a
bugfix release to correct a number of problems introduced
with the 0.2.5 release. This release does include some FAT
filesystem extensions including unlink(), mkdir(), rmdir(),
rename(), opendir(), closedir(), readdir(), seekdir(),
telldir(), rewindir().  There are some pending FAT changes
that did not make it into this release including stat(),
truncate(), and long file names.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Linux user-mode platform.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from May 26, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.7
-----------

This is the 10th release of NuttX.  This is primarily a bugfix
release to correct a number of problems reported to me (thanks
Didier!). This release does include the final changes complete the
FAT filesystem logic including stat(), statfs(), and non-standard
APIs to manage FAT attributes.  At present, FAT long file names and
file truncate() are still not supported.

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Linux user-mode platform.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from June 9, 2007.

NuttX-0.2.8
-----------

This is the 11th release of NuttX.  This release:
(1) corrects important bugs in opendir() and realloc()
(2) adds support for environment variables
(3) adds several new C library interfaces
(4) extends several example programs

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Linux user-mode platform.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from July 2, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.0
-----------

This is the 12th release of NuttX.  This release includes the initial
integration of a network subsystem and the uIP TCP/IP stack into NuttX
(see http://www.sics.se/~adam/uip/index.php/Main_Page).  Also included
is a device driver for the Davicom DM90x0 Ethernet controller.

This integration is very preliminary.  Only a small portion of the
network functionality has been integrated and there are a number of
open issues (see the TODO file).  The network subsystem is pre-alpha
at this point in time.  I expect that it will stabilize and mature
over the next few releases.

The baseline functionality of NuttX continues to mature and remains at
post-beta (as long as the network is not used).

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Neuros OSD (DM320 ARM9)
platform using the DM90x0 driver.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 6, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.1
-----------

This is the 13th release of NuttX and the second release containing
the integration of a network subsystem and the uIP TCP/IP, UDP, and
ICMP stacks into NuttX (see http://www.sics.se/~adam/uip/index.php/Main_Page).

Many network-related problems have been fixed and the implementation
has matured significantly.  However, the level of network reliability
is probably still at the pre-alpha or early level.  It is sufficiently
complete that you may begin to perform some network integration and
is expected to achieve beta level of reliability over the next few
releases.

The baseline functionality of NuttX continues to mature and remains at
post-beta (as long as the network is not used).

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

This release has been verified only on the Neuros OSD (DM320 ARM9)
platform using the DM90x0 driver.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 19, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.2
-----------

This is the 14th release of NuttX and the 3rd release containing
the integration of a network subsystem and the uIP TCP/IP, UDP, and
ICMP stacks into NuttX (see http://www.sics.se/~adam/uip/index.php/Main_Page).

Many network-related problems have been fixed and the implementation
has matured significantly.  This release consists of:

o TCP-related bug-fixes
o TCP performance improvements
o Initial UDP integration
o Initial uIP micro webserver integration

See the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes.

The level of network reliability is at alpha level is expected to
achieve beta level of reliability over the next few releases.

The baseline functionality of NuttX continues to mature and remains at
post-beta.

This release has been verified only on the Neuros OSD (DM320 ARM9)
platform using the DM90x0 driver.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 23, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.3
-----------

This is the 15th release of NuttX and the 4th release containing
the integration of a network subsystem and the uIP TCP/IP, UDP, and
ICMP stacks into NuttX (see http://www.sics.se/~adam/uip/index.php/Main_Page).

Many network-related problems have been fixed and the implementation
has matured significantly.  This release consists of:

o TCP-related bug-fixes for disconnecting sockets
o Correction of some TCP read-ahead logic
o TCP performance improvements
o Misc. additions and cleanup (See the ChangeLog for a complete list of
  changes).

The level of network reliability is at an early beta release level.  The
baseline functionality of NuttX continues to mature and remains at
post-beta. Open network-related issues include only:

o Some minor unimplemented BSD socket functionality,
o Thread safety issues: the same socket cannot be used concurrently on
  different threads.
o Pending design changes necessary to support multiple network interfaces.
o IPv6 support is incomplete.

This release has been verified only on the Neuros OSD (DM320 ARM9)
platform using the DM90x0 driver. Any feedback for improving the network
reliability/performance would be greatly appreciated.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 28, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.4
-----------

This is the 16th release of NuttX and the 5th release containing
the integration of a network subsystem and the uIP TCP/IP, UDP, and
ICMP stacks into NuttX (see http://www.sics.se/~adam/uip/index.php/Main_Page).

This release is primarily a bug-fix release.  New features include
only:

o TELNET front-end to NSH,
o DHCPC server functionality, and
o C5471 Ethernet driver.

Numerous network related problems were fixed related to DHCPC, UDP
input processing, UDP broadcast, send timeouts, and bad compilation when
uIP is compiled at high levels of optimization.

The level of network reliability is at a strong beta release level.  The
baseline functionality of NuttX continues to mature and remains at
post-beta or production level.

Parts of this release were verified only on the Neuros OSD (DM320 ARM9)
platform using the DM90x0 Ethernet driver and other parts on the Spectrum
Digital C5471 EVM using the C5471 Ethernet driver. Any feedback about bugs
or suggestions for improving the network reliability/performance would be
greatly appreciated.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from December 10, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.5
-----------

This is the 17th release of NuttX this release is primarily a bug-fix
release and intended to synchronize with the current CVS contents.  See
the ChangeLog for a detailed list of changes and fixes.

This release were verified only on the Spectrum Digital C5471 EVM using
the C5471 Ethernet driver. Any feedback about bugs or suggestions for
improvement would be greatly appreciated.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from December 18, 2007.

NuttX-0.3.6
-----------

This is the 18th release of NuttX.  This release contains on a few
changes.  The primary purpose of this release is to synchronize with
the release of the pascal-0.1.0 add-on package.

This release of NuttX includes the following changes:

* Fixes for use with SDCC compiler
* Added a simulated z80 target (arch/z80)
* Fix deadlock errors when using stdio but with no buffering
* Add support for the add-on Pascal P-Code interpreter (pcode/)
  (see the pascal-0.1.0 package)

This release were verified only on the simulated Z80 and and host
simulation targets.  As usual, any feedback about bugs or suggestions
for improvement would be greatly appreciated.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from January 6, 2007.

====

There was an error in the initial 0.3.6 release that prevented
a successful build unless the Pascal add-on was present.  The
tarball was patched to include the fix.  Make sure that you download
the nuttx-0.3.6.1.tar.gz version to avoid this problem.

NuttX-0.3.7
-----------

This is the 19th release of NuttX.  This release includes the
preliminary port of NuttX to the ZiLOG z16f 16-bit microcontroller.
This port was verified using the ZiLOG z16f2800100zcog Development
and the ZiLOG ZDS-II toolchain. See http://www.zilog.com for
further information.

I emphasize that this is a preliminary release of the z16f port and
is only alpha or, perhaps, pre-alpha quality as of this writing.
There are a list of known issues in the TODO file in the root of
the NuttX directory.  The overall quality of NuttX (excluding the
z16f port) continues to improve beyond the late beta level.

The z16f port required numerous changes to NuttX to handle:

* NEAR and FAR addressing, and
* Use of a Windows native toolchain in a Cygwin build environment.

In addition to the z16f port, at least one very critical bug was
found and corrected in NuttX:  The thread-specific errno value of one
task was being randomly trashed when a different thread exited.

This release were verified on the ZiLOG z16f2800100zcog, Neuros OSD
(ARM9), and the simulation platforms.  As usual, any feedback about bugs
or suggestions for improvement would be greatly appreciated.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from January 31, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.8
-----------

This is the 20th release of NuttX.  This is a minor bugfix release.
It corrects a few minor problems, adds a few minor features, and
continues the integration of the ZiLOG Z18F and of the Pascal P-Code
add-on.  This release is synchronized with the release of Pascal-0.1.2.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from February 10, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.9
-----------

This is the 21st release of NuttX.  This is a minor future enhancement
release.  This release includes support for the ZiLOG Z8Encore! micro-
controller.  Also included is the initial framework for support for
the Z80, XTRS platform (http://www.tim-mann.org/xtrs.html).

This released has been verified only on the ZiLOG ZDS-II Z8Encore!
chip simulation.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 9, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.10
------------

This is the 22nd release of NuttX.  This is an important bug fix
release.  This release incorporates fixes to correct critical list
handling errors in task shutdown logic: One in timer deletion logic
(timer_delete.c) and one in stream logic (lib_init.c).  This release
also includes support to ZiLOG EZ80Acclaim microcontroller (EZ80F91
chip) and configurations for the ZiLOG z8f64200100kit (Z8F6423) and
ez80f0910200kitg (EZ80F091) development kit.

NuttX-0.3.11
------------

This is the 23rd release of NuttX.  This is another important bugfix
release.  This releases fixes several bugs:

* Two POSIX timer bugs: a memory leak as well a fatal sequencing error.
* Several FAT filesystem errors.
* A deadlock that can occur in opendir()

A few new features were also added:

* Support for recursive mutexes
* Added a RAM disk block driver
* The host simulator no longer uses direct Linux system calls and
  now also works on Cygwin.
* The OS test was strengthen and now runs as an endurance test

These changes were verified only on the Host simulator under Cygwin.
Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from June 1, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.12
------------

This is the 24th release of NuttX.  This release includes some minor
bugfixes as well as a few new features.  Bugs fixed include:

* Corrected an error in recursive mutex implementation.
* task_create() was only dup()ing the first three file descriptors.
* Fixed driver open reference counting errors in dup(), dup2(), and exit().
* Fixed error handling logic in fflush().

New features were also added:

* Pipes and pipe() API
* FIFOs and mkfifo() API
* mkfatfs() API can be used to format FAT file systems.

These changes were verified only on the Host simulator under Cygwin.
Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from August 10, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.13
------------

This is the 25th release of NuttX.  This release includes some
important bugfixes as well as a few new features.  Bugs fixed
include:

* Fixed problems with Cygwin-based console input.  NSH now works
  with the Cygwin simulator.
* sched_get_priority_max/min returned error on SCHED_RR
* Corrected detection of End-of-File in fgets()
* Fixed an error in opendir() that could cause an assertion to fail
  inappropriately.
* Corrected an error in the FAT that caused files opened for writing
  with O_APPEND to fail.
* Fix error in getopt() when called with argc==1
* Fix error in stat() when used on the root directory
* Fixed a critical bug that effects the way that environment variables
  are shared among pthreads.
* uIP port now supports multi-threaded, concurrent socket access.
  So, for example, one thread can be reading from a socket while
  another is writing to the socket.

New features were also added:

* New OS APIs: chdir() and getcwd()
* The Nuttx shell (NSH) has been extended in many ways.
  - New commands: mkfatfs, mkfifo, sleep, usleep, nice, sh, cd, and pwd
  - New memory inspection commands and heap usage commands
  - New capabilities:
    - Execution of commands in background
    - Execution of simple scripts
    - Redirection of command output
    - Last command status ($?)
  - Now supports if-then[-else]-fi construct
  - Other features as noted in the ChangeLog.

These changes were verified only on the Host simulator under Cygwin
and under Linux and also on the Neuros OSD (ARM9).  Please report
any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from September 1, 2008.

nutt-0.3.14
-----------

This is the 26th release of NuttX.  This release includes some
important bugfixes as well as a few new features.  Critical bugs
fixed include:

FAT FS:
  * Fixed several critical bugs with regard to fat reading and
    writing and FAT12 accesses.  Basically the FAT FS only worked
    with my tiny test files and test cases.  A lot of stronger FAT
    tested is still needed!
  * Fixed another FAT bug in implementation of FAT lseek();
    this prohibited correct random access to large files.

Network:
  * Corrected a critical bug that may prevent recvfrom from receiving
    packets from most remote UDP port numbers.
  * Corrected an error in multi-threaded socket handling in send() and
    sendto().  Outgoing data could overwrite incoming data.
  * Corrected IP checksum calculation in ICMP and UDP message send logic.
  * Corrected an error in send() timeout logic.

New features were also added:

Network:
  * Added support for application access to ICMP protocol stacks
  * Added ping request logic (net/uip).
  * Added basic TFTP client logic (netutils/tftpc).

NuttShell (NSH):
  * New commands: 'test', '[', 'ping', 'mkrd', 'xd', and TFTP 'get' and 'put'
    See the new NuttShell User Guide for additional information.

Other less critical bugs were also fixed and other less important
features were were added.  See the ChangeLog for details.

These changes were verified only on the Neuros OSD (ARM9).  Please
report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from September 8, 2008.

nutt-0.3.15
-----------

This is the 27th release of NuttX.  This release includes some new features:

* Adds support for the ROMFS filesystem
* ROMFS supports mmap() to provide eXecute In Place (XIP) capability
* NuttShell (NSH) can be configured to use ROMFS to provide a tiny read-only
  filesystem with a startup script in /etc.
* Completed the basic port of the NXP LPC2148 on the mcu123.com board.
  The basic port includes successful booting, timer interrupts,
  serial console, successfully passing the examples/ostest, and a
  NuttShell (NSH) configuration.

These changes were verified only on the mcu123.com NXP LPC2148
board.  Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from September 20, 2008.

nutt-0.3.16
-----------

This is the 28th release of NuttX.  This release includes the first
support for USB in NuttX.  A set of USB APIs were added to support
USB device controller drivers and bindings to USB device class
drivers.  The form of the interface was inspired by the Linux Gadget APIs.

At present USB device controller drivers are included for:
  * The NXP LPC214x.  This driver has been verified and is an early alpha
    stage in quality.
  * TI DM320.  Coding for this driver is complete but it is completely
    untested as of this release.

A controller-independent class driver is also included for:
  * USB serial class device driver (emulates the Prolific PL2303
    serial-to-USB adapter).  This driver has only been verified with
    the Linux host PL2303 driver.

Other new features include:
  * Add an option to set aside a separate stack for interrupt
    handling (ARM only).  This is useful when memory is constrained,
    there are multiple tasks, and the interrupt stack requirement
    is high (as when USB is enabled).

A few bugs were also fixed:
  * Fixed the frequency of system timer interrupts in the NXP LPC214x port
    (off by 20x in nuttx-0.3.15)
  * Fixed serial driver bugs related to (1) open counts and (2) recognizing
    O_NONBLOCK on read.
  * Fixed an error in read(); it was not setting the errno on errors returned
    from the driver.

These changes were verified only on the mcu123.com NXP LPC2148 board
using with a Linux host.  Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from October 10, 2008.

UPDATE
------
This release does not build for the ARM target when USB is disabled.
Here is the fix:

Index: arch/arm/src/common/up_internal.h
===================================================================
RCS file: /cvsroot/nuttx/nuttx/arch/arm/src/common/up_internal.h,v
retrieving revision 1.13
diff -u -r1.13 up_internal.h
--- arch/arm/src/common/up_internal.h   6 Oct 2008 16:20:52 -0000       1.13
+++ arch/arm/src/common/up_internal.h   13 Oct 2008 20:48:21 -0000
@@ -200,7 +200,8 @@
 extern void up_usbinitialize(void);
 extern void up_usbuninitialize(void);
 #else
-# define up_netinitialize()
+# define up_usbinitialize()
+# define up_usbuninitialize()
 #endif

 #endif /* __ASSEMBLY__ */

NuttX-0.3.17
------------

This is the 29th release of NuttX.  This release includes the
additional support for USB in NuttX.  The following new features
were added:

* Added support for SPI-based MMC/SD cards (with an SPI driver
  for the NXP LPC214x).
* Added USB storage class device side driver (BBB)
* Added an example that demonstrates the USB storage class by
  exporting the SPI based MMC/SD card on the NXP LPC214x.

This is an early alpha release of these drivers.  At present they
only work with debug features enabled so there are probably some
race conditions that occur only with debug features disabled.
(Anyone out there with a USB analyzer?  I would love to know what
is happening.)

Several important bugs were also fixed in the FAT file system, USB
serial driver and NXP LPC214x USB controller driver. (See the ChangeLog
for details.)

These changes were verified only on the mcu123.com NXP LPC2148 board
using a Linux development environment.  USB testing was performed
using both a Linux host and a WinXP host.  Please report any errors
to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from October 28, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.18
------------

This is the 30th release of NuttX.  This release includes two
partially completed ports, several new features, and a couple of
important bug fixes.  The two partially completed ports are:

  * The STMicro STR71x processor and configuration for the Olimex
    STR-P711 board.
  * The Hitachi SH-1 using the SH1_LCEVB1 (SH-1/US7032EVB1) board

Progress on these ports is stalled (as detailed in the ChangeLog).

The new features focus primarily on management of block devices and
extensions of the NuttShell (NSH).  These include:

  * A loop device that converts a file into a block device.
  * A block to character (BCH) driver that  allow access a block device as
    if it were character device.
  * Added strcasecmp() and strncasecmp() libc functions.
  * Added the 'dd' and 'losetup' commands to NSH. These commands
    (along with mkfatfs and mount), give good management of filesystems
    on the target.

Several bugs were fixed, the most important of which are:

  * Fixed a race condition workaround delay in LPC214X SPI logic.
    This was also the cause of some bad MMC/SD performance on that
    platform.

  * Fixed a recently introduced FAT file system problem: It would
    mount a (invalid) FAT file system even if the medium is not formatted!

  * Corrected two other important errors in the FAT lseek() implementation:
    1 - The sectors-per-cluster value was being reset to "1".
    2 - Important lseek logic was omitted when the seek position was zero.

The FAT filesystem has had many bugs fixed in it and, I think, is
now maturing and becoming stable.

These changes were verified only on the mcu123.com NXP LPC2148
board, the Hitachi SH1_LCEVB1 board, and the Linux simulator, all
using a Linux development environment.  Please report any errors
to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 16, 2008.

NuttX-0.3.19
------------

This is the 31st release of NuttX.  This release includes the
following new feature:

  * Add poll() and select() APIs that may be used to monitor for
    data availability on character devices or TCP/IP sockets.
  * Implemented support TCP/IP connection backlog.  This allows
    select() to wake-up on new connections to a listener socket.
  * Added definition of a framebuffer driver and implement framebuffer
    drivers for the simulated platform and the TI DM320 (untested
    as of the initial check-in).
  * Partially developed a graphics framework based on the framebuffer
    drivers, however, this will not be ready for use for a few more
    releases.  Currently this includes only a few color conversion
    routines and some rasterizing functions.  A tiny windowing system
    is under development but not ready for check-in yet.
  * Added support for fixed precision math.
  * Added support for outgoing multicast packets.

Several bugs were fixed, the most important of which are:

  * Fixed an important bug in the TCP/IP buffering logic.  When
    TCP/IP read-ahead is enabled and not recv() is in-place when a
    TCP/IP packet is received, the packet is placed into a read-ahead
    buffer.  However, the old contents of the read-ahead buffer
    were not being cleared and old data would contaminate the newly
    received buffer.

  * Changed the behavior of the serial driver read.  It now returns
    data as it is available rather than waiting for the full requested
    read size.  This makes functions like fgetc() work much more
    smoothly.

These changes were verified only on the Neuros OSD (ARM9) using a
Linux development environment. Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 26, 2008.

NuttX-0.4.0
-----------

This is the 32nd release of NuttX.  This release adds graphics
support and a tiny windowing subsystem.  That new graphics subsystem
is documented at http://nuttx.sourceforge.net/NXGraphicsSubsystem.html.
No other substantial changes were made.

These changes were verified only on the NuttX simulation platform
with X11 windows simulating a device framebuffer. Please report any
errors to me.

The version number was bumped up to 0.4.0 in part to reflect the
new graphics subsystem, but also to recognize the NuttX is approaching
complete functionality.  In the 0.3.x versions, network support was
added, Pascal P-code runtime support was added, FAT and ROMFS
filesystems were added, MMC/SD and USB device support were added.
There were also numerous extensions to the NuttShell, NuttX APIs,
and architecture ports.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from December 6, 2008.

NuttX-0.4.1
-----------

This is the 33rd release of NuttX.  This is a minor bugfix release.
The primary reason for this release is to correct numerous build
errors that have accumulated for the ZiLOG ZDS-II based targets.
All ZDS-II targets now build correctly (but have not been re-tested).
In addition to platform-specific build failures, this release also
adds the following features which were not tested as of the time
of the release:

  * Board support for the ZiLog ez80Acclaim! ez80f910200zco Development Kit
  * ZiLOG eZ80F91 EMAC driver

These changes were verified only on the NuttX simulation platform.
Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from February 6, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.2
-----------

This is the 34th release of NuttX.  This release adds no new OS
features but does include support for two new architectures:

  * ez80Acclaim!  Basic support has been integrated and verified
    for the ez80f910200zcog-d board (eZ80F91-based).  That basic
    support includes timer interrupts and serial console.  Ongoing
    work includes an EMAC driver that should be integrated for the
    next release nuttx-0.4.2.  eZ80Acclaim! support has been in the
    code base for some time, but has only just been integrated due
    to toolchain issues.

  * Renesas M16C/20.  Support for the Renesas SKP16C20 board has
    been included in the NuttX source tree.  However, as the
    eZ80Acclaim!, testing and integration of that port is stalled
    due to toolchain issues.

These changes were verified only on the ZiLOG eZ80910200zcog-d
board. Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from February 28, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.3
-----------

This is the 35th release of NuttX.  This release one important new
OS feature and corrects and extends the eZ80 port:

  * Priority Inheritance.  The basic NuttX waiting logic was extended
    to support priority inheritance. See the NuttX User Manual for
    further information:
    http://www.nuttx.org/NuttxUserGuide.html#priorityinheritance.

  * ez80Acclaim! Corrected several critical, show-stopping bugs on that
    platform including:
    - Errors in the serial driver interrupts.
    - An error in the eZ80 table.
  * eZ80Acclaim!: Completed integration of the eZ80F91 EMAC driver.

These changes were verified only on the ZiLOG eZ80910200zcog-d board
and on Cygwin-based simulation platform in various configurations.
Please report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 13, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.4
-----------

This is the 36th release of NuttX.  This release focuses on bugfixes
and extending and verifying certain networking features.

  * Important bugs were fixed in NSH, UDP checksum calculation, UDP
    bind() behavior for port==0, the eZ80Acclaim! EMAC driver, Z80
    interrupt handling, and in the C libraries.

  * Testing was extended to further verify the tiny webserver,
    DHCPD, wget(), and sendmail.

See the Changelog for a detailed description of these changes.

These changes were verified only on the ZiLOG eZ80910200zcog-d board
using the ZDS-II toolchain in Cygwin-based environment. Please
report any errors to me.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from March 29, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.5
-----------

This is the 37th release of NuttX.  This release focuses on a few new features.

  * The basic port for the Freescale ARM920T i.MX1 processor on the
    Freescale MX1ADS board.  Coding is complete for this port, but
    it is has not yet fully integrated
  * Extended I2C and SPI interface definitions
  * Add basic support for C++ applications.  Very simple C++
    applications can now be built against NuttX without any external
    libraries.  At present, only the most primitive C++ programs
    are supported, but it is hoped that this support will be extended
    in future releases.

See the Changelog for a detailed description of these changes.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from April 19, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.6
-----------

This is the 38th release of NuttX.  The release features support
for the Micromint Eagle-100 development board.  This board is based
around, the Luminary LM3S6918 MCU.  This is the first ARM Cortex-M3
architecture supported by Nuttx. This initial, basic port includes
timer and serial console with configurations to execute the NuttX
OS test and to run the NuttShell (NSH). Work is still underway on
this port and current plans are to have I2C, SSI, MMC/SD, and and
Ethernet driver in the 0.4.7 release.

Additional work was done on the MXADS i.MX1 port, however, that
work has been set aside until I complete work on the Eagle-100 (I
also need to come up with a 3V power supply).

Other changes in this release include: Extensions to the SPI interface
definition in order to handle 9-bit interfaces to displays.  Several
bugs were fixed (see the ChangeLog for a complete list of changes).

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from May 19, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.7
-----------

This is the 39th release of NuttX.  This release focuses on cleaning
up and extending the Eagle100/LM3S6918 port released in nuttx-0.4.6
and on improved MMC/SD support.  New features include:

  * Improved reliably and additional drivers for the Eagle-100 board
    (LM3S6918 ARM Cortex-M3).  Additional drivers include Ethernet,
    SSI, and support for the on-board LEDs and microSD cards.

  * The SPI-based MMC/SD driver was extended to support SDHC Version
    2.xx cards.

In addition, this release includes several important bugfixes for
the LM3S6918, the LPC2148, the SPI-based MMC/SD driver, and to
FAT32.  See the ChangeLog for details of these bugfixes.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from May 29, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.8
-----------

This is the 40th release of NuttX.  This release adds:

  * Support for the Olimex STRP711 board.  That board is based on
    the STMicro STR711 MCU (ARM7TDMI). Integration is complete on
    the basic port (boot logic, system time, serial console). Two
    configurations have been verified: (1) The board boots and
    passes the OS test with console output visible on UART0, and
    the NuttShell (NSH) is fully functional with interrupt driven
    serial console.  An SPI driver is available but untested (because
    the Olimex card slot appears to accept only MMC cards; I have
    only SD cards).  Additional needed: USB and driver, MMC
    integration.

  * Support for the CodeSourcery and devkitARM Windows-native GNU
    toolchains.  Makefiles have been modified for the LM3S6918,
    LPC2148, and STR711 to support these toolchains under Cygwin.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from June 13, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.9
-----------

This is the 41st release of NuttX.  This release adds:

  * Support for a new binary format call NXFLAT that can be used to
    execute separately linked programs in place in a file system.
    See http://www.nuttx.org/NuttXNxFlat.html.

  * Several important bugs were files related to networking and ROMFS.
    See the ChangeLog for a complete list.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from June 26, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.10
-----------

This is the 42nd release of NuttX.  This released focused on the
port of Jeff Poskanzer's THTTPD HTTP server (see
http://acme.com/software/thttpd/).  As of the 0.4.10 release, that
port is still not fully complete and functional.  However, numerous
related bug-fixes and functional additions for THTTPD were added:

  * Several new standard C-library functions (fileno, strstr,
    strpbrk, fcntl).
  * Improved and extended timing APIs (mktime, gmtime, gmtime_r,
    gettimeofday, localtime, localtime_r, and strftime)
  * Networking enhancements: recvfrom() and accept() now work with
    non-blocking sockets.
  * NXFLAT extensions (exec)
  * Pattern matching logic.
  * And miscellaneous bug fixes (see the ChangeLog for details).

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from August 8, 2009.

NuttX-0.4.11
------------

This is the 43rd release of NuttX. This release of NuttX incorporates
the verified port of Jeff Poskanzer's THTTPD HTTP server (see
http://acme.com/software/thttpd/).  Many of the key features of
THTTPD have been tested on the Micromint Eagle-100 development board
(Cortex-M3).  These tests verify:

  * Serving of files from any file system
  * Execution of CGI executable.  This release supports execution
    of NXFLAT executables on a ROMFS file system
    (http://www.nuttx.org/NuttXNxFlat.html)

A standard CGI interface is used:  Information is pasted to the CGI
program via POST commands and via environment variables.  CGI socket
I/O is redirected to stdin and stdout so that the CGI program only
need to printf() to send its content back to the HTTP client.

Another value to this THTTPD integration effort has been that THTTPD
has provided a very good test bed for finding NuttX networking bugs.
Several very critical networking bugs have been fixed with this
0.4.11 release (see the ChangeLog for details).  Networking throughput
has also been greatly improved.  Anyone using NuttX networking
should consider upgrading to this release.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from September 16, 2009

NuttX-0.4.12
------------

This is the 44th release of NuttX.  This release adds basic support
for the STMicro STM32, Cortex-M3 MCU.  The specific port is to the
STMicro STM3210E-EVAL development board based around the STM32F103ZET6
MCU.  Some highlights of this port:

  * This basic port includes boot-up logic, interrupt driven serial
    console, and system timer interrupts.
  * Includes a basic STMicro RIDE7 project that can be used to
    perform basic STM32 board bring-up (due to RIDE7 size limitations,
    it cannot be used for the full NuttX bring-up).
  * Working, Tested Configurations: the NuttX OS test and the
    NuttShell (NSH) example.

This basic STM32 port will be extended in the 0.4.13 NuttX release.
Functionality needed for complete STM32 support includes:  USB
device driver, LCD driver and NX bringup on the development board's
display and MicroSD support.  An SPI driver and a DMA support was
included in this 0.4.12 release, but is not yet tested.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from October 17, 2009

NuttX-0.4.13
------------

This is the 45th release of NuttX.  The release extends the support
for the STMicro STM32 microcontroller.  Minimal support for the
STM3210E-EVAL development board based around the STM32F103ZET6 MCU
was released in NuttX-0.4.12.  This release adds:

  * A simple interface definition to support some FLASH, EEPROM,
    NVRAM, etc. devices.
  * Verified SPI operation using driver for SPI based FLASH parts
    M25P64 and M25P128.
  * Improved Cortex-M3 context switching.  This should improve
    context switching performance be 2x in certain cases.
  * Added a USB device-side driver for the STM32.  This is an early
    release of a very complex driver; some bugs are expected.
  * The USB driver has been verified against the USB serial device
    class driver.  There is at least one known outstanding issue
    (see the full bug description in the TODO list).

This release also corrects some important bugs in the early STM32 release:

  * Fixed several errors the prevented operation of NuttX on an
    STM32 development board using USART2 as the serial console.
  * Fixed and optimization-dependent race condition in the clock
    initialization.
  * Fixed a critical bug in the interrupt control logic that could
    cause interrupt operations to failed used for interrupts in a
    certain range.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from November 4, 2009

NuttX-4.14
----------

This is the 46th release of NuttX.  The release extends the support
for the STMicro STM32 microcontroller.  Minimal support for the
STM3210E-EVAL development board based around the STM32F103ZET6 MCU
was released in NuttX-0.4.12 and extended in Nuttx-0.4.13 to include
initial USB support.  This completes the STM32F103ZET6 and adds:

New Generic RTOS Features:

  * Added generic support that can be included in any block driver
    to provide read-ahead buffering and write buffering for improved
    driver performance.
  * Added a generic worker thread that can used to defer processing
    from an interrupt to a task.
  * Defined a generic SD/SDIO interface can can be bound to a MMC/SD
    or SDIO driver to provide SDIO support.
  * Implemented a an SDIO-based MMC/SD driver using this new SDIO
    interface.

New STM32 Features:

  * Add support to configure an STM32 input GPIO to generate an
    EXTI interrupt.
  * Added support for buttons on the STM3210E-EVAL board.
  * Implemented an STM32 version of the common the SDIO interface.
  * Added a configuration to exercise the STM32 with the USB mass
    storage device class example.

This release also corrects some important bugs in the early STM32 release:

  * Correct error handling in the mount() logic.
  * Fixed several STM32 DMA-related issues. Integrated and debugged
    STM32 DMA functionality that was added in 0.4.12.
  * Fixed several bugs in the STM32 USB device-side driver.

NOTE:  This version, 4.14, is equivalent to what would have been
called 0.4.14 to follow 0.4.13.  The zero has been eliminated from
the front of the version number to avoid confusion about the state
of development:  Some have interpreted the leading zero to mean
that the code is in some way unstable.  That was not the intent.
Beginning in January 2010, I will switch to the 2010.nn versioning
as many others have done to avoid such confusion.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from December 2, 2009

NuttX-5.0
---------

This is 47th release of NuttX and the successor to nuttx-4.14.  This
major revision number has been incremented to indicate that an
incompatibility with previous nuttx releases has been introduced.
This version adopts standard fixed width integer names as specified
by the ANSI C99 standard.  The core logic of NuttX is older than
that standard and did not conform to it.

If you have applications running on NuttX-4.14, those applications
should continue to build and execute without problem on NuttX-5.0.
However, if you have device drivers or other OS-internal logic, you
will probably have to make some minor changes to your code to use
this version.  Below is a summary of those changes:

  * If you include sys/types.h to get the non-standard, fixed width
    integer types (uint32, uint16, ubyte, etc.), that is no longer
    necessary.
  * Instead, you will need to include stdint.h where the new fixed
    width integer types are defined (uint32_t, uint16_t, uint8_t, etc).
  * You will have to change all occurrences of the following types:

    uint32 -> uint32_t
    uint16 -> uint16_t
    ubyte  -> uint8_t
    uint8  -> uint8_t
    sint32 -> int32_t
    sint16 -> int16_t
    sint8  -> int8_t

 * In addition, the non-standard type 'boolean' must replaced with
   the standard type 'bool'.  The type definition for 'bool' is in
   stdbool.h

This change in typing caused small changes to many, many files.  It
was verified that all configurations in the release still build
correctly (other than the SDCC-based configurations).  Regression
testing was performed on a few configurations, but it is possible
that minor build issues still exist. (If you encounter any, please
let me know and I will help you to fix them.)

In the course of the regression testing, several important bugs
unrelated to the type changes were found and corrected.

  * Fixed an important error in the RX FIFO handling logic of the
    LM3S6918 Ethernet driver.
  * Corrected the handling of TCP sequence numbers in the TCP stack.
  * And other less important bugs as detailed in the ChangeLog.

The primary focus of this release was standards compatibility, but
a few new features were added including a (1) Flash Translation
Layer (FTL) that will support filesystems on a FLASH device and (2)
partial ports for the STM32F107VC and HCS12 C9S12NE64 MCUs.  Those
ports are very incomplete as of this writing.

This tarball contains a complete CVS snapshot from December 21, 2009

NuttX-5.1
---------

This is the 48th release of NuttX.  This release adds support for
two new MCU architectures in various states of development:

* AT91SAM3U (http://www.atmel.com/products/at91/sam3landing.asp?family_id=605)

  This release adds support for the SAM3U-EK development board with
  the AT91SAM3U4E MCU
  (http://www.atmel.com/dyn/products/product_card_mcu.asp?part_id=4562).
  As with most NuttX architecture releases, the release will be
  rolled out in two parts:  A basic port and an extended port.

  NuttX-5.1 includes the basic port for the SAM3U-EK board.  This
  release passes the NuttX OS test and is proven to have a valid
  OS implementation.  It supports the basic boot-up, serial console
  and timer interrupts.  A configuration to support the NuttShell
  is also included.

  The extended port will also include support for SDIO-based SD
  cards and USB device (and possible LCD support).  These extensions
  may or may not happen by the Nuttx 5.2 release as my plate is
  kind of full now.

* LPC3131 (http://ics.nxp.com/products/lpc3000/lpc313x.lpc314x.lpc315x/)

  This release also adds the complete implementation of the basic
  port for the NXP LPC3131 MCU on the Embedded Artists EA3131 board
  (http://www.embeddedartists.com/products/kits/lpc3131_kit.php).
  That port, unfortunately has stalled due to tools issues.  Those
  tool issues have been resolved and I am confident that the verified
  basic port will be available in NuttX-5.2.

  The extended release will follow and should include SDIO-based
  SD card support and device USB.

A few additional features and bugfixes of a minor nature were also
incorporated as detailed in the ChangeLog.

NuttX-5.2
---------

This is the 49th release of NuttX.  This release completes the
verification of the basic port for the NXP LPC3131 MCU on the
Embedded Artists EA3131 board
(http://www.embeddedartists.com/products/kits/lpc3131_kit.php).
This basic port includes basic boot-up, serial console, and timer
interrupts.  This port has been verified on the using the NuttX OS
test and includes a working implementation of the NuttShell (NSH).

An extended release will follow and should include SDIO-based SD
card support and device USB.

NuttX-5.3
---------

This is the 50th release of NuttX.  This release support for one new
architecture:

  * A basic port for the NXP LPC2378 MCU on the Olimex-LPC2378
    development board was contributed by Rommel Marcelo.

And extensions to two existing architectures:

  * David Hewson contributed a dual-speed (full/high) USB device-side
    driver for the NXP LPC3131 on the Embedded Artists EA3131
    development board.

  * A DMA driver and a high speed MCI driver for the Atmel AT91SAM3U
    are included (but not fully tested in this release).

Two important bugfix was also included:

  * An important fix to the USB mass storage driver was contributed
    by David Hewson.
  * A serious error in the AT91SAM3U PIO handling was fixed.

NuttX-5.4
---------

This is the 51st release of NuttX.  This release includes one new,
important extension to th NX graphics system (See
http://www.nuttx.org/NXGraphicsSubsystem.html).

NX was develop a couple years back on hardware that supported only
framebuffer devices, that is, video hardware with video memory
directly converts the memory content to video.  However, most MCUs
that NuttX focuses on do not support such video memory; rather,
that typically only support LCDs via parallel or serial interfaces.

This release of NuttX extends NX so that now renders directly to
the LCD device via its serial or parallel interface.  No in-memory
copy of the screen memory need be maintained so this solution should
also work in MCUs with very limited SRAM.

This initial release of this feature includes the verified NX
extensions plus a driver for the HX8347, 16-bit parallel LCD.  This
LCD supports 16-bit RGB (5:6:5).

NuttX-5.5
---------

This is the 52nd release of NuttX.  This release includes one new
port, some new drivers and some important bugfixes:

  * NuttX was ported to the Luminary/TI LM3S6965 Ethernet Evaluation
    Kit.  At present, that port includes an OS test configuration
    and a NuttShell (NSH) configuration with Telnet support.

    MMC/SD and Networking support are provided but not thoroughly
    verified in this release: Current development efforts are focused
    on porting the NuttX window system (NX) to work with the
    Evaluation Kits OLED display.

  * A NuttX Ethernet driver for the Microchip ENC28J60 SPI Ethernet
    chip is available in the source tree (but has not yet been fully
    verified because I haven't properly connected it to hardware
    yet).

  * The Olimex STR-P711 NuttX port was extended to support the
    ENC28J60 and some new networking configurations were added.
    The ENC28J60 has not been tested on the STR-P711, however,
    because of hardware issues (I don't think the USB powered board
    provides enough power for the ENC28J60 and I don't have the
    right wall wart yet).

    Along the way, external interrupt support (XTI) was added to
    the STMicro STR-P711 port and some important bugs were fixed
    in the STR-P711 SPI driver.

  * Added (optional) floating point support for printf().
    (Contributed by Yolande Cates.)

  * Corrected an important UDP reference counting error.  It was
    not a serious error, but it trigger an assertion was IS a serious
    error.

NuttX-5.6
---------

This is the 53rd release of NuttX.  This release includes one several
new drivers for existing NuttX ports:

  * This port adds support for the RiT displays P14201 4-bpp,
    greyscale OLED.  4-bpp greyscale support was integrated into
    the NX graphics sub-system and verified using the TI/Luminary
    LP3S6965 Ethernet Evaluation Kit.

  * The M25Px driver was extended for the M24P1 FLASH part (see NOTE).

  * An I2C driver and (basic) SPI driver were added for the NXP
    LPC313x port.  The I2C interface definition was extended to
    efficiently handle multiple I2C transfers.
    (Contributed by David Hewson.)

As well as a few, important USB-related bugfixes (See the ChangeLog
for details).

This release also includes the beginnings of a port for the NXP
LPC1768 MCU.  However, it is too early for that port to be useful
(stay tuned for a future announce of the availability of the LPC1768
port).

NuttX-5.7
---------

This is the 54th release of NuttX.  This release adds basic support
for one new ARM Cortex-M3 architecture:

  * Added support for NXP LPC1768 MCU as provided on the Nucleus
    2G board from 2G Engineering (http://www.2g-eng.com).
  * Some initial files for the LPC17xx family were released in NuttX
    5.6, but the first functional release for the NXP LPC1768/Nucleus2G
    occurred with NuttX 5.7.
  * That initial basic release included timer interrupts and a
    serial console and was verified using the NuttX OS test.
  * That release includes a verified NuttShell (NSH) configuration
    (see the http://www.nuttx.org/NuttShell.html).
  * Also included are unverified SPI and USB device drivers.

Further efforts include:
  (1) development of a DMA support library
  (2) SPI-based MMC/SD support
  (3) verification of the USB driver

Watch for announcement of the completed LPC1768 port expected in
NuttX-5.8.

NuttX-5.8
---------

This is the 55th release of NuttX.  This includes several important
bugfixes:

  * Corrects some interrupt vectoring for the TI/Stellarix LM3S
    port
  * Correct initialization logic for NXP LPC17xxx NuttX ports:
    Power was not being provided to the GPIO module!
  * Corrected (but did not verify) implementation of the optional
    interrupt stack feature (all Cortex M3 architectures).
  * Correct a HardFault in the LPC17xx SSP driver.

Additional minor fixes are also included as detailed in the ChangeLog.

Several new features have been fully developed and included in this
release, but full verification of most of these new features has
been blocked for a variety of issues:

  * Added microSD support for the NuttShell (NSH) configuration in
    the Nucleus2G LPC1768 port.  For reasons that have not yet been
    determined, I have not successfully accessed the microSD card
    as of this writing.
  * Two USB configurations were also added for the Nucleus2G board:
    One to support the USB serial device and one for the USB mass
    storage device.  Some testing of the USB driver was performed,
    but full verification is stalled for an OTG style USB cable.
  * LEDs now work correctly on the Nucleus2G LPC1768 board.
  * The NuttX/uIP networking subsystem now supports IGMPv2 client.
    IGMP (Internet Group Multicast Protocol) network "appliances"
    to join into multicast groups.  Outbound traffic to enter and
    leave multicast groups has been verified, but full verification
    will require a switch capable of multicast.  Issues associated
    with the receipt of multicast packets are likely.

NuttX-5.9
---------

This is the 56th release of NuttX.  This release is difficult to
categorize; NuttX-5.9 was really released because there were too
many changes accumulating in CVS -- a few important, some unfinished
implementations, and a couple of important bugfixes.

  * By far biggest change in this release is the complete implementation
    of on-demand paging support.  This feature will allow you to
    execute large programs on a mass storage device (such as SPI
    FLASH) in a small RAM.  All of the core on-demand paging logic
    was completed (see http://www.nuttx.org/NuttXDemandPaging.html)
    and support was implemented for the ARM-9 family.  A test
    configuration is in place for the NXP LPC3131.  It has been
    verified that this new logic does not interfere with normal
    fixed-page ARM9 operation, but otherwise this new on-demand
    paging feature is untested.
  * Add support for the CodeSourcery toolchain to the Olimex-lpc2378
    port and for the Neuros OSD port.
  * The Neuros OSD port has been updated to work with the production
    v1.0 OSD (previously it only worked with the development board).
  * And some miscellaneous feature enhancements as detailed in the
    ChangeLog.

This includes several important bugfixes:

  * NXP LPC17xx - Fixed a critical bug in the GPIO configuration
    logic: When attempting to set no pull-up or pull-down (floating),
    it would, instead, select pull-down.

  * TI/Luminary LM3Sxxxx - Fixed:
    (1) A logic error in an address table lookup.
    (2) GPIO port encoding the limited support to only 8 GPIO ports.

  * Corrected the lease time in the DHCPC implementation:  It was
    not in host byte order.

  * And several other less important bugs as documented in the
    ChangeLog: Warnings, cornercase compilation problems, etc.

NuttX-5.10
----------

This is the 57th release of NuttX.  This release includes a combination
of some new features as well as several bugfixes.  New features
include:

  * TI/Luminary Stellaris LM3S9B96:
    Header file changes contributed by Tiago Maluta.
  * TI/Luminary Stellaris LM3S8962:
    Header file changes and support for the Stellaris LM3S8962
    Ethernet+CAN Evaluation Board contributed by Larry Arnold.
  * On-Demand Paging Support:
    The basic logic for the On-Demand Paging feature is complete,
    implemented for the NXP LPC3131, and partially tested.  See
    http://www.nuttx.org/NuttXDemandPaging.html.  Some additional
    test infrastructure will be needed in order to complete the
    verification.  See configs/ea3131/README.txt for details.
  * Two Pass Build Support:
    The make system now supports a two pass build where a relocatable,
    partially linked object is created on the first pass and that
    object is linked with the NuttX libraries to produce the final
    executable on the second pass.  This two pass build is currently
    only used to support the On-Demand paging feature:  The first
    pass link forces critical logic into the locked text region;
    the second pass builds the NuttX executable more-or-less as
    normal.
  * CONFIG_APP_DIR:
    Generalized the way in which applications are built and linked
    with NuttX.  The new configuration CONFIG_APP_DIR replaces
    CONFIG_EXAMPLE.  CONFIG_EXAMPLE used to identify the sub-directory
    within the NuttX examples/ directory that held the example
    application to be built.  That made it awkward to configure to
    build an application that resides outside of the NuttX examples/
    directory.  CONFIG_APP_DIR is more general; it can be used to
    refer to any directory containing the application to be built.

    For people who have their own configurations and/or Makefiles,
    you will need to make a couple of changes:

      - Replace all occurrences of CONFIG_EXAMPLE=foobar with
    CONFIG_APP_DIR=examples/foobar in all of the configuration
    files.
      - Replace any occurrences of examples/$(CONFIG_EXAMPLE) with
    $(CONFIG_APP_DIR)
      - Replace any occurrences of lib$(CONFIG_EXAMPLE)$(LIBEXT)
        with libapp$(LIBEXT) in your Makefiles.
      - Check any other occurrences of CONFIG_EXAMPLE.

  * Several bugfixes are included as well as code changes to eliminate
    some warnings.  See the ChangeLog for details.

NuttX-5.11
----------

This is the 58th release of NuttX.  This is a bugfix release.

  * One very important bug fixes a race condition that can occur
    using semaphores that can be awakened by signals.  Under this
    particular race condition, a task could hang waiting for a
    semaphore.
  * Corrections to lm3s8962 port contributed by Larry Arnold.  That
    port is purported to work correctly with these changes in place.

Plus less critical bugfixes as detailed in the ChangeLog.  New features
include:

  * A new configuration to support the mbed.org LPC1768 board.
    (Contributed by Dave Marples.)
  * A driver for the Atmel AT45DB161D 4Mbit SPI FLASH part

NuttX-5.12
----------

This is the 59th release of NuttX.  This is a critical bugfix release.

  * Fixed an important error in the signal trampoline logic.
    Essentially, interrupts are re-enabled while the signal handler
    executes, but the logic to re-disable the interrupts before
    returning from the signal handler trampoline was missing.  Under
    certain circumstances, this can cause stack corruption.  This
    was discovered by David Hewson on an ARM9 platform, but since
    the code has been leveraged, the bug has been propagated from
    ARM to Cortex-M3, AVR32, M16C, SH1, ZNEO, eZ80, Z8, and Z80 --
    almost every architecture. The correction has been incorporated
    for all architectures but only verified on a few.

Other notable changes in NuttX-5.12:

  * A complete port for the AVR32 (AT32UC3B0256) is incorporated
    in the source tree.  Testing of this port is underway now.  This
    release was made before verifying this port in order to get the
    important bugfix in place.

  * Other miscellaneous bugfix and enhancements as noted in the
    ChangeLog.

NuttX-5.13
----------

This is the 60th release of NuttX.  Headlines for this release
include:

  * AVR32, www.mcuzone.com AVR32DEV1

    The port for the www.mcuzone.com AVRDEV1 board based on the
    Atmel AT32UC3B0256 MCU was (almost) fully integrated. The port
    now successfully passes the NuttX OS test (examples/ostest).
    A NuttShell (NSH) configuration is in place (see the NSH User
    Guide at http://www.nuttx.org/NuttShell.html). Testing of that
    NSH configuration, however, has been postponed (because it got
    bumped by the Olimex LPC1766-STK port -- see below)

    Current Status: I think I have a hardware problem with my serial
    port setup. There is a good chance that the NSH port is complete
    and functional, but I am not yet able to demonstrate that. At
    present, I get nothing coming in the serial RXD line (probably
    because the pins are configured wrong or I have the MAX232
    connected wrong).

    A complete port will include drivers for additional AVR32 UC3
    devices -- like SPI and USB --- and will be available in a
    later release, time permitting.

  * LPC1766, Olimex LPC1766-STK

    Support for the Olimex-LPC1766 is newly added to NuttX and is
    still undergoing development, test, and integration. Verified
    configurations for the NuttX OS test and for the NuttShell (NSH,
    see the NSH User Guide at http://www.nuttx.org/NuttShell.html.
    Additional USB configurations are in the release as well, but
    they have not yet been verified.  Goals for NuttX-5.14 include:
    (1) An Ethernet driver, (2) Verified USB support, and (3) SD
    card support.

  * Additional changes and bugfixes as detailed in the ChangeLog.

NuttX-5.14
----------

The 61st release of NuttX, NuttX-5.14, was made on November 27,
2010.  This release includes multiple, important bugfixes as well
as a new driver for the NXP LPC1766.

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r3137

Important bugfixes include:

  * Cortex-M3 Hard Fault.  Fixed a hard fault problem that can occur
    if certain types of interrupts are pending at the time another
    interrupt returns. This problem has only been observed on the
    LPC1766 (returning from a SYSTICK interrupt with a pending
    Ethernet interrupt).  However, it is assumed that all Cortex-M3
    ports could have this as a latent bug.

  * TCP/IP Sequence Number Bug.  Corrected errors some important
    logic in the way that sequence numbers are managed when send()
    sends out packets before a previous packet has been acknowledged.
    Some of that send() logic was incompatible with logic in the
    uIP layer.  Errors seen include: (1) The final final packet in
    a sequence of packets might be too large!  In the THTTPD example,
    this might leave some garbage at the bottom of the display. Or
    (2) send() might hang with outstanding, unacknowledged data
    (and with no re-transmission requests).  This was due to
    differences in sequence number handling in send() and in
    uip_tcpinput.c; uip_tcpinput.c thought (incorrectly) that all
    of the bytes were acknowledged; send.c knew that they were not.

  * One-Shot POSIX Timer Bug. Fixed an error in set-up of a one-shot
    POSIX timer.  It was using the repetitive timer value (which
    is zero in the one-shot case), always resulting in a 10Ms timer!
    Found and fixed by Wilton Tong.

Additional support has been included for the Olimex-LPC1766.  Support
for that board was added to NuttX 5.13.  This release extends that
support with an Ethernet driver.  Verified configurations are now
available for the NuttX OS test, for the NuttShell (NSH, see
http://www.nuttx.org/NuttShell.html), for the NuttX network test,
and for the THTTPD webserver. (Additional USB configurations are
in the release as well, but those have not yet been verified.  Goals
for NuttX-5.15 (and beyond) include: (1) Verified USB support, (2)
SD card support, and (3) LCD support.

NuttX-5.15
----------

The 62nd release of NuttX, NuttX-5.15, was made on December 12,
2010.  This release includes several bugfixes as well as feature
enhancements, primarily for the Olimex LPC1766-STK board.

Important bugfixes included:

  * Additional fixes needed with the TCP sequence number problem
    "fixed" in NuttX-5.14.
  * In the send() logic, now checks if the destination IP address
    is in the ARP table before sending the packet; an ARP request
    will go out instead.  This improves behavior, for example, on
    the first on the first GET request from a browser
  * All USB class drivers need to call DEV_CONNECT() when they are
    ready to be enumerated.  That is, (1) initially when bound to
    the USB driver, and (2) after a USB reset.
  * The SPI_SETBITS macro was calling the SPI setmode method.
  * And several other bug fixes of lower importance (see the
    ChangeLog for details).

And feature enhancements:

  * The LPC176x Ethernet driver was using all of AHB SRAM Bank0 for
    Ethernet packet buffers (16K).  An option was added to limit
    the amount of SRAM used for packet buffering and to re-use any
    extra Bank0 memory for heap.

  * Enabled networking and SD/MMC card support in the Olimex
    LPC1766-STK NuttShell (NSH) configuration.

  * The LPC176x USB driver is now fully fully functional.
  * Added an optional cmddata() method to the SPI interface.  Some
    devices require an additional out-of-band bit to specify if the
    next word sent to the device is a command or data. The cmddata
    method provides selection of command or data.

  * A driver for the Nokia 6100 LCD (with either the Phillips PCF8833
    LCD controller and for the Epson S1D15G10 LCD controller) and
    an NX graphics configuration for the Olimex LPC1766-STK have
    been added.  However, neither the LCD driver nor the NX
    configuration have been verified as of the this release.

NuttX-5.16
----------

The 63rd release of NuttX, Version 5.16, was made on January 10,
2010 and is available for download from the SourceForge website.
This release includes initial support for USB host in NuttX. The
USB host infrastructure is new to NuttX. This initial USB host release
is probably only beta quality; it is expected the some bugs remain
in the logic and that the functionality requires extension.

Below is a summary of the NuttX USB host implementation as extracted
from the NuttX Porting Guide:

  6.3.9 USB Host-Side Drivers
  * include/nuttx/usb/usbhost.h. All structures and APIs needed to
    work with USB host-side drivers are provided in this header
    file.
  * struct usbhost_driver_s. Each USB host controller driver must
    implement an instance of struct usbhost_driver_s. This structure
    is defined in include/nuttx/usb/usbhost.h.  Examples:
    arch/arm/src/lpc17xx/lpc17_usbhost.c.
  * struct usbhost_class_s. Each USB host class driver must implement
    an instance of struct usbhost_class_s. This structure is also
    defined in include/nuttx/usb/usbhost.h.  Examples:
    drivers/usbhost/usbhost_storage.c
  * USB Host Class Driver Registry. The NuttX USB host infrastructure
    includes a registry. During its initialization, each USB host
    class driver must call the interface, usbhost_registerclass()
    in order add its interface to the registry. Later, when a USB
    device is connected, the USB host controller will look up the
    USB host class driver that is needed to support the connected
    device in this registry.  Examples: drivers/usbhost/usbhost_registry.c,
    drivers/usbhost/usbhost_registerclass.c, and
    drivers/usbhost/usbhost_findclass.c,
  * Detection and Enumeration of Connected Devices. Each USB host
    device controller supports two methods that are used to detect
    and enumeration newly connected devices (and also detect
    disconnected devices):
    + int (*wait)(FAR struct usbhost_driver_s *drvr, bool connected);
      Wait for a device to be connected or disconnected.
    + int (*enumerate)(FAR struct usbhost_driver_s *drvr);
      Enumerate the connected device. As part of this enumeration
      process, the driver will (1) get the device's configuration
      descriptor, (2) extract the class ID info from the configuration
      descriptor, (3) call usbhost_findclass() to find the class
      that supports this device, (4) call the create() method on
      the struct usbhost_registry_s interface to get a class instance,
      and finally (5) call the connect() method of the struct
      usbhost_class_s interface. After that, the class is in charge
      of the sequence of operations.
  * Binding USB Host-Side Drivers. USB host-side controller drivers
    are not normally directly accessed by user code, but are usually
    bound to another, higher level USB host class driver. The class
    driver exports the standard NuttX device interface so that the
    connected USB device can be accessed just as with other, similar,
    on-board devices. For example, the USB host mass storage class
    driver (drivers/usbhost/usbhost_storage.c) will register a
    standard, NuttX block driver interface (like /dev/sda) that can
    be used to mount a file system just as with any other other
    block driver instance. In general, the binding sequence is:

    1. Each USB host class driver includes an initialization entry
       point that is called from the application at initialization
       time.  This driver calls usbhost_registerclass() during this
       initialization in order to makes itself available in the
       event that the device that it supports is connected.  Examples:
       The function usbhost_storageinit() in the file
       drivers/usbhost/usbhost_storage.c
    2. Each application must include a waiter thread thread that
       (1) calls the USB host controller driver's wait() to detect
       the connection of a device, and then (2) call the USB host
       controller driver's enumerate method to bind the registered
       USB host class driver to the USB host controller driver.
       Examples: The function nsh_waiter() in the file
       configs/nucleus2g/src/up_nsh.c and the function nsh_waiter()
       in the file configs/olimex-lpc1766stk/src/up_nsh.c.
    3. As part of its operation during the binding operation, the
       USB host class driver will register an instances of a standard
       NuttX driver under the /dev directory. To repeat the above
       example, the USB host mass storage class driver
       (drivers/usbhost/usbhost_storage.c) will register a standard,
       NuttX block driver interface (like /dev/sda) that can be
       used to mount a file system just as with any other other
       block driver instance.  Examples: See the call to
       register_blockdriver() in the function usbhost_initvolume()
       in the file drivers/usbhost/usbhost_storage.c.

NuttX-5.17
----------

The 64th release of NuttX, Version 5.17, was made on January 19,
2011 and is available for download from the SourceForge website.
This release follows close on the heels of the 5.16 release and
extends the USB host capabilities first introduced in that version.

  * The LPC17xx USB host controller driver was extended to (1) add
    support for low-speed devices, (2) handle multiple concurrent
    transfers on different endpoints (still only one TD per endpoint),
    and (3) handle periodic interrupt endpoint types.

  * Add a USB host HID keyboard class driver.  Now you can connect
    a standard USB keyboard to NuttX and receive keyboard input for
    an application.

And other changes as detailed in the ChangeLog.

NuttX-5.18
----------

The 65th release of NuttX, Version 5.18, was made on February 27,
2011 and is available for download from the SourceForge website.
This is first release from the new NuttX SVN repository.  This
release is made primarily to keep the release tarball in synchronization
with SVN.  Many smaller changes have been made as identified in the
ChangeLog.  Headlines include:

  * Incorporate several important uIP patches -- including the well
    known patch to handle missing SYNACK.
  * The Freescale mc8s12ne64 port is code complete but testing has
    not yet begun due to toolchain issues.  Added support for the
    Future Electronics Group NE64 Badge board.
  * Added support for a new STM32 board, the ISOTEL NetClamps VSN
    V1.2 ready2go sensor network platform.  This board is based on
    a STM32F103RET6 and includes some interesting power saving/clock
    control extensions.
  * USB host support expanded to handle vendor specific USB devices.
  * Incorporated the LUFA HID parser.
  * Various bugfix as detailed in the ChangeLog

NuttX-5.19
----------

The 66th release of NuttX, Version 5.19, was made on March 12, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  This
release includes several new features in various states of integration
and maturity:

  * 486SX QEMU port.  This port supports the Intel 486SX architecture
    using the QEMU simulator.  Initial functionality is in place a
    partially tested.  There are still some outstanding issues with
    timer interrupts.
  * Platform specific application support.  A new apps/ directory
    appears in this port.  This apps/ directory provides a mechanism
    for applications using NuttX to have a highly customized
    initialization process. It supports a set of end-user applications
    than can be executed (1) standalone so you can have a fully
    customized application startup, or (2) on top of NSH.  Think
    of it this way:  In a buckled-up embedded application, your
    end-user programs will probably have their own dedicated start-up
    logic.  But, during development, you might want to have you
    applications available and executable from the NSH command line.
    This apps/ add-on (and NSH hooks) was contributed by Uros to
    accomplish just that.
  * NSH was also extended to support application specific ROMFS
    /etc/init.d/rcS start-up scripts.  This feature, as well, as
    all of the above-mentioned apps/ directory support was contributed
    by Uros Platise
  * Additional NSH improvements and bug fixes.  See the Changelog
    for details.
  * This release also provides a new SLIP network driver.  This
    driver should support point-to-point network communications to
    a host using TCP/IP or UDP.  This driver is code complete, but
    not tested in this release.
  * New RAMTRON FRAM driver (contributed by Uros Platise)
  * New generic 16550 UART driver.
  * Cortex-M3 Power improvements: Waits for Interrupt (WFI) in idle
    loop for reduced power consumption (LPC17xx and STM32 only -
    contributed by Uros Platise))
  * New waitpid() system interface.
  * Additional bugfixes: pipes, stdint.h, STM32 SDIO and SPI drivers

NuttX-6.0
---------

The 67th release of NuttX, Version 6.0, was made on March 21, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The
version number of this release was bumped from 5.19 to 6.0.  A
change in the major revision number is used to reflect an incompatibility
with previous versions.  In this release, the NuttX core OS
functionality has been separated from NuttX application-related
functionality.  These are provided as separate tarballs:

  * nuttx-6.0.tar.gz, and
  * apps-6.0.tar.gz

The purpose of this separation is both to better organize and
modularize the NuttX source tree, but also to provide better support
for incorporation of end-user applications with Nuttx.

The incompatibility results from the changes to the board configuration
logic needed to supported the separable application.  The major
changes to the configuration include:

  * CONFIG_APPS_DIR - This should not be set.  The default is
    ../apps.  This should only be set if you have a custom,
    product-specific application directory in some different location.

  * appconfig - Each board configuration now requires a new file
    called 'appconfig.'  As its name suggests, this file provides
    new configuration information needed by the logic in ../apps.

In addition to this major reorganization in the directory structure,
this release also includes some important extensions to existing
features and some important bugfixes.  These include:

  * The SLIP driver was been well debugged and significantly
    re-designed.  Now you can have an Ethernet connection to you
    board even if you have no Ethernet hardware.  How cool is that?

  * The QEMU i486 port is now functional.  It has also been reported
    to work on the Bifferboard (see http://bifferos.bizhat.com/).

  * And extensions to the uIP driver interface, and

  * Bug fixes to fopen() and STM32 GPIO configuration

Please see the ChangeLog for details.

NuttX-6.1
---------

The 68th release of NuttX, Version 6.1, was made on April 10, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The
6.0 release introduced a detach-able application environment to
build applications outside of the NuttX source tree.  The primary
purpose of this release is to correct numerous build problems
introduced by that architectural change:

  * In many newer environments, NuttX produced strange Makefile
    errors but built correctly in older environments.  A fix provided
    by Rafael Noronha was incorporated and is reported to fix those
    build problems.
  * The apps/ directory build system would not handle Windows-native
    toolchains due to obscure path formatting issues.
  * And other problems as detailed in the Changelog.

Many additional changes were made in the 6.1 release for another
major architectural change:  NuttX will now build as a separately
linked microkernel.  In this build option the RTOS builds as a
kernel, applications build separately and interface with kernel via
system calls.  Applications run in user mode and kernel logic users
in kernel-mode.  This provides a secure environment for NuttX.  This
feature is fully coded in NuttX-6.1, but has not been tested due
to higher priority tasks that have arisen.

Related to this change, support for the Cortex-M3 memory protection
unit (MPU) has been integrated with the NuttX kernel build to provide
an even higher level of security.

NOTE: This kernel build is an option; the default build configuration
is still the standard, flat, unsecured RTOS as in previous releases.

Additional new features in this release:

  * Support for LPC17xx GPIO interrupts (with much support from
    Decio Renno).
  * Basic timer support for STM32 (Contributed by Uros Platise)
  * A binfs file system.  This is a tiny pseudo file system that
    lets named applications to be viewed and accessed in NSH under
    the /bin directory.
  * An I2C-based driver for the LIS331DL MEMS motion sensor.
    (Contributed by Uros Platise.)
  * A configuration for the Embedded Artists LPCXpresso LPC1768 board.
  * The user_initialize() interface has been removed.

And several bugfix associated with SD drivers, opendir(), signed
8-bit types (int8_t), and USB serial device.  See the ChangeLog for
details.

NuttX-6.2
---------

The 69th release of NuttX, Version 6.2, was made on May 6, 2011 and
is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The 6.2
release includes several new features:

  * NXFFS: The obvious new feature is NXFFS, the NuttX wear-leveling
    FLASH file system.   This new file system is intended to be
    small for the MCU usage and has some limitations.  No formal
    documentation of NXFFS yet exists.  See the fs/nxffs/README.txt
    file for details (see
    http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk/nuttx/fs/nxffs/README.txt?view=log)
  * Support for NXP LPCXpresso LPC1768 board on the Embedded
    Artists base board.  The Code Red toolchain is supported under
    either Linux or Windows.   Verified configurations include
    dhcpd, nsh, nx, ostest, thttpd, and usbstorage.
  * Support for the Univision UG-9664HSWAG01 OLED with Solomon
    Systech SD1305 LCD controller.
  * A new RAM MTD driver with FLASH simulation capability.
  * A version.h file is now automatically generated so that C code
      can now be version aware.

In addition to these new feature, several important bugfixes are
included in this release correcting problems with dup2(), LPC17xx
GPIO interrupts, LPC17xx UART2/3, the FAT file system, build issues,
and strrch().  See the ChangeLog for more details.

NuttX-6.3
---------

The 70th release of NuttX follows only a nines days after the release
of version 6.2.  It was released on May 15, 2011.  This special
back-to-back release was made so that the current released version
of NuttX will correspond to the initial release from the RGMP
project.

This release adds architecture support and build configuration for
RGMP.  RGMP is a project for running GPOS and RTOS simultaneously
on multi-processor platforms. See
http://rgmp.sourceforge.net/wiki/index.php/Main_Page for further
information about RGMP.

This release also includes support for STM32 FLASH, build improvements,
and initial, incomplete support for the MicroChip PIC32MX MCU.  Bug
fixes are included for some build problems, USB host class driver
error handling, NX graphics color mapping, and problems with C
standard I/O buffer flushing.  See the ChangeLog for further details.

NuttX-6.4
---------

The 71st release of NuttX, Version 6.4, was made on June 5, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The
6.4 release includes several new features:

  * A new, full-featured FTP client.  This client may be used as a library
    for automated FTP or via an FTP client shell.  The FTP shell
    supports the following commands: cd, chmod, get, help, idle,
    login, ls, quit, mkdir, noop, put, pwd, rename, rhelp, rm,
    rmdir, size, time, and up.  A configuration is available for
    the NXP LPC17xx to demonstrate this functionality.
  * A functional C1101 wireless driver (contributed by Uros Platise)
  * A PCI-based E1000 Ethernet driver (contributed by Yu Qiang)
  * New C library functions: inet_addr() (contributed by Yu Qiang),
    strndup(), asprintf()
  * Reduced memory allocation overhead for MCUs with small heaps (<64K).
  * fdopen() now works with socket descriptors allowing standard
    buffered C functions to be used for network communications.
  * The NSH ifconfig command can now be used to set or change the
    IP address (contributed by Yu Qiang)

This release also includes some completed but untested functionality.

  * The MicroChip PIC32MX port is now code complete and ready to
    begin testing.  Unfortunately, testing will be delayed due to
    tool issues.
  * Support for the NXP LPC315x MCUs.

Additional miscellaneous enhancements and bug fixes to task_delete(),
recvfrom(), and other changes as noted in the ChangeLog.

NuttX-6.5
---------

The 72nd release of NuttX, Version 6.5, was made on June 21, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The
6.5 release is all about support for the Atmel 8-bit AVR family.
I have been interested in the AVR family for some time but because
of the severe SRAM constraints and because of the availability of
many tiny schedulers for the AVR, it has not been "on the radar
screen."  However, I have recently become interested because of
interest expressed by members of the forum and because of the
availability of newer, larger capacity AVR parts (that I don't have
yet).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r3730

This release includes support for the following AVR boards.  As
with any initial support for new architectures, there are some
incomplete areas and a few caveats that need to be stated.  Here
they are, ordered from the least to the most complete:

  * SoC Robotics Amber Web Server (ATMega128).

    This port of NuttX to the Amber Web Server from SoC Robotics
    (http://www.soc-robotics.com/index.htm).  Is only partially in
    place.  The Amber Web Server is based on an Atmel ATMega128
    (128K FLASH but only 4K of SRAM).

    STATUS: Work on this port has stalled due to toolchain issues.  It
    is complete, but untested.

  * Micropendous 3 AT9USB647

    This port of NuttX to the Opendous Micropendous 3 board. The
    Micropendous3 may be populated with an AT90USB646, 647, 1286,
    or 1287.  See http://code.google.com/p/opendous/. I have only
    the AT90USB647 version for testing.  This version has very
    limited memory resources: 64K of FLASH and 4K of SRAM.

    STATUS: The basic port was released in NuttX-6.5.  This basic
    port consists only of a "Hello, World!!" example that demonstrates
    initialization of the OS, creation of a simple task, and serial
    console output.  The tiny SRAM limits what you can do with the
    AT90USB647 (see issues below).

  * PJRC Teensy++ 2.0 AT9USB1286

    This is a port of NuttX to the PJRC Teensy++ 2.0 board.  This
    board was developed by PJRC (http://pjrc.com/teensy/). The
    Teensy++ 2.0 is based on an Atmel AT90USB1286 MCU with 128K
    of FLASH and 8K of SRAM; a little more room to move than the
    AT90USB647.

    STATUS:  The basic port was released in NuttX-6.5.  This basic
    port consists of a "Hello, World!!" example and also slightly
    simplified NuttShell (NSH) configuration (see the NSH User Guide
    at http://www.nuttx.org/NuttShell.html).

    An SPI driver and a USB device driver exist for the AT90USB as
    well as a USB mass storage configuration.  However, this
    configuration is not fully debugged as of the NuttX-6.5 release.

AVR-specific issues.  The basic AVR port is solid and biggest issue
for using AVR is its tiny SRAM memory and its Harvard architecture.
Because of the Harvard architecture, constant data that resides to
flash is inaccessible using "normal" memory reads and writes (only
SRAM data can be accessed "normally").  Special AVR instructions
are available for accessing data in FLASH, but these have not been
integrated into the normal, general purpose OS.

Most NuttX test applications are console-oriented with lots of
strings used for printf and debug output.  These strings are all
stored in SRAM now due to these data accessing issues and even the
smallest console-oriented applications can quickly fill a 4-8K
memory.  So, in order for the AVR port to be useful, one of two
things would need to be done:

1. Don't use console applications that required lots of strings.
   The basic AVR port is solid and your typical deeply embedded
   application should work fine.

2. Create a special version of printf that knows how to access
   strings that reside in FLASH (or EEPROM).

NuttX-6.6
---------

The 73rd release of NuttX, Version 6.6, was made on July 11, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  The
6.6 release adds several smaller features but is mostly a bugfix
release.

Bugfixes include

  * Fixed several NX Graphics bugs: Rendering fonts at >8 bits-per-pixel,
    graphics move logic, and display artifacts that appear when a
    window is closed.
  * Corrections to the USB host mass storage class driver
  * STM32 bugfixes: serial driver, GPIO interrupt handling
  * LPC17xx: Changes for a success compilation with no console.
  * Corrections to the Teensy AT90USB SD driver
  * Changes for a clean compilation under the ZDS-II toolchain.

Minor features:

  * Add logic to extract printf strings from FLASH (but there are
    still printf issues for that target)
  * Added a configuration for the Sure Electronics PIC32MX board.
    However, higher priority tasks have stopped work on that
    configuration.
  * Added several new configurations for the STMicro STM3210E-EVAL
    board.
  * Added support for the STM3210E-EVAL board: (1) LCD in either
    landscape or portrait mode, and (2) interrupting buttons.
  * Added a configuration option to use different serial ports for
    debug and for the NSH serial console (there are some issues
    with CR-LF expansion and character echo if NSH is not run on
    the console).
  * Standardized the button press and button interrupt interfaces
    so that they are common across all boards.
  * Added a new graphics example that focuses on placing text on
    the background while pop-up windows occur.  Text should continue
    to update normally with or without the popup windows present.
  * Added ARM stack checking logic.

See the ChangeLog for a detailed description of these changes.

NuttX-6.7
---------

The 74th release of NuttX, Version 6.7, was made on August 2, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.7.tar.gz and
apps-6.7.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).  Changes in this release are summarized
below:

  * New OS APIs: Add the standard sem_timedwait() interface.
  * FAT File System:  Adds (optional) support for VFAT long file
    names.
  * USB:  Now the mass storage device can be connected when needed
    and disconnected when not needed (or re-connected as a different
    kind of device).
  * Touchscreen Support:  Defined a new NuttX touchscreen interface.
    Added a driver for the TI TSC2007 touchscreen controller chip.
  * NX Fonts:  Add support for multiple fonts; developed a tool to
    convert open source fonts into NuttX format; Converted and
    installed nine new, high quality fontsets.
  * NX Graphics: Add new NX APIs to support drawing of wide lines
    in any orientation.  Added new low level routines to set
    individual pixel more efficiently.
  * Build system:  Added a export target that will bundle up all
    of the NuttX libraries, header files, and the startup object
    into an exportable tarball.
  * LPC17xx: A CAN driver was contributed by Li Zhuoyi (Lzyy).
  * STM32: New NX-related configurations to exercise text and
    graphic image displays.
  * C Library:  Added a fixed precision atan2() math function.
  * Bugfixes:  Serial RX overrun error, FAT upper/lower NT 8.3 name
    handling fixed.  FAT directory allocation and initialization
    bug.  STM32 SDIO DMA race condition bug.  eZ80 UART1 serial
    driver errors (Paul Osmialowski)

NuttX-6.8
---------

The 75th release of NuttX, Version 6.8, was made on August 19, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.8.tar.gz and
apps-6.8.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).  Changes in this release are summarized
below:

  * NuttX has been ported to run on the Freescale Cortex-M4 "Kinetis"
    boards.  Two board ports are available for (1) the Kinetis
    KwikStik-K40 and (2) the Kinetis TWR-K60N512 tower.
  * Support for RGMP 0.3.  This version of RGMP now runs on the
    OMAP4430 (arm) pandaboard
  * LPC17xx CAN driver extended to support both CAN1 and CAN2
    (submitted by Li Zhuoy (Lzzy))
  * Fixed several critical bugs related to signal handling
    initialization and for signals the wake up tasks that are waiting
    to send or receive message queues.Both are important.  (submitted
    by hkwilton).
  * drivers/can.c:  Fixed a semaphore overflow problem in the CAN
    driver (reported by Li Zhouy (Lzzy)).
  * Added a new ADC driver infrastructure and TI ADS1255 driver
    both developed and submitted by Li Zhouy (Lzzy)).

See the Changelog for additional changes included in this release.

NuttX-6.9
---------

The 76th release of NuttX, Version 6.9, was made on September 11, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.9.tar.gz and
apps-6.9.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release includes a few new features and several important bug fixes.
The new features (some still incomplete) include:

  * Analog Support/ NXP LPC17xx: New DAC sub-system including ADC and DAC
    drivers for the LPC17xx.  Extensions to the ADS1255 driver.
    (Contributed by Li Zhuoyi (Lzyy))

  * Power Management:  Added a new NuttX power management sub-system for
    controlling and coordinating reduced power states.  At present, only
    verified in a simulation environment.

  * I2C Test Tool:  A new application was added that can be used to
    verify and debug I2C interfaces from the NuttShell (NSH) command
    line.

  * NuttShell (NSH):  In addition to the I2C test tool, a date command
    is now supported (if CONFIG_RTC is defined) that can be used to
    read and set the RTC.

  * NXP LPC17xx: I2C and DAC driver for the NXP LPC17xx family submitted by Li Zhuoyi
   (Lzyy)

  * Kinetis Cortex-M4:  Added a SDHC driver for the Kinetis parts.
    Complete debug of the Kinetis SDHC driver was not completed, however,
    do to some higher priority tasks that forced me to stop work.

  * Other new drivers: Driver for I2C-based at24cxx EEPROM submitted by
    Li Zhuoyi (Lzyy); Driver for the LM-75 temperature sensor.  Support
    for the LM-75 temperature sensor integrated into the SM3210E-EVAL
    development board.

  * NuttX Graphics (NX):  Added new NX interfaces for drawing circles,
    both circle outlines and filled circles.

  * FLASH: Added a function that accepts the path to a block driver and
    then erases the underlying FLASH memory

  * Build System:  The Make export logic now also tries to track down all
    architecture-specific header files and include these in the NuttX
    export bundle as well.  Various changes and modifications so that
    NuttX wil build on FreeBSD using the ASH shell (submitted by Kurt Lidl).

Bugfixes, order roughly on decreasing criticality include:

  * STM32 I2C Driver:  Add resets, timeout, and other fixes to work
    reliably with the I2C tool.  Corrected a major error introduced in
    NuttX 6.8.

  * BCH Driver.  Several important bugs (noted by Li Zhuoyi (Lzyy))
    were fixed.

  * C Library:  Fixed errors in gmtime() and gmtime_r() that could lead to
    errors in date calculations.

  * Timing:  Correct an error in the tv_nsec calculation that happens
    only config CONFIG_RTC is enabled

  * Build System: Use of -print-libgcc-file-name to get path to
    libgcc.a might select the wrong libgcc.a if a multilib toolchain
    is used

NuttX-6.10
----------

The 77th release of NuttX, Version 6.10, was made on October 6, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.10.tar.gz and
apps-6.10.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4028

This release includes a few new features and several important bug fixes.
The new features (some still incomplete) include:

  * CDC ACM serial class device-side driver

  * RTC:  Now supports hi-res and lo-res hardware RTC.  The lo-res RTC
    runs at 1Hz.

  * STM32 I2C driver.  Now supports faster, polled mode of operation.
    Added an I2C trace capability.

  * ADS7843E touchscreen driver.  As used on the SAM3U-EK development
    board.

  * AT91SAM3U SPI driver.  To support the ADS7843E toucscreen

  * X11 Support on simulation target.  Build errors in the X11 windows
    for the simulated target have been correct.  Added support for a
    simulated touchscreen on the X11 window (based on mouse inputs).

  * System Timer. Added support for a 64-bit system timer.

  * TIFF Support. Added a TIFF library (currently used for storing
    LCD screen shots).

  * LCD Support.  Added a test to verify that we read and write correct
    to LCD GRAM memory.

  * I2C tool. Extended to support to include a verify command and
    repititions and auto-address increment for most commands.

  * USB terminal example.  Line oriented serial bridge connects a host
    USB serial terminal to a host UART serial terminal.

  * Build System.  apps/ Makefile will now include external directories
    in the application build.

Bugfixes, order roughly on decreasing criticality include:

  * Message Queues.  Correct errors in mq_timedsend() and
    mq_timedrecieve().

  * FAT. Writes that cross sector boundaries, stray write into the FAT,
    and a FAT long file name issue

  * NXFFS.  Added a missed error check.  Files cannot be opened for
    writing if they are already opened for reading.

  * Library: fopen() for append modse was not appending.

  * STM32 I2C driver.  Correct another conflict between concurrent FSMC
    and I2C1 accesses.  Fixed some bad error detection logic.

  * STM32 SDHC driver.  Interrupts were being left disabled.

NuttX-6.11
----------

The 78th release of NuttX, Version 6.11, was made on November 12, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.11.tar.gz and
apps-6.11.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4090

This release is a maintenance release that includes a few new features
and some important bugfixes.  New features include:

    * NX Graphics:  New interfaces to read from graphics memory
    * Drivers:  AT24 FLASH driver will now supports clustering of blocks
      to achieve a larger, more usable block size for NXFFS.
    * STM32: LCD color corrections
    * PIC32: Board configuration for the Microchip PIC32 Ethernet Starter kit
      (not yet verified), new GPIO support library, button and LED support
      for the Sure Electronics PIC32MX board.  A lot of progress has been
      made on the PIC32 NuttX port, but it is still not ready for prime time.
    * NXP LPC3152: Board configuration for the Embedded Artists EA3152.

Bugfixes, order roughly on decreasing criticality include:

    * NXFFS: Corrected critical bugs in initialization, some full FLASH handling,
      and errors in certain cases where the FLASH is repacked.
    * ARM EABI: Fix stack aligment required for passing floating point values.
    * Build system: Fix build issues when g++ is used as the compiler.
    * NX Graphics: Bitmap error handling, correct RGB color conversion macros,
      Error when the background window is released.
    * STM32: RTC build fixes, LCD color corrections
    * Simulation target: build fixes
    * C Library: fclose() return value.

See the change log for more detailed information.

NuttX-6.12
----------

The 79th release of NuttX, Version 6.12, was made on December 6, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.12.tar.gz and
apps-6.12.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4141

New features in this release include:

    * STM32. Basic support added for the STM32 F4 family.  Board support
      verified for the STMicro STM3250G-EVAL board.
    * FAT.  Enhanced partition handling.
    * SDIO-Based SD Card support.  Add support for large (>4Gb) devices
    * Graphics.  Added four new small sans serif fonts.
    * Drivers. Fix a banding problem with the R61580 LCD.

Bugfixes, order roughly on decreasing criticality include:

    * FAT. Fix errors in how the first entries in the root directory are
      added.  Fix errors in FAT date/time handling.
    * Signals.  Fix bug in certain sig_timedwait() error handling.
    * Drivers. Fix cloned errors in poll() handling in several drivers.
    * Message Queues.  errno was not being set correctly by mq_notify().
    * C Library. wchar_t is a built-in type for C++

NuttX-6.13
----------

The 80th release of NuttX, Version 6.13, was made on December 26, 2011
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.13.tar.gz and
apps-6.13.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4231

New features in this release include:

    * Drivers. New standard interface for PWM drivers and common
      "upper half" PWM driver.  Updated the MP25x driver to support
      the Macronix MX25 chips (submitted by Mohammad Elwakeel).
    * STM32 F1/F4.  Added an Ethernet driver, ADC drivers, DAC driver,
      PWM driver, CAN driver, F4 RTC driver, F4 DMA support,
      logic for saving/restoring F4 FPU registers in context switches.
    * STM32 Boards.  Added STM3240G-EVAL DHPCD and nettest configuration.
      Support for a new STM32 board, the HY-Mini STM32v board, was
      contributed by Laurent Latil
    * PIC32.  The port to the Microchip PIC32MX is finally functional and
      reliable.  The NuttX PIC32 port has verified configurations for
      the OS test and the NuttShell (NSH) both exist.
    * Tests:  New re-usable tests (in apps/examples) for PWM, ADC, and
      CAN loopback.  Several existing tests can now be built as NSH built-in
      applicaitons (dhcpd, nettest, and all of the new tests).

Bugfixes, order roughly on decreasing criticality include:

    * STM32:  Correct handling of data overrun conditions.  Existing logic
      would hang with infinite interrupts when a data overrun occurred.
    * DHCPD.  Fix several problems using host order address where network
      addresses expected (and vice versa).

And several others.  See the ChangeLog for more details.

NuttX-6.14
----------

The 81st release of NuttX, Version 6.14, was made on January 15, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.14.tar.gz and
apps-6.14.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4301

New features in this release include:

    * Drivers. The upper-half PWM driver will now support a pulse count (as
      would be needed to control a stepper motor).

    * STM32.  The CAN driver has been verified in loopback mode.  ADC driver
      support for the STM32 F4.  Add support for UART4-5 and USART6
      (Contributed by Mike Smith).  The PWM driver now supports a pulse
      count for TIM1 and TIM8.  Timer driver now supports the F4's 32-bit
      timers (Contributed by Mikhail Bychek)

    * STM32F4Discovery.  Support for the STM32F4-Discovery board contributed
      by Mike Smith.

    * STM3240G-EVAL.  Add support for user control of LEDs.

    * LPC17xx.  Add support for loopback mode to CAN driver.  CAN TX done
      perations are now interrupt driver.  Now supports configurable CAN bit
      rate.

    * LPC1766-STK. Add support for on-board buttons. Add support for user
      control of LEDs.

    * LM3S.  Add support for the LM3S6432S2E on the TI RDK-S2E (Contributed
      by Mike Smith)

    * PIC32MX.  USB device-side driver (needs further testing).  A partial
      Ethernet driver is also in place.

    * Library. Support added for fixed floating point fieldwidths in output
      formatting (Contributed by Mikhail Bychek)

    * Build.  New targets apps_clean and apps_distclean to simplify working
      with application diretories.

Bugfixes include:

    * Drivers.  Fixed a buffer-full test in the upper-half CAN driver.

    * STM32.  GPIO initialize logic (submitted by Mike Smith).  Fix the
      debug logic that dumps the GPIO configuration.

    * LPC17xxx.  Correct an integeter overlow in GPIO interrupt setup
      (prevented pins > 15 from being used as interrupt sources).  Correct
      a value used in GPIO interrupt number range test.

    * FAT.  Now returns the correct error value when it is unable to
      recognize the file system.

    * Build.  MAC OS build fixes (submitted by Mike Smith)

And several others.  See the ChangeLog for more details.

NuttX-6.15
----------

The 82nd release of NuttX, Version 6.15, was made on February 12, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.15.tar.gz and
apps-6.15.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4387

New features and extended functionality:

    * General Drivers:  Add support for (29-bit) extended CAN IDs.  Add an
      infrastructure to support battery drivers.   Add a driver for MAX17040x
      battery "fuel gauge".  Add support for Composite USB drivers (in
      particular for a CDC/ACM with MSC USB composite driver).

      Added a new RAM logging driver.  This will allow debug output into
      a RAM buffer associated with a character driver at /dev/ramlog.
      Added the new command 'dmesg' to NSH that can be used to dump the
      current contents of the log.  This is useful for systems that do not
      have the usual serial console (for example, if you only have a
      Telnet console with NSH).

    * Networking:  Add a lower level, primitive socket interface.  Telnet
      driver:

      A New Telnet daemon was created.  It wraps a Telnet session within a
      character driver that can serve as a "controlling terminal."  The
      Telnet session will then be inherited by tasks created from the
      Telnet session and the stdin/stdout from the created task will
      still go through the same Telnet connection.

    * STM32 Drivers.  PWM driver pulse count was limited to 128; now is
      (essentially) unlimited.  Add support for (29-bit) extended CAN IDs.
      Add support for I2C3.  The SDIO driver is (mostly) verified on the
      STM32 F4 platforms.

    * LPC17xx Drivers.  Extended the CAN driver so that the TSEG1 and TSEG2
      bit times can be set via the NuttX configuration.  Add support for
      (29-bit) extended CAN IDs.

    * PIC32 Drivers. The PIC32 Ethernet driver is code complete (but still
      untested).

    * FTPD.  Add a new FTP server daemon.  This is based loosely on
      the hwport_ftpd library provided by Jaehyuk Cho.

    * Library:  Add support for on_exit().  Implemented tcsetattr() and
      tcgetattr().  Moved the old, too-smart fgets() to a new application
      library function called readline().  Dumbed down the original fgets().
      Add strcasestr(), avsprintf(), inet_ntop(), and inet_pton().
      Add support to enable or disable debug output.

    * Build system: Support for building a 32-bit simulation executable on
      a 64-bit Linux machine.  Correct a dependency issue in the arch/*/src/board
      directory.

Bugfixes:

    * System:  Correct PTHREAD_MUTEX_INITIALIZER

    * FAT: Fix an error in the FAT statfs() reported by David Sidrane.

    * STM32: Fix clock frequencies for APB2 timers.  Correct AFIO register
      offset.

    * PIC32.  Correct GPIOs used for LEDs on the Sure PIC32MX board.

    * NSH.  Wait for a USB connection if a USB serial class is used to
      interface with the host.

Additional bugfixes, name changes, and other differences as detailed in the
ChangeLog.

NuttX-6.16
----------

The 83rd release of NuttX, Version 6.16, was made on March 10, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.16.tar.gz and
apps-6.16.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4475

New features and extended functionality:

    * ARMv7M Support:  Includes new, streamlined Cortex-M exception
      handling provided by Mike Smith.  Context switching support for the
      Cortex-M4 FPU registers is now provided (in both "lazy" and "non-lazy"
      modes)

    * General Drivers: Added a generic "upper half" Quadrature Encoder driver.
      The USB CDC/ACM serial driver can now be dynamically connnected or
      disconnected from the host (programmatically or using NSH commands).

    * STM32 Drivers: Added a "lower half" Quadrature Encoder driver.
      Verified the STM32 F4 DMA driver; Added F4 DMA support to the existing
      STM32 SDIO driver.

    * STM32 Board Support.  Added support for the STM32 F2 family and
      for the STM3220G-EVAL board (contributed by Gary Teravskis).
      Support is now included for C++ static constructors (verified using
      the Atollic toolchain). Added support for the SRAM available on the
      STM3240G-EVAL board.

    * PIC32 Drivers.  PIC32MX USB (device) driver is now functional.
      The PIC32MX Ethernet driver not yet fully verified (and an
      unverified SPI driver is also available).

    * Networking.  Added a lower-level, thread-independent socket layer.
      Parts of this layer were created in 6.15 to support the FTPD
      controlling terminal; this support has been extended in order
      to support an NFS file system (not yet released).

    * NuttShell (NSH).  NSH will now support a USB serial connection for
      the console (such as CDC/ACM).  This is useful in environments
      where there is no physical serial port on the board.

    * Build System.  Reorgnaization of networking header files.

Critical Bugfixes.  The following bug fixes are considered critical:

    * Networking:  Fixed a "leak" in the TCP/IP read-ahead buffering logic.
      Corrected an error in TCP/IP sequence numbering/ACK logic which
      occurred when read-ahead buffering memory is exhausted.

    * STM32 Drivers: Fixed an buffer sizing error in the STM32 Ethernet
      driver.

Additional Bugfixes:  Other important bug fixes are listed below. See
the ChangeLog of a complete, detailed list of bug fixes.

    * Networking: Corrected recv()/recvfrom() return value.  Added logic to
      monitor for loss of connection after a new connection has been
      established via accept() (Contributed by Max Nekludov).  Add
      logic to select() to correctly handle POLLHUP (Contributed by Max
      Nekludov)

Additional bugfixes, name changes, and other differences as detailed in the
ChangeLog.

NuttX-6.17
----------

The 84th release of NuttX, Version 6.17, was made on April 14, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.17.tar.gz and
apps-6.17.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4607

New features and extended functionality:

    * Networking:  Additional low-level, thread-independent socket
      interfaces (for NFS client support).

    * RTC:  Added a new interface call clock_synchronize().  This function
      will reload the system time from an RTC and is required when the
      system re-awakens from certain deep-sleep modes.

    * Graphics:  Add NxConsole.  This is a character device driver that
      wraps an NX window and can be re-directed for stdout.  This allows,
      for example, a pop-up graphics window that contains a NuttShell (NSH)
      session.  A test of NxConsole is available at apps/examples/nxconsole.

    * Watchdog Drivers:  Added an interface definition an "upper half"
      driver to support watchdog timers.

    * Calypso:  Support for TI Calypso-based cellphones (as supported by
      the Osmocom-BB project) was contributed by members of the Osmocom-BB
      team.  This includes configurations for the Compal e88 and e99 phones.

    * USB Device Interface:  Needed to extend the USB device interface
      because there was no mechanism for passing endpoint OUT data that
      may need to accompany a setup request.

    * STM32 drivers:  Added some power management controls for entering
      reduced power consumption states.  An OTG FS driver was completed
      and partially verified (this driver seems to be functional but since
      it has been test so lightly, it might better be listed in the
      next section "Work in progress").

    * PIC32 drivers: The PIC32 Ethernet driver is now stable.  The PIC32
      USB device controller driver is now functional (but not yet stable).

    * PIC32 boards: Added support for the Sure DB-DP11212 PIC32 General
      Purpose Demo Board.  There is now a PIC32 Starter Kit that
      provides NSH only through a Telnet connection.

    * Build System:  Some header files were moved into include/nuttx.
      The goal is to move any non-standard header files to include/nuttx
      or include/arch.  Moved include/math.h to include/nuttx/math.h;
      this file is now only instantiated as the 'system' math.h if
      CONFIG_ARCH_MATH_H=y is defined.

    * Tools:  Added tools/cmpconfig.c, a tool for comparing two
      configuration files.

Work in progress.  This release includes some partially completed
work that is still not ready for prime time.

    * NFS Client:  Work is progressing on support for an NFS client
      file system.    This is a port of the BSD NFS client file system
      that is being done by Jose Pablo Rojas V.

    * Automated Configuration:  Automated configuration based on the
      kconfig-frontends tool is being incorporated into the build
      system.  The configuration is still not complete enough for
      general use in this release.

    * STM32 Drivers:  Added files that will (eventually) hold an STM32
      OTG FS host driver.  This is still a work in progress.

Bugfixes:

    * Networking:  Corrected a deadlock that only occurred when
      executing the NSH 'ifconfig' command over Telnet.

    * File system:  Fix incorrect return errno value from read() when
      the file is opened write-only.

    * Graphics:   Fix several compilation errors that have crept into the
      multi-user NX server because of lack of use.

    * STM32:  In order to use CAN2, both CAN1 and CAN2 clocking must be
      enabled. Fixed a troublesome bug in the STM32 F4 I2C driver that
      resulting in timeouts.

    * LPC17xx: Fixes for errors the crept in the LPC17xx DAC logic
      Contributed by Lzyy).

    * Build System:  Reordered the link command line to account for new
      versions of libgcc.a that require symbols from the application
      (abort()).

NuttX-6.18
----------

The 85th release of NuttX, Version 6.18, was made on May 19, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.18.tar.gz and
apps-6.18.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

The majority of changes in this release are focused on supporting the
synchronized release of NxWM, the NuttX tiny window manager.  That
window manager is released as part of the NxWidgets package, but depends
upon many of the changes in this NuttX release.

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4751

New features and extended functionality:

    * Drivers.  Added a watchdog timer driver infrastructure.  Add general
      support for STMicro STMPE811 I/O Expander/touchscreen device.

    * STM32. Add support for the STM32 IWDG and WWDG watchodog timers.  DMA
      now supports cicular buffer mode; serial driver now uses circular
      DMA to improve Rx performance (Contributed by Mike Smith).

    * STM3240G-EVAL Board.  Add support for the LCD and for the STMPE811
      I/O Expander as a touchscreen controller.

    * PIC32 Boards.  Board support for the Mikroelektronika PIC32MX7
      Multimedia Board (MMB) and for the Sparkfun UBW32 PIC32 board.

    * NX. Framed windows are now draw in three colors instead of just two.
      Numerous other extensions needed to support NxWM (see the ChangeLog
      for details).

    * Library. Add prctl() command that can be used to setting and getting
      the names of threads.  This (plus several other improvements and bug
      fixes) are part of a larger effort to improve task monitoring
      capabilities.

Work in progress.  This release includes some partially completed
work that is still not ready for prime time.

    * NFS Client. Work is progressing on support for an NFS client
      file system.   This is a port of the BSD NFS client file system
      that is being done by Jose Pablo Rojas V.

    * Automated Configuration. Automated configuration based on the
      kconfig-frontends tool is being incorporated into the build
      system.  The configuration is still not complete enough for
      general use in this release.

    * STM32 Drivers. Added files that will (eventually) hold an STM32
      OTG FS host driver.  This is still a work in progress.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details) :

    * sched_setscheduler() return value (Contributed by Richard Cochran).

    * stdio. Ignore CONFIG_STDIO_LINEBUFFER if the file was opened in binary mode.

    * fopen(). Correct an error in parsing open mode string.

    * serial driver. Improved performance be reducing the amount of time
      that Rx interrupts are disabled.

    * recvfrom(). Fix a compilation problem.

    * CDC/ACM device driver. Fix an infinite loop that occurs when the serial
      device is unregistered.

    * STM32 OTG FS device driver. Numerous fixes and the driver is partially
      functional but there are still some issues that become apparent when
      debug output is disabled.

    * fcntl(). Always returned zero on success; however, some fcntl commands
      need to return non-zero values on success.

    * graphics:  Many multi-use mode fixes added to support NxWM (see the
      ChangeLog for details).  Auto-raise is temporarily disabled in multi-
      user mode because it causes some problems with NxWM.

    * on_exit():  Fix compilation errors if CONFIG_SCHED_ONEXIT is enabled.

NuttX-6.19
----------

The 86th release of NuttX, Version 6.19, was made on June 15, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.19.tar.gz and
apps-6.19.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4847

This release features new support for a Network File System (NFS) client.
This feature allows a tiny, embedded MCU to mount a remote file system
exported by an NFS server and then to access the file system as it would
any local file system.  Then the tiny MCU can effectively have terabytes
of storage!

This might be useful for data collection, for MCU configuration information,
for software updates, for providing modular, loadable code modes, controlling
a "farm" of MCUs, ... there are many possibilities and opportunities for
innovation!

The NuttShell (NSH) now supports the following command:

  nfsmount <server-address> <mount-point> <remote-path>

That command will mount the remote NFS server directory <remote-path> at
<mount-point> on the target machine.  <server-address> is the IP address of
the remote server.

The NFS development was the graduation project of Jose Pablo Rojas V. who
is a student at the Instituto Tecnolgico de Costa Rica (ITCR, or TEC).
A lot of effort went into understanding what a tiny, embedded NFS client should
do and getting the target resource usage to a bare minimum.  Only around a
kilobyte or so of memory is required to run the NFS client (and most of that
for I/O buffers).  Jose Pablo has spent several months living with NFS and
should be congratulated.

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Drivers:  SSD1289 LCD driver, MIO283QT2 LCD driver

    * LM3S: Additional register definition header files (contributed by Max
      Neklyudov).

    * STM32 Boards:  The STM32F4Discovery will now support an SSD1289 LCD,
      The STM3220G-EVAL board support is now equivalent to the STM3240G-EVAL
      board support.

    * PIC32 Boards: The Mikroelektronika PIC32MX7 MMB board port is now
      functional, very complete, and stable.

    * Graphics:  The NxConsole will now take keyboard input from the NX graphics
      subsystem.  This means that if there are multiple NxConsole windows, only
      the top instance that has focus will receive the keyboard input.

    * apps/:  Add the capability to use an arbitrary USB device as the console
      (not necessarily /dev/console).  Additional enhancements for USB consoles.
      Added the 'mv' command.

Work in progress.  This release includes some partially completed
work that is still not ready for prime time.

    * Automated Configuration. Automated configuration based on the
      kconfig-frontends tool is being incorporated into the build
      system.  The configuration is still not complete enough for
      general use in this release.

    * STM32 Drivers. Added files that will (eventually) hold an STM32
      OTG FS host driver.  This is still a work in progress.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details) :

    * General:  sleep() and usleep() return values, sig_timedwait() errno setting
      on timeout.
    * Drivers: STMPE811 touchscreen driver, USB PLC2303, USB CDC/ACM
    * STM32: Several USB device controller driver fixes, F4 interrupt priorities
      (contributed by Mike Smith).
    * Graphics: Keyboard input, fill trapezoid bug

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.20
----------

The 87th release of NuttX, Version 6.20, was made on July 12, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.20.tar.gz and
apps-6.20.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r4937

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Power Management:  An evolving power management example is being
      created by Diego Sanchez.  This effort currently involves on the
      STM32 F1 but clearly demonstrates the NuttX power management
      system which will automatically drive the system to lower power
      usage states due to lack of use.

    * Drivers:  Added a driver for the SST 25 SPI-based FLASH parts.

    * PIC32:  Added support for the PIC32MX1 and PIC32MX2 families.
      Added support for the microchipOpen and Pinguino toolchains.

    * NXP LPC43XX: Added support for the entire LPC43xx family

    * PIC32 boards:  Added support for the DTX1-4000L "Mirtoo" module
      from http://www.dimitech.com/ (PIC32MX2).

    * NXP LPC43XX Boards: Added support for NGX LPC4330-Xplorer board.

    * NXP LPC17XX Boards: Added support for Micromint Lincoln60 board
      (LPC1769).

    * LM3S Boards:  Add a configuration to support the TI/Stellaris
      EKK-LM3S3B96 development board.  Contributed by Jose Pablo Rojas V.

    * Library:  NuttX now supports platform-specific stdarg.h header
      files.

Work in progress.  This release includes some partially completed
work that is still not ready for prime time.

    * Automated Configuration. Automated configuration based on the
      kconfig-frontends tool is being incorporated into the build
      system.  The configuration is still not complete enough for
      general use in this release.

    * STM32 Drivers. Added files that will (eventually) hold an STM32
      OTG FS host driver.  This is still a work in progress.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details) :

    * PIC32: GPIO output configuration (critical bug)
    * STM32: Typos in pin mapping files.
    * LM3S:  Fixed an optimization related but that caused slow start-up
      times if optimization was disabled.
    * Library:  Fixed signed extension but in all limit.h files
      (reported by Lorenz Meier).  inet_ntoa compilation failure
      on Z80.

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.21
----------

The 88th release of NuttX, Version 6.21, was made on August 25, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.21.tar.gz and
apps-6.21.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5052

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core: Add support for multiple registered atexit() functions.  Syslog
      extended:  Now any character driver may be used for the debug logging
      device.  Mountpoint traversal logic.
    * Drivers: Added support for the TI PGA112-7 amplifier/multiplexor.
    * LPC43xx:  Added clock ramp-up logic to run at 204 MHz
    * LPC43xx Drivers:  SPIFI block driver, RS-485 support, Minimal termios
      support.  Framework for USB0 device controller driver.
    * LPC17xx Drivers:  Minimal termios support
    * STM32: Support for STM32 F1 "Value Line" (contributed by Mike Smith).
      Add support for STM32 F107 "Connectivity Line" (contributed by Max
      Holtzberg).
      Clock restart logic needed for recovery from low power modes.
    * STM32 Drivers:  RTC alarm support.  Usable for wakeup from sleep mode,
      Minimal serial termios support.  USB OTG FS host driver (alpha).
    * STM32 Boards: Add power management hooks for the STM32F4Discovery,
      Add support for the Olimex STM32-P107 (contributed by Max Holtzberg).
    * PIC32:  Add support for the Pinguino MIPS toolchain.
    * PIC32 Drivers:  GPIO driver now supports F1 analog regiaters (ANSEL).
    * PIC32 Boards: Add support for the PGA117 on the Mirtoo module.
    * Calypso:  Add support for the SSD1783 LCD on the Compal E99.
    * Library:  cfsetispeed(), cfsetospeed(), tcflush(), memchr(), and
      memccpy().
    * Applications:  Port of freemodbus-v1.5.0. Add support for testing
      devices with multiple ADC, PWM, and QE devices.
      NSH: NSH 'mount' command (with no arguments) will now show mounted
      volumes.  Add new NSH 'df' command.  Extended 'help' support. NSH
      now catches the return value from spawned applications (provided
      by Mike Smith).
    * Build System: mkconfig will not define CONFIG_DRAM_END.  A lot of
      progress has been made on the automated NuttX configuration logic
      (Thanks go to Richard Cochran).
    * Documentation: Document ways to customize the behavior of NSH.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details) :

    * Serial drivers (all): Fix ioctl return value. Common "upper half"
      serial driver will now return with EINTR if a serial wait is
      interrupted by a signal.
    * FAT: Fix statfs() file name length.
    * LPC43xx: Clock configuration.
    * STM32: Pinmap fixes, SPI driver re-initialization
    * STM32 Boards: Correct and lower SDIO frequency for F2 and f4 boards.
    * AVR: C++ build issues.
    * PM: Fix a place where interrupts were not be re-enabled.
    * Applications: NSH application start-up race conditions.
    * Library: Fieldwidth and justification for %s format.  Fixed several
      issues with presenting floating point numbers.  NULL definition
      for C++

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.22
----------

The 89th release of NuttX, Version 6.22, was made on September 29, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.22.tar.gz and
apps-6.22.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5206

Note that all SVN information has been stripped from the tarballs.  If you
need the SVN configuration, you should check out directly from SVN.  Revision
r5206 should equivalent to release 6.22 of NuttX 6.22:

    svn checkout -r5206 svn://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Or

    svn checkout -r5206 http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * RTOS: Application entry point is no longer user_start, but can be
      configured using CONFIG_USER_ENTRYPOINT.  NuttX now supports two work
      queues:  A lower priority work queue (for extended processing) and a
      higher priority work queue (for quick, high priority operations).

    * Memory Management: Added a new granule-based allocated that can be
      used to manage, aligned and quantized DMA memory.

    * File System: Add hooks to allocate I/O memory with and external
      allocated (need if required by DMA).

    * Networking: ENC28J60 driver is (finally) verified.

    * Drivers: Add hooks USB device drivers to allocate I/O memory with and
      external allocated (need if required by DMA).  Driver for the Windbond
      SPI FLASH family (W25x16, W25x32, W25x64, and others).  ADS7843E driver
      extended for TSC2046 and XPT2046 and verified.

    * ARMv7-M: Added logic to reset the MCU using the NVIC.

    * STM32: Add support for STM32F103VET6.

    * STM32 Drivers: Add logic to re-initialize UARTs a second time to
      enable DMA (Mike Smith).  I2C driver error recovery (Mike Smith).

    * STM32 boards: Support for USB host added add to several configurations
      (or at least explained in README files).  Support for the Shenzhou
      STM32F107 board (see www.armjishu.com).  Support for M3 Wildfire
      STM32F103 board (v2 and v3).

    * Build System:  Kconfig string de-quoting logic.  Remove comments from
      defconfig files (Kate).  Add tool to create NuttX-style symbol tables.
      Numerous changes to configuration logic as needed for the new mconf-based
      configuration (much of this from Richard Cochran).  Refactor common
      Make.defs logic into tools/Config.mk (Richard Cochran).

    * Library: Configurable terse output from strerror(). Added perror() (Kate).
      Add %n format to sscanf() (Kate).

    * Applications: Numerous changes and extensions to the old uIP web server
      (from Kate and Max Holtzberg, see the ChangeLog for specific extensions).
      UDP network discovery utility (Max Holtzberg).  Embeddable Lightweight
      XML-RPC Server (http://www.drdobbs.com/web-development/an-embeddable-lightweight-xml-rpc-server/184405364, Max Holtzberg).

Bugfixes (see the change log for details).  Some of these are very important
(marked *critical*):

    * RTOS: Fixes to priority inheritance logic (*critical*).  waitpid()
      critical section.  Assertion in work_cancel() (Mike Smith).  mmap() (Kate).

    * FAT File System: Improper Boolean expression caused un-necessary writes
      and performance issues (*critical*, Ronen Vainish).

    * Networking: Remove an un-necessary delay from recvfrom().  This greatly
      improves network performance (*critical*, Max Holtzberg).

    * Graphics: NX parameter checking errors.

    * Drivers: Fix double release of memory in SDIO-based, MMC/SD driver
      (Ronen Vainish).

    * LPC17xx:  Ethernet driver fixes needed for certain PHYs (Kate).

    * AVR: Fix build error (Richard Cochran).

    * STM32: USB OTG FS host driver NAKing an retries.  Power management
      compilation errors (Diego Sanchez).  Missing SPI3 remap logic.

    * STM32 Drivers: Fix for Ethernet errata for STM32F107 (*critical*).
      Ethernet buffer alignment check.  Add "kludge" to Ethernet driver to
      handle DM9161 PHY which (at least on the Shenzhou board), sometimes
      does not come up correctly.

    * Applications: THTTPD (Kate).  NSH ping when IP address is on a different
      network (Darcy Gong).

    * Library: fread(), fflush(), fdopen(): Fix error handling logic (Ronen
      Vainish). Fix some field-width handling issues in sscanf()

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.23
----------

The 90th release of NuttX, Version 6.23, was made on November 5, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.23.tar.gz and
apps-6.23.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5313

Note that all SVN information has been stripped from the tarballs.  If you
need the SVN configuration, you should check out directly from SVN.  Revision
r5313 should equivalent to release 6.23 of NuttX 6.23:

    svn checkout -r5313 svn://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Or

    svn checkout -r5313 http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * RTOS:  If both atexit() and on_exit() are enabled, use on_exit() to
      implement atexit().  Updates for RGMP 4.0.

    * Binfmt:  Add support for loading and executing ELF binary modules from
      a file system.

    * Drivers:  Maxim MAX11802 touchscreen controller (Petteri Aimonen)

    * STM32 Driver:  Implementation of /dev/random using the STM32 Random Number
      Generator (RNG).

    * STM32 Boards:  ADC support for the Shenzhou IV board.  Relay support for
      the Shenzhou IV board.

    * C Library:  Support is now included for the add-on uClibc++ C++
      standard library support.  This includes support for iostreams, strings,
      STL, RTTI, exceptions -- the complete C++ environment.  (uClibc++ is
      provided as a separate add-on package due to licensing issues).

      Optimized generic and ARM-specific memcpy() function.  Optimized
      memset() function.

      Add support for ferror(), feof(), and clearerror().   Add support for
      __cxa_atexit().

      Math Library:  Port of the math library from Rhombus OS by Nick Johnson
      (Darcy Gong).

    * Applications: New NSH commands:  ifup, ifdown, urlencode, urldecode,
      base64enc, bas64dec, md5 (Darcy Gong).  Add support for NSH telnet login
      (Darcy Gong).  Enancements to NSH ping command to support pinging hosts
      with very long round-trip times.  Extensions to the ifconfig command
      Darcy Gong),

      Many extensions to the webclient/wget and DNS resolver logic from Darcy
      Gong.  JSON, Base64, URL encoding, and MD5 libraries contributed by Darcy
      Gong.

      New examples: ELF loader, JSON, wgetjson, cxxtest, relays.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details).  Some of these are very important
(marked *critical*):

    * Drivers: W25 SPI FLASH

    * STM32 Drivers: ADC reset

    * Graphics: Missing implementation of the blocked method (*critical*,
      Petteri Aimonen).

    * C Library: Floating point numbers in printf and related formatting functions
     (Mike Smith), cf[get|set]speed() (Mike Smith)

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.24
----------

The 91st release of NuttX, Version 6.24, was made on December 20, 2012,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.24.tar.gz and
apps-6.24.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5447

Note that all SVN information has been stripped from the tarballs.  If you
need the SVN configuration information, you should check out directly from
SVN.  Revision r5447 should equivalent to release 6.24 of NuttX 6.24:

    svn checkout -r5447 svn://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Or (HTTP):

    svn checkout -r5447 http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Additional new features and extended functionality:

  * RTOS:

    - Implemented the POSIX pause() function (still has some compiance
      issues).
    - Tasking logic is extended to support the notion of address
      environments.  An address environment is the key notion underlying
      "process" vs. tasks.  If tasks are created with address environments
      (by binfmt), the OS will propogate that environment to child threads
      and will destroy the address environment when the "process" exists.
    - If support for the PATH variable is enabled, the OS start up logic
      will create an initial environment containing the default PATH
      setting (CONFIG_PATH_INITIAL).  This initial PATH will then be
      inherited by all tasks.

  * Binfmt

    - The NuttX binary loaders have been updated to support the PATH
      environment variable.  Now, if the PATH is properly defined, programs
      can be executed from mass storage using only the file name.  This
      feature is added to support more standard behavior (eventually, NSH
      will support execution of programs in file systems by just entering
      the file name, perhaps in 6.25?).
    - The NXFLAT and ELF binary loaders have been extended to create
      address environments for any new tasks executed from the file system.
      This feature requires that the architecture support a memory management
      unit (MMU) and the address environment interfaces declared in
      include/nuttx/arch.h (currently, this is only supported by the z180).

    * Drivers: LCD driver for the Univision UG-2864AMBAG01 OLED

    * STM32: Support for STM32F100 high density chips contributed by Freddie
      Chopin.

    * STM32 Drivers:  Added optional RS-485 direction bit control (from
      Freddie Chopin).

    * STM32 Boards:

      - Support for generic STM32F100RC board contributed by Freddie Chopin.
      - stm32f4discovery/nxlines: STM32F4Discovery support for the
        UG-2864AMBAG01 OLED.
      - stm32f4discovery/winbuild:  A version of the NuttX OS test
        configured to build natively on Windows.
      - stm32f4discovery/elf: Now uses the PATH variable to find ELF
        executables.
      - configs/cloudctrl: Added for Darcy Gong's CloudController board

    * PIC32 Boards: Update the Mirtool configuration for Release 2 of the
      Mirtoo module.

    * Calypso: Add Calypso keypad driver.  From Denis Cariki.

    * ZiLOG:

      - Add support for the z180 chip family and, specifically, for
        the P112 retro hardware (see http://p112.feedle.net/).
      - All ZiLOG configurations updated to use the current ZDS-II
        and/or SDCC toolchains.

    * Graphics:

      - Add a semaphore handshake so that operations on buffers from
        the NXMU client will be blocked until the NX server operates on the
        buffer data (from Petteri Aimonen).
      - nxtk_subwindowmove() and nxtk_getwindow(): Improvements to clipping
        logic from Petteri Aimonen.

    * C Library: lib/ sub-directory renamed libc/ (there is a new lib/ sub-
      directory that is used to hold all archives).

    * C++: Exception stubs from Petteri Aimonen.

    * Applications:

      - Add NSH hexdump command to dump the contents of a file (or character
        device) to the console (contributed by Petteri Aimonen).
      - Extend the NSH ifconfig command plus various DHCPC improvements
        (from Darcy Gong).

    * apps/examples:

      - ostest: Replace large tables with algorithmic prime number
        generation.  This allows the roundrobin test to run on platforms
        with minimal SRAM (Freddie Chopin).
      - keypadtest:  A new keypad test example contributed by Denis Carikli.
      - elf and nxflat:  If CONFIG_BINFMT_EXEPATH is defined, these examples
        will now use a relative path to the program and expect the binfmt/
        logic to find the absolute path to the program using the PATH
        variable.

    * Build system:

      - New top-level Makefiles: Makefile.unix and Makefile.win (along with
        numerous changes to other make-related files).  This adds basic
        support for building NuttX natively under Windows from a CMD.exe
        window (rather than in a POSIX-like environment). This build: (1)
        Uses all Windows style paths, (2) Uses primarily Windows batch
        commands from cmd.exe, with (3) a few extensions from GNUWin32.

        This capability should still be considered a work in progress
        because: (1) it has not been verfied on all targets and tools,
        and (2) still lacks some of the creature-comforts of the more
        mature environments (like a function configure.sh script and
        'make menuconfig' support).

      - Example Windows native builds for STM32F4Discovery, eZ80, z16f, z8,
        Z80, and Z180.
      - Several configurations have been converted to work the kconfig-
        frontends mconf configuration tool: stm32f4discovery/nxlines, and
        all eZ80, z16f, z8, Z80, and Z180 configurations.
      - Architectures now include a common Toolchain.defs file that can be
        used to manage toolchains in a more configurable way (most of this
        contributed by Mike Smith).

    * Build tools:

      - Renamed tools/winlink.sh to tools/copydir.sh.
      - Several new tools/scripts to support the Windows native build:
        tools/mkdeps.bat, tools/mkdeps.c, tools/link.bat, unlink.bat, and
        copydir.bat.
      - tools/incdir.sh and incdir.bat now support an -s option to generate
        system header file paths.
      - tools/b16.c: Fixed precision math conversion utility.

Bugfixes (see the change log for details).  Some of these are very important
(marked *critical*):

    * RTOS: Fix some backward conditional compilation in the work queue
      logic (Freddie Chopin).

    * File System: Uninitialized variable caused assertions (from Lorenz
      Meier).

    * Drivers: Partial fix for STM32 OTGFS device drivers and fix for short,
      unaligned writes in the flash translation layer (drivers/mtd/ftl.c),
      both from Petteri Aimonen.

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - Qencoder driver and TIM3 driver fixes from Ryan Sundberg.
      - Fix timeout delay calculation in the STM32 OTG FS host driver.

    * LPC17xx Drivers:  Resources not being properly released when I2C
      driver is un-initialized.

    * Graphics:

      - Fix logic when the mouse drags outside of the window; fix
        another "blocked message" handling case (both from Petteri Aimonen).
      - nxtk_filltrapwindow():  Correct an offset problem (also from Peterri
        Aimonen).
      - nxglib_splitline():  Correct the "fat flat line" bug.

    * C Library:

      - nrand() changes to prevent coefficients from becoming zero which
        would "lock up" the random number generate.
      - Add rounding functions to the math library (contributed by Petteri
        Aimonen).

    * Build system:  Changes to MIN definitions in all limit.h header files
      to avoid integer overflows.  For example from (-128) to (-127 - 1)
      (from Petteri Aimonen).

    * Applications: Modbus fixes from Freddie Chopin.

As well as other, less critical bugs (see the ChangeLog for details)

NuttX-6.25
----------

The 92nd release of NuttX, Version 6.25, was made on February 1, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.25.tar.gz and
apps-6.25.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5595

Note that all SVN information has been stripped from the tarballs.  If you
need the SVN configuration information, you should check out directly from
SVN.  Revision r5595 should equivalent to release 6.25 of NuttX:

    svn checkout -r5595 svn://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Or (HTTP):

    svn checkout -r5595 http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * OS Initialization

      - Removed support for CONFIG_BUILTIN_APP_START.  This is not really a
        useful feature and creates a violation of the OS layered
        architecture.

    * Task Creation:

      - Implement a simple vfork().  In NuttX-6.25, this interface is
        available only for ARM7/9, ARMv7-M (Cortext-M3/4), and MIPS32
        (PIC32MX) platforms.
      - exec() now sets the priority of the new task to the same priority as
        the parent task (instead of the arbirtrary value of 50).
      - New, partially complient implementations of execv() and execl().
        These are only partially compliant because they do not overlay any
        existing "process space" but rather create the new task and exit().
      - Add a complete implementation of posix_spawn().  This standard
        interface is a better match for an MMU-less architecture than are
        vfork() plus execv() or execl().
      - Add a task start hook that will be called before the task main
        is started.  This can be used, for example, to schedule C++
        static constructors to run automatically in the context of the
        new task.

    * Task Parentage

      - Repartitioned tasking data structures.  All shared resources are now
        collected together in a "task group".  A task group includes the
        original task plus all of the pthreads created by the task.
      - Added support for remember the parent "task group" when a new task is
        started.
      - Added optional support to record the membership of each thread in
        the "task group".
      - Implement support for retaining child task status in the "task group"
        after the child task exists.  This is behavior required by POSIX.
        But in NuttX is only enabled with CONFIG_SCHED_HAVE_PARENT and
        CONFIG_SCHED_CHILD_STATUS
      - Add internal logic to "reparent" a task.  This is useful,
        for example, where the child task is created through a trampoline
        task that redirects I/O.  Reparenting allows the caller of posix_spawn()
        to be reparented for the eventual child thread.
      - Added support for SIGCHLD.  Sent to all members of the parent task
        group when the file member of the child task group exits.
      - If SIGCHLD and retention of child task exist status are enabled, then
        a more spec-compliant version of waitpid() is enabled.
      - New interfaces waitid() and wait() are also enabled when SIGCHLD
        is enabled.

    * File System

      - dup() and dup2() can new be used with opened files in a mounted file
        system.  This supports re-direction of output in NSH to files.
      - The binfs file system was moved from apps/builtin to fs/binfs.  The
        binfs file system was extended to support execution of "builtin
        applications" using exec(), execv(), execl(), or posix_spawn().
      - Added logic based on SIGCHLD to automatically unload and clean-up
        after running a task that was loaded into memory.

    * Binary Formats

      - Much of the logic for "builtin applications" was moved from
        apps/builtin to nuttx/binfmt/libbuiltin.  Includes some extensions
        contributed by Mike Smith.
      - A binary loader was added for builtin applications to support
        execution of "builtin applications" using exec(), execv(),
        execl(), or posix_spawn().

    * Drivers:

      - Added logic to marshal and serialized "out-of-band" keyboard
        commands (such as cursor controls and key release events) intermixed
        with normal ASCII keypress data.  The encoding is partially integrated
        in the HID keyboard driver and the decoding full integrated into the
        apps/examples hidkbd and keypadtest (the latter contributed by Denis
        Carlikli).
      - Driver for the UG-2864HSWEG01 OLED contributed by Darcy Gong.
      - Add support for removable serial devices (like USB serial).  This
        support is enabled by CONFIG_SERIAL_REMOVABLE.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Added an option to use the BASEPRI register to disable interrupts
        (instead of the PRIMASK).  This eliminates some innocuous hardfaults
        that interfere with some debug tools.  You need to switch to the
        BASEPRI method only if you have such tool interference.

    * STM32 Drivers

      - Bring STM32 F1 DMA capabilities up to par with the STM32 F2/F4
        (contributed by Mike Smith).
      - Add support for USART single wire mode (Contributed by the PX4
        team).
      - Updates to support for SPI DMA on the STM32 F1/F2/F4.  From
        Petteri Aimonen.

    * STM32 Boards:

      - New configuration to support the UG-2864HSWEG01 OLED on the
        STM32F4Discovery board.
      - Added a posix_spawn() test configuration for the STM32F4Discovery.

    * LM3S/LM4F

       - Files and directories repartitioned to support both LM3S and LM4F
         using the STM32 organization as a model.
       - Partial definitions for the LM4F contributed by Jose Pablo Carballo
         (this is still a work in progress).

    * LM3S Boards

       - Added scripts and documentation to use OpenOCD with the LM3S (from
         Jose Pablo Carballo).

    * LPC176x/LPC178x

       - Files and directories repartitioned to support both LPC175x/LPC176x
         and the LPC177x/LPC178x families using the STM32 organization as a
         model.  The LPC1788 port is a work in progress by Rommel Marcelo.

    * LPC176x/LPC178x Boards:

      - Added a configuration to support the Wave Share Open1788 board.
        This is still a work in progress by Rommel Marcelo.

    * LPC2148 Boards:

      - Add basic support for the The0.net ZP213x/4xPA board (with the LPC2148
        and the UG_2864AMBAG01 OLED).
      - Add an nxlines configuration for the ZP213x/4xPA (with the LPC2148
        and the UG_2864AMBAG01).

    * Simulator:

      - Add an nxlines configuration for the simulator.

    * Networking:

      - Add logic to work around delayed ACKs by splitting packets
        (contributed by Yan T.).
      - Split net_poll() to create the internal interface psock_poll().

    * LCDs:

      - Added support for LCD1602 alphanumeric LCD (HD4468OU controller).

    * Graphics:

      - Added 5x8 monospace font. This tiny font is useful for graph
        labels and for small bitmapped display.  Contributed by Petteri
        Aimonen.

    * Build System:

      - Add an options to better manage toolchain prefixes.
      - Redesigned how the context targer works in the apps/ directory.
        The old design caused lots of problems when changing configurations
        because there is no easy way to get the system to rebuild the
        context.  This change should solve most the problems and eliminate
        questions like "Why don't I see my builtin application in NSH?"

    * Kconfig Files:

      - There are several new configurations that use the kconfig-frontends
        tools and several older configurations that have been converted to
        use these tools.  There is still a long way to go before the conversion
        is complete:

        configs/sim/nxwm
        configs/sim/nsh
        configs/stm3220g-eval/nxwm
        configs/stm32f4discovery/posix_spawn
        configs/olimex-lpc1766stk/nsh
        configs/olimex-lpc1766stk/hidkbd
        configs/olimex-lpc1766stk/nettest
        configs/open1788/ostest
        configs/stm32f4discovery/nsh
        configs/stm32f4discovery/usbnsh
        configs/lm326965-ek (all configurations)
        configs/mcu123-214x/nsh
        configs/ubw32/ostest

    * Tools:

      - tools/kconfig.bat:  Kludge to run kconfig-frontends from a DOS shell.
      - tools/configure.c:  configure.c can be used to build a work-alike
        program as a replacement for configure.sh.  This work-alike
        program would be used in environments that do not support Bash
        scripting (such as the Windows native environment).
      - tools/configure.bat: configure.bat is a small Windows batch
        file that can be used as a replacement for configure.sh in a
        Windows native environment.  configure.bat is actually just a
        thin layer that executes configure.exe if it is available. If
        configure.exe is not available, then configure.bat will attempt
        to build it first.

    * Applications:

      - New and modified examples:

        apps/examples/wlan: Remove non-functional example.
        apps/examples/ostest: Added a test of vfork(). Extend signal
          handler test to catch death-of-child signals (SIGCHLD). Add a
          test for waitpid(), waitid(), and wait().
        apps/exampes/posix_spawn: Added a test of posix_spawn().

      - NSH:

        NSH now supports re-direction of I/O to files (but still not from).
        The block driver source argument to the mount command is now
          optional for file systems that do not require a block driver.
        NSH can now execute a program from a file system using posix_spawn().
        Added support for a login script.  The init.d/rcS script will be
          executed once when NSH starts; the .nshrc script will be executed
          for each session:  Once for serial, once for each USB connection,
          once for each Telnet session.

      - Supports a new daemon that can be used to monitor USB trace outpout.
      - Removed non-functional wlan example.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Tasking:

      - Fixed a *critical* task exit bug.  Here is the failure scenario:
        (1) sched_lock() is called increments the lockcount on the current
        TCB (i.e., the one at the head of the ready to run list), (2)
        sched_mergepending is called which may change the task at the head
        of the ready-to-run list, then (3) sched_unlock() is called which
        decrements the lockcount on the wrong TCB.  The failure case that
        I saw was that pre-emption got disabled in the IDLE thread, locking
        up the whole system.

    * Signals:

      - sigtimedwait() would return a bad signal number if the signal was
        already pending when the function was called.

    * Drivers:

      - Some SD cards will appear busy until switched to SPI mode for
        first time.  Having a pull-up resistor on MISO may avoid this
        problem, but this fix from Petteri Aimonen makes it work also
        without pull-up.

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 FLASH driver counting error (from Freddie Chopin).
      - STM32 F4 maximum SPI frequency was wrong (corrected by Petteri
        Aimonen).

    * STM32 Boards

      - Due to cloning of untested code, the logic to control on-board
        LEDs did not work on any STM32 boards.
      - Serial devices number /dev/ttyS0-5 is there is a serial console,
        but /dev/ttyS1-6 if there is no serial console.

    * Binary Formats

      - C++ static constructors execute now using a start taskhook
        so that they execute in the context of the child task (instead
        of in the context of the parent task).

    * File Systems:

      - Several FAT-related bugs fixed by Petteri Aimonen.

    * Networking:

      - Fix poll/select issure reported by Qiang: poll_interrupt() must call
        net_lostconnection() when a loss of connection is reported.  Otherwise,
        the system will not remember that the connection has been lost and will
        hang waiting on a unconnected socket later.
      - Similar issues corrected for recvfrom() and send().
      - Telnetd would hang in a loop if recv() ever returned a value <= 0.

    * Libraries:

      - fread() could hang on certain error conditions.
      - Can't handle SYSLOG output to a character device from  the IDLE task
        (because the IDLE task can't block).

    * Build System:

      - Serial was driver was not being built if there is no console
        device.  Obviously, the serial driver may be needed even in
        this case.

    * Additional Bugfixes:

      - sig_timedwait() and clock_time2ticks.c: Timing "rounding" logic
      - ARM9 Compilation issue with low vectors.
      - readline() return value
      - Others as detailed in the ChangeLog: HID keyboard, LPC17xx bit
        definitions, strndup(), PL2303, SYSLOG error handling, AT25,
        apps/examples.

NuttX-6.26
----------

The 93rd release of NuttX, Version 6.26, was made on March 15, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.26.tar.gz and
apps-6.26.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release corresponds with SVN release number: r5745

Note that all SVN information has been stripped from the tarballs.  If you
need the SVN configuration information, you should check out directly from
SVN.  Revision r5745 should equivalent to release 6.26 of NuttX:

    svn checkout -r5745 svn://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Or (HTTP):

    svn checkout -r5745 http://svn.code.sf.net/p/nuttx/code/trunk nuttx-code

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * OS Initialization:

      - Add an additional call-out to support board-specific driver
        initialization during the boot-up phase (available with
        CONFIG_BOARD_INITIALIZE=y).

    * Tasking:

      - New interface task_spawn() that is like posix_spawn(), but uses
        entry point addresses like task_create().
      - Additional data restructuring as a continuation of the task group
        changes of NuttX 6.25.  These data structures were moved from the
        TCB structure into the task group:  pthread join data,
        atexit/on_exit callbacks, waitpid data structures, and message
        queues.
      - TCBs for tasks and pthreads are now separate structures.  This
        saves a little memory since tasks do not have to carry the overhead
        for threads and vice versa.

    * Kernel Build:

      - Extensive changes were made to support the kernel build mode.  In
        this mode, NuttX is built as a monolithic kernel.  NuttX is built
        as a separate kernel mode "blob" and the applications are built
        as a separate user mode "blob".  The kernel runs in kernel mode and
        the applications run in user mode (with the MPU restricting user
        mode accesses).  Access to the kernel from the user blob is only
        via system calls (SVCalls).
      - Extensive changes were made to the syscall, SVCall, and trapping
        logic.  Many internal interfaces were renamed.
      - The memory manager was extended to support both kernel- and user-
        mode allocations.  Logic within the kernel needs to use the
        correct kernel- or user-space allocator, depending upon the user
        of the allocated memory.
      - The user-space blob now contains a header built in at the beginning
        of the block that provides the same information that was previously
        provided by a kludgy, auto-generated header file (user_map.h).
      - Basic support implemented for the ARMv7-M family with fragments
        also implemetned for the ARMv6-M and MIPS32 families.
      - Kernel build supported added for the LPC17xx Open1788 and for
        the Atmel SAM3U-EK board.  All testing is being performed on the
        Open1788 board.

    * Signals:

      - Delivery of signals to threads within a task group is now compatible
        with the way that signals are delivered to threads within a process.

    * Drivers:

      - Add a driver for the SST29VF NOR FLASH parts.
      - USB device trace/debug feature extended to decode device-specific
        trace events to make the trace output more readable (from Petteri
        Aimonen).
      - USB MSC device driver can not support names of differing sizes
        in the USB descriptor and the SCSI fields (from Petteri Aimonen).
      - Locking added to MMC/SD SPI drivers so that MMC/SD can co-exist on
        the same bus as other SPI devices.  Frequency is reset each time
        that the MMC/SD SPI has the bus locked. (from Petteri Aimonen).

    * ARMv6-M (Cortex-M0):

       - Added support for the ARM Cortex-M0 family.

    * nuvoTon NUC120:

       - Added support for the nuvoTon NUC120 MCU (Cortex-M0).

    * nuvoTon NUC120 Boards:

       - Added basic support for the nuvoTon NuTiny-SDK-NUC120 board (Cortex-M0).

    * LPC17xx:

      - Added support for the LPC177x and LPC178x families.  Most of this is
        the work of Rommel Marcelo.

    * LPC17xx Boards:

      - Added support for Zilogic System's ARM development Kit, ZKIT-ARM-1769.
        From Rashid.
      - The port for the WaveShare Open1788 board is now functional.  Basic
        OS test and NuttShell (NSH) configurations are functional. More
        driver development and testing is needed (from Rommel Marcelo).

    * LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Added an SD card MSI driver for the LPC178x.  The driver is marginally
        functional but requires DMA capability to be reliable.

    * STM32

      - Support extended to handle the STM32 F3 family (Cortex-M4 with F1-like
        peripherals).

    * STM32 Boards

      - Added support the STMicro STM32F3Discovery board (STM32 F3).

    * Stellaris LM3S/LM4F

      - Basic support for the LM4F120 family is in place, but untested (mostly
        from Jose Pablo Carballo).

    * Stellaris LM4F Boards

      - Add support for the LM4F120 LaunchPad (untested).

    * Networking:

      - select() should now allocate a little less memory.

    * Memory Management:

      - Extended to support multiple heaps.  This is used as part of
        the kernel build in order to support separater user- and
        kernel-mode heaps.
      - The stand-alone memory manger test had to be removed.  It
        was too entangled and made extension of the memory manager
        nearly impossible.  This is a loss.

    * Build System:

      - Several configurations converted to use the kconfig-frontends
        configuration tool.  There are still many more that need to
        be converted.

    * C Library:

      - Move the workqueue logic into the C library.  There is now a
        special user-space version of the work queue (which will only
        be used with a NuttX kernel build).
      - Implementation of itoa() contributed by Ryan Sundberg.

    * Applications:

      - The NSH builtin task logic now uses task_spawn() to start builtin
        applications.
      - The OS test now includes a test cased to verify task_restart().

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  Most are expected to be fully
available in NuttX 6.27.

    * LM4F120 LaunchPad port.  Code is in place, but nothing has been tested.

    * WaveShare Open1788 port.  This port as actually complete and
      functional. However, there is still ongoing development and
      testing of drivers.

    * Kernel Build.  Much progress has been made, but there kernel build is
      not yet fully functional due to several user resources that are not yet
      properly disentangled from the kernel blob.

    * Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
      tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Tasking:

      - The wrong PID was being signalled with SIGCHILD.  It should be
        the PID of the task that create the task group, not the ID of
        the last thread to leave the task group.
      - Added logic so that some internal resources and states are recovered
        when tasks are deleted or restarted.  Handle cases where there are
        outstanding timed events pending when tasks are deleted or restarted.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Several fixes to the MPU control logic.

    * Drivers:

      - Removable serial drivers race conditions fixed.
      - MAX11802 timing bug (from Petteri Aimonen).

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - Handle cases were SPI DMA logic fails if sem_wait is awakened
        by a signal.  Need to clear error flags to prevent corruption of
        subsequent transfers.  Also, bit count should not be changed while
        the SPI peripheral is enabled (from Petteri Aimonen).
      - Fixes to the OTG FS device driver from Petteri Aimonen.
      - Fix typos in DMA register header file (from Yan T.)

    * Graphics:

      - Correction to the hyphen in the SANS 17x22 font (from Petteri
        Aimonen).

    * Networking:

      - Corrected errors in the socket poll/select logic.  Additional
        state logic was needed to detect if the socket is still connected
        before starting the poll wait. (bug reported by Qiang Yu).

    * Memory Management:

      - mallinfo() should hold the memory manager semaphore (from Petteri
        Aimonen.

    * Build System:

      - Resolved several build errors reported by Mike Smith.

    * Applications:

      - Fixed an NSH memory leak:  Needed to detach after creating each
        pthread.
      - readline() now returns EOF on any failure (instead of a negated
        errno value).  This is because the underlying read is based on
        logic similar to getc.  The value zero  (meaning end-of-file)
        was being confused with a NUL.  So if a NUL was received, the
        NSH session would terminate because it thought it was the end of
        file.

NuttX-6.27
----------

The 94th release of NuttX, Version 6.27, was made on April 28, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.27.tar.gz and
apps-6.27.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * OS Initialization:

      - Add missing registration of /dev/zero.  Registration of /dev/null
        should depend upon conditional compilation.  From Ken Pettit.

    * Tasking:

      - Added a new interface to set aside memory on the task's stack.  This
        is used (at least in the kernel build) to hold task arguments.
      - Remove up_assert_code().  One assertion routine is enough.

    * Kernel Build:

      - Extensive changes were made to support the kernel build mode.  In
        this mode, NuttX is built as a monolithic kernel.  NuttX is built
        as a separate kernel mode "blob" and the applications are built
        as a separate user mode "blob".  The kernel runs in kernel mode and
        the applications run in user mode (with the MPU restricting user
        mode accesses).  Access to the kernel from the user blob is only
        via system calls (SVCalls).
      - Kernel build configurations for the Open1788 board and for the
        STM32F4Discovery now execute correctly.
      - Changes were made to task and thread start-up routines, signal
        handling, data structures, ARMv7-M SVCalls, stack management
        interfaces,

    * Drivers:

      - Driver for the ST7567 LCD Display Module from Univision Technology
        Inc.  Contributed by Manikandan.S
      - SPI initialize functions renamed so that multiple SPI blocks can
        be initialized.
      - Extended to support the RAMTRON FM25V01 device. Contributed by
        Lorenz Meier
      - Serial drivers: TIOCSERGSTRUCT ioctls now conditioned on
        CONFIG_SERIAL_TIOCSERGSTRUCT

    * ARMv7-M (Cortex-M3/4):

      - Added support for modifiable interrupt vectors in RAM

    * nuvoTon NUC1xx:

      - Added kernel build support

    * Freescale Kinetis:

      - Add kernel build support
      - Add support for the Kinetis L family of Cortex-M0+ MCUs.  Contributed
        by Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * LPC17xx:

      - Now holds off sleep mode in the IDLE loop is DMA is in progress
        (because sleep mode will disable CPU SRAM).

    * LPC17xx Boards:

      - ZKIT-ARM-1769:  Now supports the ST7567 LCD display module.  Added
        an nxhello configuration for testing (Manikandan.S).
      - ZKIT-ARM-1769:  Add support for both CAN1 and CAN2.  Contributed by
        M.Kannan

      - Open1788: Basic support for the WaveShare Open1788 board is complete
        with working OS test, NSH, and graphics configurations.
      - Open1788: Integrated the LPC178x LCD driver with the WaveShare display.
        Touchscreen support is included, howerver, there appears to be an
        issue with the Open1788 touchscreen interrupt signal.
      - Open1788:  Now supports SDRAM (used to provide the LCD framebuffer).
      - Open 1788: Reversed sense of the IDLE LCD. It is now off when the
        LPC17 is sleeping and on when awake.  That is much a better visual
        indication of the dynamic CPU load

    * LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Added an LCD framebuffer driver for the LPC177x/8x family.
      - Implemented LPC17xx GPDMA support.
      - Integrated the LPC17xx GPDMA support into the SD card driver.
      - SSP driver adapted to work with the LPC178x family.
      - Separate LPC176x and LPC178x GPIO logic; this logic is too different
        to maintain in one file with conditional compilation.
      - Re-design of the GPIO logic for the LPC178x family by Rommel Marcelo.

    * LPC43xx:

      - Added kernel build support

    * STM32:

      - Added support for kernel mode build.
      - Added architecure support for the STM32 F427/F437 chips. Contributed
        by Mike Smith

    * STM32 Boards:

      - Added a configuration to support a kernel mode build of the OS test
        on the STM32F4Discovery

    * Stellaris LM3S/LM4F:

      - Added kernel build support
      - Added support for the 7 UARTs on the LM4F120

    * Stellaris LM4F Boards:

      - Added scripts and instructions to simplify use of OpenOCD with ICDI
        (JP Carballo)
      - The basic for the Stellaris LM4F120 Launchpad is complete.  This
        includes support for OS test and NSH configurations.  Additional
        driver development is needed.

    * Build System:

      - Directories where the same sources files are used to build different
        objects in the first and second pass kernel builds need to keep those
        objects in separate directories so that they are not constantly
        rebuilt.

    * Applications:

      - apps/system/ramtest:  Add a simple memory test that can be built
        as an NSH command.

    * Tools:

      - kconfig2html is a new tool which will replace the hand-generated
        documentation of the NuttX configruation variables with auto-
        generated documentation.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  Most are expected to be fully
available in NuttX 6.28.

    * A port to the Freescale Freedom KL25Z is complete but not yet stable
      enough.  The KL25Z is a low-cost Cortex-M0+ part with 128KB of FLASH
      and 16KB of SRAM.  This is is the effort of Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
      tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
      At this time, only 32% of the configurations have been converted
      to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Tasking:

     - Fixed a critical bug:  When there is pending C buffered output
       and the system is very busy, the a pthread may be blocked at
       a critical point when trying to exit.  Blocking at this critical
       point would cause crashes.  All entire task/thread exit logic
       paths were reviewed and failsafe mechanisms were put in place
       to assure that exitting tasks never block after task teardown
       has been started.

    * ARMv6-M:

      - Fixed parameter passing for all system call inline functions with > 3
        parameters
      - Fixed a major problem:  The Cortex-M0 has no BASEPRI register but the
        logic of NuttX-6.26 was using it to manage interrupts.  Switch to
        using the PRIMASK instead.  This means that hardfaults will (again)
        occur when SVC instructions are executed

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Corrected Correct MPU sub-region settings for unaligned regions.
      - In exception handling with CONFIG_NUTTX_KERNEL, need to explicitly
        set and clear the privilege bit in the CONTROL
      - Fixed parameter passing for all system call inline functions with > 3
        parameters

    * Drivers:

      - Support for O_NONBLOCK was not supported in the "upper half"
        serial driver.
      - PL2303 compilation errors

    * Stellaris LM3S/4F:

      - Corrected typos in alternate function definitions.

    * LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Added a work-around for an ADC errata.  From Chris Taglia
      - Only one ADC pin was configured. Need to configure all that
        are in the ADC0 set.  From MKannan

    * File Systems:

      - The FAT logic was not making a distinction between directory
        non-existence and file non-existence so when it you try to
        create a file in a non-existent directory, it would create a
        file with the name of the missing directory.  Reported by Andrew
        Tridgell
      - Several fixes to the FAT file system from Ronen Vainish.  These
        fixes mostly involve the logic to extend directory clusters for
        the case of long file names but also include a few important
        general fixes (such as for storing 32 bit FAT values)
      - mkfatfs was writing the boot code to the wrong location.  From
        Petteri Aimonen

    * Networking:

      - Fixed a compilation error when socket options are are disabled.
        Reported by Daniel O'Connor

    * C Library:

      - Corrected an error in sscanf.  If %n occurs in the format statement
        after the input data stream has been fully parsed, the %n format
        specifier will not be handled.  Reported by Lorenz Meier
      - strchr(str, '\0') should return a pointer to the end of the string,
        not NULL.  From Petteri Aimonen

    * Build System:

      - Fix naming of NuttX target if EXEEXT is defined.

    * Applications:

      - OS test: Fix timing error in non-cancelable thread test.
      - NSH: Correct the test of the skip input parameter.  Was limiting the
        range to <= count.  From Ken Petit.

NuttX-6.28
----------

The 95th release of NuttX, Version 6.28, was made on June 14, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.28.tar.gz and
apps-6.28.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * File Systems:

      - SMART FLASH file system (contributed by Add Ken Pettit).

    * MTD (FLASH) Drivers:

      - Add support of MTD partitions via a new MTD driver that manages a
        set of MTD devices, each managing a subset of the FLASH region
        managed by the parent MTD driver.
      - Extended the MTD interface to provide an (optional) method to
        perform byte oriented writes if supported by the FLASH part.
      - M25Px driver re-architected to use the byte write capability (when
        possible) and to use 4KB sectors for the erase block size when the
        part supports it (from Ken Pettit).

    * LCD Drivers:

      - New interface definitions to support audio devices (from Ken Pettit)
        and alphanumeric, segment LCDs.

    * Wireless Drivers:

      - Added new driver for the wireless nRF24L01+ transceiver (from
        Laurent Latil).

    * Calypso:

      - Added support for the Pirelli DP-L10 phone (from Craig Comstock via
        Alan Alan Carvalho de Assis)

    * STM32:

      - Added an option to conditionally disable the "wfi" sleep mode.  This
        is needed with certain JTAG debuggers to to prevent the debug
        session from begin disconnected (from Ken Pettit).
      - Added support for the STM32L (STM32L15X/STM32L16x) family.
      - Added STM32F103C4 and F103C8 chip support (from Laurent Latil).
      - Added a new interface function, stm32_dmacapable() that can be used
        to determine if DMA is possible from the specified memory address
        (from Petteri Aimonen)

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - If CONFIG_STM32_DMACAPABLE is defined, the STM32 SPI driver now uses
        stm32_dmacapable() to determine if it is possible to perform DMA
        from the specified address.  This change is important for the STM32
        F4 which may have SPI data buffers allocated on the stack in CCM
        memory which cannot support the DMA (from Petteri Aimonen).

    * STM32 Boards:

      - Support added for the MikroElektronika Mikromedia for STM32F4
        development board (from Ken Pettit) with the MIO283QT2 LCD and
        touchscreen.  Several graphics configurations are included.
      - The HY-mini STM32v board now uses the common SSD1289 driver
        and supported the card detect interrupt.  Several new
        configurations also added and some removed (from Laurent Latil).
      - Support added for the R65105-based LCD that comes with some
        HY-Mini STM32v boards (from Christian Faure).
      - Added basic support for the STM32L-Discovery board.  Drivers
        for the on-board segment LCD are included.
      - Added support for the STM32 Tiny development board based on the
        STM32 F103C8T6 MCU.  This includes support for the nRF24L01+
        wireless on the board (from Laurent Latil).

    * Stellaris LM3S/LM4F:

      - Support added for a TI/Stellaris internal FLASH MTD driver (from Max
        Holtzberg).

    * Stellaris LM4F Boards:

      - The LM3S6965-EK now has configurations for the UDP discovery tool and
        for the TCP echo server (both from Max Holtzberg)

    * Atmel ATSAM3/4:

      - Reorganized, renamed, and updated directory structure to better
        support additional members of the SAM3/4 family.
      - Added support for both the ATSAM4S and ATSAM4L families.  The
        ATSAM4S is similar to the ATSAM3U, but the ATSAM4L is quite a
        different beast, really much more akin to the AVR32s SoCs but
        with a Cortex-M4.

    * Atmel ATSAM3/4 Boards:

      - Added support for the Atmel SAM4L Xplained Pro development board.
        This board features the ATSAM4LC4C MCU (Cortex-M4 with 256KB FLASH +
        32KB SRAM).
      - Added support for the Atmel SAM4S Xplained developement board.  This
        board features the ATSAM4S16C MCU (Cortex-M4 with 1MB FLASH + 128KB
        SRAM).

    * PIC32MX Boards:

      - Added support for the 1602 segment LCD on-board the Sure PIC32MX
        board.  This board will now also support a USB NuttX console and
        the USB monitor test program.

    * Build System:

      - Clean-up of almost all .gitignore files:  Made scope of ignore to be
        only the current directory; Ignore .dSYM files in directories where
        .exe's may be built.  Also, in Makefiles, clean .dSYM files in
        directories where an .exe may be built.
      - Standardize and consolidated all build-as-an-NSH-application
        configuration settings.  Now only CONFIG_NSH_BUILTIN_APPS is
        sufficient to build an application, test, or or example as an NSH
        builtin application.
      - Added support for a generic ARM, ARMv6-M and ARMv7-M Windows EABI
        toolchains.

    * Libraries:

      - Added encoder/decoder logic to marshal and serialize special segment
        LCD (SLCD) commands intermixed with normal ASCII data.  This is the
        similar to the encoding/decoding logic that is used to marshal
        special commands from a keyboard.
      - Add dprintf() and vdprintf() (the latter from Andrew Tridgell).
      - Add an application that may be built as an NSH builtin command that
        will erase FLASH using a flash_eraseall NSH command (from Ken Pettit).

    * Applications:

      - Added an MTD partition test/examples.  Currently used with (1) the a
        simulation configuration to test MTD partitions on a RAM emulation
        of FLASH and (2) with the Mikroe STM32F4 configuration.
      - Added a test/example to verify alphanumeric, segment LCDs.
      - Added a simple single threaded, poll based  TCP echo server based
        on W. Richard Stevens UNIX Network Programming Book (from Max
        Holtzberg).
      - Added several tests of the SMART block driver and file system (from
        Ken Pettit).
      - Added a runtime configuration for the UDP discover utility (from
        Max Holtzberg).
      - Added an example application to demo the nRF24L01 driver (from
        Laurent Latil).
      - New and modified NSH commands:
        Added a -h option to the df command to show the volume information
        in human readable form (from Ken Petit).
        Add a new mksmartfs command (from Ken Petit).

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  Most are expected to be fully
available in NuttX 6.28.

    * Audio System:

      - A complete audio subsystem include CODECs, higher level management,
        interface definitions, and audio drivers was contributed by Ken
        Pettit.  This work has not been completely verified as of this
        release and so is categorized as a work-in-progress.  At present,
        progress is blocked due to issues interfacing with the VS1053
        audio DAC on the Mikroe STM32F4 board.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

    -  Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
       tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
       At this time, only 43% of the configurations have been converted
       to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Tasking:

      - Modify assertion in the priority inheritance logic that is reported
        to cause false alarm assertions.

    * Kernel Build:

      - Typo in syscall proxying logic corrected by Ken Pettit.

    * Networking:

      - Poll setup/teardown logic should ignore invalid (i.e., negative)
        file descriptors (from Max Holtzberg).
      - When readahead data is available, the network poll() logic should
        set POLLIN (or POLLRDNORM), not POLLOUT (from Max Holtzberg).

    * LCD Drivers:

      - Correct power controls in the MIO283QT2 LCD driver.

    * USB Device Controller Drivers:

      - Change the default IN request buffer size from 64 to 96.  This will
        avoid requests of exactly MAXPACKET size and, hence, avoid so many
        NULL packets.  Also, fix the OUT request buffers size to exactly the
        max packet size.  It really cannot be any other size.

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - Correct some bad STM32 F1 DMA definitions that crept into the system
        a few months ago a broke STM32 F1 DMA (from Laurent Latil)
      - Fixed an error in NULL packet handling in the STM32 F1 USB device
        controller driver:  If the NULL-packet needed flag ever got set,
        then it was not being cleared and infinite NULL packets resulted.
        This only affects the CDC/ACM class and was the cause of the
        failures using the USB CDC/ACM device as a NuttX console.  With this
        change the USB works well as an alternative NuttX console device for
        the STM32 F1 family.
      - Correct some bad condition compilation in the RCC logic (CONFIG_
        missing from setting names).  This affects some STM32 FLASH pre-
        fetch settings (from Lorenz Meier).
      - Change for hardware flow control support for STM32. The change also
        fixes incorrect operation of USART2 and UART5 in current master
        (from Lorenz Meier and Mike Smith).
      - Fixed a backward conditional in USB OTG FS host controller driver
        that prevented detection of disconnection events (from Scott).

    * LPC17xx Drivers:

      - I2C interrupt control.  Also correction for a single byte read
        timeout error (from M. Kannan).

    * Freescale Kinetis:

      - Freedom KL25Z pin multiplexing and LED control corrections (from
        Alan Carvalho de Assis)

    * PIC32MX:

     - Fix NULL packet handling in the PIC32 USB device driver.  Without
       this fix the CDC/ACM driver cannot be used reliably with the PIC32
       USB.  With this change the USB works well as an alternative NuttX
       console device.

    * Graphics:

      - Default priorities for NxWidget and NxWM threads should be 100,
        not 50, to be consistent with other default priorities.

    * Applications:

      - Remove the CONFIG_EXAMPLES_NXTEXT_NOGETRUN option from the NXTEXT
        example.  The test logic was bad for the case where this options is
        not selected.  Also, completed the empty Kconfig file.
      - C++ name mangling was occurring when this example is built as an NSH
        built-in application causing the entry to be undefined when called
        from C code.
      - Add some missing NSH library configuration values (from Lorenz
        Meier).

NuttX-6.29
----------

The 96th release of NuttX, Version 6.29, was made on July 31, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.29.tar.gz and
apps-6.29.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Drivers:

      - Generalized the SSD1306 driver and added support UG-2832HSWEG04
        which is very similar to the existing support for the
        UG-2864HSWEG01.
      - Added support for a generic bit-bang SPI driver.  This includes
        both a common "upper half" driver as well as a platformp-specific
        "lower half" dirvers based on a common "template."

    * ARMv7-A, Cortex-A5

      - Added support for the ARMv7-A architecture and the Cortex-A5 in particular.

    * ARMv7-M, Cortex-M3/4

      - Modified how some registers are copied during a context switch (with
        lazy FPU register saving).  This should save some context switching
        time when the context switch is due to interrupt level processing.

    * STM32:

      - Added support for a separate CCM heap.  This may be useful for
        segregating allocations for CCM (which cannot be used for DMA)
        from other allocations (that may be used used for DMA).

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - DAC: Added support for DAC DMA (contributed by John Wharington).
      - I2C: An I2C driver for the STM32 F3 family (from John Wharington).

    * Atmel AT91 SAM/4:

      - Add support for SAM3X and SAM3A chips

    * Atmel AT91 SAM/4 Drivers:

      - Re-architect the SAM3/4 SPI driver so that is it compatible with the
        SPI drivers of other MCUs.
      - Added register definition file for the SAM4L LCD peripheral.
      - Added SAM4L PDCA register definition file

    * Atmel AT91 SAM/4 Boards:

      - SAM4L-Xplained: Added support for the SPI-based SD card on the I/O1
        module.
      - SAM4L-Xplained: Added a driver for the LED1 segment LCD module.
      - SAM4L-Xplained: Added support for the UG-2832HSWEG04 OLED on the
        SAM4L Xplained Pro's OLED1 module
      - SAM4S-Xplained: Added support for on-board 1MB SRAM
      - Arduino Due:  Basic support for the Arduino Due (SAM3X) is now
        included.
      - SAM3U-EK:  The touchscreen is now functional.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3

      - Added support for the Atmel AT91SAMA5D3 Cortex-A5 chip family.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3 Boards

      - Added support for the Atmel SAMA5D3x-EK boards which use the AT9
        SAMA5D3x chips (x=1,3,4,5).

    * Freescale KL25Z Drivers

      - Freescale KL25Z TSI register definitions and example TSI driver for
        the Freedom KL25Z board from Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Added SPI driver and register definitions for the Freescale KL25Z.
      - Added a framework for controlling SPI-related discrete inputs and
        outputs.  Taken from work by Alan Carvalho de Assis

    * Build System:

      - New sub-directories to hold SPI-related files:  includes/nuttx/spi.h
        moved to include/nuttx/spi/.; SPI-related Kconfig info moved from
        drivers/Kconfig to drivers/spi/kconfig.
      - Finally... I changed the naming of configuration variables like
        CONFIG_DRAM_ to CONFIG_RAM_.  This has bothered me for a long time
        since most boards don't have DRAM.  The more generic RAM naming
        should not produce so much cognitive dissonance

    * Libraries:

      - Added CRC16 support.

    * Applications:

      - Added Zmodem file transfer support.  This may be used as an embedded
        library or may be built as 'sz' and 'rz' commands that can be
        executed from NSH.
      - C++ initializers should be set once and, preferably, in the context
        of the task that uses any C++ statically initialized classes.  This
        only becomes an issue if cxxtest or helloxx are built as NSH builtin
        applications.  Then you want the initialization done in cxxtext or
        helloxx and not in NSH (and certainly not twice).  Added
        configuration options to control who does the C++ initialization.
        NSH now does not do C++ initialization be default and must be
        configured to do otherwise.  Conversely, cxxtest and helloxx
        will always do C++ initialization unless configured do otherwise.
      - examples/cxxtext:  Add ostream test as provided by Michael.
      - NSH:  Added a 'cmp' command that can be used to compare two files
        for equivalence.  Returns an indication if the files differ.
        Contributed by Andrew Tridgell (via Lorenz Meier).

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Audio System:

      - A complete audio subsystem include CODECs, higher level management,
        interface definitions, and audio drivers was contributed by Ken
        Pettit.  This work has not been completely verified as of this
        release and so is categorized as a work-in-progress.  At present,
        progress is blocked due to issues interfacing with the VS1053
        audio DAC on the Mikroe STM32F4 board.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

    -  Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
       tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
       At this time, only 45% of the configurations have been converted
       to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * File Systems:

      - Fixed compilation error if no file systems are enabled: Change
        error to ERROR.
      - Read-Ahead/Write buffering: Correct typos that can cause failures
        in some configurations (From Chia Cheng Tsao).

    * Drivers

      - Remove the wait for the touchscreen busy bit in the ADS7843E driver.
        From my reading of the ADS7843 spec, it would not be appropriate to
        wait for the BUSY bit to de-asserted anyway (since it is only de-
        asserted when we read the data).  Most boards do not even bother to
        provide the BUSY bit.
      - MMC/SD SPI based driver:  Driver needs to make sure that the SPI
        mode and data width are correct.
      - ENC28J60:  Change buffer ordering to work around Errata.  From Dave
        (ziggurat29).

    * USB Device Controller Drivers:

      - Fixed a typo in the composite device driver unitialization logic.
        DEV1 should be DEV2 in one case.
      - usbdev.h: Fix some typos that cause compiler errors when
        CONFIG_USBDEV_DMA and CONFIG_USBDEV_DMAMEMORY are selected (From
        Chia Cheng Tsao).

    * ARM9:

      - Fix a bug (uninitialized register error) that crept in the ARM9
        boot-up code several years ago.  Obviously no one has used the
        ARM9 NuttX port for years!

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - Fix STM32 OTF FS endpoint allocation logic.  Apparently the same
        endpoint can be allocated as both an IN or an OUT endpoint.  The
        existing implementation only supported one allocation, either IN or
        OUT.  This resulted in failures to allocate endpoints when used with
        the CDC/ACM + MSC composite driver (From Chia Cheng Tsao).
      - SDIO: Add support for the data block end (DBCKEND) interrupt to
        terminate transfers (From Chia Cheng Tsao).
      - DAC: Fixed numerous DAC driver errors and added support for DAC
        DMA (contributed by John Wharington).

    * SAM3/4:

      - SAM4S: Correct configuration of PIO pins for SAM4S B and C peripherals.
      - Need to disable write protection before configuring PIO pins.
      - GPIO configuration logic must protect against re-entrancy.
      - Clocking must be applied to the SMC module for the 3X and 3A family in
        order for the NFC SRAM to be functional.
      - Fixed some errors for interrupts on ports D-F.

    * SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - Common SPI driver: Fix SPI mode setting.  In the SAM3/4 family, the
        clock phase control (CPHA) is inverted (NPHA).  Also fixed an
        incorrect pointer test.  Was checking if the wrong pointer was NULL.

    * SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM3U-EK: Fix polarity of the /PENIRQ signal (it is active low).
        The SAM3U-EK board now runs at 96MHz.

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/nxhello:  Minor fix for compilation error when the
        display resolution is low (< 8bpp) due to a typo that has been there
        for a long time.  Also Correct default colors when in Y1 code mode.
      - apps/system/ramtest:  The RAM test was not correctly built
        into the configuration and build system.
      - apps/examples/composite: Change to prevent some false alarm debug
        assertions (From Chia Cheng Tao).

NuttX-6.30
----------

The 97th release of NuttX, Version 6.30, was made on September 14, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.30.tar.gz and
apps-6.30.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Common Drivers:

      - Extended TERMIOS support for serial and CDC/ACM drivers.  From
        Mike Smith, Andrew Tridgell and Lorenz Meier.
      - Added option to disable serial port reordering.  From Lorenz Meier.
      - Several changes to the USB host control interface and extensions to
        common USB host logic to handle host controllers with multiple
        downstream ports in the root hub.
      - USB device tracing: Extended decoding and stringifying of USB trace
        output to include trace output from class drivers.
      - USB host tracing:  Added support for USB host tracing similar in
        some ways to USB device tracing:  Stringification is an inherent
        part of the trace decoding (not an option).  Only available in the
        SAMA5 USB host drivers now.

    * Networking / Network Drivers

      - Support for the Microchip ENCX24J600 Ethernet driver from Max
        Holtzberg
      - CC3000 Networking.  Initial support for the TI CC3000 network
        module on the Freescale Freedom-KL25Z board from Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.  This is still a work in progress.

    * ARMv7-A, Cortex-A5

      - Restructured some MMU-related logic and header files.
      - Hooks added for Cortex-A8, but not yet used.

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 SPI: nbits() interface extended to control bit order as well
        as bit width (from Teemu Pirinen)

    * STM32 Boards

      - Olimex STM32-P107:  Incorporate ENCX24J600 networking for the Olimex
        STM32 P107 board.
      - LeafLabs Maple Board:  Add board support for the LeafLabs Maple and
        Maple Mini boards.  From Librae.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x

      - Added support for the SAMA5 DMAC controllers.
      - DMA-capable drivers for the SAMA5 SPI peripherals.
      - DMA-capable HSCMCI 0/1/2 drivers.
      - Support for PIO interrupts
      - Utilities for intelligent conversions between physical and virtual
        addresses.
      - Added USB host controller drivers for both the OHCI (low- and full-
        speed) peripheral and the ECHI (high-speed) peripheral.
      - Added USB device controller for the SAMA5 UDPHS peripheral (full-
        and high-speed).
      - Added a Two Wire (TWI) driver.  This is a variant of I2C.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x-EK Development Boards

      - Now supports onboard SDRAM.  Modified heap initialization logic
        to include SDRAM if configured.
      - Integrated a FAT file system on the on-board SPI-based AT25 serial
        FLASH
      - Integrated HSMCI0 and HSMCI1 support for the microSD and full file
        SD card slots.  Includes PIO interrupts for card detection events.
      - Integrated USB OHCI and ECHI host and high-speed peripheral support.
        File system on AT25 now exported via Mass Storage Class.  Includes
        PIO VBUS controls.
      - Integrated the TWI driver and the I2C tool.  Added support for an
        external AT24 serial EEPROM.

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/cc3000.  Initial support for the TI CC3000 network
        module on the Freescale Freedom-KL25Z board from Alan Carvalho de
        Assis. Includes the test to verify the CC3000.
      - apps/examples/usbmsc:  apps/examples/usbstorage renamed usbmsc for
        consistency. Change submitted by CCTSAO.
      - apps/system/usbmonitor:  The USB monitor has been extended so that
        it can be used with USB device or host trace data.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * CC3000 Networking

      - CC3000 Networking.  Initial support for the TI CC3000 network
        module on the Freescale Freedom-KL25Z board from Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.  This is still a work in progress.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

      - Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
        tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
        At this time, only 46% of the configurations have been converted
        to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * File Systems:

      - ROMFS: Fix an error where long (>15) file names were read
        incorrectly from a ROMFS file system.  From Mike Smith
      - NXFFS: Clean up some compiler warnings.

    * Common Drivers

      - MMC/SD driver: Correction for a bad return value when multiple
        block SDIO transfers are suppressed.  By Andrew Tridgell.
      - USB HID keyboard and mass storage host-side class drivers:  Fix some
        compilation errors and warnings when pre-allocated data structures
        are used.
      - USB device-side class drivers:  Fix some compilations errors when
        DUALSPEED (i.e., full- and high-sped) support is enabled.
      - CDC/ACM and PL2303: Don't use max packetsize assigned to the endpoint
        when allocating request buffers; The default value of the endpoint
        max packetsize may be incorrect because the endpoint has not yet
        been configured.  Really only an issue for high-speed endpoints.
      - USB Host Mast Storage Class:  Fixed a problem that was causing some
        devices to fail to initialize: If device is returning fatal transfer
        errors while attempting to initialize, don't bother with the startup
        retries; abort immediately so that the device will be reset and we
        can try again with a better ready device.
      - USB Host Mast Storage Class:  Correct a reference counting error:
        When an MSC device transfer fails while waiting for UnitTestReady,
        the reference count on the class was not being decremented.  The end
        result is a memory leak as can be seen by the USB device numbers
        incrementing: sda, sdb, sdc, ...
      - USB Device CDC/ACM:  Fix backward conditional compilation in the
        CDC/ACM driver with regard to remote wakeup and self-powered
        capabilities.  From the PX4 team via Lorenz Meier,

    * Networking / Network Drivers

      - ARP IP harvesting:  Correct backward condition in netmask task.
        From Max Holtzberg.
      - Network connection monitor: Fixes a race condition where a loss of
        connection may not be detected when the connection is lost before it
        has been accepted (from Max Holtzberg).
      - TCP/IP Backlog:  Fix a critical bug in the TCP/IP backlog
        initialization:  Only the first backlog buffer was getting added to
        the free list.  From Max Holtzberg.
      - ENC28J60:  Fixes and improvements back-ported from the ENCX24J600
        to the ENC28J60 by Max Holtzberg.

    * STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 I2C fixes for the STM32 F3 family from John Wharington.
      - STM32 I2C Correct an error that crept into the STM32 F1 I2C
        driver with some recent changes.  From Librae
      - STM32 F4: Added some missing CONFIG_SERIAL_TERMIOS support; Fixed
        some STM32 F4 Timer 8 pin configurations.  From CCTSAO.
      - STM32 SDIO: If CONFIG_SDIO_BLOCKSETUP defined, OS would crash.  Now
        Generate an error if CONFIG_SDIO_BLOCKSETUP is defined; that
        option is not yet supported by the STM32 SDIO driver.  From CCTSAO
      - STM32 I2C Timers: Some CCER bit settings changed. Submitted by
        CCCTSAO.
      - STM32 CAN: Fix access to CAN filter registers.  From the PX4 team
        via Lorenz Meier.
      - STM32 Kconfig: Fix STM32 UART7/8 Kconfig names and UART DMA.  From
        the PX4 team via Lorenz Meier.

    * LPC17xx Drivers

      - Fix #endif with missing #if in USB host header file.  Reported
        by Andrew Bradford,

    * SAM3/4 Boards:

      - Corrected DMA-related problems: Bad register definitions, parameters
        reversed in a function call.
      - Correct a race condition in the HSMCI driver when an interrupt
        occurs before the wait for the interrupt begins.
      - Peripheral clock setup:  Correct a typo in a register name.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3

      - Order of some operations changed in boot-up logic to defer
        enabling of caching of memory regions until SDRAM is initialized.
      - Correct handling of spurious interrupts.

    * Freescale KL25Z Drivers

      - KL25Z SPI: Correct typo in name of a function.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/composite:  Fix a typo that can cause a configuration
        error.  From CCTSAO.
      - apps/examples/pwm:  Clean-up some configuration confusion.
      - apps/netutils/dhcpd/dhcpd.c:  Fixed calculation of the next lease
        address.  From Paolo Messina.
      - apps/examples/usbmsc:  Don't try to control USB trace if we are
        an NSH built-in task.  In that case our attempts are inadequate
        and only interfere with with other logic that is attempting to
        to do the same thing (in NSH or in the USB monitor).
      - apps/examples/usbmsc:  IMPORTANT bug fix: Change how the msconn
        works.  Because of recent changes the msconn command was hanging.
        This was because the USB MSC start-up logic creates a pthread;
        Now waitpid() will wait until all members of the task group
        exit.  So NSH was hanging in waitpid when msconn started even
        though msconn returned.  The USB MSC logic really should not use
        a pthread, but we are stuck with that for now.  The work-around
        is the msconn now daemonizes itself so that it so that the pthread
        is created in a different task group.
      - apps/nshlib:  Fix NSH listing output for the case of a single file.
        From the PX4 team; provided by Lorenz Meier.

NuttX-6.31
----------

The 98th release of NuttX, Version 6.31, was made on October 28, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.31.tar.gz and
apps-6.31.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * General:

      - Standardized stack checking logic so the interfaces can be used
        by common stack monitoring logic.

    * Audio Subsystem and Audio Drivers:

      - Ken Pettit has finally released his long awaited audio subsystem.
        This is a generic audio subsystem that is appropriate for the
        deeply embedded MCU.  Current testing has, however, been focused
        on the VS1053 CODEC chip.
      - Ken Pettit's VS1053 audio CODEC driver is now functional.

    * Networking / Network Drivers

      - Add the prefix ETH0 to all PHY configuration selections.  This
        will allow us to support to Ethernet MAC drivers with two different
        PHYs (identified with ETH0 and ETH1).  Enabled with CONFIG_NETDEV_MULTINIC.
      - Add MII/RMII PHY definitions for the Micrel KSZ8051 PHY.
      - Add GMII/GRMII PHY definitions for the Micrel KSZ9021/31 PHY.
      - New network-optimized, higher-performance sendfile() implementation
        from Max Holtzberg.
      - Added a simple routing table.  This table is currenly only used (1)
        when we need to look-up an Ethernet device based on an IP address,
        and (2) in the ARP logic when we need to request the MAC address of
        the router, vs the MAC address of the peer.
      - Make net_close() nonblocking and free unestablished connections if
        no free connections available.  From Max Holtzberg.
      - Changed the meaning of the uip_*input functions. They now return
        success when a packet is dropped; This is needed for the ENCX24J600
        driver that must make a decision to return the packet or not:  It
        should not retry dropped packets. From Max Holtzberg.
      - David Sidrane has completed integration of the CC3000 networking.
        This is much more than a network driver:  It is a complete
        replacement for the NuttX networking with off-chip networking support
        in the CC3000.
      - Numerous enhancements to the ENCX24J600 driver from Max Holtberg.

    * Other Common Drivers:

      - The SST25 serial FLASH MTD driver now includes support for the
        SST25VF016B.  From David Sidrane.
      - Add a preflight method to the SDIO interface to support the STM32
        DMA usage model. From Mike Smith.
      - Enhanced the MMC/SD SDIO driver to perform DMA preflight operations
        and fail DMA read/write requests that fail preflighting. From Mike
        Smith.
      - Add an ioctl command that can be used to trigger ADC/DAC conversion
        under application control.

    * File Systems:

      - Enhanced the FAT32 filesystem code to understand DMA preflight
        failures, and to use the file sector buffer as a bounce buffer when
        a user-supplied buffer is not suitable for DMA. From Mike Smith.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x

      - Add support so that subsets of the total DRAM (and other external
        memory) can be added to the heap, leaving other memory reserved for
        other purposes (like the LCDC framebuffers).

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x Drivers:

      - Use more descriptive task names when starting the EHCI and OHCI
        monitor tasks.
      - Added a 10/100Base-T Ethernet (EMAC) driver.
      - Added a 1000Base-T Ethernet (GMAC) driver.
      - Added a Real Time Clock (RTC) driver and integrated with the NuttX
        system time logic.
      - Added support for /dev/random using the SAMA5D3x True Random Number
        Generator (TRNG).
      - Added a Watchdog Timer (WDT) driver.
      - Added a Timer/Counter (TC) library with interface that make be used
        by other drivers that need timer support.
      - Added an ADC driver that can collect multiple samples using the
        sequencer, can be trigger by a timer/counter, and supports DMA data
        transfers.
      - Added a touchscreen driver based on the special features of the
        SAMA5D3 ADC peripheral.
      - Added an LCD controller (LCDC) frame buffer driver.
      - Added a CAN driver.  However, testing has been delayed because of
        cabling issues.
      - Basic header file support is available for the Image Sensor
        Interface (ISI) camera interface.  Work on the camera driver is
        underway and is expected in the next release.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x-EK Development Boards

      - Add OS test support for the FPU test.
      - Enable the task name feature board configuration sto provide
        prettier ps command output.
      - Added NX and NxWM configurations to verify the LCD and touchscreen.
        There are still some outstanding issues with the NxWM configuration
        as of this release.
      - The TRNG and /dev/random are now enabled by default in the demo
        configuration.

    * Atmel AT91 SAM3/4 Boards:

      - Add configuration to select revision 3 of the Arduino Due which has
        some small but important differences.  Suggested by gdi@embedders.org.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Add support for the STM32F207ZE chip. From Martin Lederhilger.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Add configuration for the Spark Core.  The initial check-in is
        basically the Maple Mini board and subsequent development by David
        Sidrane is his special Spark emulation hardware.  The configuration
        should be very mature when actual Spark hardware is available.
      - Support for the Olimex STM32 P207 board added by Martin Lederhilger.
      - Configuration for the Mikroe STM32F4 board configuration updated for
        audio support by Ken Pettit.

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - zkit-arm-1769:  LED1 is now user controllable after booting. From
        Rashid Fatah.

    * Kinetis KL Drivers:

      - PIT and TPM register definitions header files for the from Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Added low-level getc() function for operation with no file system.
        The KL25Z can now support NSH in a very minimal system that does
        not even have a file system.

    * Kinetis KL Boards

      - A new configuration called minnsh was added is an experiement to
        see how small we can get the NuttX footprint and still support NSH.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis..

    * TI Calypso Phones:

      - Basic board support for the Motorola C139 (Compal E86) phone.  From
        Craig Comstock.

    * Applications:

      - Moved several useful examples from apps/examples to apps/system.
        This includes USB MSC, USB CDC/ACM, and USB Composite.
      - New addroute and delroute commands added to NSH in order to manage
        the network routing table.
      - Numerous enhancements and updates to the CC3000 example from David
        Sidrane.
      - Add a new stack monitor daemon that can be used to constantly
        monitor stack usage by all threads.
      - Numerous changes to get NSH working with no file system.  Basically
        this suppresses I/O redirection and replaces file I/O with calls to
        low-level console read/write functions.  Suggested by Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - apps/system/nxplayer: A new, command-line media player called
        'nxplayer' from Ken Pettit.
      - apps/examples/random:  Add a simple test that dumps values from
        /dev/random.
      - apps/examples/adc:  Add support so that a ADC driven by software
        triggering can be tested.

    * Build System:

      - The MKDEP tools now support a new argument that identifies the
        object file path.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

      - Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
        tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
        At this time, only 48% of the configurations have been converted
        to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Initialzation and Scheduling:

      - IDLE thread initialization logic should not call group_setupidlefiles()
        if there are no file descriptors (and, hence, no file system).
      - Fix some cornercase error handling logic:  If sched_releasetcb() is
        called as part of a failed pthread startup before the flags field in
        the TCB has been initialized, then a crash occurs. Pointed out by
        David Sidrane.

    * Networking / Network Drivers:

      - Look up of a device using subnet will fail if the packet is being
        sent out of our subnet (via a router). The fallback here is just to
        use the only device ("eth0") if the subnet lookup fails (this logic
        was extended to handle multiple Ethernet devices by adding a simple
        routing table).
      - Fix some backward conditional logic in send() that enabled the
        check if the ARP address is in the ARP table.  From Max Holtzberg.
      - Notify the socket layer from the network monitor if a connection is
        lost before the monitoring callback has been registered.  From Max
        Holtzberg.
      - send():  Reset the send timeout when the data is ACKed, not when the
        data is sent.  Remove conditions on checking for timeout.  From Max
        Holtzberg.
      - Correct how the TCP/IP initial minimum MSS is calculated. Max
        Holtzberg.
      - TCP state machine: Move tcp connection into SYN_RCVD state after
        aception instead of bypassing and moving directly into ESTABLISHED.
        From Max Holtzberg.
      - Numerous fixes to the ENCX24J600 driver from Max Holtberg.

    * USB Drivers:

      - Change naming of SELFPOWERED and REMOTEWAKEUP to avoid name
        collisions.  Prepend the name of the driver (for example
        CDCACM_SELFPOWERED).
      - CDC/ACM class driver:  Change the interval for the interrupt
        endpoint from 0xff (invalid) to 10.  This is not a critical
        change but will avoid a complaint from the Linux driver when
        it overrides the 0xff value.

    * ARM Cortex-A5:

      - Fix an error in data cache clean and invalidate functions: Fix of
        addresses to cache line boundaries.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x Drivers:

      - Correct some inconsistencies in the way that USB configuration
        settings are used.  This caused compilation errors in SAMA5 OHCI
        when USB debug was ON but USB host tracing was off.
      - When 480MHz UPLL is used to drive OHCI, it should have a divider
        of 10.  However, that does not work.  A divider of 5 does.  Why?.
      - OHCI HCD: Fix a place where DMA-related data needed to be flushed
        to data cache; Fix another where a virtual address was being used
        in a register where a physical address was required.
      - HSMCI Driver: TX DMA disabled.  It is just not reliable. No idea
        why.  RX DMA is still used.
      - STM32F103C pinmapping corrections from David Sidrane.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3x-EK Board

      - Increase the number of pre-allocated watchdog timers.  The default
        number of 4 was easily being exhausted in the more complex
        configurations.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F4 DMA definitions: Typo fixes for UART7 and UART8 DMA
        configs.  From Mike Smith.
      - DMA priority configuration corrections from Mike Smith.
      - Changes to the stm32_dmacapable API. In order to correctly
        verify that a buffer can be transferred, the transfer count and
        the CCR value are required.  Implemented stm32_dmacapable for
        stm32f1xx devices. Enhanced stm32_dmacapable for stm32f2xx and
        stm32f4xx devices to check for additional conditions that will cause
        DMA to fail or lose data.
      - STM32 F1 DMA fix from David Sidrane: The DMA_CNDTRx register
        cannot be modified if the DMA channel is disabled.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Fix compilation errors from bad bit definitions in ADC and PWM
        register.  From Martin Lederhilger.
      - DMA-related fixes to the SPI driver from Ken Pettit.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Remove undefined spi_select() prototype.  This was causing compile
        time warnings.

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - zkit-arm-1768:  MMC/SD is on SPI, not SSP0.  From Rashid Fatah.

    * C Library

      - scanf() fixes from kfrolov: 1) sscanf() function hangs in the
        following example: sscanf("2", "%u,%u,%u,%u", ...), 2) sscanf()
        returns incorrect number of parsed numbers if some arguments
        can't be parsed: sscanf("=2", "%u,%u,%u,%u",...)==1 instead of
        0, and 3) using of char* instead of const char* in vsscanf
        function leads to warnings from GCC.

    * Build System

      - Dependency generation generation was broken for directories that
        keep objects in a sub-directory.  The MKDEP tools now support a new
        argument that identifies the object file path.
      - tools/define.sh:  'cut' no longer works as it once did.  Script
        adapted to observed behavior.

    * Applications:

      - Remove a warning from the NSH library when DHCP is not enabled.
      - Default NSH IP address should be 0x0a000001 (10.0.0.1), not
        0xa0000001 (160.0.0.1).  Ditto for the gateway.
      - Add some missing options to the OS test Kconfig file
      - Fix some bad conditional compilation in the USB monitor.
      - Fix default I2C frequency used by the I2C tool:  400KHz instead
        of 4MHz.  Suggested by Max Kriegleder.
      - Increase stack size for the system/info command. Ken Petit
        reports that this simple command can exceed its 768 stack size
        under certain conditions.  The size is marginal and has been
        increased to 1024 by default but is also now configurable.
      - apps/Makefile:  Needs to include external/Make.defs if we want
        allow external applications to participate in the NuttX
        configuration.  Suggested by gdi@embedders.org.
      - apps/netutils/telnetd:  Missing argument to debug statement
        can cause crashes in certain error conditions. From David
        Sidrane.
      - apps/examples/can:  Correct an error in a debug statement.  From
        Martin Lederhilger.

NuttX-6.32
----------

The 99th release of NuttX, Version 6.32, was made on December 7, 2013,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.32.tar.gz and
apps-6.32.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * General:

      - Extension and standardization of stack debug logic.  Now includes
        coloration of the IDLE and interrupt stacks as well as the heap.
        Suggested by David Sidrane.

    * Audio Subsystem and Audio Drivers:

      - I2S interface definition.  Integrates with audio sub-system.
      - VS1053 worker thread stack size is now configurable and assigned a
        name via pthread_setname_np(). From Ken Pettit.

    * Networking / Network Drivers

      - Updates and adaptations to support for TI CC3000 wireless module
        from David Sidrane.  These updates include multi-threading support
        and interface and header file changes to integrate more seamlessly
        with NuttX applications.

    * File Systems:

      - procfs:  Add support for a tiny procfs file system.  The initial
        offering is little more that a proof of concept but may be developed
        further in subsequent releases.
      - NXFFS:  An initial attempt was made to integrate NXFFS with the NAND
        MTD driver.  Changes were made to handle bad blocks.  However, I
        later realized that NXFFS cannot handle NAND because the way that
        is re-writes blocks is incompatible with the NAND ECC handling.
        These changes were backed-out so as not to introduce turmoil, but
        can be re-enabled if needed via configuration option.
      - NXFFS: Make the start up scan of the media a configuration option.
        It just takes to long and is not really necessary!  Those rare cases
        where the scan was helpful can be fixed using MDIOC_BULKERASE IOCTL
        command.

    * General Drivers:

      - I2S:  A simple character driver was added to support I2S accesses.
        This driver in its current state is intended only to support I2C
        testing and would not be appropriate to used for any real driver
        application.

    * MTD Drivers

      - Add a container for an MTD device that can be used to provide a
        simple, lightweight interface to configuration data storage that
        resides on some storage media that is wrapped as an MTD device.
        From Ken Pettit.
      - New interface definition for lower half NAND drivers.
      - MTD Nand:  Add MTD NAND driver that will support ONFI devices,
        non-ONFI devices (via table lookup), bad block checking, software
        ECC (Hamming), and will interact with the lower-half, hardware-
        specific, NAND driver.  Based on BSD-compatible Atmel sample code.
      - MTD geometry structure is now packed so that it can support larger
        erase block sizes needed by NAND without increasing the size of
        the geometry structure.
      - SST25:  Add another SST25 SerialFlash driver, sst25xx.c.  This one
        differs from sst25.c in that it supports larger SST25 parts:  In
        the larger parts support page write instead of byte/word writes
        like the smaller parts.  From Ken Pettit.

    * USB Drivers

      - STM32 F1 USB Device: Add support for decoded USB trace strings.
        From David Sidrane.

    * ARM

      - Add more ARM9 cache management functions to flush and invalidate
        D-Cache for DMA support.

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x Drivers:

      - Many new drivers including CAN, PWM, SSC/I2S
      - PCK:  Add support for programmable clock outputs.
      - NAND: Driver with hardware ECC and DMA support

    * Atmel AT91 SAMA5D3x Boards:

      - SAMA5D3x-EK: Add support for the apps/examples/i2schar test.
      - SAMA5D3x-EK: Provides board-specific memory controller initialize
        for NAND flash.
      - SAMA5D3x-EK: Add support for "auto-mounting" NAND MTD block driver
        or NXFFS file system.

    * Atmel AT91 SAM3/4 Boards:

      - Basic support for the Atmel SAM4E family.  From Mitko.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Added support for the STM32F429.  From Ken Pettit.
      - Added support for GPIOK and GPIOJ.  From Ken Pettit.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers

      - STM32 F4 OTG FS/HS Device:  OTG FS device and host drivers extended
        so that they can support either the OTG FS peripheral or the OTG HS
        peripheral (in FS mode).  This was done as a quick way to get USB
        support on the STM32F429 which has only OTG HS.  From Ken Pettit.
      - Added header files and driver framework for the STM32F429 LTDC
        framebuffer driver.  From Ken Pettit.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Support for the Spark board was completely by Davide Sidrane.  The
        Spark configuration includes integrated CC3000 wireless support, FAT
        file system on the SerialFlash and a composite device that can be
        used both to export the FAT file system and to provide a serial
        interface.
      - The Mikroe-stm32f4 now uses /dev/config for configuration data
        storage.  From Ken Pettit.
      - Added support for the STM32F429I-Discovery board from Ken Pettit.
      - Added board support for the ViewTool STM32F103/F107 board with the
        STM32F107VCT6 installed.

    * NXP LPC31xx Drivers:

      - USB ECHI HCD:  Add a driver for the low-/full-/high-speed variant
        of the EHCI host controller.

    * NXP LPC31xx Boards:

      - Board-specific USB host support for the Emedded Artists EA3131 board.
        (Missing PCA9532 controls).
      - Add support for the Olimex LPC-H3131 board.  Including USB host
        support (which does not depend on the PCA8532 interface).

    * Kinetis KL Drivers:

      - PWM driver for the Freescale Kinetis KL family from Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.

    * Kinetis KL Boards

      - Freedom-KL25Z:  Add PWM support from Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * TI Stellaris LM3S

      - Don't initialize .data in start-up logic if not running from FLASH.

    * Applications:

      - apps/platform:  A new home for platform-specific application code.
      - Define a common interface that can be used to manage platform-
        specific configuration data.  From Ken Pettit.
      - apps/examples/configdata:  A unit test for the MTD configuration
        data driver from Ken Pettit.
      - Aapps/platform/mikroe-stm32f4: dd platform-specific storage of
        configuration data for the Mikroe-stm32f4.  From Ken Pettit.
      - apps/examples/cc3000: Fine tuning of memory usage from David Sidrane.
      - apps/system/nxplayer: Play thread stack size is now configurable.
        All NxPlayer threads now have names assigned via pthread_setname_np().
        From Ken Pettit.
      - apps/examples/i2schar:  The I2S test based on the I2S character
        driver.
      - apps/examples/hidkbd/hidkbd_main.c:  Now calls a function named
        arch_usbhost_initialize() that must be provided by the platform-
        specific code.
      - NSH:

          - hexdump:  Add skip= and count= options to the hexdump command.  From Ken Pettit.
          - Allow USB trace without a USB console. From David Sidrane.
          - Mount command updates from Ken Pettit.
          - Add an option to the mkfatfs command to specify FAT12, FAT16, or FAT32.

    * Tools

      - tools/mkctags.sh:  A script for creating ctags from Ken Pettit.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

      - Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
        tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
        At this time, only 50% of the configurations have been converted
        to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * File Systems

      - FAT:  In one error return case, the error return value was not being
        set, making the failure look like success. From David Sidrane.
      - mount:  SMART FS must be included in the conditional compilation for
        the set of file systems that require block drivers.  From Daniel
        Palmer.
      - SmartFS: Fixed a minor bug with SMART partition number reporting
        that would only be seen if both partition support and multi-root
        directory support are enabled at the same time.  From Ken Pettit.
      - Deadlock: The inode semaphore must be re-entrant.  Here is the re-
        entrant path that I found:  (1) USB host connects to FLASH drive and
        creates /dev/sda, (2) /dev/sda is mounted, (3) FLASH drive is
        removed but /dev/sda is not destroyed because there is still a
        reference on the device because of the mount, (4) umount() is
        called, taking the inode semaphore, now the driver tries to destroy
        the block driver by calling unregister_blockdriver().  But (5)
        unregister_blockdriver() also takes the inode semaphore causing a
        deadlock if the inode semaphore is not re-entrant.
      - FAT: Fix a typo in the FAT16 formatting logic. Was this ever able to
        format a FAT16 volume?

    * MTD Drivers

      - MTD Partitions:  Fix erase block vs page block confusion. From Ken
        Pettit
      - SST25 Serial Flash:  Improved write performance by fixing a bug that
        prevented operation in the faster write mode.  From David Sidrane.

    * USB Drivers:

      - USB MSC Device:  pthread_join() does not work if called from a
        different task group than the pthread.  This is correct behavior,
        but still a problem.  The correct solution would be configure the
        USB MSC thread to a task, however, this workaround from David
        Sidrane plugs the hole for now.
      - USB CDC/ACM, USB MSC, and Composite Device Classes: Un-initialization
        logic caused re-use of a stale pointer.  Changed to a two pass
        un-initialization for the case of the composite driver:  Memory
        resources are not freed until the second un-initialization pass.
        From David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F1 USB Device: Fix some errors that cause crashes when the USB
        was disconnected.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F1 USB Device: Correct EP0 state handling logic when buffers
        larger than the EP0 packet size are sent.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F1 USB Device: The long outstanding bug involving the handling
        of OUT SETUP commands has been fixed in the STM32 F1 USB device
        driver by David Sidrane.
      - Kconfig:  Add missing setup of CAN TSEG1 and TSEG2 values.  From
        Martin Lederhilger.

    * Tools

      - tools/mkconfig.c:  SMART FS must be included in the conditional
        compilation for the set of writable file systems.  Noted by Daniel
        Palmer.

    * Applications:

      - apps/platform/Makefile:  Was not dealing with the bin sub-directory
        correctly.
      - apps/system/composite/composite_main.c:  The wrong handle was getting
        nullified.  From David Sidrane.

NuttX-6.33
----------

The 100th release of NuttX, Version 6.33, was made on January 30, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-6.33.tar.gz and
apps-6.33.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS Interfaces

      - nanosleep() added.  sleep() and usleep() are no longer core OS
        interfaces.  These have been moved into the library and re-implemented
        as simple wrappers around nanosleep().

    * File Systems

      - procfs restructured by Ken Pettit.  Added files for MTD status.
      - procfs extended to show uptime and task group status.
      - procfs now shows stack information.

    * Networking

      - Add support for the SO_LINGER socket option.  Extended from logic
        provided by Jason Jiang.  Enabled with  CONFIG_NET_SOLINGER.
      - TCP write buffering support added.  From Jason Jiang.
      - Changes from Max Holtzberg to improve how network status is
        reported.  New controls to manage carrier detect.

    * Graphics

      - Massive reshuffling of files with little or no logic changes.   This
        reshuffling was necessary to build graphics applications with the
        kernel builds where the graphics application lie in user space and
        the core graphic server likes in kernel space.  Moved much logic out
        of nuttx/graphics to a new user library, libnx.

    * Cortex-A5/A8/A9

      - Existing Cortex-A5 support updated to include Cortex-A8/9.
      - Add the syscall.h header file needed for the Cortex-A architecture.
      - Start-up logic now supports execution from FLASH with .data and
        .bss in SDRAM.  This was not possible prior to this because .bss
        and .data were initialized before SDRAM was configured.

    * Allwinner A10:

      - Basic support for the Allwinner A10 (Cortex-A8) is in place.

    * Allwinner A10 boards

      - Support for the pcDuino v1 board has been added.  This support
        is not yet very mature and still lacks many drivers.  It is a
        good starting point, however, if anyone wants to develop A10
        support.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3X

      - Start-up logic now supports execution from FLASH with .data and
        .bss in SDRAM.  This was not possible prior to this because .bss
        and .data were initialized before SDRAM was configured.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3X Boards

      - Partial logic in place to support the OV2640 camera.  Still needs
        quite a bit of additional logic to be useful.

    * ARMv7-M

      - Add support for high priority, nested interrupts. This change
        effects not only core ARMv-7M logic, but all ARMv7-M MCU logic:
        LM3S, LM4F,  LPC17xx, LPC43xx, SAM3, SAM4, and STM32. See
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:highperfints

    * STMicro STM32

      - Add clocking support for STM32F107 USB OTG FS (which does not yet
        work)
      - Single-wire UART support for the F1 series from Thomas Grubler.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards

      - The Viewtool board can now be configured to support either the
        STM32F103VCT6 or the STM32F107VCT6.
      - The Viewtool STM32F107VCT6 now supports networking with the
        DP83848C module installed.
      - Add support for Viewtool SSD1289-based LCD on the Viewtool
        STM32F103VCT6 board (untested)
      - Add support for the XPT2046 touchscreen controller on the Viewtool
        LCD module connected to the Viewtool STM32F103 board.
      - Added kernel mode build support for the STM3240G-EVAL board.  Added
        a new kernel mode NxWM build configuration
      - C++ static constructor logic from the nuttx/configs/stm3240g-eval/
        directory to the apps/platform/stm3240g-eval/up_cxxinitialize.c
        where is belongs so that it is available in user-space in the kernel
        mode build.
      - Add native Windows build support for the Olimex STM32 P107.  From
        Max Holtzberg
      - Support for the STM32VL-Discovery board. Contributed by Alan
        Carvalho de Assis
      - Added a configuration for testing simple configurations on the
        PX4FMU v2.

    * ZiLOG ZNEO Boards

      - Add an NSH configuration for the Z16F2800100ZCOG ZNEO board.
      - Added support for the Toyaga 16Z ZNEO board.  The 16Z board is
        based on the ZiLOG ZNEOZ16F2811AL20EG part.  See
        https://github.com/toyaga/16z for further information
      - Developed a patch to work around a compiler error that is revealed
        when building the NSH configuration.

    * Architecture-Independent Drivers

      - OV2640 Camera Driver.
      - Support for the Sharp Memory LCD from Librae.

    * Library

      - Pattern matching logic extended to handle set of characters and
        ranges of character values.  From Ken Pettit.
      - sleep() and usleep() moved intot the C library.  These are not
        longer core OS interfaces; they are simple wrappers for the
        nanosleep().
      - Add an implementation of gets_s().
      - Extend fopen() to include support for C11 exclusive open ("x")
        open mode.
      - Add an implementation of stpcpy()
      - strtol(), strtoll, strtoul(), strtoull(), and strtod() from
        libc/string to libc/stdlib where they belong.

    * Header Files

      - Add rsize_t to include/sys/types.h
      - Add the C11 thread.h header file

    * Configuration/Build System

      - Top level Makefile now supports qconfig and/or gconfig targets that
        may be used for configuration.  These may be used if you build
        kconfig-frontends with support for kconfig-qconf and/or
        kconfig-gconf.
      - Add CONFIG_DEBUG_NOOPT.  Now you can independently enable/disable
        debug symbols and optimization
      - File system related header files moved to include/nuttx/fs
      - Video related header files moved to include/nuttx/video
      - Changes for native Windows build: fix creation of a .version file
        if one does not exist.  Make sure that the APPDIR environment
        variable is set before configuring.  From Max Holtzberg.
      - Board configuration sub-directory can now be specified.  The default
        need not be used.  This is  only useful when CONFIG_ARCH_BOARD_CUSTOM
        is selected and there is no meaningful default sub-directory.
      - Many functions renamed to better conform with the naming standard:
        up_buttoninit() renamed to board_button_initialize(), up_buttons()
        renamed to board_buttons(), up_irqbutton() renamed to
        board_button_irq(), up_ledinit() renamed to board_led_intialize(),
        up_ledon() renamed to board_led_on(), and up_ledoff() renamed to
        board_led_off(). All prototypes removed from board.h header files.
        Now ONLY prototypes in include/nuttx/arch.h.

    * Applications

      - NSH: Refactor. Separate NSH command handling and command execution
        from NSH line parsing.
      - NSH: Will now support multiple commands on a command line, each
        separated with a semi-colon.
      - NSH: Add support of commands enclosed in back quotes as command
        arguments.
      - NSH: Can now handle arguments that are concatenations of constant
        strings, command return data, application return data, and
        environment variables.
      - NSH: Add true and false commands.
      - NSH: Add support for while-do-done and until-do-done loops.  These
        only work when executing a script file because they depend on the
        ability to seek in the file to implement the looping behaviors.
        Can be conditionally compiled out to reduce footprint.
      - NSH: Loosen up if-then-else-fi syntax to allow a command to be on
        the same line as the then or else tokens like:
        "if true; then echo true; else echo false; fi".  More like bash.
      - NSH: Add a break command that can be executed with a loop to
        terminate the loop immediately.

      - system/inifile:  A simple .INI file parser.
      - system/vi:  Add support for a tiny, VI work-alike editor.  This is
        a minimal full screen editor that works with a terminal emulator
        that using VT100 commands.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * kconfig-fronted Configuration:

      - Conversion of old configurations to use the kconfig-frontends
        tool is an ongoing effort that will continue for some time.
        At this time, only 53% of the configurations have been converted
        to use the kconfig-frontends tools.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Core OS

      - Added missing sem_timedwait() system call.

    * Networking

      - Prevent tcp_connect callback from being double freed.  From Max
        Holtzberg
      - uiplib:  Support new definitions and state passing for network
        device status. From Maz Holtzberg.

    * File Systems

      - FAT:  (1) A correction to FAT cluster allocation, and (2) Fix to some
        root directory logic that was conditionally done only for FAT 32.
        Apparently this needs to done for all FAT types.  Both from Andrew
        "Tridge" Tridgell via Lorenz Meier.

    * Binary Formats

      - Fix a small memory leak when attempting to load a program from a file.

    * Cortex-A8/9

      - Fix some errors in the cache invalidation logic (only seem to matter
        for Cortex-A8).
      - Add more nop's after enabling the MMU.  The cortex-a8 seems to need
        these

    * Graphics

      - Fix a typo that caused a compilation error when
        CONFIG_NXCONSOLE_BPP < 8.  From Librae

    * ARMv7-M

      - Correct alignment of RAM vector table.
      - Interrupt handling: Do not disable and enable the IRQ on each
        entry, (2) this interferes with controlling the IRQ interrupt
        setting from interrupt handlers, and (3) up_disable_irq() does
        not work anyway so that this has never done anything.
      - Fix all implementations of up_disable_irq() for all Cortex-M3 and
        M4 architectures:  To enable an interrupt on the Cortex-M3/4 CPU,
        you need to set a bit in the ISER register.  To disable the
        interrupt, you need to set a bit in the ICER register.  Existing
        logic was trying to disable interrupts by clearing the bit in the
        ISER register.  That will not work; writing a '0' to the ISER
        register has no effect.  That  means that up_disable_irq() was
        doing nothing!  It turns out that that is not really important
        because up_disable_irq() is not really used for that purpose.  But
        some spurions STM32 ADC interrupts have been reported to me and this
        turned out to be the cause in that case.  Thanks to Manuel Sthn for
        the tip.

    * STMicro STM32

      - Fix configuration and pin definitions that would prevent building
        USB for the connectivity and performance lines.
      - STM32L15xx: Fix a typo in USB pin definitions
      - Fix pin definition names for SPI2 MOSI and MISO. Noted by Brian Webb
      - Various fixes for STM32F103ZE SPI3 pin mapping definitions.  From
        Steve Redler IV

    * STMicro STM32 Boards

      - Olimex STM32-P107:  Failed to build if SPI3 for UEXT is not remapped.
        From Max Holtzberg

    * x86 Boards

      - Add a configuration option to select the -m32 compiler option when
        building for a 32-bit target on a native 64-bit compiler.  So far,
        only used for the qemu/i486 configuration.
      - Patch from Matt Campbell to fix 'Error: .size expression for idle_stack
        does not evaluate to a constant".

    * Library

      - strftime(): Needs null termination on the generated string.  From
        Max Holtzberg.
      - Typo in ctype.h macro name: iscntrl(), not iscontrol().
      - If there are no arguments (argc == 1), then getopt() will leave the
        optind variable in an undefined state (2014-1-20).
      - ARMv7-M memcpy(): Assembler changes with the gcc-47 distribution
        from ARM mean that we need to be explicit about branch sizes; one
        or more of the wide branch opcodes results in bad table branching.
        From Mike Smith.

    * Configuration/Build System

      - Fixes for some tools/ for Windows build issues from Max Holtzberg.
      - Config.mk: 'cypath' must be called if we are using a Windows native
        toolchain with the Cygwin 'make' to convert paths to proper
        Windows paths.  From Richard Cochran.
      - ARM Makefile: Dependency directory list is now computed from the
        VPATH.  From Richard Cochran.
      - builtin/Makefile: Fixes for native Windows build from Max Holtzberg.
      - Refactor some configuration dependencies:  NSH networking features
        should depend on netutil selections; netutil selections, in turn,
        should depend on networking selections.

    * Applications

      - NSH: Modified the df -h logic to eliminate truncating numbers in
        conversion (like 7900 -> 7M).  From Ken Pettit.

NuttX-7.1
---------

The 101st release of NuttX, Version 7.1, was made on March 15, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.1.tar.gz and
apps-7.1.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

  The previous NuttX version was 6.33.  The NuttX minor version number is
  incremented on each release, but the major version number is incremented
  only when an incompatibility with previous versions is included in the
  release.  In this case, the legacy, manual configuration is no longer
  supported by the NuttX build system beginning with NuttX 7.1.  Only the
  newer configurations generated by the kconfig-frontends tools will generate
  viable NuttX configurations.

  All board configurations in the NuttX source tree have been converted to
  use the newer configuration, but if you have some older style configurations
  for you board, you will need to convert those configurations to use the
  kconfig-frontends tools before taking any new code from the repository. See
  http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:howtos:convertconfig for some
  guidelines.

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - System time logic now includes logic to measure and calculate the
        CPU load percentage (from David Alessio).  This CPU load logic
        extended to keep counts on each thread.  The per-thread CPU is
        now reported in the procfs under <pid>/loadavg  An asynchronous,
        "external" clock may be used to drive the CPU load calculations
        for more accurate measurements when needed.

    * File Systems:

      - As mentioned above, the per-thread CPU load information is now
        reported in the procfs under <pid>/loadavg.
      - Many file system interfaces have been extended to operate on the
        top-level NuttX pseudo filesystem.  These include rmdir, mkdir,
        rename, and unlink.  This capability can be disabled with
        CONFIG_DISABLE_PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS in order to keep the footprint
        small.

    * Networking:

      - Numerous updates and improvements to the CC3000 driver from David
        Sidrane.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Defined a mouse interface that is very similar to a touchscreen
        interface, but allows reporting of all mouse buttons.  Also, unlike
        touchscreen drivers, mouse drivers need to report positional data
        with no button is pressed so that the mouse position can drive a
        cursor.
      - Added support for a USB HID boot mouse device.  Cursor support is
        not integrated and must be provided by the application based upon
        the reported mouse data.
      - Support added for the MIO283QT9A LCD from Toby Duckworth.

    * Atmel SAMA4E:

      - Added complete architecture support for the Atmel AT91 SAM4E
        Cortex-M4F parts.

    * Atmel SAM4E Board Support:

      - Add board support for the SAM4E-EK board.

    * Atmel SAM4E Drivers:

      - Added logic to manage the Cortex-M Cache Control block.
      - Developed and integrated an Ethernet MAC driver for the SAM4E.
      - Backported the SAMA5 SPI driver to the SAM3/4 architecture.  The
        SAMA5 version supports both multiple SPI peripherals as needed by the
        SAM3A and SAM3X and also supports DMAC (but not PDC) needed by the
        SAM4E.

    * Atmel SAM D20:

      - Added basic architecture support for the Atmel AT91 SAM D20
        Cortex-M0+ parts.

    * Atmel SAM D20 Board Support:

      - Added basic support for SAM D2 Xplained Pro board.  Currently, the
        NuttShell (NSH) works reliably over a serial port.  An SPI driver
        has also been developed.  Work with the SAM D20 has been temporarily
        stopped, however, in order to focus on the SAM4E-EK.

    * TI Tiva TMC4C123G:

      - Added architecture support for the TI Tiva TM4C123G parts.  This was
        merged into the existing support for the LM3S and LM4F families.
        All directory, file, and function references changed from lm to tiva.

    * TI Tiva TMC4C123G Board Support:

      - Added basic board support for the TM4C123G-Launchpad.  As of this
        release the TM4C123G-Launchpad board support is untested and likely
        incomplete.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - The Mikroe STM32F4 can now support the newer MIO283QT9A LCD. From
        Toby Duckworth.
      - Miscellaneous changes to better support FPU on STM32F429 Discovery
        from David Alessio.

    * NXP LPC2378 Drivers:

      - Incorporated I2C and SPI drivers for the LPC23xx from Lizhuoyi.

    * QEMU i486 Drivers:

      - New QEMU keyboard and VGA drivers from Lizhuoyi.

    * Documentation:

      - Added a coding standards document.  See
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=documentation:codingstandard

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - A configuration option, CONFIG_DEFAULT_SMALL, was added to select
        default values for configuration variables based upon whether you
        want a smaller footprint or more features.  This is not very useful
        if you are modifying existing configurations because then the
        default values do not apply.
      - CONFIG_DEFAULT_SMALL has been defined on all tiny MCU configurations
        so that they do not grow so rapidly when new, optional features are
        added.
      - The legacy, manual configuration is no longer supported by the
        NuttX build system.  Only the newer configurations generated by
        the kconfig-frontends tools will generate viable NuttX
        configurations.  All board configurations in the NuttX source tree
        have been converted to use the newer configuration, but if you have
        some older style configurations for you board, you will need to
        convert those configurations to use the kconfig-frontends tools. See
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:howtos:convertconfig for some
        guidelines.

    * Applications:

      - NSH can now use an EMACS-like command line editor.  This CLE, is
        really more like the traditional readline than is the default, tiny
        the NuttX readline .
      - The touchscreen example can now be configured to work with either a
        touchscreen or a mouse device.
      - Several NSH commands can now be used to operate on objects in the
        top-level pseudo-filesystem: rmdir, mkdir, mv, and rm.  This
        capability can be disabled with CONFIG_DISABLE_PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS
        in order to keep the footprint small.
      - If both the CPU load feature and the procfs features are enabled,
        then the NSH 'ps' command will show the CPU load used by each
        thread.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Core OS:

      - task_terminate()  always returned an error because the return value
        was not being set correctly (from Gosha).
      - nanosleep()  Fix a missing call to re-enable interrupts (from Jason
        Jiang).

    * File Systems:

      - Fixed an error in the FAT logic that can cause file corruption.  The
        error conditions are rare and only seen with very large files (from
        Andrew Tridgell).  This replaces a previous, partial fix for the same
        problem.
      - Fixed memory leaks in the NXFFS open() and stat() implementations
        (from Lzyy).
      - The interfaces include opendir(), readdir(), et al, were modified so
        that errors will not be reported if you attempt to list a empty
        pseudo-directory.

    * Networking:

      - Fix one place where the connection reference count was not being
        decremented in the socket close() logic.  This is really a cosmetic
        change BUT when CONFIG_DEBUG_NET is enabled, it will cause assertions.
      - Backed out a small part of the NuttX 6.33 write buffering changed.
        David G says that this causes problems in connecting to a server.
      - In DHCPD, there was a place where the logic was calling ntohl()
        inappropriately; the address was already in the correct order.  How
        could DHCPD have worked with this bug?

    * TI Tiva/Stellaris Drivers:

      - Fixed cut'n'paste error that prevented UARTS2-7 from being used with
        the LM4F120 Launchpad.
      - Fixed several errors there were unmasked with UARTs > UART2 are
        enabled (grom Gosha).

    * Allwinner A10 Drivers:

      - Fixed cut'n'paste error that prevented UARTS2-7 from being used with
        the pcDuino.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Fix an compilation error that crept into the LPC17xx USB host driver.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Fix cloned typo in the serial driver:  FLOWCONTROL vs FLOWCONROL.
      - Disable SPI before changing DPI CR1 register (from David Sidrane).
      - stm32 TIM: Set the timer CCMR when selecting timer channel.  From
        David Sidrane.
      - Fix typo in a Makefile: stm32_pwm.c not stm32_psm.c.  Noted by Max
        Kriegleder.

    * Library:

      - More sscanf()  bug fixes from David Sidrane.

    * Header files:

      - cstdbool:  Ignore _Bool8 if CONFIG_C99_BOOL8=y

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Several changes to restore the broken native Windows build

    * NuttShell (NSH):

      - Use strncpy vs strcpy in the Telnet console logic to avoid
        overruning the username and password buffers (from Bertold Van den
        Bergh).
      - Add a newline after printing the file in the 'cat' command.  This
        prevents the NSH prompt from be in the same line as the final line
        of the file in the case where there is no newline at the end of the
        file.

NuttX-7.2
---------

The 102nd release of NuttX, Version 7.2, was made on April 29, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.2.tar.gz and
apps-7.2.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Add support for CLOCK_REALTIME.  From Macs N.

    * Network Utilities:

      - Add a very primitive NTP client.
      - DNS resolver:  Long needed major clean up for coding style and
        unification of naming conventions (resolv vs dns).

    * Common Drivers:

      - Add a new MTD driver that can be used to contain another driver and
        force its apparent sector size to be 512 bytes.
      - If DCD can support queuing of stall requests, then the USB MSC stall
        work around delays are not necessary.
      - Redesign threading module used with the USB MSC driver.  It was using
        pthreads before and these were changed to a kernel thread.  The reason
        for this has to do with task grouping:  A pthread is a memory of the
        group of the task that started it.  A kernel thread is independent of
        the task that started in (other than knowing it as the parent).  This
        allows me to remove so kludge logic to "deparent" the pthread on
        startup.
      - Update the MIO183QT-9A LCD driver to support reading from the LCD.
        From Toby Duckworth.
      - Timer "upper half" driver and l"lower half" interface definition from
        Bob Doiron.

    * Atmel SAM4E/4S Board Support:

      - All SAM4E configurations updated to run with 120MHz CPU speed and
        with the CMCC enabled.
      - Support for the SAM4S Xplained Pro board from Bob Doiron.
      - Add watchdog driver.  From Bob Doiron.

    * Atmel SAM4E/4S Drivers:

      - Add a USB full speed device driver (UDP) for the SAM4E.
      - Add support in HSMCI and SPI drivers to invalidate cached memory if
        the CMCC is enabled.
      - Add logic to handle SPI word widths > 8
      - Port RTC driver from SAMA5 to SAM3/4.  From Bob Doiron.
      - HSMCI:  Extensions from Bob Doiron needed to support PDC-based HSMCI
        DMA transfers.  Verified on the SAM4S Xplained Pro.

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Add support for the SAMA5D36 chip.
      - Add functions to calculate PLLACK, PCK, and MCK frequencies given
        the main clock frequency.
      - Implemented RAM functions.  When booting directly into NOR flash,
        reconfiguring the PLL while executing out of NOR FLASH causes
        crashes.  This was fixed by David Sidrane by implementing RAM
        functions. The killer code is copied and executed from ISRAM and
        the crash is avoided.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - Add support for the SAMA5D3 DBGU.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Board Support:

      - Add a board support configuration for the Atmel SAMA5D3 Xplained
        board running out of SDRAM.  When booting from SDRAM, start-up logic
        needd to query the PMC registers to determine the MCK, PCK, etc.
      - For all SAMA5 boards, added support for 528MHz clocking.

    * TI Tiva/Stellaris:

      - Modify the logic to disables the interrupts and sets the default
        interrupt priority so that it uses the ICTR to get the number of
        interrupt lines/registers.  This is instead of using some fixed
        number of initializations based a priori knowledge of the number
        of interrupt lines in the MCU.

    * STMicro STM32

      - Add support for the STM401RE.  From Frank Bennett.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4Discovery:  Add support to register keyboard and mouse
        classes if so configured.  From Leo.
      - Add support for the Nucleo-F401RE board.  From Frank Bennett.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Add STM32 Ethernet IGMP hashing support.  From Manuel Sthn.
      - OTG FS Host:  USB host tracing added by Leo.

    * Freescale Kinetis

      - Modify the logic to disables the interrupts and sets the default
        interrupt priority so that it uses the ICTR to get the number of
        interrupt lines/registers.  This is instead of using some fixed
        number of initializations based a priori knowledge of the number
        of interrupt lines in the MCU.

    * NXP LPC17xx

      - Modify the logic to disables the interrupts and sets the default
        interrupt priority so that it uses the ICTR to get the number of
        interrupt lines/registers.  This is instead of using some fixed
        number of initializations based a priori knowledge of the number
        of interrupt lines in the MCU.

    * ZiLOG ZNEO Drivers

      - Added ZNEO ESPI driver.

    * Library:

      - Finish incomplete support for ferror().  From Macs N.

    * Documentation:

      - UsbTrace.html:  Add some discussion of the USB monitor.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - compiler.h:  Add macro UNUSED() that can be used to eliminate
        warnings about variables that are set to values that are not
        used.

    * Debugging Support:

      - Add a configuration option to enable dumping of the USB trace buffer
        on assertion.

    * Applications:

      - IGMP Example:  Fill out Kconfig file; update makefile so that the
        IGMP example can be used as an NSH built-in application. From Manuel
        Sthn.
      - lcdrw Example:  Fill out empty Kconfig file.
      - touchscreen Example:  Add a configuration option to indicate if
        architecture-specific initialized is required, yes or no.
      - System usbmsc:  Back out the USBMSC daemon... it is no longer needed
        with the recent fix to the USBMSC class driver.
      - NSH: malloc/free IOBUFFER for 'cat' and 'hexdump' commands instead of
        using the stack.  From Bob Doiron.
      - cpuhog, serialblaster, and serialrx Examples:  Stress test examples
        added by Bob Doiron.

Bugfixes (see the ChangeLog for details).  Some of these are very important:

    * Core OS:

      - errno_get_errno_ptr() and getpid():  Add some checks.  If these
        functions are called very early in initialization before the tasking
        structures are initialized, they would not behave properly.

    * Networking:

      - IGMP-related bug fixes from Manuel Sthn.
      - In netdev_findbyaddr(), skip network devices that are in the "down"
        state.  It does not make sense to consider an address match with a
        "down" device.  From Brennan Ashton.

    * Network Utilities:

      - DHCPD:  The correct value of the PAD option.  Should be zero, not
        one.  From Brennan Ashton.
      - Corrections to the NTP client from Manuel Stuehn.

    * Common Drivers:

      - usbhost.h:  Fix some USB HID-related conditional compilation.  From Leo.
      - USB HID mouse driver: Don't include NAKs from the device in the error
        count.  From Leo.

    * TI Tiva/Stellaris:

      - Add corrected control logic for TM4C125GXL based on logic from Daniel
        Carvalho with modifications.  The LM4F120 also works well with this
        change.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F2 SPI:  Correct a mapping for SPI MOSI pin.  From dlsitzer.
      - OTG FS Host:  Fixes related to low-speed devices and interrupt
        endpoints from Leo.  Necessary in order to use a USB HID mouse
        device.
      - STM32 SDIO:  The dmaflight method must be conditioned on
        CONFIG_SDIO_PREFLIGHT.  Noted by Pelle Windestam.
      - Sourceforge Ticket #26.  up_prioritize_irq should not be called
        if CONFIG_ARCH_IRQPRIO is not defined.

    * Atmel SAM3/4:

      - Fix some backward conditional compilation in the start-up logic.
      - Fix initialization of the default interrupt priorities.  This is
        a critical bug fix!
      - SAM4S: Fix error in macros that disable peripheral clocking.  From
        Bob Doiron.

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Fix double mapping of SDRAM when executing out of SDRAM.  In this
        case, the SDRAM was already mapping in arm_head.S.
      - In clock configuration, the BMS bit handling was fixed to match
        what the HW really does.  From David Sidrane.
      - TLB Bufferable bit did not do what I thought it was going to do.
        I though I was selecting a write-through cache, but the result was
        that all caching was disabled and NOR FLASH accesses were very slow.
      - Move the un-definitions of __ramfuncs__ from the clock configuration
        .c file to the .h file.  Otherwise, the attribute will be applied
        differently for the prototype and the function definition.
        Sourceforge patch 38 from Luciano Neri.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - Fix a case in the UDPHS driver where received status was not being
        cleared, causing OUT SETUP commands to fail.
      - TWI data sending fails to increment the number of bytes transferred
        on first byte sent.  from David Sidrane.
      - If running from SDRAM, then BOARD_MCK_FREQUENCY is not a constant
        and cannot be used in conditional compilation.  All drivers fixed
        EXCEPT for the PWM and Timer/Counter drivers which will need some
        more extensive redesign.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Boards:

      - SAMA5D3x-EK: The red LED is controlled by PE24 which is also the
        camera/ISI interface reset line.  So if the a camera is installed,
        then we must avoid controlling the red LED or we inadvertently
        also reset the camera module.  Noted by David Sidrane.
      - Header files reference type xcpt_t in certain configurations and
        so must include nuttx/irq.h.  This is Sourceforge bug 25 submitted
        by Luciano Neri.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers

      - arm/src/lpc17xx/Kconfig and lpc17_ethernet.c:  The default interrupt
         priority should be default, not the highest priority (2014-4-19).

    * ZiLOG ZNEO

      - Fix calculation of timer reload and prescaler.  The timer frequency
        was way too fast.

    * Library:

      - strncpy():  Change ordering of test and copy.  Logic would have
        failed if n=0; one byte was always copying before testing
        for the end of the copy.
      - Fix a counting error in the return value from sscanf().  Noted by
        kfrolov.  Also, sscanf() should return EOF if no values were
        converted.
      - Fix a logic error in ftell().  It was simply using the file offset
        and did not take into account data buffered in memory.  From Macs N.
      - sccanf():  Use stroul() vs strol() with %u format otherwise, range
        of values is restricted because of sign bit. From kfrolov.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Fix a build error that occurs when only USB device tracing is enabled.

    * NuttShell (NSH):

      - Fix NuttShell version number display in the NSH welcome message.
        version.h was not being included.

    * Other Applications:

      - sysinfo:  CONFIG_VERSION_BUILD is a string an needs to be
        printed with %s, not %d.  Noted by Librae.
      - nxplayer:  Compilation failure in one configuration reported by
        Manuel Stuhn.
      - System sdcard:  Remove an STM32 dependency.  From Bob Doiron.
      - telnetd Example:  Naming is confused.  In someplaces 'telnetd',
        and in others 'shell.'  All changes to telnetd.  Noted by Pelle
        Windestam.

NuttX-7.3
---------

The 103rd release of NuttX, Version 7.3, was made on June 25, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.3.tar.gz and
apps-7.3.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Dynamic loader: Framework to support Pascal P-Code as a binary
        format that can be exec'ed from a file system.
      - Dynamic Loader:  Extend the binfmt interface to handle error
        conditions where format-specific clean-up is needed in the event
        of error conditions.  This is needed by the P-Code binfmt.

    * Networking

      - IOB:  Add a generic I/O buffer chain logic.  This logic uses small,
        pre-allocated buffers that can be chained together to support
        transfers of any size, using fewer resources and also without
        committing in advance to a TCP window size.  There is now only
        one I/O type used in the networking and it is these I/O buffer
        chains.
      - TCP Write Buffering:  TCP write buffering logic converted to use
        I/O buffer chains.
      - TCP Read-Ahead Buffering:  TCP read-ahead buffering logic converted
        to use I/O buffer chains.
      - Includes logic to support throttling of read-ahead buffering if
        the read-ahead buffering is competing with write buffering for
        I/O buffers.
      - Raw Sockets:  Add support for the AF_PACKET socket family.  From
        Daniel Lazlo Sitzer.

    * Common Drivers:

      - W25 Serial FLASH driver extended by Mark Whitehorn to support the
        8Mbit W25Q80BV part.
      - Add support for Fujitsu MB85RS1MT RAMTRON part.  From Charles Ash.
      - Enhancements to the generic timer interface to support capture mode
        from Bob Doiron.
      - Add an rxflowcontrol method to the serial interface to better
        support RX flow control. This involves common changes in addition to minor updates to all MCU-specific serial drivers (only fully implemented for the STM32). From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Atmel SAM4C

      - Add support for the SAM4CM family.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * Atmel SAM4E/4S Drivers:

      - RTT driver from Bob Doiron.  Also added high resolution RTC
        emulation using the RTT for the sub-second counter.

    * Atmel SAM4E/4S Board Support:

      - The SAM4S Xplained Pro now uses the extended timer/counter
        features. From Bob Doiron.
      - Added a touchscreen and LCD driver for the SAM4E-EK board (the LCD,
        however, not yet fully functional).

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Optimized, high performance, assembly language memcpy().  This is
        the same optimized memcpy() function that Mike Smith brought in
        for the ARMv7-M with minor tweaks by David Sidrane to work with
        the ARMv7-A.
      - Basic support added for the SAMA5D4 family.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAMA5D4:  New drivers unique to the SAMA5D4: XDMAC, SAIC, and
        others.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Board Support:

      - SAMA5D4-MB:  Initial board support for the SAMA5D4-MB/EK boards.

    * STMicro STM32

      - Add support for the STM32152 and STM32162 Medium+ density parts
        (plus miscellaneous other improvements to the original STM32151
        logic).  From Jussi Kivilinna and Sami Pelkonen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Support for the Olimex STM32 H405 board contributed by Martin
        Lederhilger.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Implement the rxflowcontrol method to the serial interface to better
        support RX flow control. From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Added support for the RTC, ADC, DAC, Timers, PWM and MCPWM
        drivers.  From Max (himax).

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - Support for the RTC, ADC, DAC, Timers, PWM and MCPWM integrated
        in the LPCXpresso LPC1768 board support.  From Max (himax).

    * Library:

      - Add support for seek-able streams.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Restructured network directories, header files, and naming to
        better modularize the networking and to better integrate the
        networking with the rest of NuttX.

    * Applications:

      - prun:  An NSH built-in application that can be used to run
        Pascal P-Code programs either programatically or from the NSH
        command line.
      - netpkt:  A "raw" socket test from Lazlo Sitzer.
      - hex2bin:  A library and built-in task to convert from
        Intel HEX to binary format.  It can write the binary data to a file or it can store the binary data to memory (to support, for example, a loader).

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Dynamic Loader: Fix an error in a symbol table search function.
        Noted by Pelle Windestam.
      - Dynamic Loader:  Fix a critical error in exec(); argv was not
        being passed.
      - mq_notify:  Test for a valid signal number was inverted; this
        function could not have been working correctly before???  From
        eero.nurkkala.
      - Fix typo in conditional compilation:  CONFIG_CLOCK_MONOTONIC vs.
        CLOCK_MONOTONIC.  From Manuel Sthn.

    * Graphics

      - Fix typos in several RGB conversion macros.

    * Networking:

      - Modify TCP timout handling to provent situations where connections
        may not be freed. From Max Holtzberg.
      - Improved TCP fallback allocation logic from Max Holtzberg. Also,
        fallback mechanism is disabled when SO_LINGER is to prevent
        deadlocks.
      - Write Buffering:  Add checks from buffer allocation failures. From
        Max/Himax.

    * Network Utilities:

      - webserver: httpd_fs_open() should return OK on success and ERROR on
        failure, not 1 and 0.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Make sure that all references to up_prioritize_irq() are
        conditioned on CONFIG_ARCH_IRQPRIO.  Problem noted by Mike Smith.
      - CC3000: Correct SPI mode for CC3000 is CPOL=0 CHPA=1. From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - CC3000: Fix a race condition in thread start-up logic. From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - CC3000: Additional fixes including a compilation failure if POLL is
        enabled. From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * USB Drivers:

      - CDC/ACM and PL2303 device:  Reset RX head to avoid resending last
        serial data when USB cable disconnected/re-connected.  From
        Lizhuoyi.

    * TI Tiva/Stellaris Boards:

      - The Nucleo-F401RE has no on-board crystals and, hence, needs to run
        with the PLL input from the on-chip HSI clock.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Serial:  Handle configuration for the case of 8-bit data with
        parity.  From Freddie Chopin.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - There was a cloned error in all SAM3/4 board configurations (and
        for a few other architectures as well).  Button interrupts not
        being disabled after being detached.  As a result, unexpected
        interrupts could be received after the button interrupt was
        detached.

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Fix some critical typos in the SAMA5D3 DMA definitions.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers

      - I2C: Add an alternative I2C implementation for the STM32 F103 that
        works around errata in that specific part.  From Patrizio Simona.
      - RTCC:  Add retry logic to RTC initialization. It sometimes takes
        longer for the RTC to initialize, at least as noted on an F2 part.
        From Daniel Lazlo Sitzer.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers

      - GPDMA:  Fix an error when DMA is started:  The read-modify-write
        fails when the DMA is started.  This is because the value read is
        not the same as the value set (on write it is the number of
        transfers to do; on read it is the number of transfers completed).
        From Lizhuoyi.

    * Library:

      - snprintf():  If the size passed to snprintf() is zero, then
        snprintf() must write nothing, but instead return the size of the
        buffer needed to hold the entire string.  From Sami Pelkonen.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - The alternate console device CONFIG_NSH_CONDEV must not be defined
        unconditionally. This causes errors when using Telnet sessions.
        This was solved by adding CONFIG_NSH_ALTCONDEV: CONFIG_NSH_ALTCONDEV enables or disables the feature then, if
        enabled, CONFIG_NSH_CONDEV provides the alternative console
        device name.
      - Many files: Convert all old-style GCC variadic macros to the C99
        form.  Recent GCC changes tightens up that behavior and can cause
        some problems (at least for the IAR compiler for some reason).
        Noted by Bob Grimes.
      - tools/configure.sh:  In-place SED edit messes up permissions on
        windows. From Hannes Delago.

    * Build Tools:

      - tools/mkfsdata.pl:  Apparently, the trailing the 0x00 in http
        server files is seen as a bug in javascript and images.  From
        Max/Himax.

    * Other Applications:

      - I2C Tool:  Fix to show the updated register address on each
        fetch (vs. showing the same starting address each time).  From
        Ryan VanSickle.
      - CLE was not returning the terminating newline character. But
        reported by Max kriegleder.

NuttX-7.4
---------

The 104th release of NuttX, Version 7.4, was made on August 15, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.4.tar.gz and
apps-7.4.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Beginnings of a crypto/ subsystem from Max Neklyudov
      - Tickless operation:  NuttX now supports a mode with no periodic
        timer interrupts.  Rather, timed events are handle via an interval
        timer.  This (1) lowers the rate of interrupt processing to timer
        events, (2) gives much high timing resolution, and (3) allows lower
        power modes of operation where the CPU is not constantly being
        interrupted by the timer.
      - Restructured the OS files under sched/ to better support the already
        modular nature of the RTOS.

    * Networking

      - Substantial directory and header file reorganization and renaming to
        make the NuttX networking implementation more modular.
      - Add network device ioctl to access PHY registers. From Daniel Lazlo
        Sitzer

    * Binary Loader:

      - Various changes associated with symbol tables from Pelle Windestam.

    * Graphics:

      - colorcmp(): New utility to compare two colors.
      - The initial background color is now configurable.  Includes logic to
        eliminates multiple background updates to get the right color.
      - Minor configuration changes to handle mouse X/Y and touchscreen
        X/Y differently.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - SmartFS: Increase some variables from uint16_t to uint32_t to handle
        larger device sizes.  From Ken Pettit.
      - Add configurable AES encryption support to the block-to-character
        (BCH) driver.  This allows any block device to be accessed as an
        encrypted character device.  From  Max Nekludov
      - Add an MTD layer that will add read-ahead or write buffering to any
        MTD driver (incomplete).
      - Automounter:  Add support for an auto-mounter that will automatically
        mount and unmount a file system a media is inserted and removed

    * Audio/Audio Drivers

      - WM8904 audio CODEC driver.
      - PCM .WAV file decoder. Fast forward implemented with sub-sampling
        (currently no rewind support).
      - Add a NULL audio device that can be used to simply unit-level testing
        of audio decoders.
      - Audio subsystem now supports interfaces for fast-forward and rewind
        needed by CMediaPlayer; add hooks for equalizer settings needed by
        the WM8904 CODEC.

    * Other Common Drivers:

      - MTD: Extend erase block size to 18-bits in order (decrease block
        size to 14-bits) to handle parts with large erase blocks. From Kosma
        Moczek
      - maxTouch:  Add support for the Atmel maXTouch touchscreen controller.

    * Host Simulation:

      - Provides the timers needed to support the Tickless mode of operation.

    * Atmel SAM4C:

      - Add SAM4CM IPC register header file.  From Max Neklyudov
      - Various fixes PMC and clock configuration for the SAM4CM port from
        Max Neklyudov

    * Atmel SAM4E/4S Drivers:

      - SAM4 AES driver.  Contributed by Max Neklyudov

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Add logic to redirect all SAMA5D4 interrupts to the AIC
      - Add a configuration option to reserve DRAM for a framebuffer when
        executing out of DRAM.  This optional was available before when
        executing out of NOR, but needs to work a little differently in
        this case.
      - Add SAMA5 slow (32.768KHz) clock support.
      - Add support for the ARM L2CC-PL310 L2 cache.  The system runs with
        L2CC cache enabled but there is some issues still with the LCD DMA;
        I suspect that the memory timing configuration for L2CC needs to
        be tuned.
      - Provides the timers needed to support the Tickless mode of operation.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - XDMAC-based HSCMI driver for the SAMA5D4
      - Adapt the SAMA5D3 LCDC driver to work with the SAMA5D4 which has
        no hardware cursor.
      - PIO: Add a new interface sam_pio_forceclk() that can be used to
        force PIO clocking on.  I am afraid I was too conservative with
        PIO clocking in the initial design; this is the price.
      - TWI:  Now supports the up_i2creset() method.
      - TWI:  Use sam_pio_forceclk() so that we can read the current state
        of an open-drain output in the TWI reset logic.
      - SSC:  SCC Frame Synch Delay and Start Delay are now configurable.
      - PCK:  Add the slow clock and the main clocks as options for the
        PCK configuration.
      - Timer/Counter: Can now handle non-constant BOARD_MCK_FREQUENCY. Also
        now supports methods to attach client interrupt handlers
      - One shot and free-running timers.  These are wrappers around the low
        level timer/counter logic to provide one-shot and free-running
        timers.  These were developed to support the Tickless operation, but
        can be used for any purpose.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Board Support:

      - Add a boot loader that runs from ISRAM and loads an Intel HEX file
        into DRAM.
      - Add a configuration that will load a bootloader into AT25 Serial
        FLASH
      - SAMA5D4-EK NSH configuration supports many more features: RTC, HSCMI
        card detection, maXTouch touchscreen, TM7000 LCD, the command line
        media player (currently using the NULL audio device), automounter,
        and others.
      - SAMA5D4-EK:  Add an NxWM configuration using the TM7000 LCD with
        the maXTouch multi-touch touchscreen.
      - SAMA5D4-EK NxWM: Uses new, larger icons in configuration instead of
        scaling.
      - SAMA5D4-EK NxWM: The NxPlayer and audio system are now enabled in
        the default configuration (but currently using the NULL audio
        device).  The automounter is used to automatically mount media
        on an SD card.
      - SAMA5D3x-EK:  Add a configuration to support the command line
        NxPlayer and to verify the WM8904 CODEC driver.

    * STMicro STM32:

      -  Add support for the STM32F103RC and RD.  From Kosma Moczek
      -  Add a procfs entry to show the state of the CCM heap usage.
         From Pelle Winderstam

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Unconfigure GPIO pins when closing a serial port to prevent back
        effects from back-powering on the TX pin. From Kosma Moczek

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - ADC:  Added burstmode ADC conversion mode, with CONFIG_ADC_BURSTMODE
        option in Kconfig.  From Max
      - Ethernet: Added option to use the kernel worker thread to do most of
        the workload with CONFIG_NET_WORKER_THREAD option in Kconfig.  From Max
      - Ethernet: Critical bugfix: From time to time (after some hours) the
        Ethernet receiver would lose one receive interrupt and the IP stack
        never recover because there is no receive watchdog as the transmit
        watchdog.  From Max

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - mbed: Port ADC, DAC, and PWM logic from the configs/zkit-arm-1769.
        From Max
      - mbed:  Eliminated a problem with PHY DP83848C : it doesn't need a
        specific initialization on mbed.  From Max

    * Library:

      - Adds support for localtime.  From Max Neklyudov

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Make variable definitions 'static const' when possible to save RAM
        usage.  From Kosma Moczek

    * Applications:

      - sysem/mdio:  New PHY tool from Daniel Lazlo Sizter.
      - NSH:  Networking logic modified to handler the case of SLIP
        transport.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - NSH:  Add a configuration to use a USB keyboard for the stdin
        device.
      - NSH:  Software assigned MAC address is now configurable. From Lazlo.
      - NSH:  Also add an option to let platform-specific logic select the
        MAC address.
      - NSH:  There is now a configuration option that will bring up the
        network on an separate thread.  Since the network bring-up is
        asynchronous, there are no serial console start-up delays due
        to the network negotiation time.
      - NxPlayer: Changes to integrate with Ken's NxWM::CMediaPlayer.
      - NxPlayer: Add interfaces for fast-forward and rewind needed by
        CMediaPlayer; add interface for equalizer settings needed by the
        WM8904.
      - NxPlayer:  Supports new way of identifying the end of the audio
        stream (see the Audio section above).
      - Sudoku:  Add a sudoku game.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more detailed bugfix information):

    * Graphics:

      - NxConsole: Fix scrolling for the case of the framebuffer device.  In
        this case, the logic for clearing the vacated region at the bottom
        was missing so garbage would scroll up from the last, uncleared
        line.

    * Networking:

      - Important fix to the read-ahead buffer queue management: Consumed
        bytes were being trimmed from the head of the queue, but the queue
        head itself was not being updated.  From Rony XLN.
      - Fix an error in SLIP escaping.  From Max Neklyudov

    * Network Utilities:

      - Fix an include file ordering problem when CONFIG_NET_STATISTICS=y.
      - Move statistics from uip.h to new netstats.h  to remove a circular
        inclusion problem
      - Various fixes for networking and tiny webserver from Max
      - webclient:  Fix to offset calculation from Rony Xln.  Prevents 0x0a
        at the beginning of lines.
      - webserver:  Fix some configuration usage issues.  From Max.
      - webserver:  Missing logic to close sockets on loop termination.

    * File System / Block Drivers:

      - SmartFS:  Fix for a bug that would show up if CONFIG_MTD_BYTE_WRITE
        was not selected and the SMART sector size was larger than the MTD
        device's block size (like it would be if using SMARTFS on larger
        flash devices).  From Ken Pettit.

    * Audio:

      - Change how the end of the audio stream is detected by the leaf audio
        component.  This used to be done by looking for the first partial
        buffer.  That does not work with the in-place sub-sampling performed
        by the PCM decoder:  That always reduces the size of the buffer so
        that all buffers only partially filled by the time they get to the
        leaf.  Now, a flag is set in the audio buffer flags set to indicate
        the final buffer in the stream.

    * Common Drivers:

      - RAMLOG putc() method needs to set the errno and return EOF on a
        failure.
      - Add missing configuration option to select the MAX11802 touchscreen
        controller. From Petteri Aimonen

    * Atmel SAMA5D3/4:

      - Fix logic in conversion of physical and virtual DRAM addresses when
        running out of DRAM.  This is an important bug fix for the SAMA5D3
        and 4 when running out of DRAM .
      - Critical SAMA5D3 and 4 bug fix:  PIO clocking must be enabled for
        all input pins or else the value that is read never changes.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3/4 Drivers:

      - OHCI: Fix an error in a DEBUGASSERT statement.  Caused an
        assertion to fire inappropriately when a low- or full-speed device
        was removed and CONFIG_DEBUG=y
      - OHCI: Pointers to allocated port values were not being
        nullified after being deallocated.  This caused some assertions
        to fire when debug was enabled
      - SSC:  Needs to account for data offset in audio buffer

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Correct the initial value of the BASEPRI register.  This was
        apparently never being initialized! From Max

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - I2C:  Fix missing configuration of GPIO pins in I2C driver.  Fix
        from Alex D.
      - STM32 OTGFS device:  Various changes to try to reduce that amount of
        time in interrupts handles and with interrupts disabled.  From
        Petteri Aimonen

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - Ethernet: Wrong bits being cleared before OR-ing in new settings.
      - Ethernet: Fix an error in the function that determines the number
        of free TX descriptors.  This is an important bugfix on busy
        networks.
      - I2C: Test for read or write operation was reversed.  How could
        this have worked before?

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM4S Xplained-Pro:  Correct description of LEDs and usage. From
        Kosma Moczek

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - PIO: Fix definitions that could disable PIO interrupt support if only
        PIOE interrupts were enabled
      - PIO: Macro SAM_PION_VBASE is not define-able for the SAMA5D4 and must
        be replaced with a table lookup.
      - PIO: Fix a typo in Schmitt trigger configuration; Configure pin as a
        vanilla input first so that final pin configuration is more read-able
        (i.e., easier to debug)
      - PIO: Logic for Schmitt trigger selection backward
      - SAMA5D4:  Correct system timer frequency.  Input clock is MCK/2, not MCK.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - Ethernet: Wrong bits being cleared before OR-ing in new settings.
      - Ethernet: Fix an error in the function that determines the number
        of free TX descriptors.  This is an important bugfix on busy
        networks.
      - HSMCI: The 8-byte SCR transfer was failing silently with the DMA
        transfer, leaving the SD card in single bit mode.  Fixed by adding
        a non-DMA read transfer mode.
      - HSMCI: Fix a problem on card insertion/removal callback handling.
        Interrupts were being disable so that the callbacks occurred with
        interrupts disabled.  This resulted in loss of some interrupts and
        some not-so-good behaviors.  The solution is to perform all
        callbacks on the work thread unconditionally

    * Atmel SAMA5 Boards:

      - PIO: Fix some cloned errors in SAM GPIO interrupt setup

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Ethernet:  Comment out an assertion that is reported to fire
        inappropriately.  From Max

    * Library:

      - stdint.h: Correct naming of [U]INT_LEASTn_{MAX|MIN} and
        [U]INT_FASTn{MAX|MIN}. From Kosma Moczek
      - unistd.h: POSIX definitions should be defined to a value. rom Kosma
        Moczek
      - Fixes associated with rint() and related interfaces in the math
        library.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - NAME_MAX not available on SunOS; use FILENAME_MAX or MAXNAMELEN.
        Noted by Douglas Beattie

    * Applications:

      - NSH: if # appears on line, need to comment ignore additional
        commands on the line
      - NxPlayer:  Check for file read errors and end-of-file with zero
        bytes read.  Other error handling corrected as well.
      - NxPlayer:  NxPlayer needs to set curbyte field to zero before
        enqueuing a buffer.  Otherwise, it looks like beginning of the
        buffer has already been consumed.

NuttX-7.5
---------

The 105th release of NuttX, Version 7.5, was made on September 28, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.5.tar.gz and
apps-7.5.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Watchdog Timer Allocation:  (1) If we run out of pre-allocated
        watchdog times, the logic will now allocate additional timers
        from the heap.  A reserve of pre-allocated watchdog timers is
        maintained so that there will always be timers available for
        interrupt handlers. (2) Added support for statically allocated
        watchdog timer
      - Address Environment Support:  (2) New OS APIs integrated into all
        platform-specific context switching logic (up_block_task(),
        up_unblock_task(), _exit(), and others).
      - Kernel Build Support: (1) The MPU based "kernel build" renamed to a
        protected build (CONFIG_BUILD_PROTECTED); added support for the a
        new MMU-based "kernel build" (CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL), (2) The system
        call library can now be built with CONFIG_NUTTX_KERNEL.  New
        selection: CONFIG_LIB_SYSCALL.
      - System Startup:  Add configuration options to start the system from
        a program on a file system (versus an address in memory).
      - Startup Parameter Passing. There used to be two ways to pass
        parameters to new tasks, depending upon the configuration:  Either
        (1) argv[] as created as an array with each string strdup'ed.  Or
        (2) argv[] array and strings were created on the stack before the
        new task was started.   Now, there is only one way, way (1).  Way
        (2) might be slightly more compact, but this is not worth carry the
        complexity of two different ways of doing the same thing.
      - Board Initialization: Add capability to perform initial board
        initialization on a separate worker thread.  This is needed because
        there are many cases where initialization logic cannot execute on
        the start-up/IDLE thread.  That is because blocking or waiting is
        not permitted on the IDLE thread.

    * Memory Management:

      - Granule Allocator:  (1) Add a new function to reserve un-allocatable
        regions in the granule heap.  (2) Add interfaces to support
        un-initializing a granule allocator.
      - Page Allocator:  Add a simple physical page allocator based on the
        existing NuttX granule allocator.  I am not certain if the granule
        allocator is sufficiently deterministic for long range use, but it
        gets get a page allocator in place for testing very quickly.
      - Remove CONFIG_MM_MULTIHEAP.  Non-multiheap operation is no longer
        supported.
      - sbrk():  sbrk() is now supported in the kernel build to permit
        dynamically sized, per-process heaps.
      - Per-Process Heaps:  Space at the beginning of the process data space
        is now reserved for user heap management structures.  In the kernel
        build mode, these heap structures are shared between the kernel and
        use code in order to allocate user-specific data.
      - User Heap Management:  When a privileged thread exits, we have to
        use the kernel allocator to free memory; when an unprivileged thread
        exits, we don't have to do anything... heap memory will be cleaned
        up when the address environment is torn down.
      - Inter-Process Shared Memory Support:  (1) Add implementation and
        documentation for shmget(), shmctl(), shmat(), and shmdt().  (2)
        Add system system calls to support the user call gate to the shared
        memory interfaces.  (3) Add platform-specific interface definitions
        needed to support the shared memory feature.
      - Virtual Page Allocator:  Add support for a per-process virtual page
        allocator.  This is a new member of the task_group_s structure.  The
        allocator must be initialized when a new user process is started and
        uninitialize when the process group is finally destroyed.  It is
        used by shmat() and shmdt() to pick the virtual address onto which
        to map the shared physical memory.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - SMART FS and SMART FS procfs updates from Ken Pettit.
      - The MTD Read-ahead/Write buffer layer appears is now functional.

    * Binary Formats:

      - Add logic to initialize the per-process user heap when each user
        process is started.

    * Graphics:

      - Change all occurrences of NxConsole to NxTerm.

    * Networking:

      - PHY Interrupts: (1) Standardize a PHY interrupt attachment
        interface. (2) Add support for an ioctl that can be used to notify
        an application when there is a change in the network status
        signalled by a PHY interrupt.
      - Improved Send Logic:  In the past, the first packet send to a new
        network peer would fail; there would be no entry in the ARP table
        for the peer and so an ARP request could replace that first packet.
        Now as an option if CONFIG_NET_ARP_SEND=y, all send logic will (1)
        check if the peer MAC address is in the ARP table and, if not, (2)
        send ARP requests periodically to get the mapping and (3) wait for
        the ARP response.  Then (4) when the ARP response is received then
        the actual send logic will be initiated.  Thus there may be a delay
        with the first packet sent to a new peer, but the packet should not
        be lost

    * Host Simulation:

      - Emulated SPI FLASH driver for the sim target from Ken Pettit.

    * Intel x86:

      - The default host is now x86_64 and the -m32 option will be
        automatically selected for simulation builds.

    * Intel 8051 Family:

      - Removed all support for the 8051 family architecture from the NuttX
        source tree.  The obsoleted code along with the removal patch can
        now be found at misc/Obsoleted/.  This code was removed because (1)
        although some functionality has been demonstrated, I am not aware of
        any really successful ports of NuttX to any 8051, and (2) the 8051,
        with its hardware stack, forces limitations and complications to the
        other architectures and make growth and development of NuttX more
        complex.

    * ZiLOG ZNeo Boards:

      - configs/16z:  Support for this board has been removed from the NuttX
        source tree (but still can be found in the misc/Obsoleted
        directory). This port is not ready for usage but may return to the
        NuttX tree at some point in the future.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM4E-EK: Add (1) a fully-functional ILI9341-based LCD driver and
        (2) a fully-functional NxWM configuration.

    * ARMv7-A:

      - Address Environments:  Add support for application address
        environments using the Cortex-A MMU.  Implement standardized
        platform-specific interfaces of NuttX address environment
        support.
      - Cache Operations:  Implement standardized, platform-specific cache
        operations.  These are called from the ELF loader in order to flush
        D-cache and invalidate I-cache after an ELF module has been loaded
        into memory. With this change, ELF modules work correctly on the
        SAMA5/Cortex-A platform.
      - Kernel Build: (1) Add implementations of system call gate. (2) Add
        CRT0 start-up file that can be linked with separately built user
        programs.  (3) Add support for delivery of use-mode signals in the
        kernel build.  (4) Add logic to initialize the per-process user heap
        when each user process is started.  (5) ARMv7-A exception handling
        needs to work a little differently if we support user mode
        processes.  This is because R13 and R14 are paged differently
        between user and SVC mode.
      - Shared Memory Support:  (1) Add logic necessary to handle remapping
        of shared memory on context switches.  (2) Extend virtual/physical
        address conversions to include addresses in shared memory.  (3) Add
        implementation of platform-specific shared memory support.

    * Atmel SAMA5D Drivers:

      - Implement all network ioctls, including the new ioctl to setup PHY
        event notifications.
      - In kernel build with address environment, need logic to map user
        virtual addresses to physical addresses, and vice versa.

    * Atmel SAMA5D Boards:

      - SAMA5D3 Xplained, SAMA5D3-EK, and SAMA5D4-EK:  Convert existing
        board specific PHY interrupt interfaces to use newly defined
        standard interface.
      - SAMA5D4-EK: Add a configuration for testing the kernel build
        configuration.  There are configurations to boot either from an SD
        card or from and in-memory ROMFS file system.
      - SAMA5D4-EK: Add documentation/support for Rev E. board.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Ethernet: Modified to support the change to the network ioctl
        signature changes.  Also add support for new ioctl to setup PHY
        event notifications.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4Discovery with STM32F4DIS-BB: Add a network enabled NSH
        configuration for the STM32F4Discovery board with the STM32F4DIS-BB
        base board installed.  Includes support for the microSD card slot on
        the STM32F4DIS-BB base board.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Add support for the TI CC3200. From Jim Ewing.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - Add support for the TI CC3200 Launchpad. From Jim Ewing.

    * C Library:

      - Re-implemented poll() delay using sem_timedwait().

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Export Target:  In the kernel or protected builds, (1) only the user
        libraries should be exported,  (2) do not copy internal header files
        or build scripts if this is a kernel or protected build, and (3)
        needs to bundle up the user C startup file (crt0), not the kernel
        head object for the kernel and protected builds.
      - Add logic that will permit us to build user libraries with different
        CFLAGS than kernel code.  This is needed because we need the
        -fno-common option when building ELF code to prevent SHN_COMMON
        relocations.

    * Applications:

      - NSH:  Extend the NSH network initialization logic.  There is now an
        option that will create a network monitor thread that will monitor
        the state of the link.  When the link goes down, the code will
        attempt to gracefully put the Ethernet driver in a down state; When
        the link comes back, the code will attempt to bring the network back
        up.
      - ELF Example:  The ELF test/example has been extended so the
        individual ELF test programs can link against the SYSCALL library
        (if it is available) or against the C library to eliminate or
        minimize the need for symbol tables.
      - Change all occurrences of NxConsole to NxTerm.
      - MTDRWB Example:  Add an example to test MTD R/W buffering.
      - OS Test Example:  Add a trivial test of sem_timedwait.

    * Application Configuration/Build System:

      - Import Target:  (1) Add logic that will allow building applications
        against a NuttX export package (vs. the nuttx/ source tree).  (2)
        Add .config file to export package.  (3) Create apps/import.  Create
        apps/import/Make.defs that does things like define CFLAGS; ELF build
        requires -fno-common in CFLAGS. Copy some base logic from
        nuttx/tools/Config.mk to apps/import/Make.defs.  (4) Add
        apps/import/scripts/gnu-elf.ld GCC linker script for ELF import
        builds.
      - All Makefiles:  (1) Add an install target to all makefiles.  For
        the import build, the top-level Makefile now does two passes: (1)
        builds libapp.a, then (2) installs the programs into apps/bin.  (2)
        Add program installation for CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL in all Makefiles
        that build a main().  (3) For kernel build, the object file
        containing main cannot go into library because of name collisions.
        The object file must be handled as a special case in every Makefile.
      - All Built-In Programs:  With kernel build (CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL),
        entry point to all tasks is main(), not some xyz_main().
      - NSH: Several commands must be disabled in the kernel build because
        they depend on interfaces that are not available outside of the
        kernel: dd, df, losetup, mkfatfs, mkdr, and ps.
      - apps/tools/:  (1) Add mkimport.sh to expload an NuttX import package
        and install in apps/import.  (2) Add mkromfsimg.sh  script to create
        a BOOT ROMFS filesystem image.
      - ELF and NxFLAT Examples: Do not build test cases that use
        task_create() if there is an address environment.

    * Tools:

      - refresh.sh: Add a tool to make refreshing configurations easier
        when you want to do a lot of them.
      - mksyscall.c: Build syscalls that do not need header files.
      - mkexport.sh: Add .config file to export package.
      - See above for new apps/tools scripts.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

    * Galileo:  Similarly, there are fragments in place for an Intel Galileo
      port.  The port not been started in earnest either.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Kernel build fixes: (1) IDLE TCB setup needs to indicate that the
        IDLE thread is a privileged, kernel thread.  (2) Don't build
        task_create() or task_spawn() interfaces if there is an address
        environment.  (3) posix_spawn() kernel proxy thread should be a
        kernel thread, not a user task.
      - Several pthread interfaces: Add const storage class to phthread
        parameters.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - sched/clock: Remove vestiges of g_tickbias;  need, instead, to apply
        time bias to g_basetime in order to provide the correct system time.
      - System Calls:  (1) Several typos fixed; corrected integration of
        exevc(), execvl(), posix_spawn, and posix_spawnp system calls. (2)
        If we are configured to use a kernel stack while in SYSCALL handling,
        then we need to switch back to the user stack to deliver a signal.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - procfs: Fix some procfs breakage introduced by reorganizing some
        non-reorganizable data structures.  From Ken Pettit.
      - AT45: In at45db_bwrite , the buffer is not increased when writing
        more than 1 page.  Sourceforge bug #34.

    * Binary Formats:

      - ELF relocations.  Some relocation types do not have a named symbol
        associated with them.  The design did not account for that case.
      - ELF Loader: Critical bugfix.. BSS was not being cleared.

    * Memory Management:

      - Granule allocator initialization uses wrong allocator to setting
        aside kernel memory.
      - Add a flag to group structure:  If the group is created by a kernel
        thread, then all resources in the group must be privileged.

    * Cryptogrphic Support:

      - crypto/cryptodev.c: Path segments reversed in include file path. Noted by Brennan Ashton.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Common CAN upper-half: In can_txdone, waiters on the semaphore
        should be informed regardless of the return value of can_xmit. First
        it returns -EIO if there are no new packets, and second the
        information of the waiters is about the last transferred packet.
        From  Daniel Lazlo Sitzer.

    * ARM:

      - System Calls: Fix a typo in system call when fetching parameter from
        the stack:  regs[REG_PC]+4 is the address, not regs[REG_PC+4].

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F401 UART: Correct support for USART6 on this chip.  From
        Freddie Chopin.
      - STM32 FLASH fixes: use size_t instead of uint16_t, make interface
        more generic.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - Fix for UART7 and UART8 on STM32 clock enable from Aton.
      - CAN: At the end of the interrupt handler, the interrupts were being
        disabled, if all packets have been transferred when the interrupt
        handler was invoked. This is problematic, because the interrupt
        handler calls can_txdone of the upper half which can enqueue new
        packets to send. Removed the block altogether, because can_txdone
        calls can_xmit which disables interrupts if there are no new packets
        to send.  From  Daniel Lazlo Sitzer.
      - Additional STM32 CAN correction suggested by Max Holtzberg.

    * STMicro ST32 Boards:

      - configs/mikroe-stm32f4: Fix a few compile bugs and minor corrections
        to the mikroe-stm32f4 configuration source.  From Ken Pettit.

    * ARM9/ARMv7-A:

      - System Calls: Fix ARM7/9 and Cortex-A SYSCALLs:  For threads in SVC
        mode, the SVC instructions clobbers R14.  This must be taken account
        in the inline assembly.
      - Task Setup:  All tasks, even user mode tasks, must start in
        supervisor mode until they get past the start-up trampoline.
      - ARMv7-A:  Modify up_fullcontextrestore() for CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL.
        It changed CPSR while in kernel.  That will crash if the new CPSR is
        user mode while executing in kernel space.  Fixed by adding a
        SYS_context_restore system call.  There is an alternative, simpler
        modification to up_fullcontextrestore() that could have been done:
        It might have been possible to use the SPSR instead of the CPRSR and
        then do an exception return from up_fullcontextrestore().  That
        would be more efficient, but I never tried it.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM3X/Arduino Due: Fix typo in sam3x_periphclks.h; add SCLK
        definitions to board.h header file.  From Fabien Comte.
      - SAM3 RTT: Only SAM4 family has RTTDIS bit in the MR register.
        SourceForge bug #33 from Fabien Comte.

    * C Library:

      - sscanf(): NuttX libc tried to guess how many characters to parse,
        extracted them into a buffer, then ran strtol() on that buffer.
        That guess was often wrong.  A better approach would be to call
        strtol() directly on the input data, using the endptr return value
        to determine how many characters to skip after parsing.  From Kosma
        Moczek.
      - Corrected atan2 implementations from Denis Arnst.
      - Change to lib_dtoa() to fix precision error from trailing zeroes.
        From Bob Doiron.

    * Applications:

      - Fix NSH PS command:  If there are no arguments, it could print
        garbage for argument list.

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Null Example:  Need to include config.h it order know if this is or
        is not a kernel build.  This problem still exists in several other
        file that may need to define main().

NuttX-7.6
---------

The 106th release of NuttX, Version 7.6, was made on November 26, 2014,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.6.tar.gz and
apps-7.6.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Moved name semaphore and message queue support out of the OS and
        into the VFS.  These improves the architecture by unifying the
        management of named resources, removes redundant resource management
        logic, and makes named semaphores and message queues  visible in the
        file system.  By default, these are visible at /var/lock and
        /var/mqueue.
      - Add SIGPOLL for use as part of the AIO implementation.
      - Remove CONFIG_MAX_TASK_ARGS configuration.  There is now no
        predetermined limit on the number of arguments that may be passed
        to a new task on start-up.

    * Work queues:

      - Add support for priority inheritance on the low priority worker
        queue.  That is, if a higher priority thread has scheduled work, the
        priority of the low priority worker thread(s) will be boost to the
        priority of the queuing thread.  At work is performed at at least
        thread priority of the scheduling thread.  If there are multiple
        worker threads, then all threads get reprioritized.  Currently
        only implemented for AIO.
      - Add support for multiple low-priority work queue threads.  This
        allows individual worker threads to block indefinitely for I/O as
        necessary without halting the entire work queue.

    * VFS/General Drivers:

      - Implement create() (as a macro).
      - Add pread() and pwrite().   Also added pread() and pwrite()
        system calls.
      - AIO: Add aio_read(), aio_write(), aio_return(), aio_error(),
        aio_suspend(), aio_canel(), lio_listio(), and aio_fsync().  This
        logic minimizes the creation of new threads by using the new
        features also added to the low priority work queue with this
        release.  It uses the new low priority worker thread interface
        to adjust the priority of the worker thread according to the
        priority of the AIO client thread
      - Implement standard syslogmask() to control logging (also removing
        the non-standard syslog_enable()).

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - Extend MTD support to the M25P16. From Sbastien Lorquet.

    * Drivers:

      - BCH (Block-to-Character): Add support for seeking in BCH.  From
        Sbastien Lorquet.

    * Graphics Support/Graphics-Related Drivers:

      - Add support for a generic ILI9341 LCD driver.  From Marco Krahl.
      - Add ANSI/VT100 foreground and background color commands.
      - Add driver for ST7565 LCD that works with NHD-C12864KGZ display.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Networking:

      - Verify that multiple networks can be supported.
      - Add support for the case where there are multiple networks:  One
        being Ethernet and the other not (SLIP, PPP, ...).  The primary
        difference from the standpoint of the stack is that (1) ARP may or
        may not be necessary, (2) the size of the link layer header will
        vary, and (3) different MTUs and TCP receive windows may be used
        with each link.  Suggested by Brennan Ashton.
      - Extensions to UDP and TCP connection structures for the case of
        multiple networks.  In this case, assigned port numbers only have to
        be unique with respect to the IP address.  So, for example, you
        could have multiple port 80's, one on each network.

    * Host Simulation:

      - Removed the old, strange up_stdio.c and implemented a simulated UART
        driver to provide the console input.  The new logic starts a
        separate, Linux domain pthread to read the console input in raw mode
        and provides the incoming data to NuttX via standard NuttX domain
        IPCs.
      - Add support for 64-bit longjmp/setjmp in simulator platform.  This
        will permit operation of the simulation natively on a 64-bit
        platform.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Add ARMv7-M CMSIS ITM header file and library.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville.
      - Add ARMv7-M CMSIS DWT and TPI header files. From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville.
      - Add ARMv7-M support to use ITM for SYSLOG debug output. Includes
        logic from Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - Add support for SAM3/4 basic serial TERMIOS and flow control.
        There are issues with IFLOW control: PDC or DMAC support is
        required.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM4E-EK: Add support for PHY interrupt.

    * Atmel SAMA5D Boards:

      - SAMA5D3-Xplained:  Add a configuration that provides a simple test
        for the EMAC and GMAC on the SAMA5D3 working together.
      - SAMA5D4-EK:  Add a configuration that provides a simple test for the
        EMAC0 and EMAC1 on the SAMA5D4 working together.

    * Freescale KL:

      - Add an I2C header file for the Freescale KL family.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP LPC32xx:

      - Add support for tickless operation using the NXP LPC43xx.  From
        Brandon Warhurst.

    * SiLabs EFM32:

      - Add a basic port for the SiLabs EFM32 family.  Includes many files
        contributed by Pierre-noel Bouteville .

    * SiLabs EFM32 Boards:

      - Add board support for the EFM32 Gecko Starter Kit.
      - Add board support for the Olimex EFM32G8809128 STK.  NOTE: I am
        unable to test this configuration due to tool-related issues.
      - Add board support for the SiLbas EFM32GG Giant Gecko Starter kit.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Add support for the STM32 F411RE from Serg Podtynnyi.
      - Add support for the STM32F103RG.  From Murilo Ponte.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F4:  Add logic that implement true high speed support for the
        STM32 OTGHS peripheral and concurrent support for both LS and HS
        OTG.  New OTGHS drivers provided for both device and host. From
        Brennan Ashton.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32 Nucleo-F411RE: Extend this board configuration to also support
        the Nucleo-F411RE.  From Serg Podtynnyi.
      - Add support for the STM32F429i Discovery's LCD (SPI based).  From
        Marco Krahl.
      - configs/stm32f100rc_generic:  Removed this generic board configuration.
        I have decided to stop support of generic board configurations.  Generic
        board configurations do not provide support for any specific hardware
        but can be useful only if there are not other examples for the setup
        for a particular architecture. Not the case here.

    * C Library:

      - Add a mostly bogus wchar.h header file.  This file is mostly bogus
        because none of the wide character operations are currently
        supported in the Nuttx C library.  The file does provide the wchar_t
        types needed by some software, however.
      - Add isatty() function. From  Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add mktemp(), mkstemp(), tmpnam() and tempnam().

    * Configuration/Build System:

      - Add a PRELINK macro to Config.mk.  From Kriegleder.
      - compiler.h:  Defines inline functions as not instrumented - this is
        relevant for anyone using instrumentation.  From Lorenz Meier.

    * Applications:

      - apps/interpreter/bas:  Added in the Michael Haardt's BAS 2.4 adapted
        for use by NuttX by Alan Carvalho de Assis.   Includes support for
        VT100 terminals and color commands.
      - Examples:  Added bastest/ which holds a special version of Michael
        Haardt's BAS 2.4 test files adapted for use by NuttX on a ROMFS file
        system.
      - Examples:  Add a simple UDP relay bridge for testing configurations
        with multiple networks.  Includes a host-side test driver for
        testing the bridge.
      - Netutils: Add implementation of timeouts for the netutils webclient.
        From Brennan Ashton
      - NSH: Add support for a custom NSH ROMFS startup image header file
        location.  From Martin Lederhilger.
      - OS test:  Add a simple test of named semaphores.
      - OS test:  Add AIO test case in OS test.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

    * Galileo:  Similarly, there are fragments in place for an Intel Galileo
      port.  The port not been started in earnest either.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

I ran cppcheck against the entire code base and correct many latent bugs
including things as serious as memory leaks,  two locations where interrupts
were be disabled but never re-enabled, and errors in the Tickless mode of
operation.  My thanks to the developers of cppcheck!  I am impressed!

    * Core OS:

      - vfork():  Now that arguments are kept on the stack, the way that
        arguments are passed from parent to child in vfork() must change.
        This bug has always been present, but was not visible with the
        old strdup() way of passing arguments.
      - vfork() problem: If we get to vfork() via system call, then we
        need to clone some system call information so that the return form
        the cloned system call works correctly.
      - Fixes to tickless operation code, especially in alarm mode.  From
        Brandon Warhurst.
      - Fix an important bug in the watchdog timer creation logic.
      - Calling mq_timedreceived() with immediate timeout was getting stuck
        and not timing out. Immediate timeout is achieved by setting absolute
        timeout value to past time, for example abstime={ .tv_sec=0,
        .tv_nsec=0 }. However absolute time was converted to relative time
        using unsigned integer arithmetic and resulted large ticks count by
        clock_abstime2ticks, instead of expected negative ticks value.
        Change corrects clock_abstime2ticks() to return negative ticks, if
        absolute time is in the past.  From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Memory Management:

      - Fix a place in the memory manager where it explicitly assumed that
        the size of a pointer is 4 bytes.  That assumption was OK if the
        actual size is smaller but made the heap unstable when used with
        the x86_64 host simulation.
      - Granule Allocator:  If the INTR granule allocator mode is enabled,
        there is no semaphore to destroy.  From Lorenz Meier.

    * Networking:

      - Network routing:  I don't think that the net_route() function has
        ever worked correctly.  The source IP was updated in the match
        struct instead of the route IP.  From Brennan Ashton.
      - Move and rename IP header flag definitions.  The problem fixed here
        is that there IP header flag definitions were not available when TCP
        was disabled.  The IP flags are used in ICMP and IGMP.
      - Network routing:  Refuse to perform routing table lookups for the
        Broadcast IP address.  From Brennan Ashton.
      - Network routing:  Add logic to netdev_findbyaddr() to return the
        correct network device for the case where a broadcast
        address is used.  This change caused trivial ripples through other
        files because additional parameters are required for
        netdev_findbyaddr() when CONFIG_NET_MULTINIC.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - NXFFS Dump: Fix problems with redefinitions of fdbg macro.  With the
        fix to the syslog prototype, a LOG priority must now be the first
        parameter.  Fixed by replacing all occurrences of fdbg with
        syslog(LOG_DEBUG, and eliminating the macro redefinitions.  Noted
        by Sebastien Lorquet.
      - poll() was not waking up from signals (for example mq_notify()
        events).  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - poll():  Add proper handling for sem_timedwait errnos.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - include/nuttx/fs/fs.h: Fix typo in conditional compilation.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Graphics/Graphic-Related Drivers:

      - Remove warnings when CONFIG_NXTK_BORDERWIDTH is set to zero.  From
        Pierre-Noel Bouteville.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Make standard syslog and vsyslog POSIX compliant (also modify
        non-standard syslog functions for compatibility).
      - R/W buffering: Fix typo that can cause compilation error.

    * Atmel SAM3/4:

      - SAM4S: Add missing SPI0 clock configuration macro for the SAM4S.  From spasbyspas.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM4E-EK: Fix an error in a USART1 pin number.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3/4 Drivers:

      - SAMA5DF4: Fix several typos that will prevented EMAC1 from
        initializing properly.

    * NXP LPC43xx:

      - Fixes to allow compile of lpc43_gpioint.c.  From Brandon Warhurst.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Add missing ADC pinmap definitions for the STM32 F103R from Martin
        Lederhilger.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 EXTI: Correct STM32 RTC EXTI bit definition.  From Lazlo.
      - STM32 IWDG, WWDG, DBGMCU: Fix watchdog stop bit usage.  From Lazlo.
      - STM32 OTGFS: Correct a typo in the STM32 OTGFS register bit definitions.

    * ARM:

      - ARM up_internal.h: Add protection from C++ name mangling in the
        ARM up_internal.h.  From Lorenz Meier.

    * MicroChip PIC32MX:

      - PIC32MX7: DEVCFG0 bit 2 must be set.  Writing bit 2 as zero can
        brick the CPU on some versions.  From Cris Kvist.

    * C Library:

      - The implementation of access() as vararg macro has the issue that
        any function call with the same name (even in a C++ class) will
        match with it and result in a compile error.  Replaced with a small
        function. This resolves the compile issue, and shouldnt have
        negative side effects for users of the function. From Lorenz Meier.
      - The definition of strncpy() is that empty space should be zero-
        filled, the change adds the zero filling (See the POSIX spec here:
        http://pubs.opengroup.org/onlinepubs/7908799/xsh/strncpy.html). From
        Lorenz Meier.
      - limits.h:  Remove the definition of INT_FAST32_MIN which is already
        defined in stdint.h (the correct location).  From Lorenz Meier.

    * Applications:

      - apps/: Correct everything under apps to use the corrected syslog
        interfaces.  Remove any non-portable uses of syslog.
      - NSH: Fix ls -l output for regular files.
      - NSH: Fix reversed in/out file closing in DD command when an error
        occurs.  From Ken Pettit.
      - NSH:  Add logic to restart the console wait if an error occurs
        while reading from the console.  In USB console startup, the logic
        must be able to open the USB serial and receive 3 newlines.
        However, it the USB driver is disconnected or otherwise fails before
        the 3 newlines are received, the receive loop becomes a killer,
        infinite loop, CPU hog.  Noted by spasbyspas.
      - Netutils: Fix memcpy of host address in netlib_gethostaddr().  From
        Brennan Ashton.
      - Netutils:  If you make a DNS request before the DNS address it would
        cause an assertion. The state of the IP setting is not something the
        application should be aware of, it should only be concerned with
        whether or not the name was resolved.  From Brennan Ashton.
      - Netutils: Fix md5 hashing when digest[$i] islower that 16. From
        Sergey.
      - Stack Monitor: Fix compile problems introduced when the syslog()
        prototype changed; Also update Makefile for kernel build From
        Radoslaw Adamczyk.
      - Examples: Update NxTerm makefile for kernel-build issues. From
        Radoslaw Adamczyk.
      - Examples: Fixes to keypadtest from Pierre-Noel Bouteville.
      - Examples: These examples all set the IP address of eth1 but the
        netmask and gateway of eth0 if DHCP is enabled:  discover, tcpecho,
        webserver, xmlrpc. That can't be right.

NuttX-7.7
---------

The 107th release of NuttX, Version 7.7, was made on January 26, 2015,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.7.tar.gz and
apps-7.7.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Task exit handling:  Add logic to clean up after task_delete() or
        pthread_cancel() if the task happens to be waiting on a semaphore
        when was is cancelled.
      - Stack coloration:  Removed CONFIG_DEBUG_STACK and replaced it with
        CONFIG_STACK_COLORATION that does the same thing but without enabling
        debug.  From David Sidrane.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Discrete joystick driver: Added an interface definition and upper
        half driver for a discrete joystick device (where X/Y changes are
        indicated with button presses).
      - Analog joystick driver: Added an interface definition and upper
        half driver for a analog joystick device (where X/Y positions are
        sampled, numeric values).
      - Add driver support for the ADXL345 accelerometer.  From  Alan
        Carvalho de Assis
      - Generic serial driver:  Add watermark levels to the serial RX flow
        control logic.  Modify the rxflowcontrol method to accept the number
        of bytes in the buffer and a boolean indication of which watermark
        was crossed.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - Add procfs write support.  From Ken Petit.
      - Implemented wear-leveling in the SmartFS.  From Ken Pettit.
      - MMC/SD Interface: MMCSD SDIO:  Add support for a new
        SDWAIT_WRCOMPLETE condition.  The previous logic used a busy-wait
        loop to poll the card R1 status to determine when the card was
        ready for the next transfer.  That busy-wait can be quite long --
        up to hundreds of milliseconds.  An alternative is to look the SD D0
        pin which will change state when the card is no longer busy.  This
        change avoids the busy-wait poll by reconfiguring the SD D0 pin as a
        GPIO interrupt, then waiting for the card to become ready without
        taking up CPU cycles. From David Sidrane.

    * Drivers:

      - Add support for a generic EEPROM driver that accesses EEPROM as a
        character driver (vs. an MTD driver).  From Sbastien Lorquet.

    * Graphics Support:

      - Many new fonts converted for use with NuttX and added by
        Pierre-noel Bouteville

    * Networking:

      - IPv4 support is now conditioned on CONFIG_NET_IPv4.
      - Implemented and verified IPv6 support conditioned on
        CONFIG_NET_IPv6.  Either IPv4 or IPv4 or both may be selected.
        Sockets, of course, must be bound to one or the other. Added support
        for IPv6 ioctls to manipulate IP addresses.
      - Integrated support for ICMPv6 and the ICMPv6 Neighbor Discovery
        Protocol and ICMPv6 ECHO request/reply needed to support ping logic.
      - All Ethernet drivers:  Modified to support.  Most, however, are
        still missing address filtering logic required for ICMPv6 Neighbor
        Discovery Protocol.  See
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:howtos:ipv6#ethernet_driver_requirements
      - Also added missing raw/packet socket support to all Ethernet drivers.

    * Host Simulation:

      - Add a configuration build and test the Traveler first person game
        using the simulator.
      - Add an X11 mouse-based simulation of an analog joystick device

    * Atmel SAMA5D Boards:

      - Add analog Joystick shield support for the SAMA5D3 Xplained board.

    * Freescale KL Drivers:

      - Add GPIO interrupt capability for the KL architecture. From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis

    * Freescale KL Boards:

      - Freedom-KL25Z: Add board support for the ADXL345 accelerometer. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis
      - Freedom-KL25Z: Update the Freedom KL25Z board CC3000 support to use
        the current CC300 interfaces.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis

    * NXP LPC43xx Boards:

      - A port of NuttX to the LPC4357-EVB from Toby Duckworth.  This port
        is a leverage of the LPC3330-Xplorer port and still have a some
        misinformation from that port that needs to be updated for the
        LPC4357-EVB.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Drivers:

      - Serial: Add support for serial termios TCGET and TCSET.  For the
        moment, only set/get speed is implemented.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville.
      - RMU: Add support for the EFM32 reset management unit (RMU).  From
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Boards:

      - Add support for timer/PWM on the EFM32GG.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Enable support for the STM32 F102.  From the PX4 team.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F429 LTDC: Add interface to perform hardware accelerated layer
        operation. Provides access to a reference of a specific ltdc layer.
        From Marco Krahl
      - STM32 F429 LTDC support: Implemented LTDC framebuffer support for the
        generic nuttx framebuffer interface. Also implements the interface to
        perform hardware accelerated layer operation by the ltdc controller
        and dma2d controller later. From Marco Krahl.
      - STM32:  Add support for the internal low speed clock (LSI) as a
        source of the RTC clock.  Some  boards do not have the external
        32kKhz oscillator installed, for those boards we must fallback to
        the crummy internal RC clock.  From Kevin Hester
      - STM32 SDIO:  Add support for the new SDWAIT_WRCOMPLETE condition.
        From David Sidrane

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Add a discrete Joystick support for the STM3210E-EVAL.
      - Add analog Joystick shield support for the Nucleo F4x1RE boards.
      - STM32 F429i-Disco:  Add support for initializing of the ltdc
        controller and the lcd device connected on the stm32f429i-disco.
        From Marco Krahl.
      - Removed the px4-v2_upstream configuration.  This was not the
        official configuration for the PX4 board and has led to confusion
        by NuttX users.  The board configuration also requires some ongoing
        maintenance and customization to support ongoing PX4 testing and
        evaluation.  It is best retained the PX4 repositories where it can
        be properly maintained and not in the upstream NuttX repository.

    * TI Tiva:

       - Add support for the TI Tiva TM4C 129X family.  Some unverified
         support for the TM4C 1294 is also in place.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Added support for Tiva I2C driver.  Verified on the Tiva TM4C123G
        and TM4C129X.
      - Added a Tiva TM4C129X Ethernet driver.
      - Add a timer library for generic support of Tiva timers
      - Add a driver lower half for drivers/timer.c.  Only 32-bit periodic
        timers are supported.  This provides userspace access to timers.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - TM4C123G Launchpad:  Add initialization logic for an external AT24
        EEPROM.  This is intended only to support testing of the Tiva I2C
        driver.
      - Board support for the Tiva DK-TM4C129x Connected Development Kit.
      - DK-TMC129X:  Add an IPv6-enabled NSH configuration.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Added support for a variadic ioctl() function.  The ioctl()
        interface is a non-standard, Unix interface.  NuttX has always used
        the older, three-parameter version.  Most contemporary systems now,
        however, use a variadic form of the ioctl() function.  Added an
        option to insert a shim layer to adapt the three-parameter ioctl()
        to use the variadic interface form.  Internally, the ioctl handling
        is the same three-parameter logic.  The only real complexity to the
        shim is in how the system calls must be handled.
      - Added sys/custom_file.h.  Used when CUSTOM_FILE_IO is define and
        avoids  re-definition errors about the FILE define.  From Thomas
        Gruber via the PX4 repository
      - Add CRC8 support to the C library. From Ken Pettit.
      - math.h: Added support for the expm1 functions. From Brennan Ashton

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/djoystick:  Add a test of the discrete  joystick
        driver.
      - apps/examples/ajoystick:  Add a test of the analog joystick
        driver.
      - apps/examples/ltdc: Add ltdc test example. From Marco Krahl
      - apps/system/lm75:  Add a tiny application to read the temperature
        from an LM-75 (or compatible) temperature sensor
      - apps/examples/timer:  Add a trivial test of the timer driver

      - apps/system/cu: Add a minimalist implementation  of the 'cu'
        terminal program (part of Taylor UUCP for ages). Using it, you can
        simply open a serial port and interact with it. Using '~.' you can
        leave the terminal program and drop back to nsh.  This  might come
        in handy for people that have e.g. GSM modems, GPS receivers or
        other devices with text based serial communications attached to
        their Nuttx systems. From Harald Welte
      - apps/interpreters/micropython:  A port of Micro Python to NuttX.
        Contributed by Dave Marples

      - apps/netutils/dnsclient:  Can select to be either IPv4 or IPv6, but
        not both (IPv6 still does not compile)
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add new library functions to manipulate IPv6
        addresses.
      - apps/examples/nettest:  Update test so that it can be used to test
        IPv6 TCP sockets
      - apps/examples/udp:  The UDP test example has been extend to support
        IPv6 domain sockets

      - apps/nshlib:  Add logic to initialize IPv6 addresses
      - apps/nshlib:  Add the ping6 command to support checking IPv6 networks.
      - apps/nshlib: Clean up network status presentation for IPv6

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * IPv6.  While basic IPv6 support was completed in NuttX-7.7,
      there are lingering issues with getting IPv6 compatibility
      with applications and network utilities.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

    * Galileo:  Similarly, there are fragments in place for an Intel Galileo
      port.  The port probably will not happen (I gave my Galileo board away!).

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - POSIX message queues: msg type should be char * not void * in
        mq_send, mq_timedsend, mq_receive, and mq_timedreceive.  Noted by
        Pierre-Noel Bouteville
      - POSIX message queues: In message queue creation return ENOSPC error
        if size exceeds the configured size of pre-allocated messages; Use
        ENOSPC vs ENOMEM per OpenGroup.org.  From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.
      - Task Names: strncpy() will not copy the terminating \0 into the
        destination if the source is larger than the size of the
        destination. Ensure that the last byte is always zero and let
        strncpy() only copy CONFIG_TASK_NAME_SIZE bytes. The issue of
        unterminated names can be observed in ps when creating a pthread
        while CONFIG_TASK_NAME_SIZE is set to 8.  From  Daniel Willmann

    * Memory Management:

      - Granule allocator: Fixes some issues found by the PX4 team using
        Coverity.  From Pavel Krienko

    * Networking:

      - Several fixes correcting issues with the CC3000 networking.  From
        Jussi  Kivilinna
      - CC3000 Fix: Data can be unaligned.  When dereferenced as an input
        ntosh(), a bad value is returned.  Reported by Alan Carvalho de
        Assis
      - Correct naming of fields in struct sockaddr_in6:  sin6_port and
        sin6_family, not sin_port and sin_family.
      - accept(): Correct the value returned by accept() in the case where
        net_lockingwait() is called.  It was returning -1 and losing the
        errno value.  Noted by Rony Xln

    * Common Drivers:

      - Loop device should return -EINTR is interrupted by a signal.
      - M25P serial flash driver:  Add subsector size of the M24P16 part.
        From Lazlo
      - Common serial driver: In case a thread is doing a blocking operation
        (e.g. read()) on a serial device, while it is being terminated by
        pthread_cancel(), then uart_close() gets called, but the semaphore
        is still blocked. This means that once the serial device is opened
        next time, data will arrive on the serial port (and driver
        interrupts handled as normal), but the received characters never
        arrive in the reader thread.  The problem was fixed by re-
        initializing the semaphores on the last uart_close() on the device.
        From Harald Welte
      - Pipes: Fixes some issues found by the PX4 team using Coverity.  From
        Pavel Krienko
      - CDC/ACM driver: Fixes some issues found by the PX4 team using
        Coverity.  From Pavel Krienko

    * NXP LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC4357: Changes required to get USART 2 & 3 working on the
        lpc4357-evb.  From Toby Duckworth.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Several fixes correcting issues with the STM32 header files from
        Jussi Kivilinna

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Ported Tridge's STM32 I2C noise resilience logic from the PX4
        repository.
      - STM32 F2 and F4:  Set the GPIO_SPEED_50MHz on all F2 and F4 SPI pin
        configurations.  This is based on an F411 SPI1 errata but the fixed
        is generalized to all SPI and all F2 and F4.  Discovered and fixed
        by Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Fix for STM32 OTGHS device driver working in FS mode.  From Ken
        Pettit.
      - For STM32 OTG HS DEV (in FS mode): Disable ULPI clock enable in RCC
        AHB1 Register.  If Both ULPI and the FS clock enable bits are set in
        FS mode, then the ARM never awakens from WFI due to a chip issue.
        This is only an issue if you are using the internal PHY.  From Ken
        Pettit.
      - STM32 F429 LTDC: Add missing clut register definition. From Marco
        Krahl
      - STM32 serial: fix declaration and definition of up_receive() and
        up_dma_receive() to match fields in the interface definition of
        struct uart_ops_s.  From Freddie Chopin.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Fix Tiva IRQ control logic; was limited to only 64 IRQs.  That is a
        problem for higher numbered IRQs on many platforms

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - avsprintf():  Fix a bug in usage of va_list on x86.  On x86,
        va_list is a pointer to a single copy on the stack.  avsprintf()
        calls lib_vsprintf() twice and so traverses the va_list twice using
        va_start.  va_start modifies that single copy on the stack so that
        the second call to lib_vsprintf() fails.  This appears to be an
        issue with x86 only so far.
      - stdint.h:  Don't use hex values to specify minimum values of fixed
        width, signed values.  Hex values are inherently unsigned and not
        usable for this purpose in all contexts.
      - strncpy():  Would trash a lot of memory if n == 0.  From Yasuhiro
        Osaki.
      - sscanf().  Accept %X and %F as well as %x %f as a format specifiers.
        From Sbastien Lorquet

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/romfs: fix romfs example builtin app registry issue.
        From Librae
      - apps/system/cdcacm, composite and usbmsc:  Fix some strangely placed
        conditional compilation.  Looks like an automated update went awry
      - apps/netutils/telnetd:  Add protection when CONFIG_SCHED_HAVE_PARENT
        is enabled:  Call sigaction with SA_NOCLDWAIT so that exit status is
        not retained (no zombies) and block receipt of SIGCHLD so that
        accept is not awakened by a signal.  If accept() is awakened by a
        signal, do not do anything crazy like exit.  Most from Rony Xln
      - apps/nshlib/: NSH TFTP get command:  Wrong file name used for the
        destination.  From Lazlo

NuttX-7.8
---------

The 108th release of NuttX, Version 7.8, was made on February 11, 2015,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.8.tar.gz and
apps-7.8.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

This release is primarily a bugfix release for the NuttX-7.7 version that
was release just two weeks prior.  That release included substantial
modifications in the NuttX networking to accommodate support for IPv6.  This
release follows close behind NuttX-7.7 in order to correct some the problems
discovered in that networking code.  This release does, however, include a
small number of new features and bug fixes unrelated to NuttX networking.

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Tickless Mode:  added limit of maximum delay that can be request
        by the scheduler tickless logic.  This is necessary so that the
        tickless logic does not request a delay beyond the capability of the
        underlying hardware.  From Macs Neklyudov.

    * Common Drivers:

      - VFS Unlink: Add an unlink method to both the character and block
        driver interface.  This is important because if the driver inode is
        unlinked and there are no open references to the driver, then the
        driver resources will be stranded.  On the unlink call, the driver
        has the opportunity (1) check if there an any open references, and
        if not, (2) free the driver resources.
      - Pipes and FIFOs:  Implement the unlink method.  If the pipe/FIFO is
        unlinked, it will marked the pipe/FIFO as unlinked.  If/when all
        open references to the driver are closed, all of the driver
        resources will be freed.
      - Added an option to use the syslog'ing device as the system console.
        This option enables a low-level, write-only console device at
        /dev/console (similar to the low-level UART console device).  From
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - RAM/ROM disk:  Add logic to dispose of the driver and RAM buffer
        when the RAM disk has been unlinked and all open references to the
        RAM disk have been closed.  Add new parameters to romdisk() to
        specify what should be done with the RAM/ROM buffer in this case --
        Should it be freed or not?  Changed all calls to ramdisk() to use
        these new parameters.

    * Networking:

      - Add support for local, Unix domain sockets.  Support included for
        both SOCK_STREAM and SOCK_DGRAM style local socket.
      - UDP enhancement:  Add UDP read-ahead support.  In addition to
        eliminating the main reason for lost UDP packets, then change
        enables support for for poll/select on UDP sockets and also non-
        blocking UDP sockets.  From Macs Neklyudov.
      - SLIP interface improvements.  From Macs Neklyudov.
      - IPv6 Neighbor Solicitation: Added logic to support verification
        that we have the IPv6 address in the Neighbor Table before sending
        any packets.  If not, then the Neighbor Solicitation message is
        sent.  This feature is important because otherwise the first packet
        sent to a remote peer will fail (it would have been replaced with a
        Neighbor Solicitation).
      - IPv6 Autonomous Auto-Configuration:  Added support for sending
        ICMPv6 Router Solicitation and receiving Router advertisement.  The
        local IPv6 address, mask, and router address are then auto-configured
        from the response..
      - IPv6 Router Support:  Add logic to behave like a router (if so
        configured) only in the sense that NuttX will send the router
        advertisement message in response to any received router solicitation
        messages.  Thus, one NuttX node in a network can configure the IPv6
        addresses of all other nodes in the network.
      - Optional IPv6 address filtering added to all Ethernet drivers for
        the all-routers multicast address.

    * Atmel AVR:

      - Added architecture support for the Atmel AVR ATMega1284P MCU.  From
        Jedi Tek'Unum.

    * Atmel AVR Boards:

      - Added support for the LowPowerLab MoteinoMEGA that is based on the
        Atmel AVR ATMega1284P MCU.  From Jedi Tek'Unum.

    * Atmel SAMA4:

      - Add support for Tickless mode of operation for the SAM4CM platform.
        From Macs Neklyudov.

    * Atmel SAMA4 Drivers:

      - Ethernet: The SAM4E Ethernet driver can now be configuration to
        perform all network processing on the work queue.  This greatly
        reduces the amount of interrupt level processing to service Ethernet
        packets.
      - SAM4E Ethernet: Add support multicast address matching and IPv6.

    * Atmel SAMA4 Boards:

      - SAM4E-EK: The nsh configuration now configures the Ethernet driver
        for execution on the work thread.

    * Atmel SAMA5D Drivers:

      - SAMA5D4 Ethernet: The SAMA5D4 Ethernet driver can now be configuration
        to  perform all network processing on the work queue.  This greatly
        reduces the amount of interrupt level processing to service Ethernet
        packets.
      - SAMA5D3 and SAMA5D4 Ethernet: Add support multicast address matching
        and IPv6.

    * Atmel SAMA5D Boards:

      - SAMA5D4-EK;  Added a configuration to testing IPv6.
      - SAMA5D4-EK:  Converted the nsh and ipv6 configurations to configure
        the Ethernet driver to use the work queue (vs. interrupt level
        processing).

    * Freescale KL:

      - Add architectural support for the K26Z128VLH4 chip.  From Derek B. Noonburg.

    * Freescale KL Boards:

      - Add board support for the Freedom KL26Z board.  From Derek B. Noonburg.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - Ethernet: Add support multicast address matching and IPv6.

    * SiLabs EFM32:

      - Add configurable option to unconditionally enable LE clocking. Even
        you don't use core clock LE as source for LFA or LFB, to read are
        write any register not clocked by HFPERCLK or HFCORECLK,  HFCORECLKLE
        should be enabled.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 RTC:  RTC driver using BURTC. From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - AES: Add driver for STM32L162XX AES peripheral.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Ethernet: The STM32 Ethernet driver can now be configuration to
        perform all network processing on the work queue.  This greatly
        reduces the amount of interrupt level processing to service Ethernet
        packets.
      - Ethernet: Add support multicast address matching and IPv6.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Added an IPv6 configuration for the STM32F4-Discovery board (with the
        STM32-DISCO_BB base board).
      - Converted all STM32F4-Discovery configurations (with base board) to
        configure the Ethernet driver to use the work queue (vs. interrupt
        level processing).

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Added support for TM4C123G timers.  From Calvin Maguranis.
      - Added a Tiva ADC driver.  From Calvin Maguranis.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - Added TM4C123G timers on the TM4C123G Launchpad.  From Calvin Maguranis.
      - Added Tiva ADC support to the TM4C123G-Launchpad.  From Calvin Maguranis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Math Library: Added support for inverse hyperbolic functions,
        isfinite(), error functions, nan(), copysign(), and trunc()
        functions.  From Brennan Ashton.

    * Applications:

      - apps/examples/ustream:  Add a simple test of Unix domain stream
        sockets.
      - apps/examples/udgram:  Add a simple test of Unix domain datagram
        sockets.
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add utilities to convert to/from prefix
        lengths from/to 128-bit network masks.
      - apps/nshlib: Modify the NSH IPv6 ifconfig command to show the more
        standard post-pended prefix value, rather than the full 128-bit
        netmask.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Work Queues:  Fix a backward calculation when determining the time
        to the next interesting event. .  From Liio Chen via the PX4
        repository.
      - clock_systimespec():  Fixes for compilation errors in certain
        configurations.  From Macs Neklyudov.

    * Graphics

      - Fixed a problem with one of the font files.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Networking:

      - IOB Deadlock: There were issues with the TCP write-ahead buffering
        if CONFIG_NET_NOINTS was enabled:  There is a possibility of
        deadlocks in certain timing conditions:  The network should never
        wait for TCP read-ahead buffering space to be available.  It should
        drop the packets immediately if no buffering is available. This was
        fixed by duplicating most of the IOB interfaces:  The versions that
        waited are still present (like iob_alloc()), but now there are non-
        waiting versions of the same interfaces (like iob_tryalloc()).  The
        TCP read-ahead logic now uses only these non-waiting interfaces.
      - TCP Deadlock: Fix another deadlock when CONFIG_NET_NOINTS is enabled.
        tcp_write_buffer_alloc() calls sem_wait() with network locked.  That
        worked if CONFIG_NET_NOINTS was not defined because interrupts are
        automatically restored when the wait happens.  But with
        CONFIG_NET_NOINTS=y, the wait blocks with the network locked -- bad
        style and also can lead to a deadlock condition.
      - ARP response waiting: Fixes another CONFIG_NET_NOINTS issue.  When
        called sem_timedwait() with the network locked, the network stays
        locked while we wait which is not what we want (without CONFIG_NET_NOINTS,
        interrupts are re-enabled while we wait and all is well).
      - TCP accept():  Fix a major TCP bug introduced with the NuttX-7.7
        IPv6 changes:   Some connection logic was reordered; setting the
        socket as 'connected' got moved to BEFORE the point where the check
        was made if the socket was already connected.  The resulting behavior
        was odd:  Telnet would connect, but then when you exit and reconnect,
        it would fail to connect.  But then if try again, it would connect
        okay. So the symptom was connect-fail-connect-fail-...
      - Lots of build problems introduced into multiple NIC support with the
        IPv6 changes of NuttX-7.7.   Many places where conditional logic based
        on CONFIG_NETDEV_MULTINIC is  confused with CONFIG_NET_MULTILINK.
        Lots of code changed with IPv6 that was never compiled with MULTINIC
        enabled.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Pipes and FIFOs: Fix a race condition between FIFO buffer operations
        and the opening and closing of FIFOs which necessary when the FIFOs
        are used to support Unix domain, datagram sockets.  The default
        policy is the deallocate FIFO buffering when the last client closes
        the pipe.  When when used for datagram communications, packets left
        in the FIFO will be lost. Some like UDP read-ahead is needed:  The
        buffered data in the FIFO needs to be retained until the reader gets
        a chance to re-open the FIFO.  Added an ioctl (PIPEIOC_POLICY) to
        control the buffer policy.  Default (0) is the legacy behavior; Unix
        domain datagram logic sets the alternative policy so that the packet
        data persists after the FIFO is closed.
      - RAMTRON:  Table of parts is not terminated properly if
        CONFIG_RAMTRON_FRAM_NON_JEDEC is not defined.  Noted by David
        Sidrane.

    * All Architectures:

      - Removed all occurrences of up_maskack_irq() that disables interrupts
        with up_ack_irq() that only acknowledges the interrupts.  This is only
        used in interrupt decoding logic.  Also remove the logic that
        unconditionally re-enables interrupts with the interrupt exits.  This
        interferes with the drivers ability to control the interrupt state.
        This is a necessary, sweeping, global change and unfortunately
        impossible to test.

    * ARM

      - ARMv7-A and ARMv7-M memcpy(): Optimized ARM assembly language
        memcpy's were not returning a value in R0 they are required to do.
        From David Sidrane.
      - ARMv7-A interrupt handler should not automatically re-enable interrupts
        on interrupt return.  That interferes with the driver's ability to
        manage interrupts.  Analogous change made to all other architectures
        as well (ARM7, ARM9, HC, SH, x86, z16, z80, etc,.  See above.).

    * STMicro STM32:

      - GPIO Interrupts: Disabling any of EXTI 5-9 interrupts was disabling
        interrupts for all EXTI 5-9. Same issue with EXTI 10-15.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - RTCC:  Fix for recent changes that caused compilation failrues with
        STM32L15XX configurations.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - SPI: The source clock for SPI 4,5, and 6 should be PCLK2, not PCLK1
        (for F411, F427, and F429).  Per David Sidrane.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - execl():   Fix bad logic in counting the number of arguments.
        execl() parameter passing could never have worked.  Noted by
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Applications:

      - Fix for building with parallel make. Build-server sometimes failed
        'make -j24' with errors in the builtin line or or sometimes silently
        succeeds but generated builds that contain a random subset of
        configured NuttX applications. There are two root causes for this:
        (1) Recipes for building builtin_list.h and builtin_proto.h are
        not linearizable, and (2) Nothing ensures that 'make context' is run
        first for apps/builtin.  This change address both issues. From Juha
        Niskanen.

NuttX-7.9
---------

The 109th release of NuttX, Version 7.9, was made on April 14, 2015,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.9.tar.gz and
apps-7.9.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Assertions: Add support for dumping board-specific information on
        assertions. From David Sidrane.
      - boardctl(): :  Add a new non-standard OS interface called boardctl().
        This is similar to a driver IOCTL call.  But this is an IOCTL call
        directly on the board logic.  This function will eventually replace
        all of the ad hoc OS interfaces that are current used to perform
        application specific initialization and application driver test
        configuration.  It essentially formalizes and institutionalizes
        these rogue interface in to at least a single crazy call.

    * Graphics:

      - Line Joins:  Line drawing graphic functions now take an argument that
        will draw a circular "cap" on the ends of lines to support cleaner
        joining of lines segments..

    * Common Drivers:

      - SPI iInterface:  Add an SPIDEV_USER so that there can be board-
        specific definitions of SPI devices.
      - I2C Interface:  Add a user provided void * argument to the I2C
        callback method for the I2C slave interface.  Suggested by Nate
        Weibley.
      - AT24 EEPROM Driver: Add support for (1) the byte-oriented read()
        method, (2) devices that have extended memory regions, and (3)
        devices that use 8-bit addressing.
      - Freescale MPL115A barometer: Add driver for the Freescale MPL115A
        barometer.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - CS2100-CP: Add a driver for the CS2100-CP Fractional-N Multipler
        chip.
      - RTC IOCTls:  Added the definitions of a driver based RTC interfaces
        and RTC upper half driver.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - umount2():  Added to support un-mount flags. umount() is now a macro
        that just calls umount2() with flags = 0.
      - File system interface: Pass the umount2() flags to every unbind()
        implementation.  That is where the decision to umount or not and how
        to umount will be made.
      - FAT unbind: Add support for umount2(target, MNT_FORCE) in the FAT
        file system.

    * Networking:

      - netdev_register(): Improve the network device registration logic.
        When multiple link types are used, modify how each interface number
        is assigned to the device name by incrementing the device number
        individually for each interface link type.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - Add TUN network device.  Used to support the Netutils PPPD
        implementation. From Max Neklyudov.

    * ARMv7-M

      - ARM Cortex-M7:  Add basic support for the Cortex-M7 architecture.
      - ARMv7 Common Lazy Exception handling. Add common support for lazy
        FPU state saving.  MCU-specific lazy FPU saving was already in place.
        This change just makes the code share-able.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3/4 Drivers:

      - SAMA5 Serial:  Backport support for flowcontrol and termios from
        SAM3/4.

    * Atmel SAMV7:

      - Atmel SAMV7:  Add architecture support for the Atmel SAMV7 family
        (Cortex-M7)

    * Atmel SAMV7 Boards:

      - Atmel SAMV71 Xplained Ultra:  Add board support for this SAMV7 board.
        This initialize release includes support for: SDRAM, TWI/I2C, SPI,
        Ethernet, HSMCI, DMA, GPIOs, UARTs, AT24 EEPROM and the maXTouch
        Xplained Pro LCD.  Drivers are available for SSC/I2C, the WM8904,
        the maXTouch trouchscreen, and USB device but have not yet been
        fully integrated in this release.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 USB Device is now functional with the efforts of From Pierre-
        noel Bouteville.
      - EFM32 I2C:  Add I2C driver.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32F372/F373: Adds architecture support for this STM32 parts.
        Tested on STM32F373CC.  Contributed by  Marten Svanfeldt.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 RTCC: Break out a new internal interface, stm32_rtc_setdatetime().
        This eliminates some un-necessary time conversions.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - STM32 RTCC: Add an implementation of the RTC lower half interface
        for the STM32.
      - STM32 RTCC: Extend the RTC interface to support reading subseconds.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 BBSRAM: Adds the ability to use the STM32F2 and STM32F4 Battery
        Backed SRAM in the file system. With an option to Save Panic context
        to one of the files. From David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Olimexino-STM32: Board support for the Olimexino STM32 board from David
        Sidrane.
      - Viewtool-STM32F107:  Add support for an optional, add-on Freescale
        MPL115A baramoter.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * TI Tiva:

      - TM4C1294:  Add support for the TM4C1294.  Contributed by Frank Sautter.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Tiva ADC:  Updated files to allow for ADC and PWM triggering by a
        timer.  Refactoring of ADC implementation.  From Calvin Maguranis.
      - Tiva Timer: Refactoring by Calvin Maguranis

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - TM4C123G-launchpad: Add ADC support.  From Calvin Maguranis.
      - TM4C123G-launchpad: Add board button interrupt support.  From Calvin
        Maguranis.
      - TM4C1294 Launchpad:  Add support for the TM4C1294 Launchpad.
        Contributed by Frank Sautter.

    * Microchip PIC32

      - PIC32MZ:  Add architectural support for the PIC32MZ (MIPS32 M14k).
        Includes contributions from Kristopher Tate.

    * Microchip PIC32MZ Boards

      - PIC32MZ Starter Kit: Add basic board support for the PIC32MZ.
        Includes contributions from David Sidrane.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - gettimeofday():  This function is no longer a core OS interface.  It
        is only a wrapper around clock_settime().
      - settimeofday(): Added. gettimeofday has been deprecated in POSIX
        2008. settimeofday() was never part of POSIX, but I decided to add
        it to libc as well just for symmetry.
      - Day-of-Week: Add CONFIG_TIME_EXTENDED to support the last 3 members
        of the tm struct and support for filling them in with the day of the
        week. From David Sidrane.
      - sighold(), sigrelse(), sigignore(), sigset() and sigpause():  New
        signal handling functions.
      - sys/select.h: Extend the fd_set type definition so that it can
        handle more than 32 descriptors (if so configured).  From Max
        Neklyudov.
      - netdb.h:  Add a mostly-commented-out version of the standard netdb.h
        header file.
      - include/nuttx/board.h:  Remove common board function prototypes from
        other files and consolidate them in this new header file.

    * Applications:

      - OS test: Improved error checking for sem_timedwait() from Juha
        Niskanen.
      - OS test: Add a simple test of sigprocmask, sighold, and sigrelse.
      - PPPD test:  Add PPPD test case.  Split out from the PPPD daemon by
        Brennan Ashton.
      - Netutils: Add a PPP daemon.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - NSH:  NSH initialization now calls boardctl(BOARDIOC_INIT) instead
        of nsh_archinitialize().   Remove support for CONFIG_NSH_ARCHMAC.
        It is not used and there are better ways to do that operation.
      - NSH:  Allow NSH 'date' command with no hardware RTC.  This command
        is useful without an RTC too.  Also, this permits testing on the
        simulator which never has an RTC.
      - apps/examples/:  Several tests changed (touchscreen adc, pwm,
        graphics).  No longer call directly into the OS, but rather
        indirectly via boardctl().
      - Modbus: Includes extensions to support RTU master mode by
        Armink(383016632@qq.com): https://github.com/armink/FreeModbus_Slave-Master-RTT-STM32.
        Ported to NuttX by Darcy Gong.
      - TZ database:  All logic to build timezone database needed for
        localtime() support.  Does not do much else yet.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - atexit(): Fix compile failure due to reference to undefined variable
        in certain configurations.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - syscalls: Last changes to message queue prototypes did not make it
        into call gate logic.  Some additional errors had crept as well since
        the system calls are seldom used.
      - waitpid(): Do not use uninitialized boolean in waitpid().  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - Timing functions:  Fix some nanosecond comparisons.  Comparisons should
        be greater than OR EQUAL TO 1000000000 for maximum value of nanoseconds
        in struct tm.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Time initialization: Fix an error in time initialization when there
        is no RTC and the time is initialized from a fixed configured value.
        The call to clock_calendar2utc() was returning the time in units of
        seconds.  The initialization logic, however, was expecting to get
        time in units of days.  This problem has been there forever but
        obviously has not significant impact to behavior in systems where
        time is not visible.
      - mq_timedsend():  Should not check for valid time if there is space
        in the message queue.  Noted by Freddie Chopin.
      - select() and sem_timedwait(): Fix places where the errno value was
        being overwritten by subsequent actions so that the returned errno
        value was incorrect.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - clock_systimer64(): Fix a problem in clock_systimer64 that occurs
        when (1) the 64-bit system time is enabled, and (2) the value of
        CONFIG_USEC_PER_TICK is less than 1 milliseconds (such as when using
        the tickless mode of operation).  In that case, the conversion of
        time to 64-bit millisecond value in clock_systmer64() causes some
        bad times to be returned.  Time was converted to milliseconds, then
        to configured ticks.  Precision was lost in the millisecond
        conversion. The fix is to first convert time to a 64-bit microsecond
        value, then to the configured tick value. Noted by David Sidrane.
      - clock_systimespec():  When an RTC is used clock_systimespec() must
        subtract the basetime from the returned time.  It needs to return
        the time since power up, no the current time.  Issue noted by Max
        Neklyudov.
      - AIO: correct some backward tests in aio_read() and aio_write():
        Socket descriptors have higher numbers than file descriptors.  In
        aio_contain(),  Copy u.ptr (void *) when initializing aioc and not
        the case specific u.aioc_filep.  From Michal Ulianko.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - procfs:  Fix potential NULL pointer dereference of 'node'.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - FAT: fat_unbind() was accessing 'fs->fs_sem' after freeing the 'fs'
        struct. From Juha Niskanen.
      - mkfatfs:  Use DMA memory for mkfatfs when needed. This makes mkfatfs
        use fat_dma_alloc() when CONFIG_FAT_DMAMEMORY is set. This is needed
        to ensure mkfatfs operates with boards that use DMA for microSD.
        From Andrew Tridgell via the PX4/NuttX repository.
      - FAT unmount: Fix a bug in the FAT unbind() logic.  There were
        problems with the way certain internal list handling was
        implemented. The end result is that newly opened or cloned file
        structures were never being added to the list of open files.  So
        when the unmount() happens, it always looked like there were not
        open files and a crash could ensue.
      - FAT mounting:  Fix misthink when CONFIG_ENDIAN_BIG=y.  From Lwazi Dube.

    * Common Drivers:

      - CAN upper half driver: Some lines had to be reordered in the can_open
        function otherwise the open count will only be incremented from 0 to
        1. This caused problems when trying to open the can bus from two
        different tasks. SourceForge Patch #46.

    * Crypto:

      - crypto:  Fix issues when AES support was added for the STM32L1.
        From Juha Niskanen.

    * Networking:

      - Network initialization: Divide net_intiialize() into net_setup() and
        net_initialize() to solve a chicken-and-egg problem.  net_setup()
        must be called before up_initialize() is called so that networking
        data structures are ready to register new network devices.
        net_initialize() now does only timer related operations and is
        called AFTER up_initialize() where the timers are configured.
        Problem noted by Max Neklyudov.
      - netdev_unregister():  Fix a list handling error.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - Socket dup: Do not call sockfd_socket() twice.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * Common Drivers:

      - max11802 touchscreen:  Fix possible unmatched IRQ restore (not
        normally a problem, but could happen in certain configurations).
        Noted by Juha Niskanen.
      - MMCSD SPI Multi-block transfers: ACMD23 must be preceded with CMD55
        command as any other ACMD commands. Also, after the block reading
        wait loop must be inserted before writing the next block of data to
        the sd card.  From Dmitry Nikolaev via Jussi Kivilinna.
      - MMCSD SDIO:  Fix some bad logic when file system debug is turned on:
        Arguments to syslog were missing so that garbage was being printed.
      - Common upper-half serial driver: Report correct number of bytes free
        in serial buffer with FIONWRITE.  From Sami Pelkonen via Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Pipes/Fifos: Fix zero-lenth writes to pipes/FIFOs. From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - USB device MSC: Add NULL pointer check.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - BCH driver: Avoid NULL pointer dereference when bch->refs  == 255.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - Various drivers: The inode unlink method should not be support if
        operations on the root pseudo-filesystem are disabled.

    * ARMv7-M

      - ARMv7M MPU:  Bad syntax in ARMv7-M MPU logic would cause failure to
        write the correct value to the MPU_RASR register. From Juha Niskanen.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4 Serial TERMIOS:  A side-effect of changing serial settings
        via TERMIOS (such as tcsetattr) is that serial interrupts were being
        left disabled.  This is not a problem if the serial configuration is
        changed when there are no open references to the serial device.  In
        that case, serial interrupts are disabled and will not be enabled
        enabled until the serial device is first opened.  But it is fatal if
        the serial device is already opened and if there is a task waiting
        to receive data.  In that case, the side-effect of disabling
        interrupts is fatal:  That task is then left hanging with interrupts
        disabled.
      - SAM3/4 Serial: The IMR register is read-only.  This means that
        sam_restoreints() did not actually re-enable UART interrupts
        (Fortunately, that function was not being used up to this point).
      - SAMA5 HSMCI:  Fix a bug in SAMA5 HSMCI.  The bitfield mask and shift
        values were reversed resulting in a trashed value for the number of
        blocks in the BLOCKR register.  This was sufficient to prevent DMA
        writes from working.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAMA5 Timer/Counter: Fix typos in timer/counter header file.  From
        Bob Doiron.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 PWR and RTC: Changes to support fully write protecting the
        backup domain. N.B. stm32_pwr_enablebkp did not account for the delay
        from enable to the domain being writable. The KISS solution is a
        up_udelay. A more complex solution would be a negated write test
        with restore.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 SPI:  Add missing SPI callback functions to the STM32 SPI
        driver.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - STM32 I2C: Add missing NULL check.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 USB device: Fix stale initialization invalidating later NULL
        check.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 UART: Fix RX DMA setup for UART5.  From  Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 UART: Make input hardware flow-control work with RX DMA.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 RTC and clock control:  The STM32F4Discovery board doesn't
        come with a Low speed external oscillator so the default LSE source
        for the RTC doesn't work. In stm32_rtcc.c the up_rtc_initialize()
        logic doesn't work with the LSI. The check on RTC_MAGIC on the BK0R
        register lead to rtc_setup() call that rightfully enables the LSI
        clock; but the next times, when the rtc is already setup, the
        rtc_resume() call does NOT start the LSI clock! The right place to
        put LSE/LSI initialization is inside stm32_stdclockconfig() in
        stm32fxxxxx_rcc.c.  Doing this I checked the possible uses of the
        LSI and the LSE sources: the LSI can be used for RTC and/or the
        IWDG, while the LSE only for the RTC (and to output the MCO1 pin).
        This change is not verifed for any other platforms.  From Leo
        Aloe3132

    * Tiva Drivers:

      - Tiva GPIO driver needed small fixes in the configuration routines and
        discovered false-positive bugs in interrupt testing: interrupts are
        now verified to actually be working reliably. From Calvin Maguranis .

    * MIPS32:

      - mips32/Toolchain.mk: Current Pinguino toolchain uses the prefix p32-
        instead of mips-.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - sigaddset() and sigdelset(): Need to set errno if a bad signal
        number is received.
      - sfrtime():  Missing implementation of %C in sfrtime() C (was being
        treated as %y).  From Freddie Chopin.
      - pthread.h: Fix PTHREAD_COND_INITIALIZER.
      - ungetc.c: Fix NULL pointer dereference in ungetc() if 'stream' was
        NULL, 'stream->fs_oflags' was evaluated.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Fixes to asinh(), atanh(), and sinh():  The 'basic' expansions all
        exhibited bad cancellation errors near zero (<= 1E-10). This can be
        easily seen e.g. with x = 1E-30, the results are all zero though they
        should be extremely close to x. The cutoff values (1E-5, 1E-9) are
        chosen so that the next term in the Taylor series is negligible (for
        double). Functions could maybe be optimized to use only first term (x)
        and a smaller cutoff, just bigger than where the cancellation occurs
      - localtime(): Inconsistent configuration name: CONFIG_LIBC_TZDIR vs
        CONFIG_LIBC_TZ_TZDIR.  Former wins.

    * Applications:

      - Modbus:  Fix some compile problems when TCP is enabled.

NuttX-7.10
----------

The 110th release of NuttX, Version 7.10, was made on June 9, 2015,
and is available for download from the SourceForge website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.10.tar.gz and
apps-7.10.tar.gz.  Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt
file for build information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Binary Loader:

      - ARMv-7M, binfmt/, STM32: Add support uClibc++ exceptions.  This
        involved additional handling for relative relation types, additional
        support for unwinding, as well as additional changes.  The
        culmination of a big effort from Leo Aloe3132.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - RA8875 LCD driver contributed by Marten Svanfeldt.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - Union File System: Add support for a union file system that can be
        used to overlay and merge the content of two mounted file systems.

    * USB Host:

      - USB Hub Support: Bring in USB hub-related files from
        https://github.com/kaushalparikh/nuttx.  This is the work of Kaushal
        Parikh.  This is quite a bit more hub logic was needed in before the
        USB hub support was fully functional.  This involved changing many
        USB host controller driver interfaces and modifications to many
        drivers.
      - USB host CDC/ACM class driver:  Added initial implementation of a
        host-side CDC/ACM driver.  Initial version was a great learning
        experience, but probably should be partially redesigned (as
        discussed in the top-level TODO file).
      - IPv6 Routing: Complete implementation of the IPv6 routing logic.
        From Max Neklyudov.

    * Networking:

      - Local Sockets: Add poll support for Unix stream sockets.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - net/: ARP, ICMP, ICMPv6, PKT, TCP, and UDP now all receive event
        notifications from both network device packet processing, but now
        also from Device-specific events such as when the network goes down.
        The device notification callback structure is now supports dual
        linkages so that the client can receive notifications from both
        source; The device structure now includes a list of clients that
        want to receive device related notifications.  This prevents network
        actions from hanging when the device goes down and will be an
        essential part of future support for removable network devices.
        Some of the core logic was contributed by Max Neklyudov.
      - TUN: Misc. improvements to the TUN driver, mostly related to poll().
        Also several bugfixes. From Max Neklyudov.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - Simulator: Add logic to test localtime and TZ database.  See
        apps/system/README.txt for info.
      - Simulation:  Add a configuration for testing the Union File System.

    * Calypso:

      - Calypso Compal-E86: Updates for execution out of FLASH on the C139
        phone.  From Craig Comstock.

    * Atmel SAMD/L:

      - SAML21 Support: And chip definitions, configuration framework,
        memory map and pin configuration files for SAML21 support.

    * Atmel SAMD/L Boards:

      - SAML21-Xplained:  Add a board support for the SAML21 Xplained Pro.
        This is based on the similar SAMD20 Xplained Pro board.

    * Freescale/NXP KL:

      - KL25Z64: Added support for the KL25Z64.  The KL25Z64 is a lower
        memory variant of the KL25Z128 and is used on the Teensy LC.  From
        Michael as SourceForge patch 50.

    * Freescale/NXP KL Boards:

      - Teensy-LC: Add board support for the Teensy LC board.  Support is
        based off the Freedom KL25Z board.  LED, PWM, and UART0 have been
        tested. The SPI pins are mapped correctly but have not yet been
        tested.  From Michael Hope as SourceForge patch 51.

    * NXP LPC111x:

      - LPC111x:  Support for the LPC11xx family (the LPC1115 MCU in
        particular).  Contributed by Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP LPC111x Boards:

      - LPCXpresso LPC1115:  Support for the LPCXpression LPC1115
        board.  Contributed by Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC17xx Ethernet: Add support for the Micrel KSZ8041 PHY to the
        LPC17xx Ethernet driver.

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - Lincoln60:  Add a network enabled configuration for the Lincoln60
        board.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM4CM:  Add support for optical mode for the SAM4CM UART1.  From
        Max Neklyudov.

    * Freescale (NXP) Kinetis:

      - Kinetis K20: Basic support for the Kinetis K20 architecture.  Taken
        from PX4.  This is the work of Jakob Odersky.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Boards:

      - SAMV71-Xplained w/maXTouch Xplained Pro:  A TWIHS fix was the last
        barrier to getting the touchscreen working in the maXTouch Xplained
        Pro LCD.  Added the NxWM integrated graphics demonstration
        configuration.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32: Added support for STM32F302K8 and STM32F302K6.  From Ben Dyer
        via PX4/David Sidrane.
      - STM32F205RG: Add basic support for the STM32F205RG.  From SourceForge
        Ticket 40 (anonymous, 2015-05-31).
      - STM32 F3:  Add DBGMCU register definitions for the F3 family.  From
        Greg Meiste.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 LCDC: Defined a second interface for the dma2d controller.
        LTDC only controls the display visibility but the DMA2D controller
        changes the content of the frame buffer (buffer of the layer). From
        Marco Krahl.
      - STM32 PVD: Added support for STM32's Programmable Voltage Detector
        (PVD) feature. By Dmitry Nikolaev, submitted by Juha Niskanen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F429i-Disco: Add support for the new DMA2D features to the LTDC
        configuration.  From Marco Krahl.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - TM4C1294 Launchpad:  Added TM4C1294NCPDT EN0_LED2 (10/100-Base-Tx);
        removed all booster pack pin definitions. From Frank Sautter.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc:  Add an option to disable support for long long formats in
        lib_vsprintf().  On very tiny platforms, this reduces the footprint
        by omitting large libgcc.a libraries to perform the 64-bit
        arithmetic operations. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - nuttx/zoneinfo:  Add logic to build a ROMFS file system
        containing the timezone data.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - Add poll support for Unix stream sockets.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Enhancements to NSH ifconfig for case of multi-link operation, TUN
        device and local connections.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - Enhanced output to NSH ping command from Max Neklyudov.
      - The NSH mount command now recognizes the Union filesystem type when
        listing mounted file systems.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/thttpd/ and apps/examples/thttpd/: Add support for
        using binfs/ with the Union FS instead of NXFLAT.  NXFLAT is
        probably the better solution but recently compiler changes make it
        unusable.  binfs or ELF are fallback binary formats.  This commit
        adds an option to use binfs with the Union FS.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - Modify/simpify apps/examples build files.  From Roman Saveljev.
      - apps/examples/ltdc:  Add testing support for the STM32 LTDC's 2D DMA.
        From Marco Krahl.
      - apps/examples/ostest: Add a test of nested signals.  There are no
        failures to handle signals but neither am I getting any nested signal
        handling.
      - apps/examples/elf: Add configuration options to support building the
        hello++4 example that depends upon having uClibc++ available.  Also
        add hello++5 to the ELF example  From  Leo aloe3132.
      - apps/examples/unionfs: Add a test of the union file system to
        apps/examples.

Efforts In Progress.  The following are features that are partially
implemented but present in this release.  They are not likely to be
completed soon.

    * Processes.  Much of the work in this release is focused on the
      realization of Unix-style user processes in NuttX.  There is more to
      be done, however.  The full roadmap and status is available at:
      http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:memconfigs#the_roadmap_toward_processes

    * XMega:  There are some fragments in place for an XMega port.  That
      port has not really started, however.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - boardctl():  Add missing case causing that caused failures of PWM
        test.
      - pthread_kill(): Re-implemented pthread_kill().  It was just a simple
        wrapper around kill() but since the correct dispatching of signals
        for multi-threaded task groups has been implemented, calling kill()
        does not do what pthread_kill() is supposed to do.  The corrected
        implementation of pthread_kill() will direct the signal specifically
        to the specific pthread and no other.
      - uint32_t callbacks: Update the type passed to watchdog timer
        handlers.  Using uint32_t is a problem for 64-bit machines because
        it it too small to pass a pointer.  uintptr_t is a more appropriate
        type.
      - mq_timedreceive(): move the location where the errno value is set;
        the ETIMEDOUT errno setting was being overwritten by subsequent
        actions before returning.  Noted by Freddie Chopin.
      - POSIX message queues:  Move mq_setattr() and mq_getattr() from
        nuttx/libc/mqueue to nuttx/sched/mqueue.  Also add syscall support
        for mq_setattr() and mq_getattr().  This is necessary in protected
        and kernel builds because in those cases the message queue
        structure is protected and cannot be accessed directly from user
        mode code.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - MTD:  Increase the size of the fields in the geometry structure
        (again) to support larger FLASH sizes.  Needed by Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Common Drivers:

      - poll(): Fix resource leak and memory corruption on poll failure.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * USB Host:

      - LPC31xx and SAMA5Dx EHCI:  Fix cache related problem in LPC31 and
        SAMA5Dx EHCI drivers. All buffers are now aligned with the cache
        line size in both starting address and in length.  This cause major
        problems in unlucky builds where the USB host buffers where
        unaligned and abutting other data. The cache flush and invalidate
        operations could be subverted by accesses to adjacent data or could
        have unexpected side effects.  This bug has been in the ECHI drivers
        forever, but was only revealed due to unlucky memory allocations
        during the integration of the hub feature.

    * USB Device:

      - All USB device class drivers:  There needs to be a check to make
        sure that the size of a returned string does not exceed the size of
        the allocated request buffer.  Strings such as vendor names or
        product names will be truncated to fit in the request buffer.

    * Networking:

      - TCP:  Correct failures in long Telnet sessions by increasing th
        size of the number of bytes sent from uint16_t to uint32_t.  This
        avoids an integer overflow that causes a long Telnet session to be
        closed unexpectedly.  From Rony XLN.
      - Network locks: Correct some network lock logic:  Two error
        conditions where the network was not being unlocked and one where it
        was getting unlocked twice.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Local Sockets: Local stream sockets had problem of double releasing
        pipes (both server and client attempt release), which causes wrong
        pipe pair being closed in multi-client case. Solve by adding per
        connection instance ID to pipe names.  From  Jussi Kivilinna.
      - TCP:  Fix an important TCP networking bug: 16-bit flags was being
        converted to 8-bits in a few locations, causing loss of status
        indications.
      - TCP: net_startmonitor() always returned OK.  In the race case
        where a socket has already been closed, it correctly handled the
        disconnection event but still returned OK.  Returning OK caused the
        callers of net_startmonitor() to assume that the connection was
        okay, undoing the good things that net_startmonitor() did and
        causing the socket to be incorrectly marked as connected.  This
        behavior was noted by Pelle Windestam.
      - setsockopt() failed when setting timeouts to values less tha 100
        msec.  That is because the timeout is limited to stops of 1
        decisecond and because the conversion of structure timeval was
        truncating the microsecond remainder.  The utility
        net_timeval2dsec() now accepts and option to determine how it
        handles the remainder:  truncate, discarding the remainder, use
        the remainder to round to the closed decisecond value, or use any
        non-zero remainder to the next larger whole decisecond value.  Bug
        discovered by Librae.
      - TCP: In the TCP connection operation, it was trying to setup the
        network monitor BEFORE the socket was successfully connected.  This,
        of course, has ALWAYS failed because the socket is not yet connected
        and the TCP state is not yet correct for a connected socket.  However,
        because of other changes net_startmonitor() now returns a failure
        condition that causes worse problems when trying to connect.  The fix
        is to move the logic that starts the network monitor to AFTER the
        socket has been successfully connected.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM4CM and SAMA5D Free-running timer: Logic that samples the free
        running counter reads the pending interrupt status register and can
        cause interrupts to be lost.  So, if when the status register is
        read, the logic must also handle the timer overflow event. Found
        and fixed by Max Neklyudov.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4 Serial:  When reconfigured, serial does not receive bytes
        from UART.  This happens because RX interrupt was disabled in the
        setup routine.  Fixed this I save interrupt configuration before
        UART shutdown and restore it after.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC176x GPIO:  Reorder steps when an output GPIO is configured in
        order to avoid transient bad values from being output.  From Hal
        Glenn.
      - LPC17 USB OHCI:  Correct some initialization of data structures.
        When hub support is enabled, it would overwrite the end of an array
        and clobber some OS data structures.
      - LPC17xx Ethernet:  Review, update, and modify the Ethernet driver so
        that it works better with CONFIG_NET_NOINTS=y.  Also, update all
        LPC17xx networking configurations so that they have
        CONFIG_NET_NOTINTS=y selected.

    * SiLabs EMF32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 SPI: Add missing SPI GPIO pin initialization.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F3:  Added missing EXTI definitions for the STM32 F3; Correct
        an error the port D base address in the STM32 F30x and F37x memory
        maps.  From Greg Meiste.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM23 RTC: Fix an error introduced into stm32_pwr_enablebkp().
        That function must preserve the previous state of backup domain
        access on return.
      - STM32 RTC counter: Now need to enable backup domain write access
        when setting the time.  From Darcy Gong.
      - STM32 OTG FS and HS: Added protection in the event that out-of-bound
        endpoint numbers are received.  From David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F429i Disco: (1) Fix a bad return value if the LCD driver is
        already initialized. (2) The LCD driver initialization is now
        performed during the early boot sequence.  (3) Increased the size
        of the message queue from 32 to 64 in the lcd configuration.  From
        Marco Krahl.

    * TI Tiva

      - Fixes for Tiva TM4C1294NCPDT.  From Frank Sautter.

    * Atmel SAMV71 Drivers:

      - SAMV7 TWIHS: Fix SAMV TWIHS logic that performs multi-message
        transfers with and without repeated starts.

    * Atmel SAMA5D3/4 Dirvers:

      - SAMA5 CAN: Fix SAMA5 CAN frame construction.  From Max Holtzberg.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - stdlib.h:  MAX_RAND should be RAND_MAX.
      - assert.h: Wrap definitions of assertion macros in do while so that
        they are valid C statements.  Numerous places throughout the code
        where semicolons were missing at the end of an assertion also had to
        be fixed. Suggested by orbitalfox.
      - inetntoa(): Correct errors in printing IP address when type char is
        signed and the value is >= 128.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * Tools:

      - Tools: Fix test for the existence of the apps/ directory in
        configure.c. Fix backward interpretation of options, -l was selecting
        Windows and -w was selecting Linux. This was SourceForege Ticket #39.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib/nsh_timcmds.c: Check return values from time functions.
      - apps/nshlib/: Fix handling of gmtime_r return value in time commands.
        gmtime_r returns a pointer, not an int.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/ntp: Fix mismatched sched_lock/unlock.  Noted by Juha
        Niskanen.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/nxlines:  Fix missing right bracket that causes
        compile error when CONFIG_NX_XYINPUT=y.  From Librae.
      - apps/examples: When boardctl() fails, need to print errno not the
        returned value which will always be -1.
      - apps/examples: Correct use of the BOARDIOC_GRAPHICS_SETUP boardctl()
        call.

NuttX-7.11 Release Notes
------------------------

The 111th release of NuttX, Version 7.11, was made on August 13 2015,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.11.tar.gz and
apps-7.11.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/patacongo/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - clock_gettime(): Use up_timer_gettime for CLOCK_MONOTONIC in
        tickless mode.  From  Max Neklyudov.
      - waitpid(): Implement WNOHANG for waitpid() only and for the case of
        CONFIG_SCHED_HAVE_PARENT not selected.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - SCHED_SPORADIC:  Add a sporadic scheduler to NuttX.
      - Extend the processor-specific interface to include information to
        support the Sporadic Scheduler.
      - sem_tickwait():  Added this function for internal use within the OS.
        It is a non-standard but more efficient version of sem_timedwait()
        for use in higher performance device drivers.

    * Binary Loader:

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - Graphics:  Implement anti-aliasing in order to clean the drawing of
        all edges.  Anti-aliasing is supported in the horizontal, raster
        direction only.
      - SSD1306 LCD Driver: Modify the SSD1306 LCD driver to support either
        the SPI or I2C interface.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers/MTD:

      - mount: Add the ability to mount a file system on top of en existing
        node in the pseudo-file system.
      - epoll(): Add a very simple epoll layer just around poll calls. To
        satisfy build app requirements.  From Anton D. Kachalov.

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - IOCTL: Add relay IOCTL definitions. From Max Neklyudov.
      - I/O Expander Framework:  Add an I/O expander driver framework. From
        Sebastien Lorquet
      - NXP PCA9555 I/O Explander.  Add PCA9555 driver.From Sebastien
        Lorquet
      - BMP180 Barameter: Add support to Bosch BMP180 barometer.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - CAN IOCTLs:  Add CAN IOCTL command definitions to manage CAN message
        filtering
      - CAN Driver:  Add configuration to support DLC to byte conversions
        needed for CAN FD mode.
      - SPI Slave Interface:  Add a definition of an SPI slave interface.
      - LM92 Temperature Sensor:  Add a driver for the LM92 temperature
        sensor.  Contributed by Paul Alexander Patience.
      - AS5048B Rotary Magnetic Sensor: Add support for an AS5048B rotary
        magnetic sensor.  From Paul Alexander Patience.
      - Ramtron Driver:  Update to include supportf for newer RAMTRON parts.
        From David Sidrane.
      - MB7040 Sonar Driver: Add support for a MB7040 sonar driver.  From
        Paul Alexander Patience.
      - ms5805 Altimeter Driver: Add support for an MS5805 altimeter.  From
        Paul Alexander Patience.

    * Networking:

      - DNS Client: Implement the low-level network DNS packet protocol to
        request and receive IPv6 address mappings.
      - NetDB:  Add support for a DNS host name resolution cache.  This can
        save a lot of DNS name server lookups (but might also have the
        negative consequence of using stale IP address mappings.
      - NetDB:  Name resolution logic now supports lookups from a file like
        /etc/hosts.
      - Network Initialization: Add CONFIG_NETDEV_LATEINIT that can be
        used to suppress calls to up_netinitialize() from early in
        initialization.
      - FTMAC100 Ethernet MAC Driver. Add support for Faraday FTMCA100
        Ethernet MAC/ From Anton D. Kachalov.
      - UDP Networking:  Add support for send() for connected UDP sockets.

    * Crypto:

      - Add CFB and MAC AES modes.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - Simulation: Implement board_power_off() for the simulation platform.
        This allows for a graceful exit from the simulation.

    * MoxaRT:

      - MoxaRT SoC: Add support for MoxaRT SoC found in the most Moxa serial
        converters such as NP51x0, NP66xx, UC72xx.  From Anton D. Kachalov.

    * MoxaRT Boards:

      - Moxa NP51x0: Moxa NP51x0 series of 2-port advanced RS-232/422/485
        serial device servers.  From Anton D. Kachalov.

    * ARMv6-M:

      - ARMv6-M Assertions: Port some per-process stack dumping logic from
        ARMv7-M to ARMv6-M.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Atmel SAMD/L Boards:

      - SAML21: DMA: Add SAML21 DMA support.
      - SAMD21: Add architecture support for the SAMD21 family.
      - SAMD21-Xplained:  Board configuration for the SAMD21 Xplained board.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM4E: Add default loop optimization if EEFC_FMR is available in the
        configuration (i.e., for SAM4S and 4E). From Marco Aurlio da Cruz.
      - crypto/ and SAM4CM: Add CFB and MAC AES modes.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - SAM3/4:  Add a TWI driver for the SAM4CM.  From  Max Neklyudov.

    * Freescale (NXP) Kinetis:

      - Kinetis: Add support for MK20DN--VLH5 and MK20DX---VLH5.  Needed
        for backward compatible support for Teensy-3.0.

    * Freescale (NXP) Kinetis Boards:

      - Teensy 3.x:  Add board support for the PJRC Teensy-3.0 and
        Teensy-3.1 boards.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7:  Add an MCAN driver for the SAMV7 platform.
      - SAMV7 SPI Slave Driver: Add the an SPI slave driver.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STMicro STM32 F7:  Add architecture support for the STMicro STM32
        F7.
      - STM32 F446:  Add support for the STMicro STM32 F446.  From David
        Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F7:  Add an STM32 F7 Ethernet driver.
      - STM32 F7:  Port the STM32 F4 DMA driver.
      - STM32 F4 ADC:  Add DMA support to the ADC driver for STM32 F4.  From
        Max Kriegler.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F762G-Disco:  Add support for the STMicro STM32 F7 Discovery
        board.
      - STM32F4-Disco: Add support to BMP180 driver on the STM32F4 Discovery.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Add asctime(), asctime_r(), ctime(), and ctime_r().
      - sethostname(): Add support for sethostname().
      - gethostbyname() and gethostbyaddr():  Add support for
        gethostbyname() and gethostbyaddr().  Also support included for the
        non-standard gethostbyname_r() and gethostbyaddr_r().  This moves
        the DNS client logic from apps/ into the NuttX libc implementation.

    * Tools:

      - testbuild.sh:  Add a script that can be used to perform building
        testing for several board configurations.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - apps/ Build System:  No longer depends on hardcoded lists of
        directories. Instead, it does a wildcard search to find all
        appropriate directories.  This means that to install a new
        application, you simply have to copy the directory (or link it) into
        the apps/ directory.  If the new directory includes a Makefile and
        Make.defs file, then it will automatically be included in the build.
      - mkkonfig.sh: Add the tool mkkconfig.sh that dynamically builds the
        apps/Kconfig file at configuration time.  The hardcoded
        configuration file has been removed and now the top-level Makefile
        executes tools/mkkconfig.sh to auto-generate the top-level Kconfig
        file.  A new apps/ make target call preconfig: was added to support
        this operation.  Now you do not have to modify the top-level Kconfig
        file to add a new directory into the configuration; the top-level
        subdirectory simply needs to include a Kconfig file and it will
        automatically be included in the configuration.  The native Windows
        build is temporarily broken until a new apps/tools/mkconfig.bat
        script is generated.
      - mkkconfig.bat:  Add the Windows script corresponding to
        apps/tools/mkkconfig.sh.  Needed for a Windows native build.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH shutdown command: NSH will now support an (optional) shutdown
        command if the board provides the option CONFIG_BOARDCTL_POWEROFF.
        The command can also be used to reset the system if
        CONFIG_BOARDCTL_RESET=y.
      - NSH uname command:  Add support for a uname command.
      - NSH nslookup command:  Add an nslookup command.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - NetDB:  Add a system command to access the network database.
      - readline():  Add support for Unix-style tab complete to readline.
         Contributed by Nghia Ho.
      - readline():  Extended the tab-completion support to also expand NSH
        command names.
      - readline():  Add support for an in-memory command line history that
        can be retrieved using the up and down arrows.  Contributed by Nghia
        Ho.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - DNS client:  Moved the DNS client logic into the NuttX C library.
        It is a necessary part for the full implementation of the netdb logic
        and provides more flexibility in that location.
      - Replace calls to the non-standard dns_gethotip() with calls to
        standard gethostbyname().
      - NetLib: Create netlib wrapper functions around dns_getserver() and
        dns_setserver() to isolate application code from changes to those
        interfaces.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - OS test:  Extend the OS test to include a test of
        pthread_mutex_trylock() for recursive mutexes. From Juha Niskanen.
      - OS test: Add a test for the sporadic scheduler.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - pthreads: Use -1 instead of 0 as PID for unclaimed mutexes.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - pthreads: Implement pthread_mutex_trylock() for recursive mutexes.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - pthread_create():  Group binding needs to be cleared before
        sched_releasetcb(), as otherwise group_leave() will be called and
        group->tg_nmembers decremented or group being released. group_leave()
        should be called only after group_join() is called, not after
        group_bind().  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Protected Mode User Memory Allocator: Redesigned how the user space
        heap is accessed from the kernel code in protected mode.  It used to
        call memory management functions in user space via function pointers
        in the userspace interface.  That is inefficient because the first
        thing that those memory management functions do is to trap back into
        the kernel to get the current PID.  Worse, that operation can be
        fatal is certain fragile situations such as when a task is exiting.
        The solution is to remove all of the memory management function
        calls from the interface.  Instead, the interface exports the users
        pace heap structure and then kernel size implementations of those
        memory management functions will operate on the userspace heap
        structure. This avoids the unnecessary system calls and, more
        importantly, failures do to freeing memory when a test exits.
      - pthread_create(): Fix an (unlikely) error in fallback value in the
        event of a failure (which should never occur).

    * Common Drivers:

      - STMPE811 Driver:  In stmpe811_instanciate() when
        CONFIG_STMPE811_MULTIPLE is enabled, and the call to
        stmpe811_checkid() fails, then the linked device list is not
        restored to its previous state. From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - CAN driver:  Fix an issue in the CAN driver where the rx_sem count
        can grow beyond bounds.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - NFS client: Fix prototype of unbind method.  The function prototype
        was not updated for NFS after a recent change to the file system
        interface.  From Manuel St??.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - netconfig.h:  Fix some backward compilation that was emitting #error
        in the wrong condition when SLIP was enabled.
      - SLIP Driver:  Fix a missed name change when many of network
        interface names changed sometime back but were apparently never
        updated for SLIP.
      - Networking:  Allow receipt of empty UDP packets.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * ARMv6-M:

      - ARMv6-M: Fix Cortex-M0 assembly error when the interrupt stack is
        enabled.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Atmel SAMD/L Drivers:

      - SAMD20, D21, L21: In the SAML21, SERCOM5 uses a different SLOW clock
        channel (and, hence, also a different SLOW GCLK generator).  This
        means that the channel selection cannot be a global definition but
        must be a per SERCOM configuration setting.
      - SAMD/L:  Several fixes to register definitions and types. From
        Janne Rosberg.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4 UART: Back out an error introduced with commit
        02c33f66c5a8be774034cd40e4125e9323c7b4d8.  Causes an infinite loop in
        up_lowputc().  From Max Neklyudov.
      - SAM4CM: Fix SUPC register definitions. From Max Neklyudov.
      - SAM3/4 WDT: Correct some problems with SAM3/4 watchdog driver.
        Includes some small improvements.  From Max Neklyudov.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7 UART: Also back the bad cloned change o sam_lowputc.c for
        SAMV7 platform.

    * NXP LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC4350: Correct some LPC4350 GPIO pin configurations.  From
        Alessandro Temil.

    * SiLabs EMF32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 SPI: Correct write to incorrect register in EFM32 SPI driver.
        From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F15x: STM322 F15x stm32_stdclockconfig() was calling
        stm32_pw_setvos() which accessed PWR_CR via an inactive APB From
        Juha Niskaneni.
      - STM32 Ethernet: Extend STM32 Ethernet operating frequency to 180MHz.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - SAMV7 Xplained: In clock configuration, divider was set to 25 to get
        25*12MHz=300MHz CPU clock.  The correct multiplier is 24 because the
        calculation if (24+1)*12MHz.  So the board was running at 312MHz.
        From Efim Monjak.

    * ARMv7-A:

      - Cortex-A5 vfork():  Fix a Cortex-A compilation error when system
        calls are enabled in modes other than CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAMA5Dx EHCI:  Fix some bad conditional compilation that left a
        function undefined if CONFIG_USBHOST_ASYNCH is not selected.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - getopt():  Uninitialized variable can cause hardfault from getopt()
        if required argument is missing. From George McWilliams.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH/THHPD:  Change decoding to handle the increased size of the
        scheduling policy field in the TCB.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - THTTPD:  Fix compilation problems when
        CONFIG_THTTPD_GENERATE_INDICES is defined.
      - THTTPD: Missing gci-src as a dependency path when building with
        BINFS enabled.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - poll() example: Fix a few bit-rot compilation errors.
      - Nx Lines example:  If CONFIG_NX_ANTIALIASING=y, then the nxlines
        example now erases a line that is 2 pixels longer and 2 pixels wider
        than the line it drew.  That eliminates edges effects due to
        applying the anti-aliasing algorithm twice.  A better solution
        would be to make anti-aliasing an option for each graphics call so
        you would rend the line with anti-aliasing ON and clear it with
        anti-aliasing OFF. but I don't have the wherewithal for that change
        today.
      - OS test: Improve synchronization in round robin tests. On very fast
        processors, there are race conditions that make the test fail.
        Need better interlocking to assure that the threads actually do start
        at the same time.

NuttX-7.12 Release Notes
------------------------

The 112th release of NuttX, Version 7.12, was made on October 1, 2015,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.12.tar.gz and
apps-7.12.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/patacongo/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - Added SSD1351 OLED controller support.  Contributed by Paul
        Alexander Patience.

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - MS58xx: Generalize the MS5805 altimeter driver to support other
        family members. From Paul Alexander Patience.
      - CAN driver interface: Add an error indication bit to the CAN
        message report.
      - Developed a new interface for QSPI.  Most QSPI hardware (such as the
        SAMV71) used a programmed interface to access the QuadSPI FLASH.
        That programmed interface is no compatible with the simpler NuttX
        SPI data transfer interface.
      - Added a driver for ST25L1*K QuadSPI parts.
      - Renamed the battery driver interface to battery_gauge since it
        really only implements a battery fuel gauge.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.
      - Added a new framework to support a batter charger interface.  From
         Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Added a BQ24250 battery charger driver. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Networking:

      - Added support for the local loopback device (dev lo, hostname localhost).
      - Added NetDB support for the local loopback device.
      - Network initialization:  Automatically initialize all the TUN and
        loopback devices if they arein the configuration.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - The simulation now runs under Cygwin64.  Modern Cygwin X86_64
        machines follow the Microsoft ABI for parameter passing.  The Linux
        System 5 ABI would not work on X86_64-based Cygwin machines.  Newer
        Cygwin tool chains do nor pre-pend symbol names with the underscore
        character.

    * Atmel SAMA5Dx:

      - Added architectural support for the Atmel SAMA5D2 parts.  Not fully
        verified in this NuttX release.

    * Atmel SAMA5Dx Boards:

      - Added support for the Atmel SAMA45D2 Xplained Ultra board.  Not
        fully verified in this NuttX release.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7 USBHS DCD: The device controller driver is (finally)
        functional.

    * NXP LPC17xx:

      - Implement options to use external SDRAM and or SRAM for the heap.
        From Pavel Pisa.

    * NXP LPC43x:

      - Added architectural support for the LPC4370.  From Lok Tep.

    * NXP LPC43xx Drivers:

      - Added Ethernet support.  From Ilya Averyanov.
      - Added LPC43xx EHCI driver from Ilya Averyanov.

    * NXP LPC43xx Drivers:

      - Added support for the NXP LPC4370-Link2 development board from Lok
        Tep.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Added architectural for STM32F303K6, STM32F303K8, STM32F303C6,
        STM32F303C8, STM32F303RD, and STM32F303RE devices.  From Paul
        Alexander Patience.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Added OTG support for STM32F44x.  From David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Added support for the STMicro Nucleo F303ERE board from Paul
        Alexander Patience.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - stdlib: Add support for div() to the C library.  From OrbitalFox.
        Also added ldiv() and lldiv() which are equivalent to div() with
        long and long long types, respectively, instead of int.
      - Added an implementation of the standard shutdown function.

    * Tools:

      - tools/mksymtab: declare g_symtab array as const to occupy RO section
        (Flash).  From Pavel Pisa.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Simplify configs/ Makefiles by combining common logic into a new
        Board.mk Makefile fragment.  From Paul Alexander Patience.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - apps/system/symtab: Optional canned symtab inclusion to the build.
        When option CONFIG_SYSTEM_SYMTAB is selected and symbol table file
        libc/symtab/canned_symtab.inc is prepared then application can use
        system provided complete symbol table. The option has substantial
        effect on system image size. Mainly code/text. If loading of
        applications at runtime is not planned do not select this.  From
        Pavel Pisa.

    * Applications: apps/canutils:

      - apps/canutils/uavcan: Add support for libuavcan.  From  Paul Alexander Patience.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/can:  Extend the CAN loopback test by adding more
        command line options.
      - apps/examples/usbserial: Can now be run as an NSH builtin-function.
        Now uses a configurable IO buffer size.
      - apps/examples/nettest: Add option to suppress network initialization.
        This is necessary if the nettest is run from NSH which has already
        initialized the network.
      - apps/examples/nettest: Extend test so that can be performed using
        the local loopback device.
      - apps/examples/netloop:  Add a test of the local loopback device.
      - apps/examples/udpblaster: Add a test to stress the network by
        sending UDP packets at a very high rate. .
      - apps/examples/uavcan: libuavcan example from Paul Alexander Patience.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - wd_create():  Correct a counting error in the number of available
        watchdog timers.  When the number of free timers is low, the counter
        could be incremented below zero.
      - mq_open(): When message queue is opened, inode_reserve() leaves the
        reference count at zero.  mq_open() logic must assure that the
        reference count of the newly created inode is one.
      - work_queue(): Logic that sets the queued indication and the logic
        that does the actual queuing must be atomic.

    * Binary Loader:

      - Fix a memory leak in the built-in application logic: File was not
        being closed. From Bruno Herrera.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - poll():  If we fail to setup the poll for any file descriptor, for
        any reason, set the POLLERR bit.
      - rwbuffer: Fix some logic errors.  From Dmitry Nikolaev via Juha
        Niskanen.
      - ROMFS: One allocation was not being freed if there was a subsequent
        failure to allocation I/O buffers resulting in a memory leak on
        certain error conditions.  From Bruno Herrera.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Fix a bug in tun interface driver.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - recvfrom(): Correct wait for new data when NET_UDP_READAHEAD is
        enabled.  Fix size accounting when recvfrom_udpreadahead() sets
        state.rf_recvlen == -1.  I have not checked if data are accumulated
        to the right position in the buffer however. From Pavel Pisa.
      - networking:  Correct return value from psock_tcp_accept().  From
        SaeHie Park.
      - TCP: Fix a problem in when there are multiple network devices.
        Polls were being sent to all TCP sockets before. This is not good
        because it means that packets may sometimes be sent out on the wrong
        device.  That is inefficient because it will cause retransmissions
        and bad performance.  But, worse, when one of the devices is not
        Ethernet, it will have a different MSS and, as a result, incorrect
        data transfers can cause crashes. The fix is to lock into a single
        device once the MSS is locked locked down.
      - net/tcp:  The logic that binds a specific network device to a
        connection was faulty for the case of multiple network devices.  On
        bind(), the local address should be used to associate a device with
        the connection (if the local address is not INADDR_ANY); On connect(),
        the remote address should be used (in case the local address is
        INADDR_ANY).  On accept(), it does not matter but the remote address
        is the one guaranteed to be available.
      - net/tcp: Fix unbuffered send compilation error when Ethernet is not
        enabled.  From Alan Cavalho de Assis.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - All ARMV7-M IRQ setup:  Always set the NVIC vector table address
        unconditionally.  This is needed in cases where the code is running
        with a bootload and when the code is running from RAM.  It is also
        needed by the logic of up_ramvec_initialize() which gets the vector
        base address from the NVIC.  Suggested by Pavel Pisa.
      - Fix some H/W floating point logic: In the original implementation,
        !defined(CONFIG_ARMV7M_CMNVECTOR) was a sufficient test to determine
        if lazy floating point register saving was being used.  But recents
        changes added common lazy register as well so now that test must be
        (!defined(CONFIG_ARMV7M_CMNVECTOR) || defined(CONFIG_ARMV7M_LAZYFPU)).
      - ARMv7-M, all "lazy" interrupt stack logic.  Assembly instruction
        that fetches the saved value is incorrect; replace with more
        traditional push and pop.  This is an important fix.  Noted by
        Stefan Kolb.
      - All ARMV7-M: Force 8-byte stack alignment when calling from assembly
        to C to interrupt handling.
      - up_schedulesigaction(): Fix logic that determines if there is a
        pending signal action before scheduling the next signal action.
        Both the test and the scheduling action need to be atomic.  This
        problem was fixed on the ARMv7-M but also ported to other
        architectures that had the same issue.

    * NXP LPC43xx:

      - LPC43xx: Fix NVIC_SYSH_PRIORITY_STEP define.  From Ilya Averyanov.
      - LPC43xx: Fix missing #define in eeprom.  From Ilya Averyanov.

    * NXP LPC43xx Drivers:

      - Fixed the SPI driver.  From Ilya Averyanov.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - LPC31 and SAMA5D EHCI: Fix qh_ioccheck to move bp to next QH.  From
        Ilya Averyanov.
      - LPC31 and SAMA5D EHCI:  Performance improvement:  Do not disable the
        asynchronous queue when adding a new QH structure.  From  Ilya
        Averyanov.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - gethostbyname(): correct returned address format when DNS is used.
        The hostent.h_addr_list should point to raw in_addr or in6_addr
        as defined in the standard. Original implementation used that for
        numeric addresses but for DNS lookup returned pointer to whole
        sockaddr_in or sockaddr_in6.  From Pavel Pisa .
      - asin(): The function did not convert for some input values.  asing()
        did not convert for values which do not belong to the domain of the
        function. But aside of that the function also did not converge for
        allowed values.  I achieved a conversion of the function by
        reducing the DBL_EPSION and by checking if the input value is in
        the domain of the function. This is a fix for the problem but the
        function should always terminate after a given number of iterations.
        From Stefan Kolb.
      - Change all references from avsprintf to vasprintf.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - Fix error handling in 'cat' command.  On a failure to allocate
        memory, a file was not being closed.  From Bruno Herrera.
      - Fix error handling in 'mv' command.  On a failure to expand the
        second path, the memory allocated for the expansion of the first
        path was not being freed.  From Bruno Herrera.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - apps/system/netdb:  Failed to build if CONFIG_NET_HOSTFILE was not
        defined because gethostbyaddr() was not available.  Noted by
        OrbitalFox.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - Various Kconfig files in netutils:  Fix some changes from from
        NETUTILS_DNSCLIENT to NETDB_DNSCLIENT.  From Pavel Pisa.

    * Applications: apps/modbus:

      - Macros PR_BEGIN_EXTERN_C and PR_END_EXTERN_C were not defined in
        all contexts.  Replace with explicit expansion in all cases. From Stefan Kolb.

NuttX-7.13 Release Notes
------------------------

The 113th release of NuttX, Version 7.13, was made on December 5, 2015,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.13.tar.gz and
apps-7.13.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/patacongo/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - External RTC:  Added OS support for external RTC chips.
      - boardctl():  Add a command to the boardctl() interface to obtain a
        board unique ID.

    * File Systems:

      - TMPFS:  Add support for a new TMPFS, RAM file system.  The TMPFS
        file system does not require any significant amount of memory
        itself.  It will grow dynamically as files are added and shrink back
        when files are deleted.  A very low overhead way to retain temporary
        files.
      - VFS:  The VFS was extended to support standard file operations on
        block drivers (open, close, read, write, etc.).  The open() interface
        accomplishes this by creating a temporary characer driver to mediate
        the character oriented accesses to tje block driver.
      - HOSTFS:  Added a HOSTFS file system for use with the simulator.  The
        HOSTFS file system mounts in the simulated Nuttx context by provides
        proxied access to the file system on the host PC.  This is useful for
        providing file system content and nonvolatile storage of files in the
        simulation environment.  From Ken Pettit.
      - MTD/PROCFS:  Add an interface to un-register an MTD procfs entry.
        From Ken Pettit.
      - filemtd:  A new MTD conversion layer that will convert a regular file
        (or driver file) to an MTD device.  This is useful for testing on the
        simulation using the HOSTFS.  From Ken Pettit.
      - PROCFS:  Extended to include networking entries in the procfs. Device
        status, device statistics, and network statistics are now available
        from the PROCFS.
      - PROCFS:  The PROCFS file system can now be configured so that it
        supports runtime registration of PROCFS entries with
        CONFIG_FS_PROCFS_REGISTER=y.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - ST7565 Driver:  Extend to include support for the ERC12864-3. From
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - User buttons: Added a character driver to support application access
        to board buttons.  Supports notification of button activity via
        signals.
      - User LEDs:  Added a character driver to support application access
        to on-board LEDs.
      - Zero Cross: Added a Zero Cross device driver support.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - MAX6675:  Added support to Thermocouple-to-Digital converter MAX6675.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - BCH:  Block-to-character (BCH) driver should forward ioctl() calls
        to the contained block driver.
      - S25FL1xx:  Added a S25FL1xx QuadSPI FLASH driver.
      - On-Chip FLASH: Added an upper half MTD device that can use the
        interfaces defined in included/nuttx/progmem.h to provide a
        standard MTD driver.
      - Serial: Implemented high level DMA infrastructure for serial
        devices.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - AT24XX:  Add support for multiple AT24xx EEPROM parts, each with
        unique I2C addresses, but otherwise identical.
      - External RTC:  Added drivers for external I2C RTC chips: DS3102,
        DS1307, DS3231, DS3232, and NXP PCF85263.
      - W25: Added support for byte write mode to the W25 FLASH driver. From
        Ken Pettit.
      - dev/loop:  Added a loop character device.  losetup() and loteardown()
        should not be called directory from applications. Rather, these
        functions are now available as IOCTL commands to the loop driver.
      - dev/smart:  Added support for a /dev/smart loop device. From Ken
        Pettit.

    * Networking:

      - Driver Statistics: Most network drivers do not support statistics.
        Those that do only supported them when DEBUG is enabled.  Each
        driver collected an architecture specific set of statistics and
        there was no common mechanism to view those statistics.  Thus,
        the driver feature was mostly useless.  This release standardizes
        the driver statistics and puts the definition in the common network
        device structure defined in netdev.h where they can be accessed by
        network applications.  All Ethernet drivers that collect statistics
        have been adapted to use these common statistics.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - W25 FLASH:  Added support for W25 FLASH simulation. From Ken Pettit.
      - HOSTFS: Added support for the HOSTFS file system (see "File Systems",
        above).

    * Atmel SAMV7:

      - SAME70:  Added support for the SAME70 family of chips.
      - Tickless: SAMV7 now supports the tickless mode of operation.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - MPU:  Added MPU and protected build support.
      - QSPI:  Added a QuadSPI FLASH driver.  This driver operates in the
        memory-mapped, Serial Memory Mode (SMM).
      - FLASH:  Added support to write on-chip FLASH.
      - Timer/Counter:  TC driver ported to SAMV7 from the SAMA5.  Free-running
        and one-short timer logic also ported.
      - PCK: Brought programmable clock (PCK) logic from SAMA5 into SAMV7.
      - Timer/Counter:  Support PCK6 as an optional source for the timer/
        counter clock.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Boards:

      - SAME70-Xplained:  Add NSH and networking configurations for the
        SAME70 Xplained board.  Includes verified support for serial console,
        LEDs, buttons, SDRAM, HSMCI SD card, and networking.
      - SAMV7-XULT and SAME70-Xplained: If Tickless mode is selected then
        enable PCK6 as a timer/counter clock source

    * STMicro STM32:

      - CCM PROCFS: Is no longer a part of the 'base' procfs entries and can
        now only be supported via run time registration with
        CONFIG_FS_PROCFS_REGISTER=y.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Timers:  Add a compatible lower-half timer driver for use with the
        common timer upper-half driver.  From Wail Khemir.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4-Discovery: Add low level support for the Zero Cross driver
        for the STM32F4-Discovery.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4-Discovery: Add board config to support for the MAX6675. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - bsearch():  Added the bsearch() function from NetBSD.
      - freopen():  Added support for freopen().
      - strftime():  Added day-of-week support (when avaialable).

    * Tools:

      - nxstyle: Add crappy style checking tool nxstyle.c.  See thee tools/
        README file for more info.

    * Applications: NSH

      - mksmartfs command: Add configuration option to supported multiple
        rootdirectories. From Ken Pettit.
      - Add support for 'basename' and 'dirname' commands.
      - set command:  Like bash, NSH set command now strips off any leading
        or trailing whitespace.
      - mount command: The mount commands now accepts mount options
        (currently needed only for the hostfs file system).  From Ken
        Pettit.
      - losetup command:  NSH no longer calls losetup() and loteardown
        directly. Now it opens /dev/loop and accomplishes these things
        using ioctl() calls.
      - ifconfig command:  If CONFIG_NETDEV_STATISTICS=y, then print the
        network driver statistics in the ifconfig.
      - ifconfig, ifup, and ifdown:  These commands now uses /proc/net/<dev>
        to view network device configuration and status and /proc/net/stat
        to show network statistics.  A consequence of this is that you
        cannot view this network information if the procfs is not enabled
        and mounted at /proc.
      - losmart command:  Added a new NSH losmart command.  losmart setups
        up a loop device for the smart MTD driver similar to losetup but
        with different syntax.  From Ken Pettit.
      - ps command:  The 'ps' command now uses /proc/<pid>/ to obtain task
        status information.  A consequence of this is that you cannot use
        the 'ps' command if the procfs is not enabled and mounted at /proc.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - apps/system/hexed:  Port the hexed command line hexadeciamal editor
         to Nuttx.  See http://apps.venomdev.net/hexed/.

    * Applications: apps/fsutils:

      - apps/fsutils/smartfs: Move into apps/fsutils from kernel, now uses
        only open and ioctl.  From Ken Pettit.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/fstest:  Add a generic file system test.  This is
        essentially the same as examples/smart, but has all of the SmartFS
        specific logic ripped out.  This was created for testing the new
        TMPFS.
      - apps/examples/zerocross: Add a Zero Cross application example. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/media:  Add a simple test for access of media via a
        block driver or MTD driver.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Fixed an error in clock_timespec_subtract().  Found by Lok.
      - pthreads: CRITICAL BUGFIX: Logic was wiping out the indication that
        of the type of a pthread.  Hence, it could be confused as a task.
        Found because this was causing a crash when /proc/nnn/cmdline was
        printed.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - SMART MTD: Fix some Smart wear-leveling bugs.  Fixed SmartFS wear
        level error that occurs when the logical sector size is too small to
        save all wear level status bytes in a single sector.  Logical
        sectors 1 and 2 were simply not being allocated and then the
        read_sector and write_sector routines were failing.  From Ken
        Pettit.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - ILI9432:  Fixed errors in orientation. Portrait, RPortrait, and
        Landscript should work correly now.  They were displayed mirrored.
        From  Marco Krahl.

    * Common Drivers:

      - CAN:  Fix a problem in the CAN upper-half driver that occurs only
        for CAN hardware that support a H/W FIFO of outgoing CAN messages.
        In this case, there can be a hang condition if both the H/W and
        S/W FIFOs are both full.  In that case, there may be no event to
        awaken the upper half driver.  Add a new (conditional) CAN upper
        half interface called can_txready() that can be used by the lower
        half driver to avoid this hang condition.
      - MS58xx:  Fix some issues with initialization and with CRC
        calculation.  From Karim Keddam.
      - W25: Fixed W25 FLASH driver page read/write logic. From Ken Pettit.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - USART1 pin configuration: Reconfigure System I/O when using USART1.
        From Frank Benkert.
      - MCAN:  Added a call to can_txready() to the MCAN driver.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - stm32 F4:  Fix some TIM12 pin mappings.  From Max Kriegleder.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F429i-Disco:  Calculated partition boundries based on page
        block sizes but mtd_partition() is expecting calculations based on
        erase block size. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - sys/types.h: When building on a 64-bit machine, the size of size_t
        should be 64-bits. In general, I believe that sizeof(size_t) should
        be the same as sizeof(uinptr_t).  mmsize_t should always be 32-bits
        in any event.  The last change to stddef has been backed out.  With
        these changes, the simulator builds without errors or warnings an a
        64-bit machine.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - The I/O buffer, g_iobuffer, should not be a global buffer.  That
        will not work in an environment where there are multiple NSH
        sessions.  The I/O buffer must, instead, be a part part of the
        session-specific data defined in nsh_console.h.

NuttX-7.14 Release Notes
------------------------

The 114th release of NuttX, Version 7.14, was made on January 28, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.14.tar.gz and
apps-7.14.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/patacongo/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - modules:  Add support for kernel modules:  insmod, rmmod, support
        functions.  procfs support for user lsmod functioniality.
      - SIGEV_THREAD:  Add support for the SIGEV_THREAD notification method
        in struct sigevent.  This initial implementation will only work in
        the FLAT build since it utilizes the work queue for signal
        callbacks.  See the top-level TODO file for additional details.
      - 64-Bit Timer:  If the 64-bit timer is selected, then use it whenever
        clock_systimer() is called rather then chopping the 64-bit timer
        down to 32-bits.  Add a new type, systime_t to represent the 32- or
        64-bit system timer. This eliminates clock_systimer32() and
        clock_systime64(); there is now only clock_systimer().

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - Telnet Driver: Move the Telnet driver from apps/ to
        nuttx/drivers/net.  It is a driver a belongs in the OS.   Now works
        like the loop device:  A new interface called telnet_initialize()
        registers a telnet session "factory" device at /dev/telnet.  Via
        ioctl, the factory device can create instances of the telnet
        character devices at /dev/telnetN to support Telnet sessions.
      - PCA9635PW:  Add a driver for the PCA9635PW I2C LED driver IC which
        can be used to control the intensity of up to 16 LEDs.  From
        Alexander Entinger.
      - MCP9844: Driver for the MCP9844 I2C digital temperature sensor with
        a selectable resolution.  From Alexander Entinger.
      - PN532: Add driver for the NXP PN532 NFC-chip.  From Janne Rosberg
        and others at Offcode Ltd.
      - LSM9DS1:  Add driver for the STMicro LSM9DS1 chip. The LSM9DS1 is a
        system-in-package featuring a 3D digital linear acceleration sensor,
        a 3D digital angular rate sensor, and a 3D digital magnetic sensor.
        From Paul Alexander Patience.
      - CAN Interface:  Add more extensive error reporting capaibility to
        the CAN interface definitions.  From Frank Benkert.
      - SPI Interface:  Add an optional hwfeatures() method to the SPI
        interface.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - NSH configuration uses the custom start up scriptwith a read-only
        passwd file.  Includes hooks for an MOTD message.

    * ARMv7-R

      - ARMv7-R:  Add basic architecture support for the ARMv7-R processor
        family.

    * Atmel AVR:

      - Atmega2560:  Add support for the Atmega2560.  From Dimitry Kloper.
      - debug.h: Add an AVR-specific header file used when the AVR MEMX
        pointer is used.  From Dimitri Kloper.

    * Atmel AVR Boards:

      - Arduino-Mega2560: Add support for the Arduino-Mega2560.  From
        Dimitry Koper.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - Port the TRNG driver from the SAMA5D3/4 to the SAMV7.
      - Port the WDT driver from the SAMA5D3/4 to the SAMV7.
      - Add an RSWDT driver.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Boards:

      - SAMV71-XULT:  Add configuration for testing OS modules.

    * Freescale Kinetis:

      - MK60N512VLL100: Add support for the MK60N512VLL100 Kinetis part.
        From Andrew Webster.

    * Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - ENET:  Numerous updates to the Kinetis ENET driver. That driver is
        now functional. From Andrew Webster.

    * NXP LPC43xx Boards:

      - WaveShare LPC4337-WS:  Support for the WaveShare LPC4337-WS board.
        From Lok Tep.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Timer Capture:  Add timer input capture driver.  From Pierre-Noel
        Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Olimex STM32 H407:  Added a port to the Olimex STM32 H407 board.
        This board features the STMicro STM32F407ZGT6 (144 pins).
        Contributed by Neil Hancock.

    * TI TMS550 Boards:

      - TI LaunchXL-TMS57004:  Add basic board support for TI LaunchXL-
        TMS57004.  Still a work in progress.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - sys/time.h: Add timeradd(), timersub(), timerclear(), timerisset(),
        and timercmp() as macros. These are non-POSIX interfaces, but
        included in most BSD deriviatives, including Linux.  From Manuel St??.
      - AVR support: Introduce support for Atmel toolchain in-flash strings.
        Atmel toolchain AVR compiler provides a transparent in-flash object
        support using __flash and __memx symbols. The former indicates to
        compiler that this is a flash-based object.  The later used with
        pointer indicates that the referenced object may reside either in
        flash or in RAM. The compiler automatically makes 32-bit pointer
        with flag indicating whether referenced object is in flash or RAM
        and generates code to access either in run-time. Thus, any function
        hat accepts __memx object can transparently work with RAM and flash
        objects.
        For platforms with a Harvard architecture and a very small RAM like
        AVR this allows to move all constant strings used in trace messages
        to flash in the instruction address space, releasing resources for
        other things. This change introduces IOBJ and IPTR type qualifiers.
        The 'I' indicates that the object may lie in instruction space on a
        Harvard architecture machine. For platforms that do not have __flash
        and __memx or similar symbols IOBJ and IPTR are empty, making the
        types equivalent to, for example, 'const char' and 'const char*'.
        For Atmel compiler these will become 'const __flash char' and
        'const __memx char*'.  All printf() functions and syslog() functions
        are changed so that the qualifier is used with the format parameter.
        From Dimitry Kloper.
      - debug.h:  Add configuration to support an architecture-specific
        debug.h header file. From Dimitri Kloper.
      - netdb:  Add support for the use of a DNS resolver file like
        /etc/resolv.conf.
      - TEA:  Add an implementation of the Tiny Encryption Algorithm.
      - math32.h:  Add some utilities to support 64-bit arithmetic
        operations for platforms that do not support long long types.

    * Tools:

      - tools/cnvwindeps.c:  Add a tool that will convert paths in
        dependencies generated by a Windows compiler so that they can be
        used with the Cygwin make.
      - tools/mkwindeps.sh: A script that coordinates use of cnvwindeps.exe.
        Dependencies now work on the Cygwin platform when using a Windows
        ative toolchain.

    * Applications: NSH

      - Module Commands:  Add module commands: insmod, rmmod, and lsmod.
      - Time Command:  Add a 'time' command that may be used to time the
        execution of other commands.
      - Password Commands:  Add useradd, userdel, and passwd commands.
      - MOTD:  Now supports a Message of the Day (MOTD) that will be
        presented after the NSH greeting.
      - Session Logins:  All sessions may be protected with logins using the
        encrypted password in /etc/passwd.
      - Extended Logins.  Added optional platform-specific function to
        perform password verification and optional delay after each failed
        login attempt.

    * Applications: apps/fsutils:

      - apps/fsutils/passwd: Utility library for accessing a password file
        like /etc/passwd.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/telnetd:  Now creates Telnet sessions by opening a new
        factory device at /dev/telnet and then using ioctl calls to create
        the session character drivers at /dev/telnetN.
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add netlib_get_dripv4addr() and
        netlib_get_ipv4netmask().  From Pelle Windestam.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/module:  Add a test harness for verifying NuttX kernel
        modules.
      - apps/examples/pca9635:  Add a simple test of PCA9635PW PWM LED driver.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Add a test of POSIX timers using SIGEV_THREAD.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - pthreads: CRITICAL BUGFIX: Logic was wiping out the indication that
        of the type of a pthread.  Hence, it could be confused as a task.
      - waitpid:  CRITICAL BUGFIX.  Add a reference count to prevent waitpid
        from using stale memory released by the waited-for task group.
      - clock_systimespec():  Fix an error in a time conversion.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - poll(): Fix handling of sem_tickwait() return value sem_tickwait()
        does not return an -1+errno, it returns a negated errno value.
        Noted by Freddie Chopin.

    * Common Drivers:

      - TUN Driver:  Fix a compile time error in the TUN driver.  From
        Vladimir Komendantskiy.
      - USB Host HID Parser:  Wrong size used in memcpy().  From Hang Xu.
      - PCA9555: Fixed a bug in the function pca9555_setbit which occurs if
        someone tries to set one of the pins 8-15. The problem is that
        after the check if the pin is greater than 7 the variable addr is
        incremented and used in the Call I2C_WRITEREAD. But later in the
        call to the I2C_WRITE buf[0] is used as address but this address is
        not incremented as it should be. Note address does mean the address
        to the register in the ioexpander and not the I2C address.  From
        Stefan Kolb.

    * Networking:

      - TCP/IOB:  Numerous fixes, mostly relate to TCP and IOB buffering
        and race conditions.  These were necessary for for the NuttX
        networking later to be stable in some stress testing.  From Andrew
        Webster.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - USBHS Device: In USBHS device driver, fix check if zero length
        packet is needed.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - OTG FS Host:  Fix some backward arguments to stm32_putreg().  Note
        by Hang Xu.

    * Tools:

      - tools/mkdeps.c:  Extended/fixed support for --winpath option.
        Dependencies now work under Cygwin with a native Windows toolchain.

    * Build System:

      - apps/platform/Makefile:  Use a relative path to the board directory
        link rather than the absolute path.  For Cygwin, the absolute would
        would need converted with cygpath.  But just using the relative path
        is a simpler solution.

NuttX-7.15 Release Notes
------------------------

The 115th release of NuttX, Version 7.15, was made on March 27, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.15.tar.gz and
apps-7.15.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/patacongo/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Add a state variable that provides the current level of OS
        initialization.  This is needed by some logic that may attempt to
        run early in the start-up sequence but cannot run if a sufficient
        level of initialization has not yet occurred.
      - Spinlocks:  Add interface definitions for to support spinlocks as
        needed for multi-CPU configurations.
      - SMP support.  Support for Symmetric Multi-Processing (SMP) added.
        This affects many internal data structures, spinlock extensions
        and renaming of interrupt enable/disable interfaces, new platform
        interfaces to support CPU initialization and inter-actions, and
        new application interfaces to manage CPU affinity.  The changes
        are too extensive to summarize here; see the SMP Wiki page at
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:nxinternal:smp.  The
        new platform interfaces are also described in the NuttX porting
        guide: http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=documentation:portingguide.
        Only partially verified; awaiting hardware for the complete
        verification.
      - TLS:  Basic definitions needed to support thread local storage
        (TLS).  TLS is not used anywhere yet (and may not be used in the
        near future either).
      - Performance Monitoring:  Add a configuration option to buffer
        RTOS instrumentation data in an in-memory buffer.
      - boardctl():  Add boardctl() support that will permit applications
        to control USB devices.

    * File Systems/Block Drivers:

      - procfs:  Add /proc/kmm entry that shows that state of the kernel
        heap.  Only useful in PROTECTED and KERNEL build modes where there
        is a kernel heap.
      - procfs:  Add support for showing CPU in the tast status if SMP is
        enabled.

    * Networking:

      - ARP: Add support for IOCTL commands to manage the ARP table.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 and 6LowPAN:  There are some radio drivers and a
        directory structure is in place.  However, most of this
        development is occurring on a fork and is not yet available in the
        NuttX repositories.  Hopefully in NuttX-7.16.

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - ADS1242:  Driver for the  24-Bit Differential Input ADC ADS1242 that
        communicates via SPI with a MCU. Reading the ADC conversion result
        as well as configuring the ADC, setting the input channel, etc. is
        implemented via ioctl calls.  However, it does not yet implement
        the standard ADC interface.  From Alexander Entinger.
      - U-Blox Modem:  Add an upper half driver for the U-Blox Modem.  From
        Vladimir Komendantskiy.
      - I2C: Add an I2C, "upper half", character drivers to support raw I2C
        data transfers for test applications.
      - RGB LED: Add a driver to manage a RGB LED via PWM.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Performance Monitoring:  Add a character driver that will allow an
        application to read buffered scheduler instrumentation data.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - SMP:  Add multi-CPU support to the simulation to support SMP
        investigation.  There are issues with the simulation and it is less
        than perfect but sufficient for some very preliminary testing of
        the core SMP feature.

    * ARMv7-A, ARMv7-R, and ARMv7-M:

      - ARMv7-A, ARMv7-R, and ARMv7-M: Add test-and-set logic and
        definitions needed to supports spinlocks.
      - ARMv7-A: Added MPCOre Generic Interrupt Controller (GICv2) and
        Global Timer support
      - ARMv7-A: Now includes in MCU-specific hooks needed for SMP support.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - HSMSI: HSMCI driver can now be configured to handle unaligned data
        buffers.

    * NXP Freescale LPC11xx/17xx/43xx and LPC2378 Drivers:

      - I2C: Backported the LPC43XX I2C driver, replacing the LPC11XX,
        LPC17XX, and LPC2378 I2C drivers.  This gives us the I2C_TRANSFER
        method in all I2C drivers.

    * NXP Freescale LPC17xx Boards:

      - Support for the u-blox GSM and GPS module evaluation board with
        NXP LPCExpresso LPC1768.  The GSM module is one of LISA-C200,
        LISA-U200 or SARA-G350. The GPS module is one of MAX-M7 or
        MAX-M8.  From Vladimir Komendantskiy.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6:

      - Basic support is in place for the i.MX6 Quad/Dual MCUs.
        Verification is, however, waiting for the receipt of hardware.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6 Boards:

      - Sabre-6Quad:  Basic support for the NXP/Freescale Sabre 6Quad
        board is in place but waiting for hardware for verification.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32F46xx:  Support for STM32F46xx from Paul Alexander Patience
      - STM32L4:  Add support for the STM32L4 family.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4 Discovery: Add PWM support for the onboard RGB LED. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-L476:  Add support for the Nucleo-L476 board.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - STM32L476VG Discovery: Add support for the STM32L476VG Discovery
        board.  From Dave.

    * Tools:

      - tools/refesh.sh now has a --silent option so that it can be used in
        batch modes without human input.

    * Build System:

      - Added a 'make olddefconfig' target that will refresh a .config file
        without interaction.

    * Applications: NSH

      - 'arp':  Add an 'arp' command that will support access to the OS ARP
        table.
      - 'ps':  The 'ps' command will show CPU if SMP is enabled.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/chat: Chat logic contributed by Vladimir
        Komendantskiy.
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add utility functions to support accesses to
        the ARP table.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/chat: Chat example contributed by Vladimir
        Komendantskiy.
      - apps/sysem/ubloxmodem:  Example to control the power
        state of the modem in nsh.  From  Vladimir Komendantskiy.
      - apps/examples/leds: An example to demonstrate use of LED driver.
      - apps/examples/smp:  Add a test to verify SMP configurations.
      - apps/examples/rgbled:  Example using the RGB LED driver to drive an
        RGB LED via PWM.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Add a test of TLS.
      - apps/examples/sched_note:  Add a simple example to exercise the
        scheduler instrumentation logic.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Signals:  Move the list of signal actions from the TCB to the group
        structure.  Signal handlers are not per thread but, rather, per task
        group.  I know, I preferred it the other way too, but this is more
        compliant with POSIX.
      - Semaphores: Add an internal, non-standard interface to reset a
        semaphore count.  This is sometimes needed by drivers in order to
        recover from error conditions.  Were previously using sem_init()
        which is both inappropriate and incorrect if the semaphore count is
        negative.
      - Low-Priority Work Queue:  Fix logic to find an IDLE worker thread;
        the test for busy was backward.  From Linfei Chen.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - FAT:  Add an option to force all transfers to be performed
        indirectly using the FAT file system's internal sector buffers.
        This is a fix for the case where the user provided buffers are not
        properly aligned for DMA (as with THTTPD).
      - MTD:  Increase block size in mtd_geometry_s to 32-bits.

    * Common Drivers:

      - I2C:  Restructured the I2C interface as necessary to eliminate some
        thread-safety issues inherent in the legacy I2C interface design.
        This effects the interface definition, all I2C clients, and all low-
        level I2C drivers.  I have used caution, but I still expect a change
        of this magnitude to introduce some errors. Any bug reports of bug
        fixes will be much appreciated.
      - I2C_RESET:  Eliminate up_i2creset().  It should not be a global
        function; Now it is an I2C interface method.
      - PCA555:  Add logic to make the PCA555 driver thread safe.
      - syslog: If syslog timestamping is enabled, don't try to get the time
        if the timer hardware has not yet been initialized.
      - AT24xx driver: Correct missing address calculation logic.  From Frank
        Benkert.

    * Networking:

      - Networking drivers that support CONFIG_NET_NOINTS:  Fix a race
        condition that can cause the TX poll timer to stop running.  From
        Manuel Stuhn.
      - Timer Poll:  Fix some logic when there are multiple network
        interfaces.  In this case, TCP timeout events can really only being
        processed when the poll from the correct device is received.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7 USB HS device:  The USB driver has had some issue that would
        occasionally cause loss of packets.  Back last December, a fix was
        put in for this but the fix apparently worsens the problem; now
        causing hangs.  The basic problem is that the number of busy banks
        (NBUSYBKS) status is not real time but is delayed.  This was fixed;
        now when the DMA completes and NBUSYBKS > 0, the NBUSYBK is
        interrupt is enabled and the operations are deferred until NBUSYBKS
        is truly zero.

    * Tools:

      - tools/testbuild.sh:  .config files were not being updated because
        (a) kconfig-conf was being called in the wrong directory and (b)
        apps/Kconfig had not yet been created.  Now uses 'make
        olddefconfig'.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - apps/system/i2c:  The I2C tool now obeys it OS interfacing: it now
        uses an I2C character driver to access the I2C bus.
      - apps/system/cdcacm, usbmsc, and composite:  Use new boardctl()
        instead of calling directly in the OS when possible.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/dhcpd: DHCPD no longer calls directly into the OS but
        uses the new network IOCTL commands to modify the ARP table.

    * Applications: apps/modbus:

      - apps/modbus/nuttx/portserial.c:  Was not returning an error on
        failure to open the device driver.  From Olololshka kokoko.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/usbserial, composite, usbterm:  Use new boardctl()
        instead of calling directly in the OS when possible.  There are
        still a few bad OS calls for USB device interfaces that do not yet
        have boardctl() commands.

    * Applications: apps/platform:

      - Moved C++ initialization logic out of the RTOS and into the
        application space, specifically to apps/platform/board, where it
        belongs.

NuttX-7.16 Release Notes
------------------------

The 116th release of NuttX, Version 7.16, was made on June 1, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.16.tar.gz and
apps-7.16.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Power Management: Add activity domain to all PM interfaces and
        driver callbacks.  If CONFIG_PM_NDOMAINS == 1, then the legacy
        behavior is preserved.  If CONFIG_PM_NDOMAINS > 1, then multiple
        PM domains are supported.  This will allow separate control for
        certain power management groups.  For example, a network can be
        shut down without affect an ongoing UI (and vice versa).
      - board_app_initialize():  board_app_initialize() now accepts an
        argument that may be used to support initialization in different
        configurations.

    * File System and Block and MTD Drivers:

      - N25Qxxx: Add MTD support for Micron N25Qxxx family of QSPI flash.
        From Dave (ziggurat29).
      - SST26F:  Add an MTD driver for SST26F spi/qspi flash devices (SPI
        mode only).  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - File Descriptor Detach: Add logic to detach a file structure from a
        file descriptor. This is for use only within the OS.  It permits an
        open file or driver to be used across multiple threads.

   * Networking and Network Drivers:

      - listen()/accept():  Separate out psock_listen() and psock_accepti()
        for internal, thread independent OS usage (i.e., without a socket
        descriptor).
      - VNC Server:  Add support for a VNC server.  This logic is code
        complete and functional, but not well tested.

    * Graphics and Graphic Drivers:

      - Framebuffer driver:  Add a display number to each interface in order
        to support multiple display devices.
      - VNC Server:  Add support for a VNC server.  This logic is code
        complete and functional, but not well tested.
      - LCD Backpack: Add support for PCF8574 LCD Backpack driver. This
        driver supports an interface board that is based on the PCF8574 I/O
        expander and supports the HD44780-based (or compatible) LCD modules.
        There are a myriad of different vendors of such, but they are
        principally the same, save wiring and minor features like jumpers
        for I2C addresses. This driver supports known and unknown variants.
        From Dave (ziggurat29).

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - RTC:  Simplify the RTC interface.  The old interface was way too
        complex and was not fully implemented anywhere.
      - BH1750FVI:  Add a character driver for Rohm Ambient Light Sensor
        BH1750FVI.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - CAN:  Improve CAN error reporting. From Frank Benkert.
      - aes.h:  Modifications to the crypto API needed for LPC43xx.  From
        Alexander Vasiljev.
      - ADC:  Interface no longer uses global adc_receive() call.  Added a
        new bind() method to the ADC interface.  Now the ADC upper half
        driver will register its receipt-of-data callback.  This change
        allows the ADC lower half driver to be used with a differ ADC upper
        half.

     * Simulation Platform:

      - Linux Host Networking:  Enhance networking support for the
        simulation under Linux. Includes updated support for Linux TUN/TAP,
        and the addition of support for Linux bridge devices.  From Steve.

    * ARMv7-A, ARMv7-R, and ARMv7-M:

      - ARMv7-M:  Convert more assembly language files for use with the IAR
        toolchain.  From Kha Vo.
      - ARMv7-A:  Complete re-design of SMP-related logic to initialize each
        CPUn, n > 0, when CONFIG_SMP=y.

    * Atmel SAMV7:

      - Add a JTAG config and ERASE config to Kconfig to set the
        CCFG_SYSIO SYSIO Pins.  From David Sidrane.
      - System Reset: Add the up_systemreset interface to the samv7 arch.  The
        approach is slightly different in that: 1) It enables ARCH_HAVE_RESET
        and allows the user to set if, and for how long, to drive External
        nRST signal. It also does not contain a default board_reset, as that
        really should be done in the config's src if CONFIG_BOARDCTL_RESET
        is defined.  From David Sidrane.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Boards:

      - SAMV71-XULT: Add configuration(s) that were be used to verify VNC
        graphics output as well as mouse and keyboard input.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6 Boards:

      - Sabre-6Quad:  The basic i.MX6 port is complete.  This is a minimal
        port at present and probably still has some as-of-yet-undiscovered
        issues.
      - Sabre-6Quad: Basic SMP NSH configuration is now working.  But this
        is probably only because the SMP test case does not stress the
        logic.  There are know outstanding SMP issues as noted in the
        Sabre-6Quad README.txt file.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx:

      - LPC4337jet100: Add definitions for the LPC4337jet100 chip.  From
        Alexander Vasiljev.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - AES:  Add AES support.  From Alexander Vasiljev.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 L4: Add configuration options to allow SRAM2 to be used for
        heap, or not at all, and to zero-initialize it on OS start, or not
        at all. From Dave dev@ziggurat29.com.
      - STM32 L4: Add support for HSE and MSI clocks, and auto trim of MSI
        to LSE (needed for USB).  From Dave (ziggurat29)
      - STM32 L4: Add support for unique id function to arch; modified board
        to support unique id boardctl.  From Dave (ziggurat29)

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F4 RTC: Add a custom RTC driver with support for alarms.  From
        Neil Hancock.
      - STM32 L4 QSPI: Add a QSPI driver with DMA support and (optional
        memory mapped mode support. From Dave ziggurat29).
      - STM32, STM32 L4, and STM32 F7 Serial:  Add support for compliant
        SD-style breaks. From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4 CAN: Add CAN support for STM32L4.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 1-Wire:  Add support for a custom 1-wire driver.  The serial
        driver already supports a 1-wire interface, but this driver uses the
        same serial logic to implement a lower half driver much like the
        I2C lower half driver.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - STM32 L4 SPI: Add support for SPI 4 and 5 on stm32f411 chips. From
        Konstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32 ADC: Allow omitting use of channels in a lower part of PWM.
        From Pierre-noel Bouteville.
      - STM32 L4 I2C: Get I2C working for STM32L4.  From Dave (ziggurat29).

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM3220G-EVAL:  Add support for both the IAR and uVision GCC IDEs.
        From Kha Vo.
      - STM32F429I Discovery:  Add support for the uVision GCC IDE.   From
        Kha Vo.
      - STM32F4 Discovery: Integrate BH1750FVI driver in the STM32F4 Discovery
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32L476VG Discovery:  Add support for QSPI based N25Qxxx flash.
        From Dave (ziggurat29)
      - STM32L476VG Discovery: Add board ioctls for allowing user application
        to cause QSPI memory mapped mode to be engaged and disengaged.  Also
        partitioned QSPI flash for file system and other (eventually xip).
        From Dave (ziggurat29)
      - Nucleo-144: Basic port for the Nucleo-144 board with the STM32F746ZG
        MCU.  From Kconstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32F103 Minimum: Add support for this minimual STM32F103CBT6 "blue"
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F411E Discovery:  Add basic configuration for stm32f411e-disco
        board with STM32F411VE chip.  From Konstantin Berezenko.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Moved NuttX repository to https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx.
        Eliminated use of sub-modules.
      - Add support for the IAR toolchain for the limited case of the ARMv7-M
        architecture and the STM32 chip.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - make export: Pass top-level make to the script to allow -j greater
        than 1.  From David Sidrane.
      - fs/Kconfig:  Allow CONFIG_FS_WRITABLE to be manually selectable. This
        is needed when there are no writable file systems, but write support
        is still needed in BCH or FTL.
      - arch/*/Makefile: Add definitions that can be overrided to use GCC
        instead of LD in the final link.  From Paul Alexander Patience .

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/esp8266:  ESP8266 driver application.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/alarm:  Add a simple test of the ALARM iotcl calls of
        the RTC driver.
      - apps/examples/nximage:  Add a configuration option to select
        greyscale.

    * Platforms: apps/platform:

      - apps/platform/nucleo-144: Add platform files for NUCLEO-144
        (NUCLEO-F746ZG).  From Mark Olsson.
      - apps/examples/media:  You can now override the default device driver
        path by providing an alternal path on the command line.  From
        Sbastien Lorquet.

Works-In-Progress:

    * IEEE802.14.5/6LowPAN.  Hooks and framework for this effort were
      introduced in NuttX-7.15.  Work has continued on this effort on
      forks from the main repositories, albeit with many interruptions.
      The completion of this wireless feature will postponed until at
      least NuttX-7.17.

    * i.MX6 SMP.  Partially functional, but there is more that still
      needs to be done.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Various places:  Search for places where a stray semicolon following
        an if condition cause the if body to be executed unconditionally.
        Fixes in all SAM DMA logic, unionfs, OS signalling logic, and others.
      - enter/leave_critical_section() may attempt to access task lists
        before they have been initialized in the SMP configuration.

    * File System/Block Drivers:

      - SMART MTD:  Return code of smart_scan not checked, can cause success
        result in failure case, leading to 'dev' pointer being invalid. From
        Dave (ziggurat29)
      - mount: Fix a backward debug assertion.  Noted by David Sidrane.

    * Common Drivers:

      - NRF24L01: Fix backward calculation of relative frequency.  Noted by
        Henry Zhang.
      - PCA9555 I/O expander: Fix an error in the PCA9555 driver: Under
        certain error conditions, interrupts were not being re-enabled.
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - ADS1255: Must not do SPI access from interrupt handler.  Use the
        worker thread instead.  Must also lock the SPI bus before using it.
      - Several SPI-based drivers modified.  All drivers that use SPI must
        call SPI_LOCK and SPI_UNLOCK.  This is not optional.
      - MS583730:  Fix a bug in crc computation for ms583730. Implement
        POSIX read.

    * Atmel SAMV7:

      - Fix typo in MATRIX register definitions.  From Stefan Kolb.
      - SAMV7 Tickless Mode: This is a fix to a problem in the handling of
        the oneshot timer. Due to a wrong assumption concerning the behavior
        directly after the start of the timer/counter the function
        sam_oneshot_cancel() calculates the wrong remaining time. The code
        assumes that the counter register is zero directly after the start
        of the timer, but this is not true. To start the time/counter a
        software trigger is invoked, this trigger starts the timer/count and
        sets the counter register to zero, but the reset of the counter
        register is not performed instantly. According to the datasheet:
        "The counter can be reset by a trigger. In this case, the counter
        value passes to zero on the next valid edge of the selected clock."
        Thus the counter is set to zero between 0 and USEC_PER_TICK
        microseconds after the clock was started.
        In my fix I use the freerun count value to determine if at least one
        tick passed since the start of the timer and thus if the value of
        the oneshot counter is correct. I also tried to use the function
        up_timer_gettime() to achieve this but, at least if compiled with
        no optimization the problem vanishes without using the value of the
        function, the function call takes too long.
        Another problem treated in the fix is that if the oneshot timer/counter
        is canceled, we only know the remaining time with a precision of
        USEC_PER_TICK microseconds. This means the calculated remaining time
        is between 0 and USEC_PER_TICK microseconds  too long. To fix this I
        subtract one tick if the calculated remaining time is greater than
        one tick and otherwise set the remaining time to zero. By doing so
        the measured times are much more precise as without it.  From Stefan
        Kolb.

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - SAMA5:  Stefan Kolb's change to the SAMV7 Oneshot Timer should also
        be applied to the SAMA5 oneshot time since the drivers are identical.

    * Atmel SAM3/4:

      - SAM3/4:  Stefan Kolb's change to the SAMV7 Oneshot Timer should also
        be applied to the SAM3/4 oneshot time since the drivers are identical.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7 TWIHS (as well as SAM3/4 and SAMA5:  Ensure that the TWIHS
        (i2c) hw get's its clock set when the sequence of
        sam_i2cbus_initialize(), sam_i2cbus_uninitialize(), then
        sam_i2cbus_initialize() or twi_reset() is called.  I found this a
        while back in the stm32 family, so there may be more arch-es with
        this sort of bug. I suppose any driver that has the notion of "do
        not set the freq if it is already set" could be suspect.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - USBHS Device: Remove disabling of whole USB on suspend of USBHS.
        This fix removes the disabling of the whole USB peripheral on
        suspend interrupt. Its enough to freeze the clock instead. When
        disabling the whole peripheral, the next wakeup-interrupt comes up
        with an disabled clocking. The unfreeze clock has no effect, because
        the master clock is disabled. This makes all registers, including
        the IDR unwriteable and the IRQ falls in an endless loop blocking
        the whole system. Furthermore the disabling of the peripheral clock
        prevents hotplugging or reconnecting the USB.  From  Frank Benkert.
      - MCAN: Fix missing unlock of device in MCAN mcan_txempty().  From
        Frank Benkert.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 L4 Clocking: Problem with resetting backup domain clears
        clocking options set up before in *rcc.c use INITS flag to avoid
        magic reg value to detect power up reset state of RTC correct a
        problem clearing interrupt flags (they weren't) which prevented an
        alarm from ever being used more than once per reset cycle.  From
        Dave (ziggurat29)

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32L4 SPI: That STM32Lr SPI driver is quite different. They now
        handle frames of arbitrary size between 4 and 16 bits. It was broken
        before a new bit has to be set (RX fifo threshold) to handle <= 8-bit
        transactions. If not set, the default is 16-bit packed >=8-bit
        frames and the RXNE bit is never set (it is set when 16-bits are
        received). weird things as always. This also add 8-bit access
        routines to the data register, because a 16-bit access to the data
        register when the frame size is below 9 bits is interpreted as a
        packed dual frame exchange. Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32:  Correct some bad commits that broke the LTDC display example.
        From Marco Krahl.
      - STM32 F4 RTC: Fix logic in F4 RTCC driver that prevent ALARM
        interrupt.  From Neil Hancock.
      - STM32 F1 ADC: Fix STM32 ValueLine ADC IRQ number selection. From
        David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F429I Discovery:  Correct some bad commits that broke the LTDC
        display example.  From Marco Krahl.

    * TI Tiva:

      - GPIO Interrupts: Fix a bug of GPIO falling-edge interrupt for tiva.
        From Young.

    * C Library:

      - math: Add a NAN test on 'x' in asin function of lib_asin.c. Suggested
        by Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Several Makefiles: Add .PHONY definitions to prevent 'clean up to date'
        message weirdness when 'make clean' is done with no .config or
        Make.defs file.

NuttX-7.17 Release Notes
------------------------

The 117th release of NuttX, Version 7.17, was made on July 25, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.17.tar.gz and
apps-7.17.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * File System and Block and MTD Drivers:

      - drivers/mtd: Add a driver of IS25xP SPI flash devices.  Based on
        sst25xx driver.  From Marten Svanfeldt.

    * Networking and Network Drivers:

      - Break out internal interface psock_ioctl().

    * Common Device Drivers:

      - PTYs: Added support for pseduo-terminals: Device drivers that can be
        used for communications between tasks (usually with re-directed I/O).
        Based on existing pipe logic.
      - Button upper half driver:  Added support for poll().
      - CAN:  Add support for poll. From Paul Alexander Patience.
      - GPIO:  Add support for a simple GPIO driver.  It supports only pre-
        configured input, output, and interrupting pins with basic input and
        output operations.  Interrupt events can lead to notification via a
        signal.
      - I/O Expander: Shadow-Mode: The output- and configuration registers of
        the IO-Expander are held in the microcontrollers memory and only
        written to the IO-Expander.  This reduces bus traffic and is more
        error-proof than the normal read-modify-write operation. Retry Mode:
        If enabled and an error occurs while writing to the IO-Expander the
        current transmission is automatically repeated once. From Michael
        Spahlinger.
      - Pipes/FIFOs:  Add support to allocating different sizes for pipe and
        fifo buffers.  Adds mkfifo2() and pipe2() which are just like mkfifo()
        and pipe(), but allow control of the size of the underlying, in-memory
        circular buffer.  Move pipe() and mkpipe() to the C library, they are
        no longer core OS interfaces.  Capability currenty used only by PTY
        logic to support, configurable, smaller buffers for PTYs.

    * SYSLOG/Debug Output:

      - SYSLOG: Consolidated all SYSLOG logic in drivers/syslog.  Added an
        abstraction layer that supports:  (1) redirection of SYSLOG outpout.
        This is usually so that you can boot with one SYSLOG output but
        transition to another SYSLOG output when the OS has initialialized,
        (2) adds common serialization of interrupt output as a configuration
        option.  Without this configuration setting, interrupt level output
        will be asynchronous.  And (3) vsyslog is now a system call and is
        usable with other-than-FLAT builds.
      - SYSLOG: syslog() will now automatically redirect output to
        lowsyslog() if called from an interrupt handler.
      - Extended SYSLOG logic so that we can send SYSLOG output to a file.
      - SYSLOG character device channel will now expand LF to CR-LF.
        Controllable with a configuration option.
      - Add a SYSLOG character device that can be used to re-direct output
        to the SYSLOG channel (Not be be confused the SYSLGO output to a
        character device).
      - Debug features are now enabled separately from debug output.
        (1) CONFIG_DEBUG is gone. It is replaced with CONFIG_DEBUG_FEATURES.
        (2) The macros dbg() and vdbg() have renamed as _err() and _info(),
        respectively. This also applies to all of the variants as well,
        XXdbg() and XXvdbg().  (3) Add a new debug level, _warn() (and
        all variants XXwarn(), XXvwarn(), etc.). (4) Debug assertions can
        now be enabled separately from debug output. (5) You can now enable
        subsystem/device driver debug output at different output levels. For
        example, CONFIG_DEBUG_FS no longer enables file system debug output
        It enables general file system debug logic and enables selection of
        CONFIG_DEBUG_FS_ERROR, CONFIG_DEBUG_FS_WARN, and CONFIG_DEBUG_FS_INFO.
      - Since the SYSLOG layer now automatically handles low-level vs.
        high-level output, the low-level (ll) variants of the debug macros
        were eliminated.
      - Reviewed all uses of *err().  These macro family should indicate
        only error conditions.  Convert *err() to either *info() or add
        ERROR:, depending on if an error is reported.
      - _alert(): New debug macro: _alert().  This is high priority,
         unconditional output and is used to simplify and standardize crash
         error reporting.
      - Many CONFIG_DEBUG_* options did not have matching macros defined in
        include/debug.h.  Rather, there were various definitions scattered
        throughout the sourse tree.  These were collected together and
        centralized with single macro definitions in include/debug.h

    * Simulation Platform:

      - Added the simulated QSPI (N25Q) flash to the simulation and extened
        flash simulation capabilities to run with MTD drivers based on config
        options (currently m25p, sst26 and w25). From Ken Pettit.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SPI: SPI-Freq. 40MHz; VARSELECT; hw-features This change adds the
        following improvements:

          o Increase the allowed SPI-Frequency from 20 to 40 MHz.
          o Correct and rename the "VARSELECT" option   This option was
            included in the code as "CONFIG_SPI_VARSELECT" but nowhere
            defined in a Kconfig file. The change renames it to
            "CONFIG_SAMV7_SPI_VARSELECT" and corrects the implementation
            according the datasheet of Atmel. In short, this option
            switches the processor from "fixed peripheral selection"
            (single device) to "variable peripheral selection" (multiple
            devices on the bus).
          o Add a new Function to the interface to control the timing and
            delays of the chip according the ChipSelect lines. This function
            can control the delay between the assertion of the ChipSelect and
            the first bit, between the last bit and the de-assertion of the
            ChipSelect and between two ChipSelects. This is needed to tune
            the transfer according the specification of the connected devices.
          o Add three "hw-features" for the SAMV7, which controls the behavior
            of the ChipSelect:
              - force CS inactive after transfer: this forces a (short) de-
                assertion of the CS after a transfer, even if more data is
                available in time
              - force CS active after transfer: this forces the CS to stay
                active after a transfer, even if the chip runs out of data.
                Btw.: this is a prerequisit to make the LASTXFER bit working
                at all.
              - escape LASTXFER: this suppresses the LASTXFER bit at the end
                of the next transfer. The "escape"-Flag is reset automatically.

        From Frank Benkert
      - TWISHS:  Driver improvements from Michael Spahlinger.
      - GPIO-Driver fixed for Open-Drain Pins:

          o sam_gpioread: Now the actual line level from the pin is read
            back.   This is extremely important for Open-Drain Pins, which
            can be used bidirectionally
          o Re-Implemented twi_reset-function and enhanced it so it can be
            called from inside the driver (see next point)
          o Glitch-Filter: Added a configuration option to enable the twi-
            built-in glitch filter
          o Added a "Single Master Mode": In EMC Testing the TWI-Bus got
            stuck because the TWI-Master detected a Multi-Master access (but
            there is no second master). With the option "Single Master" we
            detect these events and automatically trigger a twi_reset. We
            also do an automatic recovery if a slave got stuck (SDA stays
            low).

        With the above changes IC-Bus reliability in harsh environments (eg.
        EMC) is greatly improved. The small change in the GPIO-Driver was
        necessary because otherwise you cannot read back the correct line
        status of Open-Drain Outputs and this is needed by the twi_reset
        function.  From Michael Spahlinger

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - EMC: Extend LPC43xx EMC code to support SDRAM on a dynamic memory
        interface.  From Vytautas Lukenskas.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis K64:  Add basic support for the K64 family.  I leveraged the
        changes from https://github.com/jmacintyre/nuttx-k64f and merged
        into the existing kinetis code  with a lot of changes and additions
        (like pin multiplexing definitions).

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Add a KinetisUSB device controller driver.  Derived from the pic32mx
        usb driver, which uses the same usb controller.  From kfazz.
      - Kinetis pwm support, based on the KL pwm driver.  From kfazz.
      - Kinetis Ethernet:  Add support for the KSZ8081 PHY.
      - Kinetis Ethernet:  Modified Ethernet driver to try all PHY addresses
        and then only fail if the driver cannot find a usable PHY address.
        This means that you no longer have to specific the PHY address in
        advance.
      - Kinetis Ethernet:  Add support for CONFIG_NET_NOINTS.  The driver no
        longer runs the networking at interrupt level but can defer interrupt
        work to the high-priority work queue.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Teensy-3.x:  Add USB support and a usbnsh configuration.
        From kfazz (2016-06).
      - Freedom-K64F: Add support for the NXP Freedom-K64F board at 120MHz.
        This is primarily the work of Jordan Macintyre.  I leveraged this
        code from https://github.com/jmacintyre/nuttx-k64f which was, itself,
        a leverage from the old K60 TWR configuration.  This includes
        significant corrections (LEDs, buttons, README, etc) and extensions
        and updates to match more recent BSPs.
      - Freedom-K64F:  Added a configuration that supports networking.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F1-4: Added support for the STM32F105R.  From Konstantin
        Berezenko.
      - STM32 F4: Added support for the STM32FF76xxx and STM32FF7xx
        families. From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F1-4:  Add support for Tickless mode (two timer
        implementation).  From Max Neklyudov.
      - STM32 L4: Add support for tickless OS, and incidentally timers,
        PWM, oneshot, free-running....  From ziggurat29.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F1-4: Add the up_getc() function to STM32 in order to support
        the minnsh configuration.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 F7: Add SPI driver.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7: Add SPI, I2C, and ADC drivers.  From Lok Tep.
      - STM32 L4: Add ioctls to set/get CAN bit timing in stm32l4.  Add
        ioctl hooks to allow future management of can id filters. From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4: Add some CAN mode IOCTL calls.  These will be useful for
        device autotest when the application boots.  They are redundant
        with the CONFIG_CAN_LOOPBACK option, which can now just be
        interpreted as a default setting.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 F1-4: Port STM32L4 CAN IOCTLs to STM32.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4: Implementation of loopback IOCTLs.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - STM32 F7: Added SDMMC1 support for stm32F7 74-75.  From Lok Tep.
      - STM32 F7: Add USB support.  From Lok Tep.
      - STM32 F7: Added PWR, RTC, and BBSRAM support for stm32f7. From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7: Added STMF7xxx RTC.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7: Added STM32F7 DBGMCU.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4: Port support for both RX FIFOs from STM32 CAN.  From Paul
        Alexander Patience.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Added a minnsh configuration for the STM32F103-Minimum board.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis .
      - Added support for the Nucleo-F767ZI board. From David Sidrane.
      - Nucleo-144/Nucleo-F767ZI:  Add test for STM32 F7 SPI.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Nucleo-144: Added SDMMC support to Nucleo-144. From David Sidrane.
      - Olimex STM32-E4077:  Add support for Olimex STM32 E407 board.  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-144: Added USB OTG device to Nucleo-144.  From David Sidrane.
      - Nucleo-144: Added bbsram test to Nucleo-144.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32F4 Disovery: add CAN support for STM32F4 Discovery.  From
        Matthias Renner.
      - STM32F4 Disovery:  added a canard configuration files.  From
        Matthias Renner.
      - STM32F4 Discovery: Add FPU support for ostest for the STM32F4
        Disovery platform. From David Alessio.
      - STM32L476 Discovery: Update stm32l476 disco to include init code for
        smartfs and nxffs for cases where those fs are included in build.
        From ziggurat29.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - include/assert.h: Check if NDEBUG is defined.  From Paul Alexander
        Patience.
      - assert.h: Define static assert for C++ usage.  From Paul Alexander
        Patience.
      - Add crc64 support. From  Paul Alexander Patience.
      - hex2bin:  Move the portable library portion of apps/system/hex2bin
        the C library with the OS internals.  It is used in certain internal
        boot-loader builds.
      - Add raise().
      - libm: This change should significantly improve the performance of
        single precision floating point math library functions. The vast
        majority of changes have to do with preventing the compiler from
        needlessly promoting floats to doubles, performing the calculation
        with doubles, only to demote the result to float. These changes only
        affect the math lib functions that return float. From David Alessio.
      - printf(): If there are no streams, let printf() fall back to use
        syslog() for output.
      - Move pipe() and mkpipe() to nuttx/libc, they are no
        longer core OS interfaces.  Capability currenty used only by PTY logi
        to support, configurable, smaller buffers for PTYs.
      - Move driver-related files from include/nuttx to include/nuttx/drivers.
        Move driver related prototypes out of include/nuttx/fs/fs.h and into
        new include/drivers/drivers.h.
      - include /nuttx/lib: Move library-related files from include/nuttx to
        include/nuttx/lib.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Custom Board Configuration: Add logic to support custom board
        directories that include a Kconfig file.  During the context phase
        of the build, any Kconfig file in the custom board directory is
        copied into configs/dummy, replacing the existing Kconfig file with
        the target Kconfig file.
      - Remove the includes/apps link to apps/include.  It is no longer
        used.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Tools:

      - tools/tesbuild.sh will now build NxWM configurations.

    * Appplication Build/Configuration System:

      - Change to the way that apps/ Kconfig files are generated in
        order to better support reuse of the apps/ directory in NuttX
        products.  Changes include: Make the full tree use wildcards
        make.defs, Add empty preconfig rules to 'leaf' makefiles, Use
        directory.mk for recursive dir makefiles, Individual app kconfig
        fixes, Recursive Kconfig autogeneration, Add kconfig files for
        pcode and tiff, and fix a gitignore rule,  From Sbastien Lorquet.
      - apps/include directory structure reorganized.  There are no longer
        any header files in the apps/include/. directory.  Rather, sub-
        directories were added to match the partitioning of apps/ sub-
        directories and the header files were moved into the appropriate
        sub-directory.  This change is intended to help with some changes
        being considered by Sbastien Lorquet.
      - Call all includes from <apps/bla/bla.h> to "bla/bla.h". From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - Add apps/include to include path in top-level Make.defs file.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - Make NSH net-initialization be a configuration option. From Marten
        Svanfeld.
      - Add NTP client initialization in NSH network startup logic.  From
        David S. Alessio .
      - 'ps' command now prints out the stack usage if stack coloration is
        enabled.  From Frank Benkert.
      - Allow stack usage to be disabled on constrained systems. From David
        Sidrane.

    * Applications: apps/netutils:

      - NTP Client:  Add retries.  From David S. Alessio.
      - NTP Client:  The NTP client will now optionally use pool.ntp.org as
        the NTP server; and reset the retry count upon success -- more robust.
        From David Alessio.
      - ESP8266: Add logic to set the BAUD rate.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.
      - ESP8266: In Kconfig, select ARCH_HAVE_NET when NETUTILS_ESP8266 is
        selected.  This allows, among other things, support for network debug
        output.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * Applications: apps/fsutils:

      - flash_eraseall: IOCTL wrapper for MDCIO_BULKERASE command.   Was in
        nuttx/drivers/mtd.  Moved to apps/fsutils because the call directly into
        the OS was incorrect.

    * Applications: apps/canutils:

      - canlib: Basic CAN utility library. From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Platforms: apps/system:

      - flash_eraseall: Now uses the IOCTL wrapper at apps/fsutils/flash_eraseall.

    * Platforms: apps/platform:

      - Add platform files for Olimex STM32 E407.  From Mateusz Szafoni.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/canard:  Add canard example application.  From
        Matthias Renner.
      - apps/examples/pty_test: PTY test program.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

Works-In-Progress:

    * IEEE802.14.5/6LowPAN.  Hooks and framework for this effort were
      introduced in NuttX-7.15.  Work has continued on this effort on
      forks from the main repositories, albeit with many interruptions.
      The completion of this wireless feature will postponed until at
      least NuttX-7.18.

    * i.MX6 SMP.  Partially functional, but there is more that still
      needs to be done.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - semaphores: Need to set errno to EINVAL on errors in sem_post()
        and sem_wait(). From Paul Alexander Patience.

    * File System/Block Drivers/MTD Drivers:

      - Several MTD FLASH drivers nullify the freed 'priv' structure and
        failed to return NULL as stated in the comments. Result, will
        operate on a NULL pointer later.  Noted by David Sidrane.
      - VFS ioctl().  Per comments from David Sidrane, file_ioctl() should
        not return succeed if the ioctl method is not supported.  It
        probably should return ENOTTY in that case.
      - SST26 Driver: Before accessing the sst26 flash, the "Global Unlock"
        command must me executed, which I do in the sst26 driver.  BUT re-
        reading the datasheet, the WREN instruction is required to enable
        the execution of this command. This was not done. I have no idea how
        the driver currently works except by chance. The writes should never
        happen at all, the flash is half-enabled!  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - N25Qxx Driver: Alter the notion of 'blocksize' to be equivalent to
        'flash write page size' in order to align with assumptions in the
        smartfs driver (at least, maybe other things do as well).  Correct a
        bug that was previously masked by having blocksize=eraseblocksize
        which would cause buffer overflows and delicious hardfaults.
        Trivial spelling changes in comments, etc.  From ziggurat29.
      - SmartFS: Fix a 32-byte memory leak.  From Ken Pettit.
      - SMART MTD layer: Fixes freesector logic error when sectorsPerBlk=256,
        adds DEBUGASSERT for invalid geometry and additional memory debug
        logic.  Also fixes the dangling pointer on error bug.  From Ken
        Pettit.

    * Common Drivers:

      - USB CDC/ACM Device Class: cdcacm_unbind leaks write request objects.
        This arises due to freeing the bulk IN endpoint before the loop
        that frees the requests via cdcasm_freereq.  That function checks
        the parameters and skips the freeing if either is NULL.  Freeing
        the bulk IN enpoint will cause the first param to be NULL, thereby
        bypassing the free operation.  To fix, I moved the release of the
        bulk IN endpoint until after to loop (much as was the case for the
        OUT and read requests, which did not exhibit the problem).  From
        ziggurat29.
      - Pipes and FIFOs: Add missing configuration for pipe ring buffer
        size.  From Frank Benkert.
      - UART 16550: Handle when CONFIG_SERIAL_UART_ARCH_IOCTL is not
        enabled. From Heath Petersen.
      - Common Serial Upper Half:  Fix a race condition noted by Stefan
        Kolb.  Between the test if the TX buffer is full and entering a
        critical section, bytes may be removed from the TX buffer making
        the wait unnecessary.  The unnecessary wait is an inefficiency,
        but not really a problem.  But with USB CDC/ACM it can be a problem
        because the entire TX buffer may be emptied when we lose the race.
        If that happens that uart_putxmitchar() can hang waiting for data
        to be removed from an empty TX buffer.
      - USB MSC Device Class: Add locks when removing request from queue.
        From Wolfgang Reissnegger.
      - USB MSC Device Class: Fix reversed logic on waiting for SCSI thread
        start.  The scsi thread was waiting for the wrong condition.
        However, this was masked by the fact that the code creating the
        scsi thread was also holding usbmsc_scsi_lock(priv) while
        initializing data, hence this lock synchronized the scsi thread
        start with init completion.  From Wolfgang Reissnegger.

    * Graphics and Graphic Drivers:

      - Correct conditional compilation in ST7565 LCD driver.  From Pierre-
        noel Bouteville

    * Networking:

      - In both IPv6 and IPv4 incoming logic:  (1) Should check if the
        packet size is large enough before trying to access the packet
        length in the IP header.  (2) In the comparison between the IP
        length and the full packet length, need to subtract the size of
        he link layer header before making the comparison or we will get
        false positives (i.e., the packet is really too small)
      - TCP Networking: While working with version 7.10 I discovered a
        problem in TCP stack that could be observed on high network load.
        Generally speaking, the problem is that RST flag is set in
        unnecessary case, in which between loss of some TCP packet and its
        proper retransmission, another packets had been successfully sent.
        The scenario is as follows:  NuttX did not receive ACK for some sent
        packet, so it has been probably lost somewhere. But before its
        retransmission starts, NuttX is correctly issuing next TCP packets,
        with sequence numbers increasing properly. When the retransmission
        of previously lost packet finally succeeds, tcp_input receives the
        accumulated ACK value, which acknowledges also the packets sent in
        the meantime (i.e. between unsuccessful sending of lost packet and
        its proper retransmission). However, variable unackseq is still set
        to conn->isn + conn->sent, which is truth only if no further
        packets transmission occurred in the meantime.  Because of incorrect
        (in such specific case) unackseq value, few lines further condition
        if (ackseq <= unackseq)is not met, and, as a result, we are going to
        reset label.  From Jakub Lagwa.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - ARM stack check: Fix double fault on IDLE task with stack size = 0.
        From David Sidrane.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - CAN: CAN Message Filtering fixed: (1) stdfilters didn't work because
        the filter was never enabled (wrong number of bits to shift), and
        (2) Filters were never used because the configuration register
        cannot be written without using the initialization mode. Both bugs
        are fixed by this change. Filtering has been tested with both
        standard and extended identifiers and is now working properly. From
        Michael Spahlinger.

    * Atmel SAMA5:


    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - Fix some errors in AFEC header file.  From OrbitalFox.
      - DAC: DACC_WPMR_WPKEY_MASK -> DACC_WPMR_WPKEY.  From Wolfgang
        Reissnegge.
      - Timer:  Fix ops check in TCIOC_STOP.  From Wolfgang Reissnegge.
      - I2C: Fix reversed logic in twi_startmessage().  From Wolfgang
        Reissnegger.
      - SAM3/4 UDP: Fix handling of endpoint RX FIFO banks.  This fixes
        a race condition where the HW fills a FIFO bank while the SW is
        busy, resulting in out of sequence USB packets.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - USBHS Device:  This change solves a problem which causes data loss
        while sending data via USB. This problem is caused by an incorrect
        handling of the endpoint state in the USB driver sam_usbdevhs.  This
        leads under some circumstances to situations in which an DMA
        transfer is setup while a previous DMA transfer is currently active.
        Amongst other things I introduced the new endpoint state
        USBHS_EPSTATE_SENDING_DMA for the fix.  To reproduce the problem, I
        used a program which send as many data as possible via a CDC/ACM
        device and verified the received data on the PC.  From Stefan Kolb.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Timers: Support up to 8 channels per timer.  From kfazz.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Teensy 3.x clock fixes:  The High Gain bit in MCG_C1 was preventing
        teensy from booting except after a programming session. The second
        change doesn't appear to change any functionality, but complies with
        restrictions in the k20 family reference manual on FEI -> FBE clock
        transiions.  From kfazz.

    * NXP Freescale LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC17 Ethernet:  Needs to correctly ignore PHYID2 revision number
        when comparing PHY IDs.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - Fix errors in GPIO interrupt logic.  From v01d (phreakuencies)
      - Ethernet:  Correct auto-negotiation mode in the LPC43xx Ethernet.
        From Alexander Vasiljev
      - Writing zero to NVIC_IRQ_ENABLE has no effect.  Disable interrupts
        with  NVIC_IRQ_CLEAR. From Paul Alexander Patience.
      - SPIFI: If CONFIG_SPIFI_SECTOR512 undefined, lpc43_bwrite doesn't do
        actual write (probably copy/paste errors). Still not sure about
        current state of lpc43_spifi implementation, but for me NXFFS works
        with this change.  From Vytautas Lukenskas.

    * Qemu-i486:

      - Fix qemu-i486/ostest/Make.defs test for M32.  From Heath Petersen.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Drivers:

      - Fix EFM32 FLASH conditional compilation.  From Pierre-noel
        Bouteville
      - Writing zero to NVIC_IRQ_ENABLE has no effect.  Disable interrupts
        with  NVIC_IRQ_CLEAR. From Paul Alexander Patience.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F1-F4:  In PWM driver, just update duty if frequency is not
        changed and PSM started.  This removeis glitch or blinking when
        only duty is frequently changed.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F7: Fixed STM32F7 DMA stm32_dmacapable.  DMA working on SDMMC.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F1-F4 Timer Driver: Change calculation of per- timer pre-scaler
        value.  Add support for all timers
      - STM32 F1-F4: Correct conditional compilation in STM32 timer capture
        logic.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville
      - STM32 F1-F4: Fix STM32 DMA code and configuration for STM32F37X chips.
        From Marten Svanfeldt.
      - STM32 F1-F4: Fix compilation errors in debug mode of stm32_pwm.c.
        From Konstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32 F1-F4: Correct the CAN2 RX IRQ number for stm32f10xx chips.
        From Konstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32 F1-F4: Move backup domain reset to to earlier in the
        initialization sequence (stm32_rcc.c() in order to avoid disabling
        LSE during RTC initialiation.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 F1-F4: When configuring a GPIO via stm32_configgpio() the
        function will first set the mode to output and then set the initial
        state of the gpio later on.  If you have an application with an
        externaly pulled-up pin, this would lead to a glitch on the line
        that may be dangerous in some applications (e.G. Reset Line for
        other chips, etc).  This changes sets the output state before
        configuring the pin as an output.  From Pascal Speck .
      - STM32 F7: Apply Pascal Speck's GPIO STM32 change to STM32 L4.
      - STM32 L4: Apply Pascal Speck's GPIO STM32 change to STM32 L4.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 F7:  BUGFIX: PLLs IS2 and SAI P Calculation. From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4:  STM32 CAN fixes need to be backported to STM32L4 as well.
      - STM32 F1-F4 and L4: Writing zero to NVIC_IRQ_ENABLE has no effect.
        Disable interrupts with  NVIC_IRQ_CLEAR. From Paul Alexander
        Patience.
      - STM32 F7: STMF7xxx RTC: (1) Remove proxy #defines, (2) Ensure the
        LSE(ON) etal are set and remembered in a) A cold start (RTC_MAGIC
        invalid) of the RTC, and b) A warm start (RTC_MAGIC valid) of the
        RTC but a clock change.  The change was needed because in bench
        testing a merge of the latest's STM32  53ec3ca (and friends) it
        became apparent that the sequence of operation is wrong in the
        reset of the Backup Domain in the RCC code.  PWR is required before
        the Backup Domain can be futzed with. !!!This Code should be tested
        on STM32 and if needed rippled to the STM32 families.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 F1-F4: STM32 BBSRAM fixed (and formatted) flags.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7: STM32F7 BBSRAM fixed (and formatted) flags. From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4: Fix incorrect clock setup for LPTIM1.  From ziggurat29.
      - STM32 F4/L4 RTC ALARM: were enabling interrupts too early in the
        power-up sequence,  BEFORE the interrupt system was being
        initialized.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32 board.h: Fix STM32 timer input clock definitions.  From David
        Sidrane.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Bug Fix in tiva_serial.c - UART5, UART6 and UART7 were not being
        configured as TTYS0 for printing over serial console. From Shirshak
        Sengupta.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - include/signal.h:  Change type of SIG_ERR, SIG_IGN, ... to
        _sa_handler_t.  The type void does not work with the IAR toolchain.
        From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - crc16: fix error. From  Paul Alexander Patience.
      - strtoul() and strtoull():  Fix errno settings required by function
        definition.  Resolved Bitbucket Issue #1. From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Build system: This change fixes a build problem that only occurs
        when reconfiguring from Linux to Windows or vice-versa.  It is a
        problem that was present but not usually experienced until two
        things happened: (1) The pre_config target was added to run before
        the menconfig operation and (2) the context target was added before
        the pre_config target in order to set up the correct symbolic links
        (in the apps/platform directory) needed by the pre_config target.
        But then now if you start with a Linux system and run 'make
        menuconfig' to switch to Linux, the context target will execute
        first and set up POSIX style symbolic links before doing the
        menuconfig.  Then after the menuconfig, the make will fail on
        Windows if you are using a Windows native toolchain because that
        native toolchain cannot follow the Cygwin- style symbolic links.
        The fix here is to also execute the clean_context AFTER executing
        menuconfig.  A lot more happens now:  It used to be that doing
        'make menuconfig' only did the menuconfig operation.  Now it does
        context, pre_config, menuconfig, clean_context.  Not nearly as
        snappy as it used to be.
      - Need to build the drivers/ directory even it file descriptors are
        not supported.  There are things in the drivers/ directory that are
        still needed (like SYSLOG logic).
      - Remove all inclusion of header files from the apps/include
        directory from NuttX core logic.  There should be no dependency on
        logic within NuttX on logic within apps/.  This caused a lot of
        reshuffling of logic:  binfmt pcode support, usbmonitor is now a
        kernel thread, TZ/Olson database moved to libc/zoneinfo.

    * Application Build/Configuration System:

      - Make sure that APPNAME is defined in all Makefiles that generate
        applications.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * apps/builtins:

      - apps/builtins: exec_builtin was not using the provided open flags.
        As a result >> redirection was not working; it was treated the same
        as >.

    * apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshilib: PS Command: When Priority Inheritance is enabled, the
        format of /proc/<PID>/status changes to show both the current
        priority and the threads base priority.  This messes up the format
        of cmd_ps. From David Alessio.

    * apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils, uIP webserver:  Fix a data declaration in a header
        file.

    * apps/canutils:

      - apps/canutils/libuavcan: Fix for recent change to STM32 timer
        frequency definiitions.

    * apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/alarm: ioctl call was clobbering file descriptor.
      - apps/examples/can: Some variables were not declared in all required
        cases. From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - apps/examples/media: media example was intended to take either a
        command line argument, or a compiled-in default value from config.
        However, the default was ignored, leading to confusing error
        messages. From ziggurat29.

NuttX-7.18 Release Notes
------------------------

The 118th release of NuttX, Version 7.18, was made on October 8, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.18.tar.gz and
apps-7.18.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Add standard adjtime() interface and basic timekeeping support.
        Normally used with an NTP client to keep system time in
        synchronization.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - Use the oneshot timer with optional entropy to measure CPU load if
        so configured.

    * File System and Block and MTD Drivers:

      - Add Fujistu MB85RS256B ramtron support.  From Beat Kng.
      - SPI-based MTD driver for Macronix MX25L3233F or MX25L6433F.  From
        Aleksandr Vyhovanec.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - SH1106 0.96 OLED module support (SSD1306 compatible) + I2C fixes.
        From v01d (phreakuencies).

    * Sensor Drivers:

      - Add KXTJ9 Accelerometer driver from the Motorola Moto Z MDK.
      - Add MFRC522 RFID ISO14443 and Mifare transceiver driver.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add driver for the LIS3MDL 3 axis magnetometer.  From Alexander
        Entinger.
      - Add driver for the MLX90393 3 axis magnetometer. From Alexander
        Entinger.
      - Add driver for the LIS3DSH 3 axis accelerometer. From Alexander
        Entinger.
      - Add driver for the Bosch BMG160 3 axis gyroscope. From Alexander
        Entinger.
      - Add support for the  Sensixs XEN1210 3D-board. This sensor is used
        on NANOSATC-BR2 a Brazillian CUBESAT project.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - Add a new ioctl command (set MAXPOS) for Tiva QEI.  From Young.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - I/O Expander: Remove hard-coded PCA9555 fields from ioexpander.h
        definitons.  Add support for an attach() method that may be used
        when any subset of pin interrupts occur.
      - I/O Expander Interface:  Encode and extend I/O expander options to
        include interrupt configuration.
      - PCA9555 Driver:  Replace the signalling logic with a simple callback
        using the new definitons of ioexpander.h.  This repartitioning of
        functionality is necessary because (1) the I/O expander driver is
        the lower-lower part of any driver that uses GPIOs (include the GPIO
        driver itself) and should not be interacting directly with the much
        higher level application layer.  And (2) in order to be compatible
        with the GPIO driver (and any arbitrary upper half driver), the
        PCA9555 should not directly signal, but should call back into the
        upper half.  The upper half driver that interacts directly with the
        application is the appropriate place to be generating signal.
      - Add a skeleton I/O Expander driver (based on the PCA9555 driver).
      - Add PCF8574 I/O Expander driver.
      - GPIO driver:  Add IOCTLs to get the pin type and to unregister a
        signal handler.
      - Add a GPIO lower-half driver that can be used to register a GPIO
        character driver for accessing pins on an I/O expander.
      - Add an SPI helper function that encapsulates and manages a sequence
        of SPI transfers.
      - Add an SPI character driver that will permit access to the SPI bus
        for testing purposes.
      - Add oneshot timer lower half interface definition.
      - Add an upper-half, oneshot timer character driver.
      - Add Audio Tone Generator for NuttX.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add USB host support for composite devices.  This feature is not
        well tested.
      - drivers/ioexpander: Add an (untested) TCA64XX I/O Expander driver
        leveraged from Project Ara.

    * Simulation Platform:

      - Add a simulated I/O Expander driver.
      - Add simulator-based test support for apps/examples/gpio.
      - Add a configuration useful for testing Mini Basic.
      - Add a simulated oneshot lowerhalf driver.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM4CM: Add option to support oneshot timer without free-running
        timer.  Add oneshot lower half driver.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAMA5D: Add option to support oneshot timer without free-running
        timer.  Add oneshot lower half driver.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMV71/SAME70: Add option to support oneshot timer without
        free-running timer.  Add oneshot lower half driver.
      - Add support for SAMV7 DACC module.  From Piotr Mienkowski.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Add support for I2C and RTC.  From v01d (phreakuencies).

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Add teensy 3.x I2C support.  From v01d (phreakuencies).

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Add IAR-style STM32F1xx vectors. Tested on STM32F103RB and
        STM32F107RC.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Add timekeeping support for the STM32 tickless mode.  From Max
        Neklyudov.
      - Add a oneshot, lower-half driver for STM32.
      - STM32 L4: Add oneshot lower half driver for STM32 L4.
      - STM32 L4: Add support for quadrature encoders on STM32L4. Sebastien
        Lorquet.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - stm32f103-minimum: Add board support to MFRC522 driver.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add oneshot board initialization to stm32f103-minimum.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - stm32f103-minimum: Add board configuration to initialize Audio Tone
        Generator.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - stm32bufferfly2: Add support for the Kamami stm32butterfly2
        development board with optional ETH phy.  From  Michal Lyszczek.
      - stm32f103-minimum: Add board config support to SPI LCD module
        JLX12864G-086.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - stm32l476-mdk: Support basic booting and nsh on Motorola MDK. The
        Motorola MDK is based off of an earlier version of NuttX.
        This only provides a basic NSH shell.  From Jim Wylder.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery:  Add support for XEN1210 3D-board.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - stm32f103-minimum:  Add stm32_bringup support and userled example to
        STM32F103 Minimum board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add support for qencoders on various nucleo boards.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - olimex-stm32-e407: Add some networking configurations.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Add tiva PWM lower-half driver implementation. From Young.
      - Tiva QEI:  Add QEI lower-half driver for Tiva series chip.  From
        Young.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Separate XorShift128 PRNG from /dev/urandom and make it generally
        available.
      - Add POSIX type sig_atomic_t.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Add the difftime() function.  The function depends on the toolchain-
        dependent CONFIG_HAVE_DOUBLE so is not available on tiny platforms.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Add support for remove().  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Add system() to stdlib.h.  Actual implementation is in
        apps/system/system.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Rename arch/sh to arch/renesas.
      - Remove contactless drivers from drivers/wireless to drivers
        contactless.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Move all modem-related IOCTL commands to a common file to assure
        that they will be unique.

    * Tools:

      - Add sethost.sh.   This is a script that you can use to quickly
        change the host platform from Linux to Windows/Cygwin. Might save
        you a lot of headaches.

    * Applications: apps/nshlib:

      - Add logic to support an NSH-specific system command.
      - Add printf command to NSH, e.g., controlling /dev/userleds from
        command line: nsh> printf \x01 > /dev/userleds. From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.

    * Platforms: apps/system:

      - Port tee command from NetBSD.
      - Add a generic system command.  Current implentation cannot use
        /bin/sh and spawns the custom NSH system command directly.

    * Platforms: apps/platform:

      - Add C++ support for STM32L476-MDK.

    * Platforms: apps/interpreters:

      - Add a port of Mini Basic, version 1.0, written by Malcom McLean and
        released under the Creative Commons Attribution license.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - Add a simple test of the GPIO driver.
      - Add RFID_READUID sample application. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add Oneshot timer example.
      - Add a simple test of the system command.

Works-In-Progress:

    * IEEE802.14.5/6LowPAN.  Hooks and framework for this effort were
      introduced in NuttX-7.15.  Work has continued on this effort on
      forks from the main repositories, albeit with many interruptions.
      The completion of this wireless feature will postponed until at
      least NuttX-7.19.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Explicitly initialize the group tg_exitsem with sem_init().  The
        existing logic worked because the correct initialization value is
        all zero, but it is better to initialize the semaphore explicitly.
      - The TCB nchildren field should not be incremented when pthreads are
        created.
      - Move fields related to parent/child task relationship out of TCB
        into group structure where they belong.  Child is a group, not a
        thread.
      - mq_send() was not setting the errno value on certain failures to
        allocate a message.
      - Define 'group' even if HAVE_GROUPID is not set.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - Vector table should have dimension NR_IRQS, not NR_IRQS+1. From
        Sagitta Li.
      - pthreads:  When a pthread is started, there is a small bit
        of logic that will run on the thread of execution of the new
        pthread.  In the case where the new pthread has a lower
        priority than the parent thread, then this could cause both the
        parent thread and the new pthread to be blocked at the priority of
        the lower priority pthread (assuming that CONFIG_PRIORITY_INHERITANCE
        is not selected). This change temporarily boosts the priority of the
        new pthread to at least the priority of the new pthread to at least
        the priority of the parent thread.  When that bit of logic has
        executed on the thread of execution of the new pthread, it will then
        drop to the correct priority (if necessary) before calling into the
        new pthread's entry point.

    * File System/Block Drivers/MTD Drivers:

      - FAT performance improvement. In large files, seeking to a
        position from the beginning of the file can be very time consuming.
        ftell does lssek(fd, 0, SET_CURR).  In that case, that is wasted
        time since we are going to seek to the same position.  This fix
        short-circuits fat_seek() in all cases where we attempt to seek to
        current position.  Suggested by Nate Weibley.
      - MTD: Fixed cloned typos in several FLASH drivers.  From Aleksandr
        Vyhovanec.
      - mount: Corrects a bad assertion noted by Pierre-noel Bouteville.
        Also fixes a reference counting problem in an error condition:
        When the mountpoint inode is found but is not an appropriate
        mountpoint, the reference count on the inode was not being
        decremented.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Various serial drivers: Fix FIONWRITE and add FIONSPACE.  All
        implementations of FIONWRITE were wrong.  FIONWRITE should return
        the number of bytes waiting in the outgoing send queue, not the free
        space.  Rather, FIONSPACE should return the free space in the send
        queue.
      - Add missing prototype for btn_lower_initialize().
      - Make DAC sample structure packed.  From Marc Recht.

    * Networking:

      - TCP:  tcp_ipvX_bind() not actually using the port selected with
        port==0.  Also removes duplicate call to pkt_input().  Issues noted
        by Pascal Speck.
      - drivers/net: NET_TUN=y => NET_MULTIBUFFER=y.  From Vladimir
        Komendantskiy.
      - slip driver: Fix calculations using MSEC_PER_TICK.  If
        USEC_PER_TICK is less than 1000, then MSEC_PER_TICK will be
        zero.  It will be inaccurate in any case.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4 GPIO: Enable peripheral clock for GPIO port when GPIO is
        configured as input. The value of a GPIO input is only sampled when
        the peripheral clock for the port controller the GPIO resides in is
        enabled.  Therefore we need to enable the clock even when polling a
        GPIO.  From Wolfgang Reissnegger.
      - All SAM Ethernet Drivers: Add support so that the drivers can be
        built with CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER=y.
      - SAM3/4: Fix GPIO pull-up/down code. Enabling the pull-down resistor
        while the pull-up resistor is still enabled is not possible. In this
        case, the write of PIO_PPDER for the relevant I/O line is discarded.
        Likewise, enabling the pull-up resistor while the pull-down resistor
        is still enabled is not possible. In this case, the write of
        PIO_PUER for the relevant I/O line is discarded.  From Wolfgang
        Reinegger.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - All SAM Ethernet Drivers: Add support so that the drivers can be
        built with CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER=y.
      - SAM GPIO: Apply Wolfgang's change for SAM3/4 to SAMA5 and SAMV7.

    * Atmel SAMA5:

      - Add missing oneshot max_delay method.
      - All SAM Ethernet Drivers: Add support so that the drivers can be
        built with CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER=y.
      - SAM GPIO: Apply Wolfgang's change for SAM3/4 to SAMA5 and SAMV7.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx serial: Fix typos in LPC43 serial driver.  Found by Vytautas
        Lukenskas.
      - LPC43xx Serial: There are some small problems in LPC43xx RS485 mode
        configuration. In particular: (1) UART0,2,3 do not have DTR pins
        (different from UART1), so, Kconfig needs to be adjusted. (2)
        lpc43_uart.c in RS485 mode only configures DIR pin, but doesn't
        enable pin output for UART0,2,3. (3) should be option to reverse DIR
        control pin output polarity. (4) lpc43xx/chip/lpc43_uart.h doesn't
        have USART3 definitions.  NOTE: I didn't modified and didn't tested
        USART1, as it has different hardware.  From Vytautas Lukenskas.
        From Vytautas Lukenskas.

    * SiLabs EFM32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 SPI drivers adopted incompatible conventions (See STM32 for
        details of the issue).

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32, STM32 L4, and EFM32 SPI drivers adopted incompatible
        conventions somewhere along the line.  They set the number of bits
        to negative when calling SPI_SETBITS which had the magical side-
        effect of setting LSB first order of bit transmission.  This is not
        only a hokey way to pass control information but is supported by no
        other SPI drivers.  This change three things:  (1) It adds
        HWFEAT_LSBFIRST as a new H/W feature. (2) It changes the
        implementations of SPI_SETBITS in the STM32 and EFM32 drivers so
        that negated bit numbers are simply errors and it adds the
        SPI_HWFEATURES method that can set the LSB bit order, and
        (3) It changes all calls with negative number of bits from all
        drivers: The number of bits is now always positive and
        SPI_HWFEATURES is called with HWFEAT_LSBFIRST to set the bit order.
      - Add missing SPI2 and SPI3 support for STM32F3F3.  Add STM32F37XX DMA
        channel configuration.  For STM32F37XX, SYSCFG_EXTICR_PORTE defined
        twice.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32: Make stm32_pwr_enablebkp thread safe.  From Max Neklyudov.
      - Fix bad pllmul values for STM32F1XX connectivity line. STM32F1XX
        connectivity line supports only x4, x5, x6, x7, x8, x9 and x6.5
        values. From Michal Lyszczek.
      - STM32F3 SPI:  Fix the number of bit setting for the F3.  That and
        data packing work differently on the STM32F3 than for other STM32
        parts.
      - STM32 and STM32 L4: Enabling SPI DMA loses other bits in CR2.
      - STM32F3 SPI:  Cannot write always 16-bit value to DR register
        because of how the F3 implements data packing.
      - STM32F411 and STM32F446 map i2c2_sda_4 to different alternate
        function numbers.  From Konstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32 DMA Fix: Change stm32 adc dma callback to send channel
        number instead of index.  From Konstantin Berezenko.
      - STM32 OTGFS device: Fix for lost first word from FIFO

        1) Do not overwrite Reserved Bits in GINTSTS (per ref manual)*
        2) Acknowledge all pending int on entry to ISR that are Only rc_w1*
        3) Do not disable RXFVL*
        4) Loop until RXFVL is cleared*
        5) Only clear the NAK on the endpoint on the OTGFS_GRXSTSD_PKTSTS_SETUPDONE to not loose the first WORD of FIFO all the data  (Bug Fix)

        Changed marked *are just driver clean up and ensure ints are not lost. The bug fix is #5

        Test case open putty and observer the Set/Get LineCoding. Without this fix #5 the Get will not match the Set, and in fact the data might be skewed by 4 bytes, that are lost from the FIFO if the OTGFS_DOEPCTL0_CNAK bit is set in the OTGFS_GRXSTSD_PKTSTS_SETUPRECVD as opposed to the OTGFS_GRXSTSD_PKTSTS_SETUPDONE

        Set Line Coding DATA1: 4B | 00 c2 01 00 00 00 08 | c8 1B
        Get Line Coding DATA1: 4B | .. .. .. .. 00 00 08   c8 .. 00 00 07 | 7a 72

        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4 OTGFS device: Apply stm32 fix to stm32l4.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - STM32 F7: Remove duplicate call to pkt_input from Ethernet driver.
        Issues noted by Pascal Speck.
      - STM32 L4: Add support for USART3-USART5.  For STM32L4 parts, the
        higher number USART ports supported varies.  Add the HAVE_USARTx
        definitions to the configuration to allow enabling the higher
        numbered USART ports. From Jim Wylder.
      - STM32 USB: Set USB address to avoid a failed assertion.  From
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.
      - STM32 L4 and L7 USB: Pierre's assertion-avoidance change should
        also be applied to STM32 F7 and L4.
      - STM32, L4, and F7:  Remove GPIO_ETH_RMII_TX_CLK. TX_CLK is not
        present in RMII. Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 Ethernet: Correct typo in conditional logic.  From Neil
        Hancock.
      - STM32 L4 USB Device: Fixed L4 USB Driver by avoiding SETUPDONE and
        EPOUT_SETUP.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 SPI: stm32_modifycr2 should be available on all platforms if
        DMA is enabled.
      - STM32 DMA2D: fix an error in up_dma2dcreatelayer where an invalid
        pointer was returned when a certain underlying function failed.
        From Jens Grf.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Fix two bugs of tiva pwm lower-half driver implementation. From
        Young.
      - Tiva Ethernet:  Needs support for CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER=y.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - lib_dumpbuffer() now prints a large on-stack buffer first to avoid
        problems when the syslog output is prefixed with time.  From
        Pierre-noel Bouteville.
      - libc/math: This fixes the following libc/math issues: (1) asin[f l]()
        use Newtons method to converge on a solution. But Newtons method
        converges very slowly (> 500,000 iterations) for values of x close to
        1.0; and, in the case of asinl(), sometimes fails to converge (loops
        forever). The attached patch uses an trig identity for values of
        x > sqrt(2). The resultant functions converge in no more than 5
        iterations, 6 for asinl().  (2) The NuttX erf[f l]() functions are
        based on Chebyshev fitting to a good guess. The problem theres a
        bug in the implementation that causes the functions to blow up with
        x near -3.0. This patch fixes that problem. It should be noted that
        this method returns the error function erf(x) with fractional error
        less than 1.2E-07 and thats fine for the float version erff(), but
        the same method is used for double and long double version which
        will yield only slightly better precision. This patch doesn't
        address the issue of lower precision for erf() and erfl(). (3) a
        faster version of copysignf() for floats is included. From David S.
        Alessio.
      - strtod() was not returning endptr on error conditions.
      - libc/math: floor(), floorf(), and floorl():  Fix logic error.  Was
        not correctly handling negative integral value.
      - isatty() should be prototyped in unstid.h, not termios.h.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - nxglib: Fix handling of near-horizontal lines of width 1 in
        nxgl_splitline().  Missing handling for degenerate condition caused
        width 1 lines such as (0, 0) - (100, 10) to have gaps in the
        drawing. From Petteri Aimonen.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Top-Level Makefiles:  Fix a chicken-and-egg problem. In the menuconfig
        target, the context dependency was executed before kconfig-mconf.  That
        was necessary because the link at apps/platform/board needed to be set
        up before creating the apps/Kconfig file.  Otherwise, the platform
        Kconfig files would not be included.  But this introduces the chicken-
        and-egg problem in some configurations. In particular:  (1) An NX
        graphics configuration is used that requires auto-generation of
        source files using cpp, (2) the configuration is set for Linux, but
        (3) we are running under Cygwin with (4) a Windows native toolchain.
        In this case, POSIX-style symbolic links are set up but the Windows
        native toolchain cannot follow them. The reason we are running
        'make menuconfig' is to change from Linux to Cygwin, but the target
        fails.  During the context phase, NX runs CPP to generate source files
        but that fails because the Windows native toolchain cannot follow
        the links.  Checkmate.  This was fixed by changing all of the make
        menuconfig (and related) targets.  They no longer depend on context
        being run.  Instead, they depend only on the dirlinks target.  The
        dirlinks target only sets up the directory links but does not try
        to run all of the context setup; the compiler is never invoked; no
        code is autogenerated and things work.
      - CXXFLAGS: add -fcheck-new whenever -fno-exceptions is used. From
        Beat Kng.

    * Tools

      - tools/refresh.sh: Recent complexities added to apps/ means that
        configuration needs the correct Make.defs file in place in order to
        configure properly.
      - tools/kconfig2html.c: Update to handle absolute paths when sourcing
        Kconfig files.
      - tools/mkfsdata.pl was still generating the old-style apps/include
        inclusion paths.

    * Application Build/Configuration System:

      - Add DIRLINK and DIRUNLINK tool definitions to apps/Make.defs.

    * apps/nshlib:

      - Fix FIFO_SIZE vs PIPE_SIZE.
      - Fix hex representation of IP address in Kconfig.  Noted by Michal
        Lyszczek.
      - nsh_syscmds.c: missing semicolon.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - In system command, don't try to flush output streams if stdio
        buffered I/O is not supported.

    * apps/canutils:

      - libuavcan: Under certain circumstances, DELIM is not be defined in
        Makefile.
      - Add definition for APPNAME in apps/canutils/canlib.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.

    * apps/gpsutils:

      - Fix an error minmea.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.

    * apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/oneshot:  If the requested delay is > max_delay, then
        break the delay up into several pieces.

NuttX-7.19 Release Notes
------------------------

The 119th release of NuttX, Version 7.19, was made on December 26, 2016,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.19.tar.gz and
apps-7.19.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - sched/semaphore, sched/phread/, libc/semaphore, libc/pthread: Add
        pthread_mutexattr_get/set_protocol and non-standard
        sem_get/set_protocol. These may use to enable or disable priority
        inheritance on a single semaphore.
      - Spinlocks:  Added capability to provide architecture-specific memory
        barriers.
      - SMP: Add spin_trylock().  Use this in conditions where other CPUs need
        to stopped but we cannot call enter_critical_section().
      - sched note:  Extend OS instrumentation to include some SMP events.
        Also add spinlock instrumentation;  In SMP configurations, add a
        filter mask to log only notes from certain CPUs.
      - sched note:  Permit spinlock and critical section notes in in-memory
        buffer iff sched_not_get() interfaces is disabled.
      - sched note:  Add additional note to see if/when CPU is started in SMP
        mode.
      - sched note:  Record ID enumeration now results on constant values; ID
        values do not change with configuration.  This makes writing post-processing software much easier.
      - boardctl:  Add new boardctl() command, BOARDIOC_NX_START, to start the
        NX server as a kernel thread.
      - pthreads:  Add pthread_cleanup_push() and pthread_cleanup_pop().
      - pthreads: Added pthread_setcanceltype() and pthread_testcancel().
      - pthreads: Add support for cancellation points.
      - task_delete() now obeys all cancellation point semantics.
      - Add task_setcancelstate(), task_setcanceltype(), and
        task_testcancel().  These are non-standard interfaces analogous to the
        correponding pthread_ interfaces that provide cancellation controls
        for tasks.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - boardctl:  Add new boardctl() command, BOARDIOC_NX_START, to start the
        NX server as a kernel thread.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Network drivers:  Add option to use low-priority work queue to all
        Ethernet and MAC level drivers.
      - Network Drivers:  Adapt all Ethernet (and other MAC) drivers to work
        as though CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER were set.  Remove all references to
        CONFIG_NET_MULTIBUFFER.
      - Eliminate CONFIG_NO_NOINTS.  There is no longer any support for
        interrupt level processing of the network stack. Lots of files changed.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - Vishay VEML6070:  Add Vishay VEML6070 driver.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * ARMv7-A

      - ARMv7-A/i.MX6:  Add SCU register definitions.  Add some controls to
        enable SMP cache coherency in SMP mode.  Makes no difference, however
        -- cache still incoherent on i.MX6.
      - ARMv7 GIC: SGIs are non-maskable but go through the same path as
        other, maskable interrupts.  Added logic to serialize SGI processing
        when necessary.

    * Atmel SAM3/4:

      - SAM3/4:  Add SMP support for the dual-core SAM4CM.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - Add support for the SAM5CMP-DB board.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM4CMP-DB:  Add support for the Atmel SAM4CMP-DB board running in an
        SMP configuration.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - SAM4CMP-DB: Add hooks to auto-mount the procfs file system on startup
        in board bring-up logic.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7:  Register the watchdog device at the configured device path
        CONFIG_WATCHDOG_DEVPATH vs. hard-coded /dev/wdt.  From Frank Benkert.

    * Calypso

      - Calyps: Remove all Calypso board configurations.  Remove Calypso
        architecture support and support for Calypso SERCOMM driver.

    * Misoc LM32:

      - Misoc LM32:  Adds basic support for the Misoc procoessors and the LM32
        in particular.  From Ramtin Amin.
      - Misoc LM32:  Add signal handling logic.  From Ramtin Amin.
      - Misoc LM32:  Add logic to flush/invalidate caches.  From Ramtin Amin.

    * Misoc LM32 Drivers:

      - Misoc LM32 Serial:  Add interrupting Misoc serial driver.  From Ramtin
        Amin.
      - Misoc LM32 Timer:  Add timer driver.  From Ramtin Amin.
      - Misoc LM32:  Add Misoc Ethernet driver  From Ramtin Amin.

    * Misoc LM32 Boards:

      - Misoc LM32 Qemu:  Board support for testing Misoc LM32 with Qemu. From
        Ramtin Amin.
      - Misoc LM32 Qemu:  Integrate network support into configs/misoc/hello.
        From Ramtin Amin.
      - Misoc LM32 Qemu:  Remove configs/misoc/include/generated directory.  I
        suppose the intent now is that this is a symbolic link?  DANGER!
        This means that you cannot compile this code with first generating
        these files a providing a symbolic link to this location!   There is a
        sample directory containing generated sources.  This is really only
        useful for performing test builds.  You really must generate the Misoc
        architecture for a real-life build.  From Ramtin Amin.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6 Drivers:

      - i.MX6:  Add an untested SPI driver taken directly from the i.MX1 port.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis:  Added missing headers.  Kinetis broke out SPI to
        kinetis/kinetis_spi.h. Broke out DMA to use the modern Nuttx chip
        inclusion - still STUBS.  Add Kinetis support for ARMV7-M Common
        Vector and FPU.  Allow CONFIG_ARMV7M_CMNVECTOR,
        CONFIG_STACK_COLORATION, CONFIG_ARCH_FPU.  Fix  i2c driver offset
        swapped for value in kinetis_i2c_putreg.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis: Add UID Unique ID.  From Neil Hancock.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Freedom-K64F board: Add support for UID Unique ID.  From Neil Hancock.

    * NXP Freescale LPC17xx Boards:

      - Olimex-LPC1766-STK:  Enable procfs in NSH configuration. Automount
        /proc on startup.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx: Add timer driver:  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - LPC43xx GPDMA driver:  The GPDMA block is basically the same as the
        LPC17xx.  Only the clock configuration is different and LPC43xx has
        four different DMA request sources, where LPC17xx has only two. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Boards:

      - Bambino 200E:  Add basic support to Micromint Bambino 200E board.
        This includes contributions from Jim Wolfman.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.
      - Bambino 200E:  Add support for timer driver.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * RGMP:

      - Remove RGMP and RGMP drivers.

    * RISC-V:

      - RISC-V: Add support for the RISC-V architecture and
        configs/nr5m100-nexys4 board.  The board support on this is pretty
        thin, but it seems like maybe a good idea to get the base RISC-V stuff
        in since there are people interested in it.  From Ken Pettit.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F3:  Implemention of the STM32 F37xx SDADC module. There are
        also changes to ADC, DAC modules. SDADC has only been tested in DMA
        mode and does not support external TIMER triggers. This is a work in
        progress.  From  Marc Recht.
      - STM32 F3:  Add PWM driver support for STMF37xx.  The changes have been
        tested successfuly for TIM4 and TIM17 (different IPs).  From  Marc
        Recht.
      - STM32 F4:  Support oversampling by 8 for the STM32 F4. From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Added Timers 2-5 and control of SAI and I2S PLLs.  Added
        support for stmf469 SAI and I2S PLL configuration and STM446 fixes.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Expanded OTGFS support to stm32F469 and stm32f446.  Added
        missing bit definitions, Used stm32F469 and stm32f446 bit
        definitions,  Removed unsed header file.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Allow dma in 1 bit mode in STM32F4xxx.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  Allow the config to override the clock edge setting.  From
        David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4:  Support Complementary PWM outputs on STM32L4.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4:  Add implementation of dumpgpio for stm32l4, was required
        for pwm debug. From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103 Minimum:  Add button support.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103 Minimum:  Add support to PWM on STM32F103-Minimum board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103 Minimum:  Add RGB LED support on STM32F103 Minimum board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103 Minimum:  Add Vishay VEML6070 driver support to the
        STM32F103-Minimum board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-F303RE:  Add STM32 F303RE hello configuration.   From Marc
        Recht.
      - Nucleo-L476:  Support PWM testing on board Nucleo L476.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Nucleo L476:  Add support for timers to Nucleo L476.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - Hymini STM32v:  Enable CONFIG_RTC in the hymini-stm32v/nsh2
        (kitchensink) config. From Maciej Wjcik.
      - Olimex STM32-p407:  Add support for the Olimex STM32 P407 board.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Tiva PWM: Support PWM_PULSECOUNT feature for TI tiva.  From Young.Mu.

    * Xtensa/ESP32

      - Xtensa ESP32:  Basic architectural support for Xtensa processors and
        the Expressif. ESP32 added.
      - Xtensa ESP32:  Add EXPERIMENTAL hooks to support lazy Xtensa
        co-processor state restore in the future.
      - Xtensa ESP32:  Basic port is function in both single CPU and dual CPU
        SMP configurations.  There is an NSH configuration for each CPU
        configuration.  Outstanding issues include missing clock configuration
        logic, missing partition tables to support correct configuration from
        FLASH, and some serial driver pin configuration issues.
      - Xtensa ESP32: Add stack checking logic.

    * Xtensa/ESP32 Boards:

      - ESP32 Core v2:  Basic support for Expressif ESP32 Core v2 board
        added.  The initial release includes an NSH and an SMP test
        configuration.
      - ESP32 Core v2:  Add configuration to support linking NuttX for
        execution out of IRAM.
      - ESP32 Core v2:  Automatically mount /proc at start-up.
      - ESP32 Core v2:  Add an OS test to verify the port.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc/locale:  Add a dummy setlocale() function to avoid drawing the
        function from newlib.  Add clocale header file.
      - include/locale.h:  Modify locale.h to add localeconv() and lconv
        structure.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - libc/locale:  Allows c++ code to compile with or without
        CONFIG_LIBC_LOCALE and will generate a link error if
        CONFIG_LIBC_LOCALE is not defined and setlocale is referenced. With
        CONFIG_LIBC_LOCALE defined setlocale will act as if MB string is not
        supported and return "C" for POSIX. C and "". From David Sidrane.
      - libc/wchar:  Add wcslen, wmemchr, wmemcmp, wmemcpy wmemset, btowc,
        mbrtowc, mbtowc, wcscmp, wcscoll, and wmemmove to NuttX.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - libc/wctype:  Add functions wcrtomb, wcslcpy, wcsxfrm, wctob, wctomb,
        wctype, localeconv, strcoll, strxfrm, swctype, towlower, towupper and
        wcsftime.   Add wctype.h; Move lib_wctype.c to libc/wctype.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - include/ctype.h : Add isblank() macro to ctype.h.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - lic/stdlib:   Add strtof() and strtold() as simply a copy of strtod
        with types and limits changed.
      - sscanf():  Use strtof() instead of strtod() if a short floating point
        value was requested.  The should help performance with MCUs with
        32-bit FPU support with some additional code size.
      - sscanf(): Add scansets to the scanf function. Enabled
        CONFIG_LIBC_SCANSET option.  From  Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - include/inttypes.h: Add architecture-specific inttypes.h.  From Paul
        A. Patience.
      - C Library:  Allow option to enable IP address conversions even when
        the IP address family is not supported.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - The Smoothie project needs to compile C++ inside config/boardname/src/
        to use with High Priority Interruption, then I modified the board
        configs Makefile to support it.  It works fine for the first time
        compilation, but if we execute "touch config/boardname/src/Pin.cxx"
        and execute "make" it will not detect that Pin.cxx was modified. I
        think there is some other place I should modify, but I didn't find
        it.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Tools:

      - tools/: Add tools/showsize.sh.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH: dd command will show statistics.  From  Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * Applications: apps/system:

      - apps/system/sched_note:  Extend to include additions to instumentation
        for SMP.
      - apps/system/sched_note:  Add support for spinlock notes.
      - apps/system/sched_note:  Add support for new scheduler instrumentation.

    * Platforms: apps/platform:

      - ESP32 Core v2:  Add platform support for the ESP32 core v2 board.
      - Olimex STM32-p407: Add platform support for the Olimex STM32 P407.

    * Graphics: apps/graphics

      - graphics/traveler/tcledit and libwld:  Add an X11 Tcl/Tk tool that can
        be used to edit Traveler world files.
      - Graphics: Remove all NX server taks.  Instead, call boardctl() to the
        NX server kernel thread.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - examples/buttons:  Add a new buttons example that uses the button
        character driver instead of the architecture buttons directly. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - examples/cctype:  Add an example to verify cctype functions.
      - Remove RGMP example.
      - examples/ostest:  Extend the pthread cancellation test to exercise
        pthread_cleanup_push() (and pthread_cleanup_pop() indirectly via
        pthread_cancel() and pthread_exit().
      - examples/ostest: enhance pthread cancellation test some.

Works-In-Progress:

    * IEEE802.14.5/6LowPAN.  Hooks and framework for this effort were
      introduced in NuttX-7.15.  Work has continued on this effort on
      forks from the main repositories, albeit with many interruptions.
      The completion of this wireless feature will postponed until at
      least NuttX-7.20.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - sched/semaphore: Within the OS, when a thread obtains a semaphore
        count it must call sem_addholder() if CONFIG_PRIORITY_INHERITANCE is
        enabled.  If a count is available, then sem_wait() calls
        sem_addholder(), otherwise it waited for the semaphore and called
        sem_addholder() when it eventually received the count.  This caused a
        problem when the thread calling sem_wait() was very low priority.
        When it received the count, there may be higher priority threads
        "hogging" the CPU that prevent the lower priority task from running
        and, as a result, the sem_addholder() may be delayed indefinitely.
        The fix was to have sem_post() call sem_addholder() just before
        restarting the thread waiting for the semaphore count.  This problem
        was noted by Benix Vincent who also suggested the solution.
      - Many files: Make sure that priority inheritance is not enabled for
        semaphores whose primary use is signaling (vs locking of resources) by
        calling sem_setprotocol().
      - sched/semaphore:  sem_trywait() no longer modifies the errno value
        UNLESS an error occurs.  This allows these functions to be used
        internally without clobbering the errno value.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - sched/clock: Correct clock initialization.  The correct range for the
        month is 0-11 but is entered as 1-12 in the .config file.  Add ranges
        to START_YEAR, MONTH, and DAY in sched/Kconfig.
      - sched/clock:  Correct calculation for the case of Tickless mode with a
        32-bit timer.  In that case, the calculation was returning millisecond
        accuracy.  That is not good when the timer accuracy is < 1 msec.  From
        Rajan Gill.
      - Work Queue:  When queuing new LP work, don't signal any threads if
        they are all busy.  From Heesub Shin.
      - Work Queue: Signal sent from work_signal() may interrupt the low
        priority worker thread that is already running. For example, the
        worker thread that is waiting for a semaphore could be woken up by the
        signal and break any synchronization assumption as a result. It also
        does not make any sense to send signal if it is already running and
        busy. This change fixes it.  From Heesub Shin.
      - Fix DEBUGASSERT() in group_signal.c.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Eliminate bad boardctl() commands:  Remove all references to
        BOARDIOC_PWMSETUP and board_pwm_setup(). Remove all references to
        BOARDIOC_ADCSETUP and board_adc_setup(). Remove
        BOARDIOC_CAN_INITIALIZE.  CAN initialization is now done in the board
        initialization logic just like every other device driver.
      - pthreads:  Fix an error in pthread_mutex_destroy().  An error could
        occur while destroying a mutex after a pthread has been canceled while
        holding the mutex.
      - task_restart: Make sure new task starts with pre-emption disabled and
        not in a critical section.
      - Enter/leave Critical Sections.  Major redeign to
        enter/leave_critical_section logic to deal with the case where
        interrupts are disabled only on the local CPU.  In this case, some
        rather complex spinlocks must be used to maintain the critical section
        accross all CPUs.
      - SMP Critical Sections:  Fixes for the SMP case: (1) Change order for
        SMP case in enter_critical_section:  (1) Disable local interrupts
        BEFORE taking spinlock and (2) If SMP is enabled, if any interrupt
        handler calls enter_critical_section(), it should take the spinlock.
      - SMP wdogs:  Wdog timers use a tasking interface that to manipulate
        wdogs, and a different interface in the timer interrupt handling logic
        to manage wdog expirations.  In the single CPU case, this is fine.
        Since the tasking level code calls enter_critical_section, interrupts
        are disabled and no conflicts can occur.  But that may not be the case
        in the SMP case.  Most architectures do not permit disabling
        interrupts on other CPUs so enter_critical_section must work
        differently:  Locks are required to protect code. this change adds
        locking (via enter_critical section) to wdog expiration logic for the
        the case if the SMP configuration.
      - SMP vfork():  Fix a race condition in the SMP case.  Existing logic
        depended on the fact that the child would not run until waitpid was
        called because the child had the same priority as the parent.  BUT in
        the SMP case that is not true... the child may run immediately on a
        different CPU.
      - SMP: This change adds a new internal interfaces and fixes a problem
        with three APIs in the SMP configuration.  The new internal interface
        is sched_cpu_pause(tcb).  This function will pause a CPU if the task
        associated with 'tcb' is running on that CPU.  This allows a different
        CPU to modify that OS data stuctures associated with the CPU.  When
        the other CPU is resumed, those modifications can safely take place.
        The three fixes are to handle cases in the SMP configuration where one
        CPU does need to make modifications to TCB and data structures on a
        task that could be running running on another CPU.  Those three cases
        are task_delete(), task_restart(), and execution of signal handlers.
        In all three cases the solutions is basically the same:  (1) Call
        sched_cpu_pause(tcb) to pause the CPU on which the task is running,
        (2) perform the necessary operations, then (3) call up_cpu_resume() to
        restart the paused CPU.
      - SMP: Add logic to avoid a deadlock condition when CPU1 is hung waiting
        for g_cpu_irqlock with interrupts interrupts and CPU0 is waiting for
        g_cpu_paused.
      - SMP: Enforce this rule: Tasks which are normally restored when
        sched_unlock() is called must remain pending (1) if we are in a
        critical section, i.e., g_cpu_irqlock is locked , or (2) other CPUs
        still have pre-emption disabled, i.e., g_cpu_schedlock is locked.  In
        those cases, the release of the pending tasks must be deferred until
        those conditions are met.

    * File System/Block Drivers/MTD Drivers:

      - AT24XX EEPROM MTD driver:  Added EEPROM timeout.  Fromo Aleksandr
        Vyhovanec.
      - fs/procfs:  Fix procfs status for SMP case.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - Fonts:  Correct some default font IDs.  From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.

    * Common Drivers:

      - usbhost/enumerate:  Fix possible buffer overwrite.  From Janne Rosberg.
      - usbhost/composite:  Fix compile; missing semicolons.  From Jann Rosberg.
      - syslog:  Fixes required for file syslog output.  From Max Kriegleder.
      - SPI configuration:  Fix Kconfig warning.  This change moves the
        ARCH_HAVE_SPI options outside the check for SPI.  Those options don't
        depend on SPI, and Kconfig files  in arch/ enable them even if SPI
        isn't  enabled.  Source the driver's Kconfig in drivers/Kconfig only
        if support for the driver is enabled prevents us from defining these
        ARCH_HAVE options in the driver's Kconfig. We should probably remove
        the other checks in drivers/Kconfig and check if the drivers are
        enabled only in their Kconfig.  From Paul A. Patience.
      - drivers/timer:  Remove the timer driver TIOC_SETHANDLER IOCTL call.
        This calls directly from the timer driver into application code.  That
        is non-standard, non-portable, and cannot be supported.  Instead, add
        timer driver hooks to support signal notification of timer
        expiration.  Signal notification logic added by Sebastien Lorquet.
      - All timer lower half drivers.  Port Sebastien's changes to all other
        implementations of the timer lower half.
      - USB MSC Device:  Fix length of mode6 sense reply packet.  From
        Wolfgang Reinegger.
      - USB Composite Host:  Fix end offset in usbhost_copyinterface().  From
        Janne Rosberg.
      - USB CDC/ACM Host:   Add CDC_SUBCLASS_ACM and CDC_PROTO_ATM to
        supported class and proto.  From Janne Rosberg.
      - SSD1306:  Fix errors in SPI mode configuration.  From Gong Darcy.
      - CDC/ACM Device Class:  uart_ops_s portion of cdcacm will not be
        initalized with correct functions if CONFIG_SERIAL_DMA is selected.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - drivers/net/tun.c: Fix bug in TUN interface driver.  From  Max Nekludov.

    * ARMv7-A:

      - ARMv7-A SMP: Add SMP logic to signal handling.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - ARMv7-M: Fix double allocation of MPU region in mmu.h.

    * ARMv7-R:

      - ARMv7-R:  Fix compilation error.  This change fixes compilation errors
        on MPU support for ARMv7-R.  From Heesub Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: fix invalid drbar handling.  In ARMv7-R, [31:5] bits of DRBAR
        is physical base address and other bits are reserved and SBZ. Thus,
        there is no point in passing other than the base address.  From Heesub
        Shin.
      - ARMv7-R:  Remove the redundant update on SCTLR. mpu_control() is
        invoking cp15_wrsctlr() around SCTLR update redundantly.  From Heesub
        Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: add new Kconfig entries for d/i-cache. Unlike in ARMv7-A/M,
        Kconfig entries for data and instruction caches are currently missing
        in ARMv7-R. This change adds those missing Kconfig entries. Actual
        implmenetation for those functions will be added in the subsequent
        patches.  From Heesub Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: Add cache handling functions.  This change adds functions for
        enabling and disabling d/i-caches which were missing for ARMv7-R.
        From Heesub Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: Fix typo in mpu support.  s/ARMV7M/ARMV7R/g. From Heesub Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: Fix CPSR corruption after exception handling.  A sporadic
        hang with consequent crash was observed when booting. It seemed to be
        caused by the corrupted or wrong CPSR restored on return from
        exception. NuttX restores the context using code like this:  msr spsr,
        r1.  GCC translates this to:  msr spsr_fc, r1.  As a result, not all
        SPSR fields are updated on exception return.  This should be: msr
        spsr_fsxc, r1.  On some evaluation boards, spsr_svc may have totally
        invalid value at power-on-reset. As it is not initialized at boot, the
        code above may result in the corruption of cpsr and thus unexpected
        behavior. From Heesub Shin.
      - ARMv7-R: Fix to restore the Thumb flag in CPSR.  Thumb flag in CPSR is
        not restored back when the context switch occurs while executing thumb
        instruction.  From Heesub Shin.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4 UDP:  Add delay between setting and clearing the endpoint RESET
        bit in sam_ep_resume().  We need to add a delay between setting and
        clearing the endpoint reset bit in SAM_UDP_RSTEP. Without the delay
        the USB controller will (may?) not reset the endpoint.  If the
        endpoint is not being reset, the Data Toggle (DTGLE) bit will not to
        be cleared which will cause the next transaction to fail if DTGLE is
        1. If that happens the host will time-out and reset the bus.  Adding
        this delay may also fix the USBMSC_STALL_RACEWAR in usbmsc_scsi.c,
        however this has not been verified yet.  From Wolfgang Reinegger.
      - SAM3/4: Remove unused 'halted' flag from UDP driver.  From Wolfgang
        Reinegger.
      - SAM3/4: Remove 'stalled' flag from the UDP driver.  This flag is not
        necessary because the state of the endpoint can be determined using
        'epstate' instead. From Wolfgang Reinegger.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - SAM4S Xplained Pro: Configuration uses old, improper timer interface.
        CONFIG_TIMER disabled in configuration.  Remove obsolete timer
        initialization logic.

    * Atmel SAMV7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7 USBDEVHS:  A problem occurred with the SAMV7 USBDEVHS driver  if
        the USB cable is unplugged while a large amount of data is send over
        an IN endpoint using DMA. If the USB cable is plugged in again after a
        few seconds it is not possible to send data over this IN endpoint
        again, all other endpoints work as expected.  The problem occurs
        because if the USB cable is unplugged while an DMA transfer is in
        flight the transfer is canceled but the register SAM_USBHS_DEVDMACTRL
        is left in an undefined state.  The problem was fixed the problem by
        resetting the register SAM_USBHS_DEVDMACTRL to a known state.
        Additionally all pending interrupts are cleared.  From Stefan Kolb.
      - SAMV7 MCAN: Prevent Interrupt-Flooding of ACKE when not connected to
        CAN-BUS. An Acknowledge-Error will occur every time no other CAN Node
        acknowledges the message sent. This will also occur if the device is
        not connected to the can-bus. The CAN-Standard declares, that the Chip
        has to retry a given message as long as it is not sent successfully
        (or it is not cancelled by the application). Every time the chip tries
        to resend the message an Acknowledge-Error-Interrupt is generated. At
        high baud rates this can lead in extremely high CPU load just for
        handling the interrupts (and possibly the error handling in the
        application). To prevent this Interrupt-Flooding we disable the ACKE
        once it is seen as long we didn't transfer at least one message
        successfully.  From Frank Benkert.
      - SAMV7 MCAN:  Make delete_filter functions more robust.  From Frank
        Benkert.

    * Atmel SAMA5 Drivers:

      - SAMA5 PWM:  Driver does not build when executing from SDRAM before
        board frequencies are not constant.  Rather, the bootloader configures
        the clocking and we must derive the clocking from the MCK left by the
        bootloader.  This means lots more computations.  This is untested on
        initial change because I don't have a good PWM test setup right now.

    * Misoc LM32:

      - Misoc LM32: Corrects a bug that never occured in qemu on simulation or
        real fpga. The error was that the r1 register was being modified out
        of context switching and not restoring it.  From Ramtin Amin

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6:

      - i.MX6 interrupt handling:  Additional logic needed to handle nested
        interrupts when an interrupt stack is used.  Nesting can occur because
        SGI interrupts are non-maskable.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx serial: Fix a typo in ioctl TIOCSRS485 ioctl.  From Vytautas
        Lukenskas.
      - LPC43xx serial:  Restore RS485 mode on serial port open (if RS485 is
        enabled via menuconfig).  From Vytautas Lukenskas.
      - LPC43xx SD/MMC:  Correct some definitions on SMMC control register in
        lpc43_sdmmc.h.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - LPC43xx SD card:  Correct pin configuration options needed for SD card
        pins.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * SiLabs EFM32:

      - EFM32: Fix a compilation error.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 CHxN channels are always outputs.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 DAC:  Fix shift value whenever there are is a DAC2 and, hence,
        up to three interfaces.  From Marc Recht.
      - STM32 F1:  Add TIM8 to STM32F103V pinmap.  From Maciej Wjcik.
      - STM32 F1: Fix for F1 RTC Clock, tested on F103.  From Maciej Wjcik.
      - STM32 F3:  STM32F303xB and STM32F303xC chips have 4 ADCs.  From Paul
        A. Patience.
      - STM32 F4:  A new implementation of the STM32 F4 I2C bottom half.  The
        common I2C as this did not handled correctly in the current
        implementation (see also https://github.com/PX4/NuttX/issues/54).  The
        changes almost exclusively affect the ISR.  From Max Kriegleder.
      - STM32 F4  OTGHS Host:  If STM32F446 increase number of channels to
        16.  From Janne Rosberg.
      - STM32 F4:  I think, that Size is (highest address+1 - Base address).
        Base address has been removed and if address+count >= size we are
        outside of the Flash.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Fix ADC compilation error when DMA isn't enabled. From Paul
        A. Patience.
      - STM32 F4:  STM32F427 was rebooting. Over reached family.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Added STM32F469 RAM size and deliberated STM32F446 size.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4:  Typo in stm32f76xxxx_pinmap.h edited online with
        Bitbucket.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  stm32_i2c.c Dejavu.  Fixes a bug previously found in the
        F4. From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  OTGDEV fixed typo.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  Fix to SPI-Master driver.  Without this the chip select
        decoding feature will not work properly.  From Michael Spahlinger.
      - STM32 F7:  STM32F7 SD/MMC driver depends on CONFIG_SDIO_DMA which is
        only defined in stm32/Kconfig.  Changed to CONFIG_STM32F7_SDMMC_DMA
        and defined in stm32f7/Kconfig.
      - STM32 F7:  Fix some STM32F7 copy paste errors.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4:  Complementary PWM outputs on STM32L4"  (1) too many
        parentheses when calculating max chan count and (2) channel 4 does not
        have a complementary output. From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4:  Fix I2C devices RCC registers.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4:  Enable and renaming for 32l4 UARTs 4 and 5. From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4:  Change the way to configure quadrature encoder prescalers.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 L4:  Correct USART1/2 definitions.  Use default mbed UART4
        settings.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103 Minimum: Fix Timers 2 to 7 clock frequencies. From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-F303RE:  Remove duplicate setting from board.h.   From  Marc
        Recht.
      - Nucleo F303RE: Various fixes to get the ADC configuration building
        again after PR.  Refresh all configurations.
      - Nucleo L476RG: Add better selection of timer.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - DK-TM4C129x: Typo fix.  From Wolfgang Reinegger.

    * Xtensa ESP32:

      - ESP32 core v2:  Flush the UART TX buffer in the esp32 serial shutdown
        routine. The ROM bootloader does not flush the FIFO before handing
        over to user code, so some of this output is not currently seen when
        the UART is reconfigured in early stages of startup.  From Angus
        Gratton.
      - Xtensa ESP32:  Corrects a problem with dispatching to signal
        handlers:  Cannot vector directly to the signal handling function as
        in other ABIs under the Xtensa Window ABI.  In that case, we need to
        go through a tiny hook when performs the correct window call (call4)
        otherwise registers will be scrambled in the signal handler.

    * Xtensa ESP32 Boards:

      - ESP32 core v2:  Changes the openocd config file's default flash
        voltage from 1.8V to 3.3V. This is not necessary right now, but may
        save some hard-to-debug moments down the track (3.3V-only flash
        running at 1.8V often half-works and does weird things...).  From
        Angus Gratton.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc/stdio:  Fixes sscanf() %sn where strlen(data) < n.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - libc/stdio:  Include wchar.h in lib_libvsprintf.c to fix compilation
        error.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - include/sys/time.h: timersub macro modified per recommendations of
        phreakuencies.
      - include/ctype.h and cxx/cctype:  Implement ctype.h functions as inline
        if possible.  cctype can then properly select namespace.
      - include/: Fix a number of header files with mismatched 'extern C {'
        and '}'.
      - libc/unisted:  Change brings strtol() and related functions more
        conformant with POSIX.  Corner cases like strtol(-2147483648, NULL,
        10) now pass clang -fsanitize=integer without warnings.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - libc/unistd: sleep() was returning remaining nanoseconds (kind of),
        instead the remaining seconds.  From Eunbong Song.
      - termios.h:  Fix CRTSCTS define to include input and output flow. From
        Lorenz Meier.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - configs/*/defconfig: The buttons example was changed to archbuttons.
        As a result all of the button configurations are broken and need some
        renaming in the defconfig files.  Noted by Frank Berkert.
      - config/*/defconfgs: More fallout from name change of
        apps/examples/buttons to archbuttons.
      - configs:  All QE encoder files.  Last change made timer hard-coded to
        3. Make configurable.
      - configs: Remove all traces of the no-longer existent ARCHBUTTONS
        example.  Remove all button configurations that depended on the
        obsoleted ARCHBUTTON example.
      - minnsh Configurations:  Remove minnsh configurations and support
        logic:  up_getc() and lowinstream.  This was an interesting exercise
        to see just how small you could get NuttX, but otherwise it was not
        useful:  (1) the NSH code violated the OS interface layer by callup
        up_getc() and up_putc() directly, and (2) while waiting for character
        input, NSH would call up_getc() which would hog all of the CPU.  Not a
        reasonable solution other than as a proof of concept.

    * Application Build/Configuration System:

      - Make.defs:  Using wrong link script if native window tool used with
        Cygwin.

    * apps/platform:

      - ESP32 Core v2 Platform: Fix some naming that prevented building the
        C++ support.

    * apps/nshlib:

      - NSH Library:  nsh_getdirpath(), use snprint instead of sprintf to
        avoid possibility of buffer overrun.  Noted by Chung Hwan Kim.

    * apps/system:

      - Remove std_readline().  This called up_getc() and up_putc() directly,
        violating the POSIX OS interface.

    * apps/netutils:

      - FTPD: Fixed bug that didn't free ftpd ressources on exit.  From Pascal
        Speck.
      - NTP client: Fix missing left parenthesis.  From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.
      - cJSON: Import patch to fix:cJSON_PrintUnformatted() behaves unexpected
        if an empty array shall be printed to text. from Jerome Lang
        2012-04-19. From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.
      - esp8266 update cosmetic and many bug fix.  From Pierre-Noel Bouteville.
      - FTPD:  Fix bug un ftpd file or socket may be not closed.  From
        Pierre-Noel Bouteville.

    * apps/modbus:

      - Modbus Master is missing many files and doesn't compile at all. More
        details in
        https://groups.yahoo.com/neo/groups/nuttx/conversations/topics/13734.
        From Vytautas Lukenskas.

    * apps/examples:

      - The examples/qencoder app was trying to init the encoder by a direct
        call into the board, cheating in a local header to declare the
        normally unavailable function prototype.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - apps/examples/timer: Should detach signal handler before exiting.
      - examples/qencode: The examples/qencoder app was trying to init the
        encoder by a direct call into the board, cheating in a local header to
        declare the normally unavailable function prototype.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - apps/examples/archbuttons:  Removed becaue it violates OS interface
        principles.
      - examples/adc, pwm, can: Remove all usage of BOARDIOC_ADCTEST_SETUP,
        BIOARDIOC_PWMSETUP.  Remove BOARDIOC_CAN_INITIALIZE.  CAN
        initialization is now done in the board initialization logic just like
        every other device driver.
      - examples/ostest: Add some delays to the pthread cancellation test.
        With deferred cancellation enabled, things happen more asynchronously.

NuttX-7.20 Release Notes
------------------------

The 120th release of NuttX, Version 7.20, was made on March 8, 2017,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.20.tar.gz and
apps-7.20.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - Kernel Modules:  Module initializer may now return a symbol table.
      - Modules:  Extend the module interface so that we can access symbols
        exported by the module.
      - Shared Libraries:  In the FLAT build mode, kernel modules may be
        used to provide minimal shared library functionality.
      - Modules/Shared Libraries:  Add support for dependencies between
        modules.
      - Module Library:  Add build a configuration logic for a shared module
        library.
      - Shared Libraries: Implement module based shared libraries for the
        PROTECTED mode build.
      - Interrupt handling:  irq_attach() now includes an argument of type
        xcpt_t that retained with the handler address.  That argument is
        then provided to the interrupt handler when the interrupt occurs.
        The common parameter passing replaces the ad hoc parmater passing
        implemented in current drivers.  From Mark Schulte.
      - Adapt many drivers to utilize the IRQ argument feature.
      - All functions that used to return an xcpt_t old handler value, now
        return an int error code.  The oldhandler value is no longer useful
        with the recent changes to the interrupt argument passing.  Some of
        the functions effected include board_button_irq(), arch_phy_irq(),
        STM32 EXTI functions (Alarm, COMP, PVD), GPIO interrupt logic like
        kinetis_pinirq(), stm32_gpiosetevent(), and others.
      - IRQ subsystem:  Add support for smaller interrupt tables as
        described at
        http://www.nuttx.org/doku.php?id=wiki:howtos:smallvectors .  This
        is partially the work of Mark Schulte.

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - Pseudo File System:  Add support for soft links in the top-level
        pseudo file system.
      - Soft links:  Add an implementation of readlink().
      - Add fstat() support.  Implement fstat() method in binfs, romfs,
        unionfs, tmpfs, nxffs, nfx, hostfs, procfs, and smartfs.
      - fstat:  Add fstat() support to FAT.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - Fonts: Add support for Tom Thumb small mono-space font. From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Graphics:  Separated of font cache from graphics/nxterm.  Now in
        libnx/nxfronts where it can be shared with other grapics
        applications.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Ethernet drivers:  Add framework for serialization in the case where
        multiple low-priority work queues are used.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - Add capabilities() method to SDIO interface.  Remove
        CONFIG_SDIO_WIDTH_D1_ONLY.  That should not be a global propertie,
        but rather a capability/limitation of single slot when there may be
        multiple slots.
      - Removed dmasupported() method from the SDIO interface.  That is now
        a bit in the capability set.
      - drivers/sensors: Add driver for the ST L3GD20 3 axis gyro.  From
        raiden00.

    * Atmel SAM3/4:

      - SAM3/4: Add support for ATSAM4S4C.  From Wolfgang Reinegger.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX6 Boards:

      - Sabre 6quad:  Enable examples/smp test in i.MX6 SMP/NSH
        configurations.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis:  Added support for CHIP_MK60FN1M0VLQ12 chip.  From Maciej
        Skrzypek.
      - Kinetis:  Add support for K64/K66 RTC lower half driver. From Neil
        Hancock.
      - Kinetis:  Extensive modification of MCG support based feature
        configuration.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Add support for K66 family.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Created a kinetis SIM versioning scheme pulled in by
        Kinetis chip.h.  From David Sidrane.
      - Created a kinetis PMC versioning scheme pulled in by Kinetis
        chip.h.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis: Extend clock configuration logic.  Refactor
        implementation.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis Ethernet:  Kinetis Support RMII clock source select.  This
        defined the RMII clock source select bits and allows the selection
        to be made via Kconfig. From David Sidrane.  Freedom-K66F uses
        ENET_1588_CLKIN as RMII clock
      - Kinetis Serial:  Added configurable 1|2 stop bits.
        HAVE_SERIAL_CONSOLE -> HAVE_UART_CONSOLE to be consistent with
        HAVE_LPUART_CONSOLE naming. From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis LPserial:  Add LPUART serial driver and Clock
        configuartaion to freedom-k66f board.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis USB device:  Refactor clocking in kinetis_usbdev.  From
        David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Add support for NXP Freedom-k66f development board.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis Freedom K66F:  Add Ethernet support.  From David Sidrane.
      - Add twr-k64f120m config.  From Marc Recht.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Boards:

      - Bamboo-200E: Add netnsh configuration.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Add usbnsh config to Bambino 200E board.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F7: Allow board to configure HSE clock in bypass-mode. This
        is needed to enable HSE with Nucleo-F746ZG board.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7: stm32_allocateheap: allow use DTCM memory for heap.
        STM32F7 has up to 128KiB of DTCM memory that is currently left
        unused.  This change adds DTCM to main heap if
        CONFIG_STM32F7_DTCMEXCLUDE is not enabled.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Add basic support for the STM32F334.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F33XX DAC, OPAMP, COMP, ADC, HRTIM headers.   From Mateusz
        Szafoni.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F7 SDMMC:  Add support for single bit operation on SDMMC2.
      - STM32 L4:  Port STM32L4 SAI driver from MDK.
      - STM32 L4:  Bring power management logic from Motrola MDK into NuttX.
      - STM32 L4:  Bring LPTIM driver in from the Motorola MDK.
      - STM32 L4 COMP: Port from Motorola MDK.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F429i Discovery: Add support for NxWM on STM32F429i-Disco
        board. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103 Minimum: Add support for nRF24 on STM32F103-Minimum
        board. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Olimex STM32 P407: Add a NSH protected build configuration; Enable
        procfs/ in all configurations.
      - Olimex STM32 P407: Add support for on-board microSD slot.
      - STM32F429i Discovery: add support for the L3GD20 driver.  From
        raiden00.
      - STM32F103 Minimum: Add support to QEncoder on STM32F103 Minimum
        board.   From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Olimex STM32 P407:  Add external SRAM support.
      - Add basic support for the Nucleo F334R8 board.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32F103 Minimum: Add SDCard support over SPI on STM32F103-Minimum
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103 Minimum: Add support to USB Device on STM32F103-Minimum
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - compiler.h: packed_struct replaced by begin_packed_struct and
        end_packed_struct. Now support IAR style packed structures.  From
        Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - Math library: Leverage optimized ARMv8-M functions from BSD license
        ARM file.
      - Shared libraries:  Add a non-standard dllfnc.h function to set the
        symbol table.
      - C Library: Add a support for setvbuf(). This is a collaborative
        effort.  Alan Carvalho de Assis did the initial prototype.
      - C Library: Add setbuf() which is a trivial wrapper around setvbuf().
      - C library:  Add swab().
      - C library: Add strtoimax and strtoumax.
      - C library:  Add ffs(), rindex(), an index().  Add strings.h.  Move
        strcasecmp, strncasecmp, bzero, bcmp, and bcopy to where they
        belong in strings.h.h, not string.h.  bzero, bcmp, and bcopy are
        legacy functions; the contemporary counterparts should be used
        instead.
      - C library: Add fstatfs().
      - Update cwchar.  Add cwctype.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Add configuration support for builds with Ubuntu under Windows 10.

    * Tools:

      - tools/noteinfo.c: A hack tool that I use to analyze some sched_note
        output.  Needs a home and may be useful to others.
      - tools/mkconfig.c: Add logic to keep all of the buffering options in
        sync.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH: Add support for the 'ln' command.
      - NSH ls command: if node is a symobolic link, use readlink() to get
        and the display the target of the symblic link.
      - NSH: Add readlink command.

    * Applications: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/nxtext: Make line spacing configurable.
      - apps/system/zmodem/host/nuttx/compiler.h synchronized with
        nuttx/nuttx/include/nuttx/compiler.h.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.
      - apps/examples/sotest:  Add a test for shared libraries.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Add a test of setvbuf().
      - apps/examples/stat:  Add a simple test for stat(), fstat(),
        statfs(), and fstatfs().

Works-In-Progress:

    * IEEE802.14.5/6LowPAN.  Hooks and framework for this effort were
      introduced in NuttX-7.15.  Work has continued on this effort on
      forks from the main repositories, albeit with many interruptions.
      The completion of this wireless feature will postponed until at
      least NuttX-7.21.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - SMP: There were certain conditions that we must avoid by preventing
        the release of the pending tasks while withn a critical section.
        But this logic was incomplete; there was no logic to prevent other
        CPUs from adding new, running tasks while on CPU is in a critical
        section.  This commit corrects this.  This is matching logic in
        sched_addreadytorun to avoid starting new tasks within the critical
        section (unless the CPU is the holder of the lock).  The holder of
        the IRQ lock must be permitted to do whatever it needs to do.
      - SMP: Make checks for CPU lock set more robust.  There are certain
        conditions early in initialization on during interrupt handling
        where things need to be done a little differently.
      - sched_cpulocked:  Avoid use of spinlock.  That has been reported to
        cause a deadlock (2016-12-28).
      - SMP: Fix a gap where we may try to make modifications to the task
        lists without being in a critical sections.  That permits
        concurrent access to the tasks lists and many subtle problems.
        This fix just remains in the critical section throughout the
        operation (and possible until the task is restore in the event of a
        context switch).  Makes a big difference in stability.
      - SMP: Fix an error in critical section logic when performing a
        context switch from an interrupt handler.  The g_cpu_irqset bit was
        not being set for the CPU so other CPUs did not know about the
        critical section.
      - SMP Signals: Fix some SMP signal delivery logic. Was not handling
        some critical sections correctly and was missing logic to signal
        tasks running on other CPUs.
      - SMP:  Fix timer related issues:  Round robin and sporadic
        scheduling were only being performed for tasks running on the CPU
        that processes the system timer interrupt.  Similary, CPU load
        measurements were only be processed for running on the CPU that
        receives the sampling interrupt.
      - sched_note: Fix spinlock instrumentation.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - In all implementations of _exit(), use enter_critical_section() vs.
        disabling local interrupts.
      - sigtimedwait:  When timer expires, up_unblock_task() is called.
        This is okay in the single CPU case because interrupts are disable
        in the timer interrupt handler.  But it is insufficient in the SMP
        case.  enter_ and leave_critical_section() must be called in order
        to manage spinlocks correctly.
      - Fix a compile error: in sched_cpuload.c:Line136, the variables ts
        and secs are not defined if CONFIG_CPULOAD_ONESHOT_ENTROPY = 0.
        However, these variables are used regardless of
        CONFIG_CPULOAD_ONESHOT_ENTROPY at lines~180:onwards.  From Rajan Gill.
      - CPU load: Correct computation of the nominal period to use when the
        source is a oneshot timer.
      - Cancellation points:  Fix some backward logic in conditional
        compilation.
      - Remove an unused variable when calling sigwaitinfo() and
        sigtimedwait().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - procfs:  Correct to snprintf-related errors in fs_procfsproc.c.
        Resolves issue #24.
      - Add logic to VFS rename:  If target of rename exists and is a
        directory, then the source file should be moved 'under' the target
        directory. POSIX also requires that if the target is a file, then
        that old file must be deleted.
      - Fix open() a block device with
        CONFIG_DISABLE_PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS=y. From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - File System: Don't build block driver proxy if PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS
        are disabled.
      - sendfile():  Fix error introduced with commit
        ff73be870e38959b0aaee5961dc47b4b58dc2d86.  Noted by Maciej Wjcik.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - NxWM configurations.  If using a 7-bit character set, then the
        cursor character cannot be 137 (graphic block).  Use 95
        (underscore) instead.
      - NX server: Correct message queue names.  Should not be at /dev,
        but rather relative to /var/mqueue.

    * Common Drivers:

      - MMCSD_SDIO: Only wait for card ejected if card detection is
        supported. From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Typos withim mtd/ with Macronix MX25L.  In
        NuttX/drivers/mtd/Make.defs letters X between M and 25 are
        missing.  Noted by Oleg Evseev.
      - USBMSC: Always set LUN readonly flag.  From Wolfgang Reinegger.
      - drivers/lcd:  ssd1306_configspi() must have global scope.
      - MMC/SD SDIO:  Some drivers need to start DMA before sending CMD24
        and some AFTER.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - drivers/tone.c:  Handle configuration with multiple PWM channels.
        This resolves issue #30: Audio Tone Generator and PWM Multiple
        Output Channel options.
      - drivers/tone.c:  50% duty needs to be expressed a a fixed precision
        number.
      - drivers/spi/Kconfig:  There is too much SPI in the configuration
        menu; SPI Driver Support menu is empty.  From Maciej Wjcik.
      - option to enable Memory Card debug output was hidden with SD cards
        connected through SPI.   From Maciej Wjcik.
      - usbhost_cdcacm: fix tx outbuffer overflow and remove now invalid
        assert.  From Janne Rosberg.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Networking: Fixed some issues that prevented IPv6 from working with
        IPv4 enabled.  From Pascal Speck.
      - Networking: fixed a nullptr-dereference on iob_clone.  From Pascal
        Speck.
      - Ethernet: Need two work structures (minimum) in all Ethernet
        drivers so that pending poll work is not lost when an interrupt
        occurs.

    * ARMv7-R:

      - I found an issue inside the cp15_coherent_dcache function:  The
        "mcr CP15_BPIALLIS(r0)" should only be used with SMP
        configurationa. In non-SMP configuration this instruction could
        become undefined.  From Manohara HK.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4: GPIO bit numbering typo fixes.  From Wolfgang Reinegger.

    * Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - Add missing sched_note_*() calls in sam4cm SMP functions.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis: Fixed wrong MCG VDIV calculation on new NXP K60.  From
        Maciej Skrzypek.
      - Kinetis: Need to set HAVE_UART_DEVICE when UART4 is selected.  From
        Maciej Skrzypek.
      - Kinetis MCG: Wrong FRDIV set in MCG_C1.  From Maciej Skrzypek.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis Serial: Fixed compile error when UART5 is selected.  From
        Maciej Skrzypek.
      - Kinetis SDHC - Enable clock after selected.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Correct some SPI and I2C configuration issues.  From
        David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis Ethernet:  Add #define for number of loops for auto
        negotiation to complete.  From Marc Recht.
      - Kinetis Werial:  Fixed up_rxint - did not disable the RX
        interuppts. There was an OR where and AND NOT was needed.  From
        David Sidrane.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx:

      - LPC43 pinset definitions:  Add more 1 bit to pinset to reach
        SFSCLK0-SFSCLK3. Remove PINCONFIG_DIGITAL.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43 serial:  Correct conditional logic that selects /dev/ttySN.
        Problem noted by Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP/Freescale i.MX6:

      - i.MX6: Fix clearing GPT status register.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32, STM32L4 Oneshot: Fix logic so that it can support multiple
        oneshot timers.
      - STM32 F7: Added missing ARCH_HAVE_RESET for F7.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32:  Add missing STM32_BKP_BASE.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 and STM32F7: Fixes the BKP reference counter issue.  From
        David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - Fix for SAMv7 SPI: DLYBS value was calculated, but never written to
        any registers. This led to incorrect timings on the bus.  From
        Michael Spahlinger.
      - STM32 QEncoder: Fix QEncoder driver, based on STM32L4 driver.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 QEncoder:  Enable clocking to the timer on QE setup; disable
        clock on QE teardown.
      - STM32 Ethernet: Need two work structures so that pending poll work
        is not lost when an interrupt occurs.  This change has also been
        ported to all all other effected Ethernet drivers.
      - STM32 OTGHS host:  stm32_in_transfer() fails and returns NAK if a
        short transfer is received.  This causes problems from class
        drivers like CDC/ACM where short packets are expected.  In those
        protocols, any transfer may be terminated by sending short or NUL
        packet.  From Janne Rosberg.  Adapted Janne Rosberg's patch to
        STM32 OTGHS host to OTGFS host, and to similar USB host
        implementations for STM32 L4 and F7.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4 Discovery: Fix issues with QEncoder support.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Add debug assertion in libdtoa to catch attempts to use floating
        point output formats from within an interrupt handler.  That will
        cause assertions or crashes downstream because __dtoa will attempt
        to allocate memory.  From Pierre-noel Bouteville.
      - libc: Fix ARMv7-A/R memcpy assembly.
      - Fix return value if x is NaN.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.

    * apps/nshlib:

      - NSH: Eliminate a warning when all memory inspection commands are disabled.

    * apps/graphics:

      - apps/graphics/traveler/tools: Fix linkage issue. The -lm should
        come after -o binname.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * apps/netutils:

      - The CONFIG_NETUTILS_HTTPD_PATH constant is used by httpd_mmap.c and
        httpd_sendfile.c but It was not present in Kconfig menu.  From
        Maciej Wjcik.

    * apps/examples:

      - Configurations that enable OSTEST must not disable signals.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Was ignoring
        CONFIG_EXAMPLES_OSTEST_FPUTESTDISABLE.
      - In apps/examples/mtdpart/mtdpart_main.c where
        CONFIG_EXAMPLES_MTDPART_NPARTITIONS defining is checked should be
        #ifndef instead of #ifdef.  Noted by Oleg Evseev.

NuttX-7.21 Release Notes
------------------------

The 121st release of NuttX, Version 7.21, was made on June 6, 2017,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.21.tar.gz and
apps-7.21.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - pthread rwlocks:  Add an implementation for read/write locks
        (rwlocks) into the pthread library.  These locks are writer
        priority, such that if any writers come in they are given priority
        for writing.  From Mark Schulte.
      - pthread robust mutexes:  Implement robust mutex support:
        pthread_mutex_lock() and trylock() will return EOWNERDEAD if the
        mutex is locked by a thread that no longer exists.  Add
        pthread_mutex_consistent() to recover from this situation.  Keep
        list of all mutexes held by a thread in a list in the pthread's TCB.
        When pthread exits or is cancelled, mutexes held by thread are
        marked inconsistent and the highest priority thread waiting for the
        mutex is awakened.  There is a configuration option to (a) support
        only robust mutexes, (b) support only traditional unsafe mutexes,
        or (c) Support both unsafe and robust mutexes via
        pthread_mutexattr_get/setrobust().
      - pthread cancellation points:  Add logic to disable cancellation
        points within the OS.  This is useful when an internal OS function
        that is NOT a cancellation point calls an OS function which is a
        cancellation point.  In that case, irrecoverable states may occur if
        the cancellation is within the OS. From Juha Niskanen.
      - clock:  Add clock_resynchronize and use subseconds RTC.  Add
        clock_resynchronize for better synchronization of CLOCK_REALTIME and
        CLOCK_MONOTONIC to match RTC after resume from low-power state.  Add
        up_rtc_getdatetime_with_subseconds under
        CONFIG_ARCH_HAVE_RTC_SUBSECONDS to allow initializing (and
        resynchronizing) system clock with subseconds accuracy RTC.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - clock:  Add new type ssystime_t for relative 64-bit ticks, change
        ticks<->time conversion functions to use ssystime_t.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - clock:  Add testing for 32-bit overflow of 64-bit system timer.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - drivers/mtd/w25.c:  Erase sector only if it is not in erased state.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - drivers/lcd:  Extend st7565 driver to include support for the
        AQM_1248A.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - drivers/lcd:  Add driver for Nokia 5110 (Philips PCD8544).  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Extensive modifications to support wireless network (see below).
      - TUN driver:  Implement TAP (OSI layer 2) mode. Enable by setting the
        IFF_TAP flag instead of the IFF_TUN flag in ifr_flags.  From Thomas
        Keh.
      - Add user-space networking stack API (usrsock).  User-space
        networking stack API allows user-space daemon to provide TCP/IP
        stack implementation for NuttX network.  Main use for this is to
        allow use and seamless integration of HW-provided TCP/IP stacks to
        NuttX.  For example, user-space daemon can translate /dev/usrsock
        API requests to HW TCP/IP API requests while rest of the user-space
        can access standard socket API, with socket descriptors that can be
        used with NuttX system calls.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - net/:  Network driver now retains Ethernet MAC address in a union so
        that other link layer addresses may be used in a MULTILINK
        environment.

    * Wireless Networking/Wireless Drivers:

      - BCM43362:  Support for Broadcom's BCM43362 WiFi chip was contributed
        by Simon Piriou as part of the port of the Particle Photon board.
        Only station functionality is available at present.  This work
        includes not on the WiFi driver, but the support Particle Photon
        board, the infrasture for IEEE 802.11 FullMAC networking including
        the network device interface, WiFi configuration, AP scanning and
        authentication and association with an AP.
      - IEEE 802.11 networking tools and support.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC support.  This is an effort that was started some
        time back by Sebastien Lorquet (with some help from Matte Poppe).
        Recently, Anthony Merlino has taken on this effort and has made
        some significant progress.  Using the Microchip MRF24J40 module with
        the Mikroe Clicker2-STM32 board along with a PC-based IEEE 802.15.4
        sniffer, Anthonly has verified correct transmittion and receipt of
        basic frames.
      - Microchip MRF24J40: As mentioned above, this IEEE 802.15.4 radio
        driver is now basically functional.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 Network Driver:  A driver that interfaces the NuttX
        network with the IEEE 802.15.4 MAC has been developed but is still
        incomplete and has not been verified.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 Network Loopback Driver:  A simple IEEE 802.15.4 MAC
        loopback driver was developed.  This driver allowed for parallel
        development of the IEEE 802.15.4 MAC and 6LoWPAN.
      - 6LoWPAN:  The Contiki 6LoWPAN stack has been ported so that works
        within the NuttX networking framework and interfaces with the new
        IEEE 802.15.4 MAC via the network driver.  Live testing with
        IEEE 802.15.4 radios has not yet been done; all testing has used
        the loopback driver.  There are no known problems and the stack
        is ready for additional testing.
      - Add option to enable wireless debug output.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - Add entropy pool and strong random number generator.   Entropy pool
        gathers environmental noise from device drivers, user-space, etc.,
        and returns good random numbers, suitable for cryptographic use.
        Based on entropy pool design from *BSDs and uses BLAKE2Xs algorithm
        for CSPRNG output.  Patch also adds /dev/urandom support for using
        entropy pool RNG and new 'getrandom' system call for getting
        randomness without file-descriptor usage (thus avoiding file-
        descriptor exhaustion attacks). The 'getrandom' interface is similar
        as 'getentropy' and 'getrandom' available on OpenBSD and Linux
        respectively.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - XBox One controller:  Adds USB host driver support for the XBox One
        controller.  Currently only the latest version (XBox One X)
        controller works.  The older XBox One controllers do not enumerate
        correctly.  From Brian Webb.
      - drivers/analog:  Add basic COMP driver.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - drivers/analog:  Add driver for the LTC1767L ADC.  From Martin
        Lederhilger.
      - drivers/analog:  Add basic OPAMP driver.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - drivers/sensors:  Add driver for ST HTS221 humidity sensor.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/sensors:  Add driver for ST LPS25H pressure sensor.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/sensors:  Add driver for ST LIS2DH accelerometer.  From Timo
        Voutilainen.
      - drivers/usbmisc:  Add driver for Fairchild FUSB301 USB type-C
        controller.  From Harri Luhtala.
      - RTC:  Add interface for check if RTC time has been set.  New
        interface allows checking if RTC time has been set.  This allows to
        application to detect if RTC has valid time (after reset) or should
        application attempt to get real time by other means (for example, by
        launching ntpclient or GPS).  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Buttons:  Change return value of board_buttons() and the type of
        btn_buttonset_t to uint32_t so that more than 8 buttons can be
        supported.
      - drivers/syslog:  Use monotonic clock for timestamp when available.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - SPI:  Add an instance argument to the SPIDEV definitions.  Thus,
        instead of specifying a FLASH device, for example, as SPI_FLASH, you
        would now use SPI_FLASH(0) where the "instance" argument now
        distinguishes multiple FLASH devices on the same SPI bus.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - IOBs:  Move from net/iob to a better location in mm/iob where they
        can be shared outside of the networking logic.  Current also used
        by IEEE 802.15.4 MAC and by syslog (when buffering enabled).
      - syslog:  Add option to buffer SYSLOG output to avoid interleaving.
        Uses new shareable IOBs.  Additional logic to assure that the the
        write from the buffer is a single atomic write in normal debug
        output.
      - drivers/can:  Move CAN subsystem to its own directory and put device
        drivers there.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - drivers/can:  Add Microchip MCP2515 CAN Bus controller driver.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - drivers/audio:  Add cs43l22 audio driver.  From Taras Drozdovsky.
      - drivers/input:  Add Cypress MBR3108 CapSense touch button driver.
        From Juha Niskanen.

    * Simulation

      - configs/sim/sixlowpan:  Configuration for testing the 6LoWPAN with
        the IEEE 802.15.4 loopback network driver.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx:

      - arch/arm/src/xmc4:  Initial, partial support for Infineon XMC4xxx.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500 Relax:  Add basic board support infrastructure of Infineon
        XMC4500 Relax Lite v1.  Basic serial, LED, and button button support
        for a simple NSH configuration.  There are still stome remaining
        issues with serial communications.

    * MicroChip PIC32MX Boards:

      - pic32mx7mmb:  Add support for the Pinquino toolchain.
      - pic32mx7mmb:  Add support for PROCFS file system.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis:  Allow board to add pullups on SDHC lines.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Use optional BOARD_OSC_CR and BOARD_OSC_DIV in clock
        configuration.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis:  Add Timer PWM Module (TPM) to K66 chip.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Added HW flow control and termios.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  Add ARCH_HAVE_I2CRESET.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx:

      - Add support for LPC4337FET256.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - Change STM32 tickless to use only one timer.  From Konstantin
        Berezenko.
      - STM32 F7:  Add support for LSE RTC and enable RTC subseconds.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 L1: stm32l15xx_rcc:  Add support for using MSI as system
        clock. From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L1:  stm32l15xxx_rcc: configure medium performance voltage
        range and zero wait-state when allowed by SYSCLK setting.  Zero
        wait-state for flash can be configured when:  (1) Range 1 and
        SYSCLK <= 16 Mhz, (2) Range 2 and SYSCLK <= 8 Mhz, or (3) Range 3
        and SYSCLK <= 4.2 Mhz.  Medium performance voltage range (1.5V)
        can be configured when SYSCLK is up to 16 Mhz and PLLVCO up to
        48 Mhz.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F0: Add basic support for STM32F0.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.
      - STM32 F0:  Add basic support for STM32F07x family.
      - STM32 L1: stm32l15xx_rcc: Allow board to configure HSE clock in
        bypass-mode.  Allows using MCO output from ST-link chip (on Nucleo
        and Discovery boards) as HSE input.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L1: Add support for STM32L152CC, STM32L152RC and STM32L152VC.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F0:  Add support for HSI48.
      - STM32 L4:  Add support for the STM32L496XX family.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4: modularize Kconfig to support different product
        lines/families.  This is modeled after STM32F7. Idea is to declare
        each chip in Kconfig but allow for flash size override.  Commit adds
        many STM32L4_HAVE_XXX feature test macros.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Separate SYSCFG into product line specific files for
        clarity.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Add support for many new MCUs from the STM32L4X3XX
        product line.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Add dbgmcu header files.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F410:  Add support for STM32F410.  STM32F410 is a version of
        STM32F4 with 32 KB of RAM and 62 or 128 KB of flash.  From Gwenhael
        Goavec-Merou.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - SDIO:  Extensions to support the SDIO interface to the BCM43362 from
        Simon Piriou.
      - STM32 F2:  Add USB OTG HS support for stm32f20xxx cores.  From Simon
        Piriou.
      - STM32 F2, F4, and F7:  Add BOARD_DISABLE_USBOTG_HSULPI flag.  From
        Simon Piriou.
      - STM32 F33:  Move DMA logic to a separate files + add ADC support.
        From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F3:  Add COMP support.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F33:  Support for COMP character driver.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F4:  Implement DMA support for the STM32F4 I2C.  From Rajan Gill.
      - STM32 F7:  Add stm32 RNG support.  This is copied from stm32l4.
        Tested on STM32F746ZG board.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L1:  Add STM32L162VE to chip.h.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F4:  Add I2C3 SDA pin mapping for STM32F411.  From no1wudi.
      - STM32 L1:  stm32_flash:  Add EEPROM writing for STM32L15XX.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7:  Serial:  Add interface to get uart_dev_t by USART number,
        stm32_serial_get_uart.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F4:  Provide TIM5 definition for STM32F429.  From Matias v01d.
      - STM32 F0:  Add an untested port of the F1 USB device to the STM32F0.
      - STM32 F0:  Add support for the STM32F09X family.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 F0:  Initial cut at I2C driver.  Still a work in progress.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 F33:  Add OPAMP support.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 L4: stm32l4_i2c:  Add I2C4 code.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Add GPIO_PORTI definition.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 Serial:  Allow configuring Rx DMA buffer size.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - STM32 L4:  Firewall for stm32l4x3xx.  Not tested for any product
        family, but now it at least compiles.  L496 devices can have one bit
        wider Volatile Data Segment.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 TIM:  Add method to get timer width.  Freerun timer: Use timer
        width to get the correct clock rollover point.
      - STM32 L4:  Add internal flash write support.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Port stm32l4_serial_get_uart function from STM32F7.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 Ethernet:  Add support for KSZ8081 PHY interrupts.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 F4:  Add I2S driver.  From Taras Drozdovsky.
      - STM32 L4:  Add IWDG peripheral.  This is the same as for STM32
        except that prescale and reload can be changed after watchdog has
        been started, as this seems to work on L4.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7:  Add SPI DMA support.  From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Support for the Particle Photon board was contributed by Simon
        Piriou.  The Photon board is based on a STM32F205G MCU with and on-
        board BCM43362 WiFi chip that interfaces via the STM32's SDIO
        interface.  Board configuration support includes, in addition,
        buttons, LEDS, IWDG, USB OTG HS, and procfs support.  Configurations
        available for nsh, usbnsh, and wlan configurations.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Support for the Mikroelektronika Clicker 2 for
        STM32 was added by Anthony Merlino.  This board, along with the
        MRF24J40 Click board is the platform used to deveop the IEEE
        802.15.4 support.  The boad configuration includes the MRF24J40
        intialization logic and SPI support.  Configurations exist for nsh,
        knsh, usbnsh, and mrf24j40-radio.
      - Nucleo_F334R8:  Add ADC example.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add COMP support.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Use new COMP driver.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Adds USB host support to stm32f411-disco board.  From Brian Webb.
      - Add stm32f0discovery board support.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-F072RB:  Add board configuration.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add OPAMP support.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F072RB:  Add support for the I2C driver used by I2C tools.
      - Nucleo-L496ZG:  Add nucleo-l496zg board files.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Nucleo-F091RC:  Add nucleo-f091rc board files.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Nucleo-L432KC:  Add nucleo-l432kc board files.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - Nucleo-L452RE:  Add nucleo-l452re board files.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - stm32f103-miniumum:  Add board support to use the Nokia 5110
        LCD display driver.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - C library:  Add strerror_r().
      - C Library:  Add wcstoull(), swprintf(), wcstod(), wcstof(), wcstol(),
        wcstold(), wcstoul(), wcstoll() functions.  Add mbsnrtowcs() and
        wcsnrtombs() (just returning success).  Add mbtowc() and wctomb() to
        C++ std namespace.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - C Library:  Add ffsl(), ffsll(), fls(), flsl(), flsll() and use
        GCC's __builtin_ctz/__builtin_clz for faster implementation of these.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - fixedmath:  Add square root and b32_t conversion operators.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - locale.h:  Add a bogus definition of locale_t.
      - C library:  Versions mbrlen and mbsrtowcs taken and adapted from
        FreeBSD code (at https://github.com/freebsd/freebsd/).  From Matias
        v01d.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Include C++ library in 'make export'.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs:  Remove all setenv.sh and setenv.bat files.  Remove all
        references to setenv.sh and setenv.bat from all config README files.
      - Kconfig/deconfigs:  Add CONFIG_ARCH_TOOLCHAIN_GNU to indicate that
        the toolchain is based on GNU gcc/as/ld.  This is in addition to the
        CPU-specific versions of the same definition.
      - Move prototype for up_cxxinitialize() from nuttx/include/nuttx/arch.h
        to apps/include/platform/cxxinitialize.h.

    * Tools:

      - Add initialconfig.c so that perhaps in the future we will be able to
        use this to generate a new configuration from scratch (rather than
        having to derive new configurations from existing configurations).
        NOTE: Not yet intregated into the build system.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - Added support for set [{+|-}{e|x|xe|ex}] [<name> <value>].  Set the
        'exit on error control' and/or 'print a trace' of commands when
        parsing scripts in NSH.  The settinngs are in effect from the point
        of exection, until they are changed again, or in the case of the init
        script, the settings are returned to the default settings when it
        exits.  Included child scripts will run with the parents settings and
        changes made in the child script will effect the parent on return.
        Use 'set -e' to enable and 'set +e' to disable (ignore) the exit
        condition on commands. The default is -e. Errors cause script to
        exit.  Use 'set -x' to enable and 'set +x' to disable (silence)
        printing a trace of the script commands as they are ececuted. The
        default is +x. No printing of a trace of script commands as they are
        executed.  From David Sidrane.
      - Print expanded variables if -x.  From David Sidrane.
      - ifconfig command:  Extend ifconfig to support 6LoWPAN.  Adapt to
        some changes in configuration variable usage.
      - Network initialization:  If IEEE802.11 selected use wlan0 instead of
        eth0 for network device name.
      - Network initialization:  NSH now has configuration options to select
        the wireless properties.  It builds the configuration structure and
        passes this to wpa_driver_wext_associate() so that it will set the
        network as configured.
      - Network initialization:  Add a new option CONFIG_NSH_NETLOCAL that
        will suppress some built in operations and will support manual
        configuration of a wireless network through command line tools.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - examples/xbc_text: Adds a test program for the XBox One controller
        driver.  From Brian Webb.
      - examples/ostest:  Add a test of robust mutexes.
      - examples/ostest: Add tests for pthread_rwlock.  Adding tests to be
        used to verify the pthread_rwlock lock works.  From Mark Schulte.
      - examples/ostest:  Additional test for rwlock and one for cancel
        cleanup handlers.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - examples/usrsocktest:  Add application for USRSOCK testing.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - examples/nettest:  Adapt for use in testing 6LoWPAN.
      - examples/nettest:  If doing loopback, but not using the official
        loopback device, then use the server should use the configured client
        IP address.
      - examples/udpblaster:  Several fixes to work with 6LoWPAN.
      - examples/udpblaster:  Add logic to bind the local UDP socket to a
        well-known address.
      - examples/configdata:  Add stacksize and priority.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - netutils/netlib:  Add IEEE 802.11 wireless IOCTL wrappers.
      - netutils/netlib: Add a helper function to convert a string to a
        6LoWPAN node address.
      - netlib and NSH: Add logic to get/set the IEEE802.15.4 PAN ID.
      - netutils/dhcpc:  Make the network device name a configuration
        option.  Was hardcoded to eth0 but may, instead, need to be wlan0.
      - netutils/dhcpc:  Remove hard-coded interface device.  Now passed as
        a parameter to dhcpc_open().  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - wireless/wapi:   Port of Wapi wireless services.  The original
        depended on features not supported by NuttX:  Removed logic that
        depends on Linux netlink.  Removed functionality that depended on
        the Linux procfs:  This includes only 1) listing of available
        interfaces and 2) listing of all routes.
      - wireless/wapi:  Create command line Wapi application based on
        Wapi sample code.
      - wireless/wapi:  wpa_driver_wext_associate() now accepts a
        configuration parameter that can be used to specify the wireless
        properties.
      - wireless/wapi:  Add basic wapi_event_stream_extract implementation.
        From Simon Piriou.
      - wireless/ieee802154:  Add iwpan and i8sak tools.  iwpan is similar
        in concept to wapi.  From Anthony Merlino (i8sak was originally
        by Sebastien Lorquet).
      - wireless/ieee802154/libmac:  IEEE 802.15.4 MAC library.
      - wireless/wext:  Add drivers_wext from the WPA supplicant; Integrate
        into NSH.  From Simon Piriou.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - apps/system/dhcpc:  Add a command to renew or establish a lease on an
        IPv4 address.
      - apps/system/ntpc:  Add a command to start or stop the NTPC daemon.
      - apps/system/ramtest: Make stacksize and priority conigurable.

    * Platform-Specific Support (apps/platform)

      - apps/platform:  Create gnu/ subdirectory that contains the one and
        only GNU C++ initialization function.  Remove all other C++
        initialization functions.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Priority inheritance:  When CONFIG_SEM_PREALLOCHOLDERS==0, there is
        only a single, hard-allocated holder structure.  This is problem
        because in sem_wait() the holder is released, but needs to remain in
        the holder container until sem_restorebaseprio() is called.  The call
        to sem_restorebaseprio() must be one of the last things the
        sem_wait() does because it can cause the task to be suspended. If in
        sem_wait(), a new task gets the semaphore count then it will fail to
        allocate the holder and will not participate in priority
        inheritance.  This fix is to add two hard-allocated holders in the
        sem_t structure:  One of the old holder and one for the new holder.
      - Priority inheritance:  sem_holder sem_findholder missing
        inintalization of pholder.  sem_findholder would fail and code
        optimization covered this up.  From David Sidrane.
      - Partial Fix priority inheritance CONFIG_SEM_PREALLOCHOLDERS=0.  From
        David Sidrane.
      - Priority inheritance:  sem_boostholderprio prevent overrun of
        pend_reprios.  The second case rtcb->sched_priority <=
        htcb->sched_priority did not check if there is sufficient space in
        the pend_reprios array.  From David Sidrane.
      - lp_worker:  Guard from pend_reprios overlow.  From David Sidrane.
      - Priority inheritance: Fixes improper restoration of base_priority in
        the case of CONFIG_SEM_PREALLOCHOLDERS=0.  The call to
        sem_restorebaseprio_task context switches in the
        sem_foreachholder(sem, sem_restoreholderprioB, stcb); call prior to
        releasing the holder. So the running task is left as a holder as is
        the started task. Leaving both slots filled thus failing to perform
        the boost/or restoration on the correct tcb.  This PR fixes this by
        releasing the running task slot prior to reprioritization that can
        lead to the context switch.  To faclitate this, the interface to
        sem_restorebaseprio needed to take the tcb from the holder prior to
        the holder being freed. In the failure case where sched_verifytcb
        fails it added the overhead of looking up the holder.  There is also
        the additional thunking on the foreach to get from holer to
        holder->tcb.  An alternate approach could be to leve the interface
        the same and allocate a holder on the stack of sem_restoreholderprioB
        copy the sem's holder to it, free it as is done in this pr and and
        then pass that address sem_restoreholderprio as the holder. It could
        then get the holder's tcb but we would keep the same sem_findholder
        in sched_verifytcb.  From David Sidrane.
      - Priority inheritance:  Fixes improper restoration of base_priority.
        From David Sidrane.
      - sem_holder:  Indexing error.  From David Sidrane.

          if (sem->holder[0].htcb != NULL || sem->holder[**1**].htcb != NULL)
      - realloc():  When realloc() has to fall back to calling malloc(), size
        including overhead was being provided to malloc(), causing a slightly
        larger allocation than needed.  Noted by initialkjc@yahoo.com.
      - scheduler:  Fix tg_flags check with GROUP_FLAG_NOCLDWAIT.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - scheduler:  Fix CHILD_FLAG_EXITED in include/nuttx/sched.h.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - binfmt/elf:  Fix offset value when calling elf_read() in
        elf_symname().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - binfmt/elf:  Fix offset value when calling elf_read() in
        elf_sectname().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - There can be a failure in IOB allocation to some asynchronous
        behavior caused by the use of sem_post().  Consider this scenario:
        (1) Task A holds an IOB. There are no further IOBs. The value of
        semcount is zero. Task B calls iob_alloc(). Since there are not
        IOBs, it calls sem_wait(). The value of semcount is now -1.  (2)
        Task A frees the IOB. iob_free() adds the IOB to the free list and
        calls sem_post() this makes Task B ready to run and sets semcount to
        zero NOT 1. There is one IOB in the free list and semcount is zero.
        When Task B wakes up it would increment the sem_count back to the
        correct value.  (3) But an interrupt or another task runs occurs
        before Task B executes. The interrupt or other tak takes the IOB off
        of the free list and decrements the semcount. But since semcount is
        then < 0, this causes the assertion because that is an invalid state
        in the interrupt handler. So I think that the root cause is that
        there the asynchrony between incrementing the semcount.  This change
        separates the list of IOBs:  Currently there is only a free list of
        IOBs.  The problem, I believe, is because of asynchronies due
        sem_post() post cause the semcount and the list content to become out
        of sync.  This change adds a new 'committed' list:  When there is a
        task waiting for an IOB, it will go into the committed list rather
        than the free list before the semaphore is posted.  On the waiting
        side, when awakened from the semaphore wait, it will expect to find
        its IOB in the committed list, rather than free list.  In this way,
        the content of the free list and the value of the semaphore count
        always remain in sync.
      - binfmt:  Fix .dtor memory allocation.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - SmartFS:  If whence is SEEK_END, the file offset shall be set to the
        size of the file plus offset. Noted by eunb.song@samsung.com.
      - mtd/progmem:  Fix incorrect target address calculation.
        progmem_read/write() is incorrectly calculating the target address,
        expecting the offset argument is given in a block number. This is
        completely wrong and as a result invalid flash region is accessed.
        Byte-oriented read/write interfaces of mtd device accept the target
        address in a byte offset, not a block number.  From Heesub Shin.
      - procfs:  Fix wrong member IDs are displayed when 'cat
        /proc/<pid>/group/status'.  From Nobutaka Toyoshima.
      - procfs:  Fix incorrect uptime with CONFIG_SYSTEM_TIME64.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - vfs/poll: round timeout up to next full tick.  Calling poll() with
        timeout less than half tick (thus MSEC2TICK(timeout) => 0) caused
        returning error with EAGAIN. Instead of rounding timeout down, value
        should be rounded up. Open Group spec for poll says:
        "Implementations may place limitations on the granularity of timeout
        intervals. If the requested timeout interval requires a finer
        granularity than the implementation supports, the actual timeout
        interval will be rounded up to the next supported value."  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - mtd/config:  erase block between block read and write.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - mtd:  Build RAMTRON and AT45DB drivers only if selected.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - mtd/config:  Fix byte read interface test.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - mtd:  Fix some unallocated and NULL pointer issues.  rwb->wrflush and
        rwb->wrmaxblocks in rwbuffer could get unallocated values from
        ftl_initialize() in some configurations.  Also fixes related assert:

          up_assert: Assertion failed at file:rwbuffer.c line: 643

        that can happen with the following configuration:

          CONFIG_FTL_WRITEBUFFER=y
          CONFIG_DRVR_WRITEBUFFER=y
          # CONFIG_FS_WRITABLE is not set

        These problems are caused by CONFIG variable differences between the
        buffer layers. TODO: This is not a perfect solution. readahead
        support has similar issues.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - net procfs:  Fix buffer corruption and refactor netdev_statistics.c.
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - FAT:  Fix 'Missing unlock' in fs_fat32.c.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - VFS fdopen:  Add missing file stream flags clearing.  Clear file
        stream structure regardless of config options. Structure clearing is
        needed as previous use of stream list entry might leave fs_flags
        set.  From Harri Luhtala.
      - mtd/smart: Fix use of uninitialized variable.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - mtd/w25.c:  Enable short delay after sector/chip erase.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - mtd/config:  Add some error checks for I/O errors.  From Juha
        Niskanen.

    * Graphics/Graphic Drivers:

      - net procfs:  Some long lines were being generated that cause buffer-
        related problems and corrupted output.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Fixed wrong assert on udp dgram send.  From Pascal Speck.
      - TCP/IPv6: Fix a compile issue when IPv6, but not IPv4 is enabled.
      - net/socket/accept:  Fix building with CONFIG_NET_LOCAL_STREAM.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Argument of network device IOCTL should be unsigned long, just as
        will all other IOCTL methods.
      - net/socket:  Fix cloning of local and raw sockets.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - TCP:  Wait for 3-Way Handshare before accept() returns.  From Simon
        Piriou.
      - TCP:  Send RST if applicaiton 'unlistens()' before we complete the
        connection sequence.
      - TCP:  An RST received during the 3-way handshake requires a little
        more clean-up.
      - IPv6:  Fix net_ipv6_pref2mask().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - network IOCTL commands:  The only place in net/netdev/netdev_ioctl.c
        where the interface state should change is for SIOCSIFFLAGS.  The
        other ones .. SIOCSIFADDR, SIOSLIFADDR, SIODIFADDR ..  should not
        change the link state.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - TCP:  Fix tcp_findlistner() in dual stack mode.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Fix as5048b by adding missing frequency parameter.  From Andreas
        Bihlmaier.
      - multiple fixes in nrf24l01 driver:  (1) signal POLLIN if there is
        already data in the FIFO, (2) send ETIMEDOUT to userspace after 2
        seconds if TX IRQ was not received, (3) handle FIFO overflow, (4)
        handle invalid pipes/empty FIFO, and (5) multiple cosmetics (missing
        static, duplicate define, missing \n).  From Leif Jakob.
      - input/mxt:  Prevent overriding i2c transfer return value.
        put_reg/get_reg function was overriding i2c transfer error code with
        i2creset return value, that lead to OK status although actual
        transfer failed.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/audio/wm8904:  WM8904 has same problem as that fixed by Juha
        Niskanen in the MaxTouch driver.
      - UART 16550:  Missing left parenthesis in function prototype.  This is
        Bitbucket Issue #41.
      - USBMSC:  Fix a wrong lun number issue.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - drivers/i2c:  Fix compile issues if CONFIG_DISABLE_PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS
        is enabled.
      - drivers/serial: I discovered a problem in the file
        drivers/serial/serial.c concerning the function uart_close(). In the
        case that a serial device is opened with the flag O_NONBLOCK the
        function uart_close() blocks until all data in the buffer is
        transmitted. The function close() called on an handle opened with
        O_NONBLOCK should not block. The problem occurred with a CDC/ACM
        device.  From Stefan Kolb.
      - drivers:  Fix some bad NULL checks.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers:  Rename newly introduced up_i2creset to I2C_RESET.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/bch:  BCH character driver bch_ioctl() always returns -ENOTTY
        for DIOC_GETPRIV command.  It should returns OK if DIOC_GETPRIV
        command succeeds.  From  EunBong Song.
      - Replace sprintf() with snprintf() in pipe.c.  From Nobutaka Toyoshima.
      - drivers/bch:  Fix 'Missing Unlock' in bchdev_driver.c.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - button_upper:  Fix interrupt enabling for poll-events.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - drivers/{sensors,usbmisc}:  Fix uninitialized I2C frequency.  From
        Juha Niskanen.

    * ARM:

      - Set EABI stack alignment for all ARM architectures (remove OABI
        code).  From David Cabecinhas.
      - Remove redundant interrupt stack coloring and OABI code.  From David
        Cabecinhas.
      - Fix off-by-one interrupt stack allocation in 8-byte aligned
        architectures.  From David Cabecinhas.

    * ARMv6-M:

      - CONFIG_DEBUG_HARDFAULT should be available for Cortex-M0 too.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAM3/4 Drivers:

      - SAM3/4:  Fixed configurations for TWI master.  Obviously an
        incomplete port from SAMA5.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Drivers:

      - SAMV7: Watchdog:  Fix Forbidden Window Value.  According the Datasheet
        the WDD Value is the lower bound of a so called Forbidden Window and
        to disable this we have to set the WDD Value greater than or equal to
        the WDV Value.  This seems to be a bug in the datasheet. It looks
        like we have to set it to a greater value than the WDV to really
        disable this Thing.  When triggering the Watchdog faster than the
        (very slow) clock source of the Watchdog fires, this Forbidden Window
        Feature resets the System if WDD equals to WDV.  This Changeset
        disables the Forbidden Window by setting the WDD Value to the Maximum
        (0xfff) Value possible.  From Frank Benkert.
      - SAMV7 EMAC:  Add conditional logic to account the fact that the
        SAMV71 has 6 rather than 3 queues after version 1.  From Ian McAfee.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis:  Fixed GPIO _PIN_OUTPUT_LOWDRIVE swapped with
        _PIN_OUTPUT_OPENDRAIN.  From David Sidrane.
      - Ensure interrupts are back on BEFORE running code dependant on
        clock_systimer.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis k66, k64, k60, k40, k20: Pin mux configure all I2C signals as
        Open Drain.  The output structure of the GPIO for I2C needs to be
        open drain.  When left at the default, one can observe on a scope the
        slave contending with the push-pull during the ACK.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis K66:  Fixed TMP2_CH1 definition.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis K66:  Define ALT1 to match ref manual.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis K66:  GPIO and pin mux cleanup.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis ADC:  Various corrections and updates.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx:

      - Add missing PINCONF_INBUFFER in several places of
        lpc4310203050_pinconfig.h.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.
      - Fix logic in preprocessor checks and correct arguments to
        lpc43_pin_config initialization.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - Fix logic error in lpc43_adc.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.
      - Use correct macro for irqid (fortunately both point to
        LPC43_IRQ_EXTINT+18).  From Andreas Bihlmaier.
      - Actually write modified value to register.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.
      - Increase number of supported PWM channels from 4 to 6.  From Andreas
        Bihlmaier.

    * Silicon Labs EFM32 Drivers:

      - EFM32 I2C: Fix timeout calculation.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - As discovered by dcabecinhas.  This fix assume the 8 byte alignment
        options for size stack size or this will overwrite the first word
        after TOS.  See
        https://github.com/PX4/Firmware/issues/6613#issuecomment-285869778.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  In stm32_allocateheap.c There are 5 not 4 configurations.
        From David Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32, STM32 F7, STM32 L4:  OTG host drivers: Do not do data toggle
        if interrupt transfer is NAKed.  Sugested by webbbn@gmail.com.
      - Save elapsed time before handling I2C in stm32_i2c_sem_waitstop().
        This change follows the same logic as in previous fix to
        stm32_i2c_sem_waitdone().  It is possible that a context switch
        occurs after I2C registers are read but before elapsed time is saved
        in stm32_i2c_sem_waitstop(). It is then possible that the registers
        were read only once with "elapsed time" equal 0. When scheduler
        resumes this thread it is quite possible that now "elapsed time" will
        be well above timeout threshold. In that case the function returns
        and reports a timeout, even though the registers were not read
        "recently". Fix this by inverting the order of operations in the loop
        - save elapsed time before reading registers. This way a context
        switch anywhere in the loop will not cause an erroneous "timeout"
        error.  From Freddie Chopin.
      - STM32, STM32 F7, and STM32 L4:  Clone Freddie Chopin's I2C change to
        similar STM32 I2C drivers.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32:  OTG host implementations of stm32_in_transfer() must obey the
        polling interval for the case of isochronous and interrupt endpoints.
      - STM32:  Fix erase sector number for microcontrolers with more than 11
        sectors.  Erase a sector from the second bank cause the bit 4 of SNB
        being set but never unsed, so trying to erase a sector from the first
        bank was acually eraseing a sector from the second bank.  From Jos
        Roberto de Souza.
      - STM32:  Make up_progmem thread safe.  Writing to a flash sector while
        starting the erase of other sector have a undefined behavior so lets
        add a semaphore and syncronize access to Flash registers.  But for
        the semaphore to work it needs to be initialized so each board needs
        call stm32_flash_initialize() on initialization, so to avoid runtime
        problems it is only using semaphore and making it thread safe if
        initialized, after all boards starts to call stm32_flash_initialize()
        we can remove the boolean and the check.  From Jos Roberto de Souza.
      - STM32:  Add workaround for flash data cache corruption on
        read-while-write.  This is a known hardware issue on some STM32 see
        the errata of your model and if you make use of both memory banks you
        should enable it.  From Jos Roberto de Souza.
      - STM32 Flash fixes.  From Jos Roberto de Souza.
      - STM32 Flash:  Missing unlock on F1 HSI off path.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F4 I2C: I needed to use DS3231,I rememberthatin past it
        worked ok, but now for stm32f4xx is used another driver (chip
        specific,stm32f40xxx_i2c.c) and DS3231 driver doesn't work.  After
        investigating a problem I found that I2C driver (isr routine) has a
        few places there it sends stop bit even if not all messages are
        managed. So, e.g., removing stm32_i2c_sendstop (#1744) and adding
        stm32_i2c_sendstart after data reading helps to make DS3231 working.
        From  Alexander Oryshchenko; verified by David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7 Serial:  Serial fix for dropped data:  (1) Revert the
        inherited dma bug from the stm32.  see
        https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/commits/df9ae3c13fc2fff2c21ebdb098c520b11f43280d
        for details.  And (2) Most all CR1-CR3 settings can not be configured
        while UE is true. Threfore we make all operation atomic and disable
        UE and restore it's originalstate on exit.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L1:  Fix IWDG and WWDG debug mode stop for STM32L15XX.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7:  Fix UART7 and UART8 IFLOWCONTROL options.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7:  Add warning for RXDMA + IFLOWCONTROL combination.
        Combination of RXDMA + IFLOWCONTROL does not work as one might
        expect.  Since RXDMA uses circular DMA-buffer, DMA will always keep
        reading new data from USART peripheral even if DMA buffer underruns.
        Thus this combination only does following: RTS is asserted on USART
        setup and deasserted on shutdown and does not perform actual RTS
        flow-control.  Data loss can be demonstrated by doing long up_mdelay
        inside irq critical section and feeding data to RXDMA+IFLOWCONTROL
        UART.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7 Serial:  Do not stop processing input in SW flow-control
        mode.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 L4 DMA: Correct bad channel definition.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 F7:  Warn if no DMA2 configured when using ADC with DMA.  Also
        correct ADC channel numbers that DMA callback passes to upper half
        driver.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 ADC:  Do not override ADCPRE_DIV when measuring
        internal voltage.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Don't think these chips have DPFPU, DTCM or ITCM.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 Flash:  macro naming errors, there is no FLASH_CONFIG_F for
        F7.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4: stm32l4x6xx_pinmap:  Update I2C4 and DCMI pins.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4: stm32l4_i2c: change wrong macro to CONFIG_I2C_POLLED.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - Fix STM32F7 I2C interrupt handler.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32:  Serial Allow configuring Rx DMA buffer size.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - STM32 CAN: I had the problem that the transmit FIFO size (= actual
        elements in FIFO) was slowly increasing over time, and was full after
        a few hours.  The reason was that the code hit the line
        "canerr("ERROR: No available mailbox\n");" in stm32_cansend, so
        can_xmit thinks it has sent the packet to the hardware, but actually
        has not. Therefore the transmit interrupt never happens which would
        call can_txdone, and so the size of the FIFO size does not decrease.
        The reason why the code actually hit the mentioned line above, is
        because stm32can_txready uses a different (incomplete) condition than
        stm32can_send to determine if the mailbox can be used for sending,
        and thus can_xmit forwards the packet to stm32can_send.
        stm32can_txready considered mailboxes OK for sending if the mailbox
        was empty, but did not consider that mailboxes may not yet be used if
        the request completed bit is set - stm32can_txinterrupt has to
        process these mailboxes first.  Note that I have also modified
        stm32can_txinterrupt - I removed the if condition, because the CAN
        controller retries to send the packet until it succeeds. Also if the
        condition would not evaluate to true, can_txdone would not be called
        and the FIFO size would not decrease also.  From Lederhilger Martin.
      - STM32 Serial:  Fix freezing serial port.  Serial interrupt
        enable/disable functions do not disable interrupts and can freeze
        device when serial interrupt is received while execution is at those
        functions. Trivially triggered with two or more threads write to
        regular syslog stream and to emergency stream. In this case, freeze
        happens because of mismatch of priv->ie (TXEIE == 0) and actually
        enabled interrupts in USART registers (TXEIE == 1), which leads to
        unhandled TXE interrupt and causes interrupt storm for USART.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 I2C:  Make private symbols static.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 GPIO:  Put back EXTI line source selection.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Store RTC MAGIC to backup reg, not to address zero.
        From Juha Niskanen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Disable serial console on stm32f103-minimum usbnsh example project
        config. Devices enumerate after this change.  From Bob Ryan.
      - Nucleo-144:  Default for choice in Kconfig was not one of the
        possible choices.
      - Nucleo-F4X1RE User LEDS: Issue #51 reports compilation problems with
        stm32_userled.c.  Reported by Gappi92.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Tiva I2C:  Correct an error in conditional compilation.
      - Tiva SSI:  Resolves issue 52 'Copy-Paste error in
        tiva_ssibus_initialize()' submitted by Aleksandr Kazantsev.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - C Library vsnprintf():  Fix precision for string formatting.  Fixes
        use of format precision to truncate input string.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - C Library vsnprintf():  If size is zero, then vsnprintf() should
        return the size of the required buffer without writing anything.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - C Library netdb: in dns_query_callback, ret != -EADDRNOTAVAIL
        condition consumes error returns including EAGAIN in this case,
        dns query retransmission doesn't work.  From Ritajina.
      - C Library netdb:  Fix time info in lib_dnscache.c.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - C Library netdb: Fix bugs in lib_gethostbynamer.c. This fix sets
        h_name in struct hostent returned by gethostbyname().  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - C Library Defect Workaround: replace '%6.6u' format with an
        equivalent '%06u'.  From Tomasz Wozniak.

    * Tools

      - Fix mksyscall host binary name.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Applications (apps/)

      - Fix some calls to task_create():  argv[0] is the first parameter, not
        the name of the task.
      - Bitbucket Issue 5:  I found an unexpected behavior in apps/
        configuration generation. Adding external symbolic link in apps/
        directory and using Make.defs for Kconfig generation, Kconfig file
        has a wrong path in the source argument. It contains original dir
        path outside of the source tree instead path to sub-directory in
        apps/.  The problem is connected with make/system symbolic link path
        resolution.  Corrected by a patch submitted by Artur Madrzak with
        Issue 5.
      - apps/: Make more globals static to avoid name clashes.  From Juha
        Niskanen.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH library:  In nsh_argexand(), if CONFIG_NSH_ARGCAT is defined but
        CONFIG_NSH_CMDPARMS defined and/or CONFIG_DISABLE_ENVIRON not
        defined, then there is a situation that causes an infinite loop in
        the parser.  Noted by Freddie Chopin.
      - NSH library:  Fix building when CONFIG_NET_USRSOCK enabled with other
        link-layers.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - NSH library:  Fix some warnings about integer/pointer casts of
        different sizes (probably only effects 64-bit simulation).
      - NSH library:  Fix open flags in nsh_codeccmd.c.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - I need to look at the registers that are at or around 0xe000ef90.
        Using mw and xd, I see that nsh does not support pointers greater
        than 0x7fffffff.  A quick look at the source shows that the pointers
        for those two commands are set with calls to strtol() rather than
        strtoul().  Changing the two pointer-setting instances to strtoul()
        fixes the problem, at least for my architecture/config.  From Ian
        McAfee.
      - NSH library: Fix a resource leak in cmd_hexdump().  From Nobutaka
        Toyoshima.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/hidkbd:  Remove call to arch_usbhost_initialize().
        That is violation of the OS interfacing rules and will no longer be
        supported.  USB host should be initialized as part of the normal
        board bring-up logic as with any other devices and should not involve
        illegal calls from applications into the OS.
      - apps/examples/usbterm:  Removed because it is not very useful and
        because it can be configured to use an illegal call into the OS.
      - examples/mm: Fix Makefile.  Built-in was not being registered.
      - examples/hidkbd:  Add some missing configuration settings.
      - examples/random:  Avoid stack overflows.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - examples/nettest:  Fix an error in pre-processor expression.
      - examples/mtdpart:  Prevent part array overflow.  mtdpart examples
        create partions and allocate from 1 index not a 0 index to part[]
        array. This cause buffer overflow for part array.  This change fixes
        this problem.  From  EunBong Song.
      - examples/can:  Fix can example app to print data when
        CONFIG_EXAMPLES_CAN_READ is defined.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - Not a clean fix, but at least makes DHCP working with
        CONFIG_NETDEV_MULTINIC.  From Andreas Bihlmaier.
      - Ensure netlib will not be broken when setip will not bring the
        network up anymore.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * CAN Utilities: apps/canutils:

      - Fix libcanard github download link to get it compiling correctly.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Fix to use the new canardInit() function.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - system/dhcpc:  Add missing argument of fprintf.

    * Tools (apps/tools):

      - The dedicated windows tool at tools/mkkconfig.bat uses $APPSDIR,
        which is not a windows shell variable, and is left uninitialized, but
        in fact should be the current directory.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

NuttX-7.22 Release Notes
------------------------

The 122nd release of NuttX, Version 7.22, was made on September 9, 2017,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.22.tar.gz and
apps-7.22.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - pthreads:  Move functions from sched/pthreads to libc/pthreads.  These
        functions just coordinate other OS interface calls but are not a
        fundamental OS interfaces and, hence, do not belong within the OS:
        pthread_yield(), pthread_once(), pthread_cond_init(),
        pthread_cond_destroy(), pthread_barrier_init(),
        pthread_barrier_destroy(), and pthread_barrier_wait().
      - Add power-related debug output.

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - RAMTRON:  Add support for splitting block writes in chunks.  Some
        Re-RAMs like MB85AS4MT have a write buffer size limitation.  From
        Boris Astardzhiev.
      - MTD: Add driver for Macronix QuadSPI flash memory.  From Simon Piriou.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - SSD1306 LCD Driver:  (1) Separate lcd_dev_s setup to separate object.
        g_oleddev takes 1 KiB because framebuffer and was allocated to .data
        section because of lcd_dev_s function pointer setup. Move lcd_dev_s
        setup out, so that g_oleddev goes to .bss and avoid wasting ROM. (2)
        Fix memory corruption caused by ssd1306_getrun(). ssd1306_getrun was
        writing one extra byte (with value 0) past target buffer when pixlen
        is multiple of 8. When pixlen was not multiple of 8, last byte of
        buffer was fully cleared, instead of modifying only the (pixlen % 8)
        bits of last byte.  (3) Add support for board power control.
        ThingseeOne has regulator for controlling display power on/off.  Patch
        adds support for board based power control to SSD1306 driver. (4) Add
        DD-12864WO-4A/SSD1309 support to SSD1306 driver. From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Sockets: Support listening sockets in the getsockname() function.
        From Roland Takacs.
      - IP Forwading:  At the IP level, network may be configured to forward
        IP packets that are not destined for the target through a different
        network device, decrementing the packet TTL.
      - IP forwarding:  Add optional support to forward broadcast and
        multicast packets.  Add missing ICMP support.
      - ICMPv6:  Add 6LoWPAN and IP forwarding support.
      - ICMPv6:  Support source link-layer address option in RA.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - TUN Driver: Add definitions that will permit TUN-only networking.
      - Socket I/F:  Created a socket interface used to provide socket support.
        Each address family has an interface that describes how to perform
        socket operations on that address family.  Currently only a couple of
        methods are defined in the socket interface call table
      - Remove CONFIG_NET_MULTILINK.  This increases code size by a little,
        but greatly reduces the complexity of the network code.
      - Network procfs:  Add support for routing tables at proc/net/route.
      - Network procfs:  Add support for network procfs statistics for the
        PF_IEEE802154 address family.
      - Network Driver Backlog:  Remove driver based backlog support.  This
        affects the entire network, but is used by only one driver.  The only
        supported RX backlog is now via common read-ahead buffering.

    * Wireless Networking/Wireless Drivers:

      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC / MRF24J60 Driver:  Extensive updates for
        association/beacon-enabled networks.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC / MRF24J60 Driver:  Hook in setdevmode from newly
        added radio attribute setting.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC: Supports get request for coordinator address.  From
        Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC: Notify radio layer of changes in devmode.  From
        Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4:  Add special attribute that can be used to perform a
        regdump of the radio.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 loopback driver:  Better simulation addressing: short
        and extended addresses, panid, and IP address conversion.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 Network Driver:  Add logic to setup the network mask,
        update the MAC-based IPv6 addressing when the network is brought up.
        The idea is that addressing changes are supposed to occur only while
        the network is down but won't take effect until the network is up
        again.
      - PktRadio:  Add an infrastructure to support networking on generic
        (non-IEEE 802.15.4) packet radios.
      - PktRadio Loopback Driver:  Add a PktRadio loopback network driver to
        testing testing with 6LoWPAN and PktRadios on the simulator.
      - Spirit Network Driver:  The Spirit1 radio (SPSGRF-915) is the first
        generic PktRadio Network driver.  Based on STMicros STack packets
        with 8-bit addressing.  We need to use the STack packets in order to
        provide the source address and automatic ACKing.
      - Network procfs:  Fix so that PktRadio address are shown correctly.
      - Networking:  Add support for some packet radio IOCTL commands.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Added handling for TCP and ICMPv6 packets.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Add configurable support for 6LoWPAN star topology.  With
        this change, the endpoints which are the 'points' of the star will
        forward all traffic to the coordinator.  The coordinator is assumed to
        be the 'hub' of the star.  This function also used IPv6 forwarding.
      - 6LoWPAN:  The original, Contiki-based design used only a single buffer
        for reassemblying larger packets.  This could be a problem issue for
        hub configurations which really need the capability concurrently
        reassemble multiple incoming streams concurrently. These was also a
        design issue in that the reassembly buffer could be corrupted by
        outgoing packets.  The design was extended to support multiple
        reassembly buffers, each associated with the reassembly tag and source
        address.  This assures that there can be be no corruption of the
        reassembly once it has started.
      - 6LoWPAN PktRadio:  Now radio agnostic.  All IEEE 802.15.4 dependencies
        have been removed or isolated so that 6LoWPAN can be used with any
        kind of packet radio.  This involved things like:  (1) generalizing
        the representation of radio MAC meta-data,  (2) changes to handle
        variable-length radio addresses,  (3) removal of all explicit IEEE
        802.15.4 types, references, and interfaces, (4) a new radio driver
        interface to return 'capabilities' of the drvier.
      - ICMPv6:  Update so that ICMPv6 can be used with 6LoWPAN.
      - IPv6 Neighbor:  Update table format to support IEEE 802.15.4 MAC
        addresses.
      - PF_IEEE802154 Address Family:  Add support for the PF_IEEE802154
        address family socket type. This socket is similar to the PF_PACKET,
        "raw" packet address family except that:  (1) it supports only
        SOCK_DRAM, not SOCK_RAW, and (2) works only with IEEE 802.15.4
        MAC-based radios.  This address family permits simple access to IEEE
        802.15.4 IOCTLs and frame-level network transfers.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - Dynamically configurable USB composite devices:  We developed a huge
        Changeset over a year ago to make USB Composite configuration
        dynamical and be able to instantiate the CDC/ACM multiple times inside
        this device.  We use this feature to switch between one in typical USB MSC + CDC/ACM configuration and up to three CDCACMs dynamically.
        I've changed the interface for some USB-Functions to receive also the
        dynamic configuration.  From Frank Benkert.
      - Franks' change remained on a branch until all issues were resolved.
        the current version in Master is complete and ready for use.
      - power:  battery_charger: add ioctl for charging input current.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - SMPS driver:  Add generic upper-half driver for SMPS.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - LED Driver:  Add support for inverted LEDS.  From Jeff.
      - LED Driver:  Add lightness correction for RGB LED driver.  From Jeff.
      - LTC4151 Driver:  Add driver for LTC4151 current and voltage monitor.
        From Giorgio Gro.
      - Serial TERMIOS:  tcdrain() implementation based on a new term ioctl.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Serial TERMIOS:  Add support for TCFLUSH.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - syslog:  Add option to use the CLOCK_MONOTONIC for time stamping. From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - HC-SR04 Driver:  Add support to HC-SR04 distance sensor.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - COMP Driver:  Add poll support.  From Pekka Ervasti.
      - BQ2429X Driver: add driver for TI BQ2429X battery charger.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - ADC Driver:  Add poll support.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - BCH Driver:  Add poll support.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - RTC Driver:  Extend the RTC framework with an alarm read ioctl
        (RTC_RD_ALARM).  Through it consumer could get configuration settings
        about previously scheduled hardware alarms (active status, hours,
        minutes, seconds).  From Boris Astardzhiev.

    * Simulation

      - sim/ipforward:  Add an IP forwarding configuration using TUN devices
        and apps/examples/tun.
      - Console:  Add non blocking read to devconsole driver.  From Simon
        Piriou.
      - Networking:  Poll for TX frames to speed up driver.  From Simon Piriou.
      - pf_ieee802154:  Add configuration for testing PF_IEEE802154 address
        family sockets.
      - ARM Simulator:  Adds necessary functionality to build Simulator under
        ARM Linux. Tested only on Raspberry3. Currently setjmp/longjmp do not
        save/restore floating point registers.  From Nickolay Semyonov.

    * MicroChip/Atmel SAML21 Drivers:

      - SAML21 I2C driver.  Developed for and contributed with permissin from
        Filament company.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - SAMD/L21 USB Driver:  Add a USB driver.  Developed for Filament Inc.
        by Offcode, LTD.  From Janne Rosberg.

    * MicroChip/Atmel SAMv7 Boards:

      - SAMV71-XULT:  Add support for the MRF24J40 radio and create a
        mrf24j40-starhub configuration.
      - SAME70-Xplained:  Add MRF24J40 support.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis USB Improvements:  usbdev clean up ensuring proper use of HW.
        Rework suspend and resume logic so they perform properly.  Made attach
        and detach functions optional. As they do not make sense for a bus
        powered device.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis SPI driver:  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  I2C driver added I2C3, reference counting and reset.
        Refactored the driver to support reference counting and reset added
        I2C3. From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis RTC:  Implementation of the alarm read function.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - configs/teensy-3.x USB:  Define USBOTG-FS Read from FLASH access in
        board config.  Allow the board config to define the USBOTG-FS to have
        Read access to FLASH.  From David Sidrane.
      - configs/teensy-3.x:  Removed call to khci_usbattach.  The call is not
        need by the driver if CONFIG_USBDEV_BUSPOWERED=y.  On a USB powered device if we are running we are attached.  From David Sidrane.
      - freedom-k66f:  Use SPI driver.  Initalize SPI1 on connector J6. No
        real use, as of yet.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx:

      - LPC43xx:  Modify up_allocate_(k)heap() to support PROTECTED mode. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP Freescale LPC4xx Boards:

      - configs/Bambino:  Add protected mode configuration to Bambino board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450

      - LC823450: Initial support for ON Semiconductor LC823450. From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - LC823450: eMMC/SD and USB support for LC823450.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450 Boards

      - LC823450-XGEVK:  LC823450-XGEVK board support.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add eMMC/SD and USB support.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

      * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 L4:  Add support for the STM32L475 family.
      - STM32 L4 RCC:  Enable ADC clock source.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32:  Allow clock frequencies > 168 Mhz on stm32f427/429.  We need
        to enable the power overdrive for this case.  This change allows the
        required bits to be set in proper sequence.  It also modifies the
        local register access operations to allow more than 16-bit registers.
        From Sebastien Lorquet .
      - STM32 F4:  Add support for STM32F433RC.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 F7:  Add new configuration option for enabling flash ART
        Accelerator and flash prefetcher.  From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 TIM:  Add the set counter function for stm32 timers.  From
        Sergey Ustinov.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Update HRTIM definitions. Add HRTIM driver.  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add HRTIM character driver.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Fix DAC triggers configuration, Add missing master timer
        logic, enable DAC triggering.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add DMA configuration. From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add burst mode configuration.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 RTC:  Port Boris Astardzhiev's RTC change for STM32L4 to STM32.
      - STM32 DAC:  Add support for HRTIM triggering.  Separate dma buffer
        configuration for channels.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 DAC:  Conditional logic for timer triggering, fix TSEL
        configuration when HRTIM, DMA request remapping, Add DMA buffers
        initialization logic.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 DAC:  Support external triggering for DMA transfer.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 L1 TIM:  Add base address for TIM11.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F4 FLASH:  Enable/disable the flash write protection on any
        sector.  I have verified it to work on the STM32 F427.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.
      - STM32 F4 Clocking:  To use an external oscillator module (not just a
        crystal) with the STM32F4, one needs to enable the HSEBYP bit in the
        RCC_CR register. This change allows an integrator to define
        STM32_RCC_CR_HSEBYP in their board.h file if they want this
        configuration.  From Jeff.
      - STM32 F4 USB:  I'm working on bringing up USB full-speed support on
        STM32F405. My board does not include a USB power switch, VBus
        sensing, over current detection, or ID pin.  This commit add a
        configSTM32_OTGFS_VBUS_ CONTROL which lets us selectively disable
        VBus sensing and control. I also sneaked in a change to disable the
        configgpio call for the ID pin, which is only used in OTG mode which
        isn't supported yet. The only pins that need to be initialized should
        be OTGFS_DP and OTGFS_DM.  From Jeff.
      - STM32 FLASH:  Add CONFIG_STM32_STM32F469 support. From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 COMP:  Add default INM configuration and some missing COMP
        1,3,5,7 code.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F33:  Add missing SYSCFG CFGR3 definitions.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 L4 Serial: Allow configuring Rx DMA buffer size.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 COMP:  Input minus pin extended selection.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 COMP:  Bind to upper half comp driver.  From Pekka Ervasti.
      - STM32 L4 DAC:  Port from STM32.  Add ADC register definitions.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 DAC:  Add option for routing DAC output to ADC.  Actually
        write something to the DAC DMA buffer.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 DAC:  Separate DMA buffer configuration for channels. From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 ADC:  Implement peripheral.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7:  Definitions for I2C4, SDMMC2.  Adapted RAM start / size to
        internal SRAM.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 I2C4:  I2C4_SDA can also be on GPIO PB7.  From Titus von
        Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 LTDC:  Option for DSI output, inconsistency: the stm32f746
        does not feature a DSI interface.  compilable with LTDC_INTERFACE and
        LTDC_USE_DSI.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 Clocking:  Added functions for DSI clock source selection.
        From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 Clocking:  Enable APB2 DSI clock.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 LTDC:  No board specific dithering values used; corrected
        dithering init.  Corrected LIPOS/LIPCR calculation.  Change only
        polarity bits in LTDC_GCR.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 Reset:  Added function for reset.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7 DMA:  DMA add dcache alignment check in stm32_dmacapable.  In
        the case dcache write-buffed mode is used (not write-through) buffer
        alignment is required for DMA transfers because  a)
        arch_invalidate_dcache could lose buffered writes data and b)
        arch_flush_dcache could corrupt adjacent memory if the maddr and the
        mend+1, the next next address are not on ARMV7M_DCACHE_LINESIZE
        boundaries.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7 SDMMC: SDMMC remove widebus limitation on DMA.  There is no
        documantation for the STM32F7 that limits DMA on 1 bit vrs 4 bit
        mode.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7 SDMMC: SDMMC add dcache alignment check in
        dma{recv|send}setup. In the case where CONFIG_SDIO_PREFLIGHT is not
        used.
      - STM32 F7 RTC: Port Boris Astardzhiev's RTC change for STM32L4 to
        STM32F7.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add GPIO device driver example.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum: Add small hello example for  STM32F103-Minimum
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum: Add support for SmartFS on Winbond W25 SPI NOR
        Flash.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum: (1) Enable CONFIG_MTD_PARTITION in Kconfig if flash
        partition is enabled and (2) Update the README.txt file with info
        needed to get SmartFS working.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add HRTIM initialization.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  UART2 is default serial port (STLINK Virtual Port).
        From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Add a configuration that was used with the MRF24J60
        for 6loWPAN testing.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Allow both IEEE 802.15.4 MAC character and network
        devices to be registered.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Add configurations to support the endpoint and hub
        roles in a star topology.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Add support for per-function-call stack checking.
        From Anthony Merlino.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Configure EDBG SPI CS just to make that it is
        disabled.
      - STM32F4 Discovery: Add logic to register the button driver and the
        user led driver if so configured.  From Jan Pobrislo.
      - STM32F4-Discovery:  Add a configuration for testing libc++.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A:  Add support for the STMicro B-L475E-IOT01A board.
        From Simon Piriou.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A: Add support for the SPSRGF/Spirit1 radio module.  Add
        a configuration for testing sprit radio.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A:  Add configurations to support a star topology.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A: add basic support for external Macronix QuadSPI flash
        memory.  From Simon Piriou.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A:  Enable UDP broadcast test in the spirit-starhub
        configuration.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add STM32F334-DISCO basic support.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32F746-Disco:  Add ADC3 support.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.
      - STM32L476-Disco:  Add a knsh configuration that may be used to test
        the PROTECTED build mode.
      - STM32F769I-DISCO:  Initial port to STM32F769I-DISCO.  From Titus von
        Boxberg.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - Move TUN ioctl command to include/nuttx/net/ioctl.h so that it will
        always be unique.
      - Math Library:  Port gamma() and lgamma() from FreeBSD to NuttX.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - C++: Compilation with recent C++ compiler needs an overloaded delete
        operator that includes a size_t size argument.  New sized delete
        operators are only for C++14 and above.

    * Build/Configuration System:

      - Initial clang compile.  From Goran Mekic.
      - Add CLANG definitions in Kconfig and Toolchain.defs.
      - drivers/wireless/ieee802154:  Moved radios to individual
        sub-directories.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - Makefile.unix: Add savedefconfig target.  From Gwenhael Goavec-Merou.
      - Add Gwenhael's change to Makefile.win and update README.txt to
        described the new make target.
      - All defconfig files are now in the compressed format created with
        'make savedefconfig.'  The original .config file can be reconstituted
        using 'make olddefconfig.'
      - Build System:  It is no longer necessary to have a unique Make.defs
        file for each configuration.  A board may share a common Make.defs
        file in the scripts directory.  Duplicate Make.defs files removed;
        common Make.defs file moved to the scripts/ sub-directory for each
        board.
      - Networking: Move INET socket interface out of net/sockets to its own
        directory net/inet.

    * Tools:

      - testbuild.sh:  Added -x to fail build on errors for continous
        integration (CI).  On CI we want to know ASAP of a failure.  From
        David Sidrane.
      - Improve configure.sh behavior:  (1) enable to call from top directory.
        (2) enable to designate direct path for config.  (3) install .gdbinit
        if the target has.  From Hidetaka Takano.
      - Update tools/configure.c to same functionality as configure.sh.  Add
        an array of optional file names.  Currently, .gdbinit is the only
        optional file but other things like IDE-specific project files might
        need to be copied as well.
      - tools/configure.sh will now copy Eclipse project files if they are
        present in the board directory file.
      - Update configure.sh, configure.bat, configure.c:  With compressed
        format, part of the installation requires that we run 'make
        olddefconfig' to restore the uncompressed defconfig format.  Also,
        while I was at it, I also added options to select host platform on
        configure command line.
      - tools/refresh.sh:  Now runs make savedefconfig before copying the new
        defconfig file in place;  Also, added a new option --defaults.  Since
        the number of defaults that you now have to answer is so large, the
        option lets you just accept the default values.  So it works just like
        --silent but still prompts you for the decision to save or discard the
        new defconfig file.
      - tools/refresh.sh:  Update so that it can find the Make.defs file in
        the new location.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH Library:  Add a Telnetd command.  This is needed when network
        initialization is deferred.  In that case, telnet daemon cannot be
        started until the network is finally initialized.  The telnetd command
        was added just for that case:  So that the telnet daemon can be
        started from the NSH command line after the network is configured.
      - NSH Library:  Misc changes needed for PktRadio support.
      - NSH Library:  Extend ifconfig command so that it can set variable
        length packet radio addresss.
      - NSH Library:  Update addroute and delroute command.  The would support either
        IPv4 or IPv6, but not both.  Allow expression of the netmask in IPv4 CIDR or
        IPv6 slash notation.  This really reduces the pain of using the commands,
        especially for IPv6.
      - NSH Library: Add a route command that will dump the content of routing table.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - examples/udp: Add configurable network device name; Add option to
        suppress network initialization which is not needed if started by NSH
        or for 6LoWPAN.
      - examples/udp:  Fix registration as a built-in program; Change some
        naming to make room for a second target.  Current one endpoint is the
        target and one is the host.  This will (eventually) allow two targets
        to be both endpoints of the test.  Change build so that both server
        and client can be on a target, rather than one on the target one on
        the host PC.  Server IP address may not be provided on the command line.
      - examples/udp:  Port numbers need to be configurable to work with
        6LoWPAN.  Need to bind the client socket to a port number.  This was
        not required before so is a apparently a change in the UDP packet
        dispatch logic.
      - examples/udp:  Enable testing with the broadcast address.
      - examples/nettest:  Support target boards on both ends of the test.
        Separate out network initialization so that it may be used by both a
        target server and a target client.  Fix client/server naming
        confusion; Add command line option to select the server address on the
        target.  Add support for both enpoints on target boards vs. one on a
        target and one on the host PC.
      - examples/nettest:  The send buffer size is now a configuration option.
      - examples/nettest:  Loopback option should be available in Kconfig for
        PktRadio.
      - examples/keypadtest: REMOVED and warehoused in the Obsoleted
        repository.  This was just a bad clone of apps/examples/hidkbd for a
        keypad driver that was removed years ago.  It also uses illegal
        function calls into the OS.  So it has no purpse:  It is redundant, it
        uses illegal interfaces, and is a test for non-existent code.
      - examples/ipforward: Add an IP forwarding example using only TUN
        devices.  Test extended to test forwarding of ICMPv6 multicast messages.
      - Implement powermonitor example for ltc4151 current and voltage
        monitor.  From Giorgio Gro.
      - examples/pf_ieee802154:  Add for testing PF_IEEE802154 sockets.  Add
        PANID to command line options; Cannot bind to address zero... There is
        no counterpart to INADDR_ANY for these radios (not now at least).
      - examples/dac: add DAC example.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - netutils/telnetc:  This a port of libtelnet to NuttX.
      - netutils/telnetd and users of telnetd:  Add support for IPv6.
      - netutils/thttpd:  Remove the netstats demo.  This depends on an
        illegal function call and cannot be supported.  That example could be
        replaced with logic that uses the procfs network entries as was done
        for NSH which had the same issue.  But I am too lazy to implement that.
      - netutils/netlib:  Add support for PktRadio IOCTL commands.
      - netutils/netlib:  Add a helper to decode short addresses.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Rewrote i8sak to be test CLI for IEEE
        802.15.4 MAC layer.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Updates to i8sak for
        association/beacon-enabled changes to IEEE 802.15.4.  From Anthony
        Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Add option to make it easy to send large
        frame for testing purposes.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Add scan command.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Add coordinfo command allowing you to
        poll various attributes related to the coordinator.  From Anthony
        Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Add a option to retry on failures to the
        assoc command (usually meaning tht the coordinator is not yet up).
      - iwireless/ieee802154/8sak:  Add reset command to reset the MAC layer.
        Adds option to assoc command -t to specify how long to wait for a
        response from the Coordinator.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - ieee802154/i8sak:  Adds command to trigger regdump of radio.  From
        Anthony Merlino.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - apps/system/composite: Update to apps/system/composite assocated with
        big changes to the composite device logic.  From Frank Benkert.
      - apps/system/composite:  Remove CDC/ACM and MSC configuration logic.
        This belongs in the OS composite initialization.  Add and argument so
        that you can select the USB composite configuration to be attached.
        Restore USB tracing; remove unused field in a structure.  Remove
        configuration settings that are no longer used.  Fix configuration
        selecting.. was setting the port number, not the configure ID.  Also
        add a configuration option to select the default configuration.
      - apps/system/composite: Add a configuration option to the boardctl()
        calls to support multiple composite device configurations dynamically.
      - apps/system/composite:  Remove references to USBMSC.  There still
        dependencies on CDC/ACM in the serial USB trace output.
      - apps/system/telnet:  Add Telnet Chat deamon and and client from
        libtelent.

    * Platform-Specific Support (apps/platform)

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Fix ELF loader up_checkarch on ARM arch.  From Cristian Condurache.
      - pthread_mutex_unlock():  Missing check for the case where
        pthread_mutex_lock() is called when the mutex is not locked.  In that
        case, it would increment the underlying semaphore above 1.  This is
        the fix for a problem noted by initialkjc@yahoo.com.
      - sig_timedwait():  Pending signal structure used after it has been
        releasd.  From anonymous Bitbucket Issue 59.
      - mm_mallinfo:  do heap end debug assert check with heap semaphore held.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - sched/:  Fix return value in sched_setaffinity().  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - Work Queues:  work_queue() must cancel existing work prior to queuing
        new work, otherwise the work queue list structure can become
        corrupted. Problem noted by Pascal Speck.
      - waitpid():  Corrects two problems when CONFIG_SCHED_HAVE_PARENT +
        CONFIG_SCHED_CHILD_STATUS are enabled:  (1) Was erroring out if the
        waited for task had already exited, and (2) was not freeing resources
        when a wait was completed.  From Boris Astardzhiev.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - VFS poll():  Fix timeout calculation.  From Jim Paris.
      - VFS poll():  Fix poll for regular files and block devices.  Open Group
        documentation says that poll (and select) support regular files and
        that 'Regular files shall always poll TRUE for reading and writing'.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - VFS epoll():  Fix epoll_wait function.  From Simon Piriou.
      - Smart FS:  Fix wrong freeing of device structure and use-after-free
        issues on error paths.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - MTD FLASH drivers:  The byte write method of several drivers had a
        cloned error:  It was not locking the bus while performing byte write
        operations.
      - MTD M2PX: If we READ while a write/erase is pending, the command is
        ignored and the write/erase continues. If we dont catch this situation
        we will return garbage to the user because the flash will not execute
        the command.  So READ MUST wait for write completion, and before that,
        the bus must be locked since it's a precondition to calling
        waitwritecomplete().  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - MTD FLASH drivers: Clone Sebastien Lorquet's m25px change to at25,
        is25xp, ramtron, and sst25xx.
      - MTD W25:  Add missing locking and fix SPI_SELECT usage for
        w25_unprotect.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - MTD W25:  Wait for BUSY flag to clear in w25_readid and
        w25_unprotect.  W25Q128 datasheet says that all instructions expect
        'Read Status Register' and 'Erase/Program Suspend' are ignored when
        BUSY flag in status register is '1'. Therefore wait for busy flag to
        clear in w25_readid() and w25_unprotect().  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Automounter: FS_AUTOMOUNTER should depend on SCHED_LPWORK.  From
        Nickolay Semyonov.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - TCP Listen: Throw error when error happens in the tcp_listen
        function.  From Roland Takacs.
      - Nework Device Management:  Do not search net device when all-zeros
        address is used.  From Roland Takacs.
      - Network Device Management:  Fix a error in netdev_register(); it was
        not handling device names properly when TUN is the only network device.
      - Network Device Management:  Fix netdev_dev_lladdrsize().  In some
        configurations, it could return the wrong size for the address of a
        packet radio.
      - Network Device Management:  Fix typo for 802.11 devices in
        netdev_register().  Was being masked before because depended on
        CONFIG_NET_MULTLINK.
      - TUN Driver:  Use critical section instead of semaphore in
        tun_ifdown().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - TUN Driver:  Do all polling on worker thread.  Otherwise, the stack
        gets very deep.
      - TUN Driver:  Currently cannot support TAP mode unless Ethenet is
        enabled.
      - netdb:  Fixed buffer size used for sending DNS queries should depend
        on the configured DNS name size.  From Ritjaina.
      - UDP networking:  The TTL (time to live) was not being set in the IPv4
        or IPv6 header unless the UDP socket was bound.
      - UDP Networking:  Fix a copy-paste error that could effect networking
        when both IPv4 and IPv6 are enabled.
      - UDP Networking:  When upd_input() cannot process a packet, it returns
        ERROR so that network drivers may try calling ipv4_input() later.  In
        this case, it must also set d_len to zero.  Otherwise, all network
        drivers will assume tht there is also an outgoing packet.  This
        results in a gratuitous ARP.
      - TCP Networking:  Correct some issues that prevent TCP from working
        correctly when both IPv4 and IPv6 are enabled.
      - TCP Networking:  TCP disconnection callbacks are not retained in a
        list.  This will support mutiple callbacks per lower-level TCP
        connection structure.  That is necessary for the cae where a socket is
        dup'ed and shares the same lower-level connection structure.  NOTE:
        There still needs to be a call to tcp_start_monitor() when the socket
        is dup'ed.
      - TCP Networking:  Start the network monitor for a socket when a TCP
        socket is dup'ed.
      - TCP Networking:  If one of the dup'ed socket's is closed, then network
        monitor resources associated with that one socket must be recovered.
        Also, in the event that socket is being used on one thread, but then
        closed on another, any threads waiting for events from the socket
        should be informed of the closure.  That latter requirement is not
        implemented because current data structures do not support it.
      - TCP Networking:   Fix a race condition.  The accept() operation is
        performed with the network locked.  However, the network is unlocked
        BEFORE the connected state is set.  Therefore, a context switch may
        occur and the socket may no longer be connected when it is marked so.
        Noted by Pascal Speck.
      - Network routing tables:  Fix a compilation error when IPv6 and
        routing are enabled.
      - Network procfs:  Fix some spacing when both IPv6 and IPv4 are enabled.
      - Network Local Sockets:  Fix accept for local stream sockets.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Network Local Sockets:  Fix server lc_waitsem overflow.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - IPv6 Networking:  Remove comparisons to the address with all ones
        set.  IPv6 does not support broadcast addresses and certainly not in
        that form.  Replace with multicast addresses beginning with 0xff02.
      - ICMPv6 Networking:  Fix a compilation issue with
        CONFIG_NET_ICMPv6_AUTOCONF=y.  From  Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Networking:  Fix net_lock returning ERROR when instead of real error
        code on failure.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - IGMPv2 Networking:  Remove special support for interrupt level
        processing (there is none) and fix some timer cancellation logic.  In
        many files, correct comments.  There is no interrupt level processing
        in the networking layer.

    * Wireless/Wireless Drivers:

      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC:  Need counting protection on the logic that
        releases the notification resources.  Otherwise, notification handlers
        may be operating with a stale pointer.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MAC: Improves internal timer logic to handle work
        serially.  Before, the MAC timer used a watchdog to schedule work with
        the high priority worker queue.  However, since everything in the MAC
        is supposed to be serialized through the use of the high priority work
        queue, but the timer uses a watchdog, there are some unintended
        consequences. To simplify, we now use the delayed work feature of the
        work queue.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 Network Driver: Update RX statistics in network driver.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MRF24J40 Driver:  Minor timing fix. Matches recommended
        value in datasheet.  Splits up driver into multiple files to make it
        easier to navigate.  Fixes issue with non-beacon enabled mode.  From
        Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MRF24J40 Driver:  Fix a bug causing radio to cease
        transmitting.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4 MRF24J40 Driver:  Fixes issues with sleeping for beacon
        enabled networking.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - EEE 802.15.4 MRF24J40 Driver:  Fix math error for calculating sleep
        count values.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE 802.15.4: Fix timing issues for beacon enabled coordinators and
        endpoints. From Anthony Merlino.
      - iIEEE 802.15.4: Fix issue with association on beacon-enabled
        networking.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Correct a few addressing issues.  Also reserve two bytes at
        the end of the frame for the FCS.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Fixes needed when extended addressing is enabled; broke short
        addressing.  Loopback driver needs to initialize the MAC meta data;
        Address decompression logic must have the MAC address to handle the
        most common compression cases.  Fix a src/dest address confusion and
        other addressing problems.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Add missing IPv6 address creation to HC1 decode logic. Fix a
        typo in an index that prevented use with HC1 and extended addresses.
      - 6LoWPAN:  TCP logic was not obeying MTU packet size limitations.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Major re-architecting of TCP logic to properly handle TCP
        stuff like ACKs and TDP windowing which were not properly covered in
        the initial design.
      - 6LoWPAN:  HC06, copy TCP header as though it were data.  TCP packet
        reassembly now seems to work OK.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Fix duplicate and bad memcpy in loopback driver.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Fix a misconception about HC06 16-bit IPv6 address
        compression.
      - 6LoWPAN:  TCP send logic was returning a failure in one case when, in
        fact, the send was successful.

    * Common Drivers:

      - USB MSC:  Use struct instead of pointer to the struct as sizeof
        argument in memset in usbmsc.c.  Otherwise it leads to error: argument
        to sizeof in memset call is the same pointer type struct usbmsc_lun_s
        * as the destination.  From Oleg Evseev.
      - USB MSC:  Add missing logic to define endpoints.  The composite
        changes broke the the non-composite, USB MSC only case because it omitted the critical setup when USB MSC was not part of the composite.
      - USB CDC/ACM.  Fix several known problems resulting from merge of USB
        composite device.  That merge now breaks some of the non-composite USB
        devices.
      - Button Driver:  Interrupts weren't enabled since nothing updates them
        after btn_poll() marks the file descriptor structure as being polling.
        From Jan Pobrislo.
      - ADC Driver:  Fix some data alignment issues in the ADC driver.
      - I2C Drivers:  Handle I2C_TRANSFER return value consistently.  Some I2C
        peripherals transfers return zero on success, others number of
        completed transfers.  Make drivers robust against this.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - COMP Driver:  Fix compilation errors when poll disabled.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.

    * Simulation:

      - Simulation:  Fix mkdir issue in GNU target.  From Simon Piriou.
      - Simulation:  x86 stack needs to be aligned to 16-byte boundaries.
      - Simulation:  Fix building 32-bit simulation on 32-bit X86.  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.

    * ARM:

      - ARM: The older ARM7 and ARM9 configurations were determining CFLAGS
        based on the GCC version 4.x.x or not.  That needx to be extended for
        5.x.x and 6.x.x which also behave like 4.x.x.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - Fixed ARMv7-M Toolchain setting.  Cortex-M4 only have Single
        Precision FPU.  From Hidetaka Takano.
      - ARMv7-M syscall logic:  Clear bit 0 in PC settings.  Bit 0 is the
        thumb mode indication and should not be set in the PC.  This extra bit
        has not caused problems in the past, but seeing it set in the PC is
        unnerving.

    * Expressif ESP32:

      - Fix ESP32 gpio enable reg and default UART pin. Modify default UART
        pin for ESP-WROOM-32. Fix gpio enable reg.  From Sungki Kim.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD21 Drivers:

      - SAMD21:  Fix some SPI-related issues.  From Matt Thompson.
      - SAMD21 SPI: I was having issues with the bus freezing up .. slaves
        holding SDL low.. so I rewrote a good portion of the interrupt logic
        based on the application notes from Atmel.  One major improvement is
        using the RXNACK flag in the STATUS register, which indicates that no
        device responded to an address packet. Assuming that the chip will
        always give an interrupt status, I believe it's possible to eliminate
        the timer as well.  From Matt Thompson.
      - SAMD/L21:  Need to preserve errno value across syslog() call.
      - SAMD21:  Changes needed to get USB working.  From Matt Thompson.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7 TWIHS:  TWIHS driver add reference counting. From David Sidrane.
      - SAMv7 CAN:  We discovered a problem with the samv7 mcan driver which
        results, under some circumstances, in a very high CPU load.  The
        problem occurs, and is easily reproducible, if the device is connected
        to a CAN network with a wrongly configured CAN speed (baud rate). In
        our tests we set the CAN speed of the device to 1000000 and the speed
        of the other CAN nodes to 500000. The device is restarted and sends a
        CANopen "bootup message" to the CAN network. This results in huge
        amount of errors messages on the CAN bus, probably because of the CAN
        feature for acknowledging error messages. The error messages cant be
        read by the device because of the misconfigured CAN speed, instead the
        CAN chip reports lots of errors, which are reported to the application
        which uses the CAN driver (CONFIG_CAN_ERRORS is enabled).  The CAN
        errors are reported from the CAN chip via interrupts and thus the
        interrupt load is very high in this scenario. To fix the problem the
        driver now disables each RX error interrupt after it is occurred.  The
        RX error interrupts are turned back on if at least one CAN message is
        received successfully.  From Stefan Kolb.
      - SAMv7 CAN:  I discovered while working on the SAMV7 mcan driver that
        the implementation of the CAN error handling is suboptimal. In the
        current implementation the many errors are implemented as pending
        errors.  But those errors are not pending, the errors occurred and are
        gone directly afterwards. This commit changes the described behavior
        and simplifies the handling of CAN errors.  From Stefan Kolb.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Boards:

      - SAMv71-XULT:  Fix MRF24J40 interrupt GPIO number.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis MPU:  Disable MPU when not in protected mode.  The hardware
        reset state of the the MPU precludes any bus masters other then DMA
        access to memory. Unfortunately USB and SDHC have there own DMA and
        will not have access to memory in the default reset state.  This change
        disabled the MPU if present on system startup.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis MPU:  Fixed warning for kinetis_mpudisable. Missing header
        file added.  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis SIM:  Ensure isolation of clock dividers for 0 value case.
        This fixes a bug were a SoC does not have a clockdivN register and
        passes a 0 for the init value.  This prevents overflow of the 0
        decremented to -1 (0xffffffff) spilling over to other clockdivN
        fields.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP/Freescale i.MX6 Drivers:

      - i.MX6: Fix a wrong parameter passed when calling irq_attach() in
        imx_serial.c.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Based on Masayuki's change, I review all serial driver vector
        attachment.  I Found one additional error and updated all relevant
        drivers to current interrupt parameter passing.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F410 Kconfig:  Fix peripherals available on the STM32 F410.
        This also adds a select for STM32_HAVE_DAC1 present on this STM32
        flavor.  From Gwenhael Goavec-Merou.
      - STM32 L4 DMA: Correct USART3_RX bad channel definition.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 PWR:  Correct PWR_SR2 REGLPS and REGLPF bits, add port I
        registers.  Also remove duplicate section from Kconfig.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7: do not enable read-modify-write on DTCM.  "AN 4667 - STM32F7
        Series system architecture and performance" recommends to disable
        read-modify-write on DTCM: "If the DTCM-RAM is used as data location
        and the variables used are byte or/and halfword types, since there is
        no ECC management in this RAM on the STM32F7 Series, it is recommended
        to disable the read-modify-write of the DTCM-RAM in the DTCM interface
        (inthe DTCMCR register) to increase the performance." From Jussi
        Kivilinna.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 TIM3/4 are always 16-bits; never 32-bits.  Noted by Eetu
        Nevalainen..
      - STM32 ADC:  Invalidate dma buffer before use.  Missing invalidation
        caused old samples being fetched from cache.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32, STM32L4, STM32F7 ADC:  Fix channel 18 sample time.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 DAC:  Fix some configuration logic. When STM32_NDAC is greather
        than 1, then second channel is always DAC1OUT2.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 DAC:  Fix compilation when DMA disabled for channel.  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F0:  Fix some funny shifts in DAC header files.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 F1 RTC fixes:  (1) Compile issues because of missing RTC_MAGIC
        #defines, (2) missing functionality based on RTC_MAGIC in RTC based on
        stm32_rtcounter.c, (3) IRQ setup from up_rtc_initialize was later
        reset in up_irqinitialize, (4) write access to backup registers
        without enabling access to backup domain, (5) possible races in
        set/cancel alarm.  tested with STM32F103C8 only.  device now wakes up
        from forced STANDBY mode by alarm.  From Leif Jakob.
      - STM32/STM32 L4 PWM:  While attempting to output a 70 MHz square wave
        from the timer output of a STM32 clocked at 140 MHz, found that the
        reload calculation was off by one.  This correction does allow the
        output up to 70 MHz.  I am not sure this affects most users
        generating slow PWM but for frequencies close to the PCLK, the
        difference becomes significant.  From JM.
      - STM32 L4 I2C: Set I2C SDA and SCL pins to open drain mode.  From Pekka
        Ervasti.
      - STM32 L4 I2C: I2C4 was writing to wrong RCC registers.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 DAC:  Report transfer as completed in DMA callback.  Without
        this even O_NONBLOCK writes block the calling task if DAC was using
        DMA.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 COMP: comparators share RCC enable bit with SYSCFG.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 ADC:  Correct EXTSEL macros.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 TIM: TIM15,16,17 are always in APB2.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 I2C: Set I2C4 SDA and SCL pins to open drain mode.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 F4 RTCC: ISR register and write protection fix.  From Eetu
        Nevalainen.
      - STM32 F7 Ethernet:  Fix typo in header; Add memory sync barrier
        between writing to DMA TX descriptor and restarting DMA TX. Avoid
        calling work_queue on pollwork if it's already queued, just skip a
        poll cycle instead.  Nucleo-144: Fix RMII TXD1 signal, connected to
        PB13 not to PG14.  From savinz.
      - STM32 F7:  Added missing config option for register value debugging.
        From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7:  No FSMC, only FMC for STM32F7.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7:  HEAP2 depends on CONFIG_ARCH_HAVE_HEAP2, not on particular
        FMC RAM type.  From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32 F7:  STM32_RCC_DCKCFGR2 has nothing to do with PLLI2S; PLLI2S is
        not dependent on LTDC, instead on SAICLK1/2 generated from PLLI2S.
        From Titus von Boxberg.
      - STM32F7: Some STM32F7 builds failed in build testing due to undefined
        STM32_SRAM1_BASE.  I think that is because stm32_allocateheap.c was
        not including chip/stm32_memorymap.h.
      - STM32 F7: dcache write-buffed mode is used (not write-through) buffer
        alignment is required for DMA transfers because a)
        arch_invalidate_dcache could lose buffered writes data and b)
        arch_flush_dcache could corrupt adjacent memory if the buffer and the
        bufflen, are not on ARMV7M_DCACHE_LINESIZE boundaries.  From David
        Sidrane.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103-Minumum SPI: SPIDEV_WIRELESS used when this has
        changed to SPIDEV_CONTACTLESS. From Nicolas Estibals.
      - configs/:  a few more places where SPIDEV_WIRELELSS should be
        SPIDEV_CONTACTLESS.
      - STM32F103-Minumum:  Fix a BUG when reading from output pin.  We need
        a different read_ops to read from output pin. This patch fixes the
        issue.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minumum: Use separated read_ops for GPIO interrupt pins.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minumum: Fix compiler error in MCP2415 logic.
      - STM32F746G-DISCO:  Fix for compilation of STM32F746G-DISCO.  From Ivan
        Ucherdzhiev.
      - STM32F746G-DISCO:  Fix for stm32f746g-disco board for button support
        with interrupt.  This change is tested with buttons app example and it
        is working with interrupts (signals). I tried the test with polling
        but at this point it doesn't work.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.

    * Build System

      - Fix -Werror=implicit-fallthrough on gcc7.  From Julien Lecoeur.
      - configs/Board.mk:  Remove comment form end of line. In windows native
        build, it appears to be trying to make that an extra parameter to the
        AR command.  From Jeff.
      - configs/Board.mk:  Remove quotes from CONFIG_ARCH_FAMILY.  Causes
        problems with Windows native build.  From Jeff.
      - Makefile.win would only create uboot images for ARM.  MIPS support
        also needed.  From Lwazi Dube.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - C++:  Fix C++ __guard implementation for ARM.  The standard C++ ABI
        that most platforms follow defines __guard to be 64 bits.  The existing
        implementation of libxx_cxa_guard.cxx follows this.  However, the
        32-bit ARM C++ ABI defines it as 32 bits instead, and changes the
        meaning slightly so only the lowest bit is used. This matters because
        GCC creates guard symbols without regards to what libxx_cxa_guard.cxx
        says.  So on ARM, gcc allocates 4 bytes, but __cxa_guard_release
        writes 8 bytes, zeroing out another unlucky variable nearby. Fix it
        by special-casing 32-bit ARM in libxx_cxa_guard.  From Jim Paris.
      - C++:  In cwchar it uses CONFIG_LIBC_WCHAR to only export the wc/mb
        functions.  When a build does not want to use wide or multibyte char
        CONFIG_LIBC_WCHAR is not set. Therefore we should to only export the
        wc/mb functions when defined.  Regardless of the stat of
        CONFIG_LIBC_WCHAR the non mb/wc  definitions such as mbstate_t,
        wint_t, wctype_t need to be exported.  From David Sidrane.
      - C Library:  Fix an error in mkstemp() the could result in an infinite
        loop.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - C Library:  (1) Fix an error in mkstemp() the could result in an
        infinite loop.  (2)  Fix for wrong output in some cases.  For Example:
        (a) input: "FILEXX", output: "FILE00" and repeats same output for
        further invocations of mkstemp(). But, the ouput has to be FILE01,
        FILE02, ...., FILEZZ. (b) input: "FILEXXXXXX", output: "FILE100000",
        for next invocation "FILE200000" and so on.  But it's good, if the
        ouput goes like FILE000001, FILE000002, ..., FILE000101, ...  From
        Lokesh B V.
      - C Library:  gethostbyname_r: Fix check for space in buffer.
      - C Library:  inet_ntop() was printing negative values for fields >127.
      - Math Library:  Fix wrong ouput in modf() API.  The sign of integral
        part given by the modf() should be same as sign of input.  But for
        inputs between 0 and 1, the sign of integral part was not same as
        sign of input.  From Lokesh B V.
      - Math Library:  Fix wrong ouput in ceil() API.  Ex:for input x = 1.0,
        the output should be 1.0, but the ouput was 2.0.  From Lokesh B V.

    * Tools

      - tools/testbuild.sh: Fix missing $ before variable name.
      - tools/mkdeps.c:  Eliminate a warning. MAX_PATH may already be defined
        in included system files.  From Jeff.

    * Applications: apps/

      - All apps/ Makefiles:  Add .PRECIOUS: apps/libapps.a to every
        Makefile.  Hopefully this will end awkward problems when you Control-C
        out of a build and libapps.a is deleted.
      - platform/Makefile: More attempts to fix for Windows native build.
        Backslash as a delimiter causes problems in pattern subsitutions.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - NSH network initialization: Fix some ieee 802.15.4 initialization
        logic.  It should not set the saddr or panid; those cannot be
        hard-coded but must come from the coordinator.  Re-factor a function
        that has gotten too big and too complex.  Do not set the IP address
        for 6loWPAN.  The 6loWPAN stack uses IP address that derive from the
        ieee 802.15.4 addressing and cannot be (safely) configured by the user.
      - NSH Library: Fix copy-paste typo in nsh_usbconsole.c.  From Oleg
        Evseev.
      - NSH Library: fix size of 6LoWPAN extended address.
      - NSH Library: Fix build break in nsh_command.c with IPv4/IPv6 dual
        stack.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - NSH Library: Correct parsing of ifconfig so that you can specify the
        HW address without specifying the IP address.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - examples/smart: Fix some compilation errors.  Obviously this test has
        not been used in a LONG time.
      - examples/udp:  Renaming some files to prevent name collision in
        libapps.a.  Fix naming of a configuration setting.
      - examples/nettest:  Renaming some files to prevent name collision in
        libapps.a
      - examples/nximage:  Remove unused global variable.
      - examples/nsh:  Remove APPNAME, PRIORITY, and STACKSIZE settings from
        Makefile to avoid showing nsh in Builtin Apps.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - netutils/tftpc:  Missing header file causes errors in some
        configurations.
      - netutils/tftpc:  TFTPC depends on CONFIG_NET_IPv4.
      - netutils/netlib:  Fixes to work when only USRSOCK is enabled.
      - netutils/netlib: Fix netlib_nodaddrconv() so that its return type is
        the same as other address conversion functions.
      - netutils/netlib: If only PF_IEEE802154 socket family is enabled, then
        must use SOCK_DGRAM.
      - netutils/ftpc:  Fix some memory leaks.  From Boris Astardzhiev.
      - netutils/thttpd: Fix a malformed if condition detected by GCC 6.x.x.
      - netutils/dhcpd: Prevent buffer overflow in dhcpd_addoption.  offset
        represents distance from start of option buffer.  So this should be
        changed current option pointer minus start of buffer.  From EunBong
        Song.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Need to increment the next_saddr after
        each successful association.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - correct copy-paste typo in comments in composite_main.c  From Oleg
        Evseev.
      - system/dhcpc:  The DHCPC renew command did not build correctly due to
        naming problems.  Noted by Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - system/dhcpc: Fix warning about renew_main.o appear twice in rule.

    * Tools (apps/tools):

      - tools/mkkconfig.bat: Use %cd% instead of %~dp0 for usage of APPSDIR
        in this batch file.
      - tools/mkkconfig.bat:  Remove quotes in echo.  These were begin
        Echo'ed and generating double quots in the output.  From Jeff.
      - Windows build fixes:  tools/mkkconfig.bat - switch APPSDIR path to
        use forward slashes for kconfig-frontends. interpreters/ficl -
        Reorder some targets that causes GNUwin32 make to behave badly.  From
        Jeff.

NuttX-7.23 Release Notes
------------------------

The 123rd release of NuttX, Version 7.23, was made on December 4, 2017,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.23.tar.gz and
apps-7.23.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - sem_open() should return SEM_FAILED on any failures.  This is change
        in the POSIX specification since the original sem_open() was written
        so many years ago.
      - exec():  The non-standard interface exec() is now enshrined as a
        official NuttX API.  I really dislike doing this but I think that
        this is probably the only want to load programs in the protected
        mode.  It is currently used by some example code under apps/ that
        generate their own symbol tables for linking.  Other file execution
        APIs relay on a symbol table provided by the OS.  In the protected
        mode, the OS cannot provide any meaning symbol table for execution
        of code in the user-space blob so that is they exec() is really
        needed in that build case.  And, finally, the interface is
        completely useless and will not be supported in the KERNEL build
        mode where the contrary is true:  An application process cannot
        provide any meaning symbolic information for use in linking a
        different process.
      - OS Internal Functions:  Rename many OS internal functions so it is
        clear that they are not part of the application interface.  All
        internal functions with the sem_* prefix became nxsem_*, sig* become
        nxsig_*, mq_* become nxmq_*, etc.
      - Cancellation Points:  Add new cancellation point interface,
        check_cancellation_point().
      - Signals:  Add logic to wake up a thread that is waiting on a signal
        if it is canceled.
      - sigtimedwait():  Add logic to suppress the wait if there is a
        pending cancellation.
      - clock_nanosleep():  Implement clock_nanosleep().  nanosleep() is now
        reduced to a libc wrapper around clock_nanosleep().
      - task_delete():  Do not permit user applications to delete kernel
        threads.
      - kthread_create():  Rename kernel_thread() to kthread_create() for
        better naming consistency with task_create() and kthread_delete().
      - boardctl():  Remove the BOARDIOC_GRAPHICS_SETUP command.
      - TCB:  Move POSIX thread specific data from pthread TCB to common TCB
        structure.  This change allows using pthread_getspecific and
        pthread_setspecific from main thread. Patch also enables using
        pthread data with config option CONFIG_DISABLE_PTHREAD=y. From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - mm:  Remove the CONFIG_GRAN_SINGLE configuration option.  It adds no
        technical benefit (other than some minor reduction in the number of
        interface arguments) but adds a lot of code complexity.  Better
        without it.
      - mm:  Add a function to get information about the state of the
        granule allocator.  This is the moral equivalent of mallinfo().

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - MT25Q Serial FLASH:  Add support for Micron MT25Q series MT25Q128.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - MX35LFxGE4AB:  Add an MTD driver for Macronix MX35LFxGE4AB serial
        NAND flash.  From Ekaterina Kovylova.
      - FileMTD:  Add block device MTD interface.  Block MTD interface
        allows using block device directly as MTD instead of having to use
        file-system in between.  NOTE that this provides the opposite
        capability of FTL which will let you use an MTD interface directly
        as a block device.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - BCH:  The character driver to block device access now supports an
        IOCTL to get the geomtry of the underlying block device.
      - mkfatfs:  Remove mkfatfs from the OS.  This is a user-space
        application and belongs in apps, not in the OS.
      - procfs:  Implements procfs /proc/fs/blocks and /proc/fs/usage files,
        replacing the NSH df command.  Also implements procfs /proc/fs/mount
        file, replacing the NSH mount command when there are no arguments.
      - procfs:  Add /proc/meminfo.  This is an alternative way to get the
        information that was previoulsy available in apps/system/free.
        apps/system/free was removed beause it made illegal calls into the
        OS violating the portable interface.  This new procfs entry provides
        the same information with no such violation.  it also provides
        information about the kernel heap (formerly /proc/kmm), about the
        use of program memory(formerly /proc/progmem).  And also information
        for the page table usage in the KERNEL build.
      - UserFS:  Adds the UserFS client and of the UserFS feature in
        general.  Initially used Unix domain local sockets instead of
        message queues.  Easier to transfer big data in local sockets than
        message queues.  However, that lead to certain inescapable deadlock
        conditions So the IPC was converted to UDP LocalHost loopback
        sockets.  The problem with the local sockets is that they do require
        operations on the top level pseudo-file system inode tree.  That
        tree must be locked during certain traversals such as enumerate
        mountpoints or enumerating directory entries.  This conversion is
        unfortunate in the sense that Unix local domain sockets are
        relatively lightweight.  LocalHost UDP sockets are much heavier
        weight since they rely on the full UDP stack.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - Framebufer character driver:  Add framebuffer character device driver.
      - LCD Framebuffer:  Add support for a generic front-end that will
        convert any LCD driver into a framebuffer driver.
      - Framebufer character driver:  Include support for LCD drivers that
        use a simulated framebuffer and must receive explicit notification
        when there is an update to a region in the framebuffer.
      - LCD:  Make LCD driver configuration indepently selected from NX
        graphics configuration.  This makes things awkward and loses some
        error checking but is a necessary step in order to make LCD drivers
        usable when the NX graphics system is disabled.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Networking:   Add implementation of logic for SIOCGIFCONF and
        SIOCGLIFCOF IOCTL commnds.
      - Network IOCTLs:  Add support for the SIOCGIFBRDADDR ioctl() command.
      - Routing Tables:  Permit IPv4 and IPv6 routing tables to be of
        different sizes.
      - Routing Tables:  Adds support for read-only routing tables.  Prior
        to this change, routing tables were only support in RAM and had to
        be initialized with explicit logic to add the necessary routes to
        the routing table.  With this change, routes may be defined in the
        pre-initialized, read-only routing table provided by the
        board-specific logic.
        This would be particularly useful, for example, in the case where
        there is only a single network adaptor and you want all output
        packets to go to the single adaptor in all cases.  So for that
        behavior you could add a read-only routing table to the
        board-specific long that contains a single entry, the default route:
        0.0.0.0/0.
      - Routing Tables.  Added support for routing tables in files in a file
        system.  This might be useful for customized, per-unit routing
        tables. There are two issues with it however:
         1. Reading from file system on a per packet basis could be slow.  I
            think it probably should have a small, in-memory cache of most
            frequently used routes for good problem.
         2. Currently the delroute logic is disabled due to a problem with
            the design.  NuttX does not currently support truncate().
            Therefore, it is not possible to delete entries from the routing
            table file. In this current implementation, that leaves the last
            entry intact at the end of the file.  An alternative design
            might include a tag on each record to indicate if the record is
            valid or not.  That would work but would add complexity to the
            other routing table functions.
      - Routing Tables:  Add support for an in-memory routing table cache in
        order to improve performance when the routing table is retained in a
        file. The cache holds the most recently used routing table entries
        and so can eliminate some file access.  Flush the in-memory cache
        when any entry is deleted from the routing table.  When a router
        matching an IP address is found, add the routing table entry to the
        cache.
      - Routing Tables:  Add logic to mark a route as most-recently-used in
        the route cache.
      - ICMP:  This change adds support for semi-standard IPPROTO_ICMP
        AF_INET datagram sockets.  This replaces the old ad hoc, nonstandard
        way of implementing ping with a more standard, socket interface.
      - ICMPV6: This commit adds support for semi-standard IPPROTO_ICMP6
        sockets.  This is a replacement for the non-standard ICMPv6 ping
        support that violated the portable POSIX OS interface.
      - ICMPv6:  Add option to manually specify router prefix in router
        advertisement message.  From Sakari Kapanen.
      - Local Sockets:  This commit modifies the Unix domain local socket
        design. Local sockets are built on top of pipes.  The Local socket
        implementation maintained file descriptors to interrupt with the
        pipes. File descriptors have the bad property that they are valid
        only while running on the thread within the task that created the
        local socket.
        As a policy, all internal OS implementations must use "detached"
        files which are valid in any context and do not depend on the
        validity of a file descriptor at any point in time.  This commit
        converts the usage of file descriptors to detached files throughout
        the local socket implementation.

    * Wireless Networking/Wireless Drivers:

      - IEEE-802154:  Adds support for receiving MAC events via IOCTL through
        socket interface.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IEEE-802154:  Simplifies notify() and rxframe() calls to a single
        notify() call. dataind's and all other "notifs" are now "primitives"
        which aligns with standard terminology  From Anthony Merlino.
      - MAC802154:  Add support for getting promiscuous mode state From
        Anthony Merlino.
      - MAC802154 Character Driver: When in promiscuous mode, the char
        driver sends the entire frame, including the MAC header.  This
        change adds an offset field indicating the header-payload boundary.
        It is set to 0 when not in promiscuous mode as the header is not
        passed to the application
      - 6LoWPAN: Remove CONFIG_NET_6LOWPAN_FRAMELEN.  In this case where
        multiple radios are supported, this may not be a constant.  6LoWPAN
        now always queries the driver to get the maximum frame length.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Support sending to a router that is on-link and may be
        able to forward the packet for us if the destination is not
        reachable directly.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - XBee:  Adds XBee S2C (802.15.4 firmware) support. XBee driver
        emulates mac802154 interface.  From Anthony Merlino.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - PowerLED:  Add upper-half driver for high power LED driver (powerled)
        From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - RTC Driver:  Add periodic alarms to upper and lower halves.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - Pipes:  Fix writing large buffers not triggering POLLIN for reader
        poll.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - USB CDC/ACM Device:  Add support for RX flow control to the CDC/ACM
        driver.
      - USB CDC/ACM Device:  Add support for flow control TERMIOs in CDC/ACM
        driver.
      - USB RNDIS Device:  Add RNDIS-over-USB driver.  From Sakari Kapanen
        with added Hi-Speed support from Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Loop Driver:  Don't use file descriptors... Use the internal file
        system interfaces so that the loop device can be shared across
        threads.
      - APA102 LED controller:  Add driver for APA102 LED controller.  These
        LEDs are used on LED Strips and are controlled over SPI.
      - INA219.  Add INA219 Driver.  The INA219 is a combined voltage and
        current sensor that can measure up to 26 volts and a current that
        depends on an external shunt resistor.  Connection happens via
        i2c/smbus and the chip features a power supply rail that is
        independent from the measured voltage, so it can measure low
        voltages.  Right now it measures bus voltage and current, and does
        not use the internal calibrated current reading, nor the available
        power measurement.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - PCA9555:  The IRQ subsystem now supports passing a void * parameter
        to IRQ handlers.  Use that method to support multiple PCA9555
        devices, by passing a pointer to the device to the board defined irq
        handler.  Now the CONFIG_ for multiple PCA devices just allocates
        device structures dynamically instead of statically when not enabled.
        The same interrupt handler is entered with the device structure
        parameter in all situations, multiple or single PCA. One should
        still be careful if multiple PCA devices share the same IRQ.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.
      - APDS-9960: Add driver for the APDS-9960 gesture sensor.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - MAX7219:  Add support to MAX7219 LED Matrix as LCD interface.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - WM8774:  Add WM8774 audio DAC support.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Nunchuck: Add Nintendo Wii Nunchuck driver.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * Simulation

      - Simulation:  Add a configuration for non-graphical testing of the
        frambuffer character driver using apps/example/fb.
      - Simulation:  Add a configuration for testing the UserFS using
        apps/examples/userfs.

    * Broadcom BCM2708:

      - BCM2708:  Add enough infrastructrue (more stubs) to get a clean
        compilation of the Pi Zero configuration (with many undefined things
        at link time).   This includes several register definition header
        files (some from Alan Carvalho de Assis), basic interrupt handling
        logic, boot-up files, GPIO support, tickless timer, build and
        configuration logic

    * Broadcom BCM2708 Boards:

      - Raspberry Pi Zero.  Basic board support at configs/pizero.  Untested
        in this release and still some remaining issues.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500-Relax:  Add config for UART3 on RXD P0.0 and TXD P0.1 pins.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP Freescale LPC17xx Boards:

      - Open1788:  Add initialization of Framebuffer driver.  Add
        configuration for testing the framebuffer driver.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx:  Add LPC43xx CAN driver.  From Alexander Vasiljev.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Boards:

      - MCB1700:  Add support for Keil MCB1700 board.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.
      - Open1788:  Add support for the discrete joystick driver.
      - Open1788:  Add a configuration for testing pdcurses with discrete
        joystick.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450

      - LC823450:  Add ADC driver and watchdog drivers.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - LC823450:  Add IPL2 support.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450:  Add I2S support. From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450:  Add auto LED for CPU activity.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450 Boards

      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Enable ADC and watchdog driver.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add IPL2 support.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add WM8774 support. From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add auto LED support.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Enable CONFIG_SMP for audio. From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add rndis configuration.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - ARM Kconfig:  Add support for classic ARM11 architecture selections.
      - STM32 Tickless:  Removes the restriction to 16-bit counts when a
        32-bit timer is used for tickless operation on the stm32.  As it
        was, the restriction is very limiting, especially if one wants high
        granularity and large achievable intervals and has the hardware
        (namely the 32bit timers) available.  From Rajan Gill.
      - STM32 L4 Kconfig:  Add some L486 and L496 chips.  From Juha Niskanen
      - STM32 F7:  Adds architecture support for the STM32 F72x and F73x
        families.  From Bob Feretich.
      - STM32 F7:  Allow changing voltage output scaling setting and
        prevents enabling over-drive mode for low frequencies (STM32 F74xx,
        75xx, 76xx, 77xx). From Jussi Kivilinna.  Changes replicated for
        the 72xx and 73xx families.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 ADC:  Added support for ADC's IO_ENABLE_TEMPER_VOLT_CH ioctl
        on STM32F10XX and STM32F20XX.  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - STM32 Wakeup: Add logic for enabling wakeup pins.  From Oleg Evseev.
      - STM32 PWR:  Adds stm32_pwr_getsbf and stm32_pwr_getwuf functions
        that return the standby flag and the wakeup flag PWR power
        control/status register.  From Oleg Evseev.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Sdd support for capture, chopper, deadtime and dump
        registers.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 RTC:  Canceling an alarm marks it as inactive.  From Juha
        Niskanen
      - STM32 Serial:  Add interface to get uart_dev_t by USART number,
        stm32_serial_get_uart().  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F33xx ADC:  Initial ADC support for the STM32F33XX.  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 F33xx ADC:  Add ADC DMA support to STM32F33 configuration.  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 L4 ADC:  Port analog watchdog ioctl commands from the Motorola
        MDK.  From Juha Niskanen
      - STM32 L4 ADC:  Add option for routing ADC data to DFSDM, fix DFSDM
        DMA. From Juha Niskanen
      - STM32 L4 ADC:  Add PM hooks from Motorola MDK
      - STM32 L4 FLASH:  Add function for modifying device option bytes,
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 DFSDM:  Add peripheral support for digital filters for
        sigma-delta ADCs.  Initial version.  Timer trigger support is not
        completed and there is some issue with DMA.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 I2C:  Port then STM32 F7 I2C driver to STM32 L4.  STM32L4 I2C
        driver is in work-in-progress state (plentiful of TODOs and
        #warnings) and lags many features found in more up-to-date STM32 I2C
        drivers.  The peripheral on STM32F7 and STM32L4 are identical except
        for L4's 'wakeup from stop mode' flag and STM32F7's I2C driver is in
        more 'ready to use' state.  The I2C clock configuration is kept the
        same as before (I2CCLK = PCLK1 80 Mhz) instead of switching to
        STM32F7 arch default that is I2CCLK=HSI. Further work would be to
        add configuration option for choosing I2C clock source instead of
        current hard-coded default.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Add up_rtc_getdatetime_with_subseconds
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Change maximum alarm time from 24h to one month.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Add support for periodic interrupts with
        (experimental) CONFIG_RTC_PERIODIC.   From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 SDMMC:  Add support for an SDMMC driver.  From Miha Vrhovnik.
      - STM32 L4 Serial:  Suspend serial for Stop mode.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 Serial/PM:  STM32L4 serial PM interface improvements:
        Check rx/tx buffers for pending data in pmprepare.  Remove adhoc PM
        interfaces and move serial suspend functionality behind CONFIG_PM.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add board support for APA102 driver.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add ADC support on stm32f103-minimum board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add support for LM75 in the stm32f103-minimum
        board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add an ADPS-9960 example configuration.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add board support for MAX7219 LED Matrix
        controller.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add USB MSC device initialzation to
        stm32f103-minimum.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add framebuffer driver initialization for
        stm32f103-minimum board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Add Nunchuck board support for
        stm32f103-minimum board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Add support for JLX12864G display on STM32F4
        Discovery board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Viewtool-STM32F107:  Add support to auto-mount the procfs file system.
      - Photon:  Support SPI1 and SPI3.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add lower half driver for high power LED
        (powerled).  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add flash mode support for powerled driver. From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add powerled example configuration.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add lower-half driver for SMPS (buck-boost onboard
        converter).  From Mateusz Szafoni
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add logic for zero latency high priority interrupts
        example.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add highpri example configuration.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery:  Added support for the LIS3DSH accelerometer on
        the STM32F4 Discovery rev. C boards.  From Florian Olbrich.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery: ROMFS for STM32F4 Discovery board.  From Tomasz
        Wozniak.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery:  Add a USB MSC configuration.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery:  RNDIS support on STM32F4Discovery + DM-STF4BB.
        NOTE: MAC address for the host side starts 0xaa.  This assignment
        scheme should be fixed later.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - STM32 F4 Discovery:  Add STM32F4 Discovery board support for
        Nunchuck joystick.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM3240G-EVAL:  Add a configuration for testing the Framebuffer
        character driver using the LCD framebuffer front.
      - STM3240G-EVAL:  Mount procfs if enabled.
      - STM3240G-EVAL:  Add support for pdcurses and the pdcurses demo
        programs in the 'fb' configuration.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Adds SD card, automount, and syslog file
        support and fixes a few minor issues.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - Clicker2-STM32:  Adds support for USB RNDIS device.  From Anthony
        Merlino.
      - Olimex STM32-H407:  Add serial support on the on-board UEXT
        connector.  Add USART6 for UEXT connector.   Add nsh_uext
        configuration and README update.  From Jan Pobrslo.
      - Nucleo-F410RB:  Add support for the nucleo-F410RB board.  From
        Gwenhael Goavec-Merou.
      - STM32F429i-DISCO:  Add framebuffer driver initialization.  Add a
        framebuffer (fb) configuration.
      - STM32F429i-DISCO:  Add logic to auto-mount procfs.  Enable procfs in
        all configurations that use NSH.
      - STM32F429i-DISCO:  Enable support for the STMPE811 touchscreen
        controller.  Enable touchscreen and also the touchscreen testa at
        apps/examples/touchscreen in the fb configuration.
      - STM32F429i-DISCO:  Convert NxWM configuration to use LTDC
        framebuffer driver instead of SPI serial.  Also reduce number of
        layers from 4 to 1 in fb configuration.  Only one layer is used.
      - STM32L476-MDK:  Add support for the on-board LEDs.
      - Nucleo-L496ZG:  Add DFSDM initialization.  From Juha Niskanen
      - Nucleo-L496ZG:  Add support for SDMMC driver.  From Miha Vrhovnik.
      - Nucleo-L496ZG:  Enable I2C4 bus with i2ctool in NSH configuration.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - Nucleo-L496ZG:  Make HSE on Nucleo-L496ZG default to enable USB.
        From Miha Vrhovnik.
      - Nucleo-F746ZG:  Use the serial console over /dev/ttyACM0 by default.
        The Nucleo-F746ZG doesn't come with Arduio RS-232 shield, then it is
        better to use the serial over the /dev/ttyACM0 that is created
        automatically when the board is plugged in the computer.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-144:  Adds support for the Nucleo-144 boards with
        STM32F722ZE.  From Bob Feretich.

    * ZiLOG Z80

      - z80/include: compiler.h, limits.h, types.h:  Update SDCC/z80 files
        to include support for long long, inline, __FILE__, and __func__.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - include/:  Add stdnoreturn.h.  Holds definitions for the C11
        noreturn keyword.  Applies to C too.
      - include/netinet/tcp.h:  Add trivial standard tcp.h header file.
      - libc:  Add support for readv() and writev().
      - libc:  Adds tcflow().
      - libc:  Add support for sigwait().
      - libnx:  Changes to allow the font subsystem to be built without
        enabling the entire graphics system (CONFIG_NX).  Adds
        CONFIG_NXFONTS and CONFIG_NXGLIB.  Needed to duplicate some Kconfig
        setting for NXFONTs if it can be configured and built independently
        of NX.

    * Tools:

      - tools/configure.sh:  Add special support so that you can start with a
        windows native configuration and install on a different host (and
        vice versa).
      - tools/configure.c:  Duplicate new functionaity added to configure.sh.
      - tools/configure.sh:  This commit adds a -m option for macOS. For
        anyone not aware, Apple renamed OSX to macOS recently; thus the 'm'
        instead of 'o'. This does not change the other uses of *_OSX to
        macOS. From jeditekunum.
      - tools/configure.c:  Update functionality to match last change to
        tools/configure.sh.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  mount command no long uses the non-standard OS
        interface foreach_mountpoint().  Now simply cats /proc/fs/mount
        when there are no arguments to the mount command.
      - apps/nshlib:  df command no long uses the non-standard OS interface
        foreach_mountpoint().  Now simply cats /proc/fs/blocks or
        /proc/fs/usage.
      - apps/nshlib:  The free commands no longer used mallinfo() to get
        the state of the use heap.  Two reasons:  That is not useful
        information in the kernel build.  And (2) there are other memory
        resources of interest in other configurations such as the Kernel
        heap in PROTECTED and KERNEL builds, and the prog mem uses when
        FLASH is used to hold modifiable data.  The free command has been
        extended to just dump the content of procfs entries and to include
        all of these other memory resources of the procfs entries are
        available.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/fb:  Add a simple test for the framebuffer character
        driver..
      - apps/examples/ostest: sem_open() now returns SEM_FAILED in the
        event of a failure.
      - examples/ostest:  Extend cancellation test to make sure that
        cancelable threads waiting on a message queue or on a signal can be
        canceled.
      - Added a simple reader example for the LIS3DSH acceleration sensor
        on STM32F4Discovery.  From Florian Olbrich.
      - apps/examples/apa102:  Add a Rainbow example for APA102 LED Strip.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/flowc:  Add a simple test of serial hardware flow
        control.
      - Add powerled driver example.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - apps/examples/ina219: A simple infinite loop that polls the INA219
        sensor and displays the measurements.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - apps/examples/alarm:  Add options for reading alarm value and
        canceling it.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Add -n samples to lm75 app and replace Centigrade with Celsius.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/adps9960:  Add ADPS-9960 example.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - apps/examples/obd2:  Add OBD2 example application.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/userfs:  Add a test case for verifying UserFS.
      - apps/examples/smps: add SMPS driver example.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - apps/examples/pdcurses:  Bring in pdcurses demos and make them
        conform to the NuttX coding style.
      - apps/examples/pdcurses:  Add a very simple example that just shows
        the entire character set (7-bit only).  It adapts to the size of
        the framebuffer and, hence, can be used with very tiny displays.
        In fact it looks really dumb on big displays.
      - apps/examples/nunchuck:  Add Nunchuck example application.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * File System Utilities: apps/fsutils:

      - apps/fsutils/mkfatfs:  Move mkfatfs from the OS to here.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add netlib_ipv6adaptor() and
        netlib_ipv4adaptor().
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add helpers for reading the routing table:
        netlib_read_ipv4route() and netlib_read_ipv6route().
      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Add new utilities netlib_ipv[4|6]router()
        that can be used to determine the IP address of a router that would
        be used some some destination IP address that is not locally
        accessible.
      - apps/netutils/ftpc:  Adds support for IPv6 and fixes various
        transfer issues.   From Anthony Merlino.

    * CANUtilities: apps/canutils:

      - apps/canutils/libobd2:  Add libobd2 for NuttX.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.

    * Graphics: apps/graphics:

      - graphics/traveler:  Convert to use the framebuffer driver.
      - apps/graphics/pdcurs34:  This commit brings the public domain
        pdcurses library into NuttX.  NuttX graphics support based on the
        framebuffer character drivers has been integrated.  Input is
        currently limited to a discrete joystick driver.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Adds socket interface support. You
        can now use both socket or char driver to control the MAC layer.
        From Anthony Merlino.
      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Adds sniffer port option and a few
        other get/set parameters.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8sak: Changes 'notif' to 'primitive'
        corresponding to the changes in the Kernel.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8sak: Channel setting is now saved
        locally, so when performing a startpan or assoc, the channel
        previously set is still used, even though the MAC layer gets reset.
        From Anthony Merlino.
      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8sak:  Adds ability to get/set rxonidle
        setting for MAC layer. From Anthony Merlino.
      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8shark:  Adds i8shark, a sniffer "adapter"
        that captures all 802.15.4 traffic, packages it into a Wireshark ZEP
        packet, and sends it to a host running Wireshark  From Anthony
        Merlino.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - apps/system/ping and ping6:  This commit removes the ping and ping6
        commands from NSH and replaces then with the apps/system/ping and
        apps/system/ping6 built-in commands.  The NSH ping[6] commands had
        to be removed because they violated the portable POSIX OS interface.
        The apps/system/png and ping6 command uses the sem-standard
        IPPROTO_ICMP and IPPROTO_ICMP6 socket interfaces.

    * Platform-Specific Support (apps/platform)

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Task Environment Creation:  Fix an error in the duplication of the
        child tasks environment in the special case where the parent's
        environment was created, but then all of the variables were unset.
        In that case, there is still an allocation in place but the size of
        the allocation is zero. This case was not being handled correctly
        when a child task attempts to create its environment and inherit the
        zero-size partent environment. Noted by Anthony Merlino.
      - timer_create():  Fix watchdog resource leak if cannot allocate a new
        timer. From Bruno Herrera.
      - OS Internal Functions: Internal OS functions should not return error
        information via the user errno variable:  This includes functions
        like file_seek(), file_read(), file_write(), etc.  The complete list
        is too long to duplicate here (please refer to the ChangeLog for
        details).
      - OS Internal Functions:  Not only should internal OS functions not
        modify the errno variable, they should never introduce cancellation
        points:  psock_connect(), psock_listen(), psock_getsockopt(), etc.
        The list is too long to duplicate here (please refer to the
        ChangeLog for details).
      - OS Internal Functions:  Create OS internal versions of many
        applications functions that were used by the OS.  The new versions
        differ from the application interfaces in that (1) they do not
        return error information via the errno variable, and (2) they never
        create cancellation points.  This includes new internal interfaces
        like nxsem_init() that is like sem_init(), etc.  There are too many
        to list here (see the ChangeLog for details).
      - Task Exit:  task_exithook.c fails to link if signals are disabled
        because was unconditionally trying to send the SIGCHLD signal to the
        parent in certain configurations.  Noted by Jeongchan Kim.
      - memalign():  Fix heap corruption caused by using unaligned chunk
        size.  Unaligned nodes generated by memalign later cause heap
        corruptions when nodes are shrink further (for example, 24 bytes ->
        8 bytes, when alignment is 16 bytes).  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - SMP:  In sched/sched/sched_cpuselect.c, in order to find the cpu
        with the lowest priority thread, we have to remember the already
        found lowest priority.  Noted by Anonymous in Issue #75.
      - spinlocks:  Disable local interrupts in spin_setbit() and
        spin_clrbit() in order to avoid a deadlock condition.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - atexit()/on_exit():  Clear atexit()/on_exit() function pointer
        before calling it.  On most archs, up_assert() calls exit() so
        without this change, if atexit() function triggers an assertion we
        are in endless loop.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - tmpfs:  Fixed directory unlocking in tmpfs_opendir.   From Dmitriy
        Linikov.
      - fcntl():  fcntl() did not return success fail for F_SETFL.  Reported
        by Jussi Kivilinna.
      - tcdrain():  tcdrain() was recently added to the NuttX C library.
        But there is a problem.  The specification of tcdrain() requires
        that it be a cancellation point.  In order to do this, tcdrain was
        moved from the C library into the OS and the addition cancellation
        point hooks were added.  In non-FLAT builds, access via system calls
        is also now supported.
      - FS FAT:  Fix hard-fault when listing contents of FAT root.  From
        Jussi Kivilinna.
      - procfs: Correct a problem that was causing an apparent directory to
        be reported as a file instead of a directory by opendir.  This
        happened after adding these three new procfs entries: fs/block,
        fs/mount, and fs/usage.  Of course, there is no directory fs in this
        case, only three files that have fs/ in their relative pathnames.
        The logic was detecting that fs was the name of the enty to report,
        but it was then declaring that fs was a file (because fs/block is of
        type file).  This was fixed by adding a check for matching lenghts.
        i.e., if strlen(fs) != strlen(fs/block), then report fs as a
        directory instead of a file.
      - procfs:  Fix uptime being clse to maximum 32-bit value in certain
        config.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * Binary Loader:

      - binfmt/:  Don't schedule starthook if there are no constructors.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - LCD: ILI9341 initialize method not permitted to set errno.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Networking:  net/netdev/netdev_ifconfig.c: Was not returning all of
        the address info.
      - Networking: In some cases, packets are still not sent behind the
        router. I found that NuttX sends the ARP requests not to the router
        but to the target. Mistake in file net/route/netdev_router.c.  From
        Aleksandr Kazantsev.
      - SIOCGIFCONF and SIOCGLIFCONF IOCTL commands should only report on
        network adatpors in the UP state.
      - recvfrom():  Fix double leave_cancellation_point on error path.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - send():  Verify that sock descriptor is valid.  Fixes assertion when
        using send on closed socket.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - sendto():  Remove assert check for null psock and buf input
        pointers.  Removes check as 'psock == NULL' altogether because that
        checked for later in psock_send and psock_sendto. Change null check
        for 'buf' so that it is handled same as in recvfrom.c (return
        -EINVAL instead of assert).  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - sockgetname() files need to include udp/udp.h and tcp/tcp.h or
        otherwise NET_UDP_HAVE_STACK and NET_TCP_HAVE_STACK are undefined
        and the logic is never compiled.  Noted by Anthony Merlino.
      - dup()/dup2():  There was a reference counting problem in the TPC
        logic of net_clone().  net_clone() which is the common logic
        underlying dup() and dup2() for sockets.  When net_clone() calls
        net_start_monitor() and net_start_monitor() returns a failure
        (because the underlying TCP connection) then net_clone() must back
        out the reference count on the structure.  Problem noted by Pascal
        Speck and this implementation of the solution is based on his
        suggestion.
      - close():  There was a possible recursion that could eventually
        overflow the stack.  The error occurred when closing the socket with
        inet_close() while a socket callback was still queued.  When the
        socket callback was executed by devif_conn_event(), this resulted in
        a call to psock_send_eventhandler() with TCP_CLOSE flag set which
        then called tcp_lost_connection().  tcp_shutdown_monitor() then
        called tcp_callback() again, which again called
        psock_send_eventhandler(), and so on....  Noted by Pascal Speck.
        Solution is also similar to a solution proposed by Pascal Speck.
      - inet:  Add check for protocol before handing out TCP and UDP sockets.
      - IP Forwarding:  Fixes typo that caused build error when IP
        forwarding was enabled with CONFIG_NET_ICMPv6_NEIGHBOR enabled as
        well.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - IP Forwarding:  Do not add link layer header size to d_len inside
        devif_forward().  From Anthony Merlino.
      - TCP Networking:  When CONFIG_NET_TCP_WRITE_BUFF=y there is a
        situation where a NULL pointer may be dereferenced.  In this
        configuration, the TCP connection's 'semi-permanent' callback,
        s_sndcb was nullified in tcp_close_disconnect.  However, other logic
        in tcp_lost_connection() attempt to use that callback reference
        after it was nullifed.  Fixed in tcp_lost_connectino() by adding a
        NULL pointer change before the access.  This was reported by Dmitriy
        Linikov in Bitbucket Issue 72.
      - UDP Broadcat:  Fix some issues with regard to UDP broadcast
        handling.  This is Bitbucket Issue #77.
      - ICMP:  Fix an error in the poll logic.  It was assumed that the
        input parmeter pvconn was valid.  It was not.  Instead, the poll
        logic must work like the sendto() and recvfrom() logic:  It must
        keep a copy of the conn structure in the private data.
      - ICMPv6: Fixes several errors preventing icmpv6_radvertise.c from
        being compiled. Fixes conversions to network byte order (namely
        vlifetime, plifetime, mtu).  IPv6 source address is set to
        link-local IP address instead of the address in the netdev
        structure. This is in compliance to RFC 4861. RA didn't work on
        Linux before this change.  Finally, router prefix and prefix length
        are derived from the IPv6 address and netmask in the netdev
        structure. This seems to make more sense than using a predefined,
        separate prefix from the config.  From Sakari Kapanen.
      - ICMPV6:  icmpv6_input() needs to set d_len to 0 after consuming echo
        reply, otherwise, garbage will get sent out.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - ICMPV6:  Fix an error in the poll logic.  It was assumed that the
        input parmeter pvconn was valid.  It was not.  Instead, the poll
        logic must work like the sendto() and recvfrom() logic:  It must
        keep a copy of the conn structure in the private data.
      - IGMPv2 Send:  Fix incoming IGMP checksum calculation.  From Louis
        Mayencourt.
      - ARP:  Fix IGMP Ethernet address computation.  From Louis Mayencourt.

    * Wireless/Wireless Drivers:

      - CC1101:  CC1101 driver not permitted to set errno.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Correct an error in uncompressing multicast address.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Correct a bug in handling uncompressed frames (IPv6
        dispatch).  Adds a separate local variable, protosize, to keep track
        of the size of thep protocol header.
      - 6LoWPAN:  Fix an endian-ness problem in 6LoWPAN address
        decompression.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - 6LoWPAN:  The logic that extracts interface identifier from the IP
        address needs to be generalized to handle cases where the address is
        not a link local address.  From Anthony Merlino.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Serial: 16550 UART driver IOCTL method must not set errno; it must
        return a negated errno value.
      - LIS3DSH:  Added the argument parameter (FAR void *arg) to the
        interrupt handler provided by the LIS3DSH driver to fit the
        definition for ISRs in xcpt_t.  Changed the check for working queue
        availability in lis3dsh interrupt handler to use work_available()
        and not crash in case of an overrun.  From Florian Olbrich.
      - LIS2DH:  Fixes for self-test.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - LIS2DH:  Fix use of obsolete dbg macro.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - LIS331DL:  LIS331DL driver not permitted to set errno.
      - HTS221:  Power-on sensor for loading calibration data. From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - MCP2515:  Fix the MCP2515 Bit Rate Prescale calculation.   Fix BRP
        for SET_BITTIMING ioctl as well.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STMPE811: Fix GPIO operation of STMPE811 driver.
        1. STMPE811_GPIO_DIR was defined for register name and later was
          redefined to be the pin direction mask for `stmpe811_gpioconfig`.
          I decided to change register name to be STMPE811_GPIO_DIR_REG, and
          keep pin direction mask STMPE811_GPIO_DIR, so that any external
          code that already use this driver will be unchanged.
        2. The STMPE811 register GPIO_DIR uses bit value 1 for output and 0
          for input, but `stmpe811_gpioconfig` set the opposite.
        3. The call to `stmpe811_gpiowrite` from inside of
          `stmpe811_gpioconfig` leaded to deadlock.
        From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - BQ2429X:  Add BATIO_OPRTN_SYSON for enabling BATFET after SYSOFF.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Simulation:

      - Simulation:  Serial and console drivers are not permitted to set
        the errno.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - ARM Stack Check:  Fix assert panic when both TLS and interrupt stack
        are enable.  From Jussi Kivilinna.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Drivers:

      - XMC4 USIC: Kconfig was not selecting XMC4_USIC for USIC1. From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - XMC4 UART: Fix XMC4xxx USIC UART sginal to be high level when in idle.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - XMC4 UART:xmc4_uart_configure() expects the channel# not uartbase as
        an input parameter.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - XMC4 UART:  Enable RX/TX status.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - XMC4 UART:  The Alternative Receive Interrupt was not being
        configured.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500-Relax:  Setup max. freq. 120MHz and setup pull-up to UART
        RXD pin.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7:  DAC and ADC drivers are not permitted to set the errno.
      - SAMv7:  Correct an error in RX DMA setup.  From Manish Kumar Sharma.
      - SAMv7 USB:  It is necessary to disable pre-emption and interrupts
        around a loop that copies TX data into the hardware in order to
        avoid a TX data underrun condition.  From Anthony Merlino.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC31xx Drivers:

      - LPC31xx:  Serial and console drivers are not permitted to set
        the errno.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx:

      - lpc43xx:  lpc43_adc.c was being selected by the build system wehn
        DAC was selected.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx Ethernet:  Fix some backward logic setting full-duplex and
        100mbps when autoconfiguration is disabled.  Noted by Anonymous in
        Issue #76.
      - lpc43xx: UART_RX pins should be configured with input buffers
        enabled. Otherwise it cannot be read.  From Alexander Vasiljev.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F2:  Fixed build for STM32F20XX platforms when
        CONFIG_STM32_DMACAPABLE is enabled.  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - STM32 F4:  Remove ltdc.h and dma2d.h. Those header files in that
        location permitted inclusion into application space logic and,
        hence, facilitated and encouraged calling into the OS and violating
        the portable POSIX OS interface.  The definitions in those header
        files were move the appropriate location in the counterpart,
        architecture specific files at arch/arm/src/stm32/dma2d.h and ltdc.h.
      - STM32 L4:  Build stm32l4_idle.c only if  CONFIG_ARCH_IDLE_CUSTOM is
        not enabled.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7:  Remove ltdc.h and dma2d.h. Those header files in that
        location permitted inclusion into application space logic and,
        hence, facilitated and encouraged calling into the OS and violating
        the portable POSIX OS interface.  The definitions in those header
        files were move the appropriate location in the counterpart,
        architecture specific files at arch/arm/src/stm32f7/dma2d.h and
        ltdc.h.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32:  DAC and ADC drivers are not permitted to set the errno.
      - STM32 ADC:  Clear pending interrupts.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 CAN:  Lower part of STM32 CAN driver
        arch/arm/src/stm32/stm32_can.c uses all three hw tx mailboxes and
        clears TXFP bit in the CAN_MCR register (it means transmission order
        is defined by identifier and mailbox number).
        This creates situation when order frames are put in upper part of
        CAN driver (via can_write) and order frames are sent on bus can be
        different (and I experience this in wild).  Since CAN driver API
        pretends to be "file like" I expect data to be read from fd the same
        order it is written. So I consider described behaviour to be a bug.
        Fixed by settin the TXFP bit in the CAN_MCR register (FIFO
        transmit order).  From comments by Alexey T, in Bitbucket Issue 73.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Fix pclk calculation.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Fix burst mode prescaler update. From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 (alt) I2C:  Ensure proper error handling. Injecting data
        errors would cause the driver to continually reenter the isr with
        BERR an RxNE.  This fix allows the error to be cleared and
        propagated to the waiting task.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32:  LTDC and DMA2D drivers are not permitted to set the errno.
      - STM32 RTC:  Workaround for potential subseconds race condition.  In
        all recent STM32 chips reading either RTC_SSR or RTC_TR is supposed
        to lock the values in the higher-order calendar shadow registers
        until RTC_DR is read. However many old chips have in their errata
        this silicon bug (at least F401xB/C, F42xx, F43xx, L15xxE, L15xVD
        and likely others):  "When reading the calendar registers with
        BYPSHAD=0, the RTC_TR and RTC_DR registers may not be locked after
        reading the RTC_SSR register. This happens if the read operation is
        initiated one APB clock period before the shadow registers are
        updated. This can result in a non-consistency of the three
        registers. Similarly, RTC_DR register can be updated after reading
        the RTC_TR register instead of being locked."
      - STM32 Serial:  Do not stop processing input in SW flow-control
        mode.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32F33xxx ADC:  Add some publicly visable interfaces and some
        code to support injected channels.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F33xxx DMA:  Add public interface to handle with DMA
        interrupts.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F33xxx RCC:  Fix CAN clock enable.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - stm32 F4 I2C:  Ensure proper interrupt handling.  Injecting data
        errors that causes a STOP to be perceived by the driver, will
        continually re-enter the isr with SB not set and BTF and RxNE set.
        This changes allows the interrupts to be cleared and propagates a
        I2C_SR1_TIMEOUT to the waiting task.  From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 L4 Serial:  Do not stop processing input in SW flow-control
        mode.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7:  LTDC and DMA2D drivers are not permitted to set the errno.
      - STM32 L4:  DAC and ADC drivers are not permitted to set the errno.
      - STM32 L4 DAC:  Do not configure output pin if it is not used.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RTC, PM:  Small fixes to subseconds handling, ADC
        power-management hooks
      - STM32 F4 RTC:  Fix reading alarm value that is more than 24h in
        future.  From Juha Niskanen
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Fix reading alarm value that is more than 24h in
        future.  From Juha Niskanen
      - STM32 L4 TIM:  Fix compilation of timers with complementary outputs
        when not PWM_MULTICHAN.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RCC:  Restore backup-registers after backup-domain reset.
        From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Correct RTC_SSR and RTC_TR read ordering.  In all
        recent STM32 chips reading either RTC_SSR or RTC_TR is supposed to
        lock the values in the higher-order calendar shadow registers until
        RTC_DR is read. Change the register read ordering to match this and
        don't keep a workaround for a hypothetical race condition (not in
        any L4 errata, lets for once assume ST's silicon works as it is
        documented...)
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Init mode was never exited because nested locking in
        rtc_synchwait() disabled backup domain access.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Use backup register magic value instead of INITS
        bit.  The INITS (bit 4) of RTC_ISR register cannot be used to
        reliably detect backup domain reset. This is because we can operate
        our device without ever initializing the year field in the RTC
        calendar if our application does not care about correct date being
        set.  Hardware also clears the bit when RTC date is set back to year
        2000.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 RTC:  Put back the SSR race condition workaround.  ST has
        confirmed that the issue has not been fixed, and that it applies to
        STM32 L4 too (was not in errata sheets due to documentation bug) See
        discussion: https://community.st.com/thread/43710-issue-with-rtc-maximum-time-resolution .
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 BBSRAM:  Avoid assert in stm32_bbsram_savepanic. If panic
        happens before stm32_bbsram is initialized, stm32_bbsram_savepanic
        caused additional assert panic. Function has null pointer check, so
        drop DEBUGASSERT.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7 I2C: fix I2C_M_NORESTART handling.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7 I2C:  Restore bus frequency after I2C reset.  Copy
        frequency restoration fix from STM32L4 I2C driver to STM32F7 I2C
        driver.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - STM32 F7 RTC:  Fix reading alarm value that is more than 24h in
        future.  From Juha Niskanen

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Add missing ram_vectors configuration in linker
        script.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add missing ram_vectors configuration in linker
        script.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - Nucleo-F334R8:  Add Missing ADC trigger configuration tot he highpri
        configuration.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM3240G-EVAL:  The timer frequencies (BOARD_TIMx_FREQUENCY) are
        incorrectly defined inboard.h.  Since the APB prescalers are set to
        divide by 4 and 2 respectively, the frequencies should be "2xAPBx"
        as said in the comment. The correct frequencies are already defined
        but as STM32_APBx_TIMx_CLKIN.  From Mattias Edlund.
      - STM32F429i-DISCO:  The ltdc configuration has been deleted because
        it violated the portable POSIX OS interface.  It used
        apps/examples/ltdc and include ltdc.h and dma2d.h which were also
        removed for the same reason.

    * ZiLOG Z80

      - configs/z80sim and xtrs:  Serial driver lower halfs ioctl methods
        should return a negated errno value, not set the errno variable.
      - z80 Make.defs:  Fixes dependency generation with newest SDCC
        compiler.
      - configs/z80sim:  Fix a naming problem.  Also, don't try to build the
        serial driver if CONFIG_NFILE_DESCRIPTOR=0.
      - Z80:  Makefile fix for use with current SDCC.

    * Build System

      - configs/:  All defconfig filess that include
        CONFIG_NET_ICMPv6_SOCKET=y need to select CONFIG_SYSTEM_PING6=y and
        deselect CONFIG_DISABLE_POLL.
      - configs/:  All NX configuration... Because of recent changes to
        libnx/nxfonts, Supported bit per pixel must be separated specified
        for NXFONTs too and need to match the select BPP for NX.
      - Build system:  Fix CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL logic directories that have
        ubin and kbin subdirectories.  Conditional logic was fine for
        CONFIG_BUILD_FLAT and CONFIG_BUILD_PROTECTED but generated useless
        dependencies if CONFIG_BUILD_KERNEL.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc/stdio:  Build the lib_noflush() and lib_snoflush() stubs even
        if CONFIG_FILE_DESCRIPTORS=0.  They may still be needed.
      - libc and libnx:  When the libraries are built into two libraries, a
        user space library and a OS space library (as in the PROTECTED and
        KERNEL build).  Then the user space library must not use the OS
        internal interfaces; similarly, the OS must avoid using the
        userspace interfaces so that it does not muck the errno value or
        create spurious cancellation points.
      - libc/match:  Use of exp() vs expf() in logf() caused function to be
        slow.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - libnx:  Fixes a memory leak that is caused because the client message
        queue is not unlinked after the client disconnects from the NX
        server.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - sscanf():  Fix sscanf() character conversion (%c): do not add '\0' at
        the end as for strings, cause, for example, parsing one character
        will fill two bytes: character itself and zero one '\0' after it, so
        will overflow one byte variable argument and corrupt memory for
        variables allocated after it.  From Oleg Evseev.

    * Tools

      - tools/:  configure.sh and configure.c should redirect stdout to
        /dev/null but should not suppress stderr output.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib/:  Avoid truncating the strcmp result in the parser
        into a unsigned char variable.  nshlib/nsh_netcmds.c:  Check for
        valid hostip before using it.   From Bruno Herrera.
      - apps/nshlib/:  Fix resouce leak in 'dd' commenad when 'if=' or
        'of=' params are repeated in the command line.  For example:
          dd if=/dev/null if=/dev/zero of=/dev/null or
          dd if=/dev/zero of=/dev/zero of=/dev/null.   From Bruno Herrera.
      - apps/nshlib:  This commit eliminates the ping and ping6 commands
        from NSH and replaces them with 'built-in' commands at
        apps/system/ping and ping6.  The original NSH version of ping[6]
        commands violated the portable POSIX interface and, hence, had to
        be removed. The new system/ping and ping6 built-in commands uses
        the new IPPROTO_ICMP AF_INET and IPPROTO_ICMP6 AF_INET6 datagram
        sockets to implement ping.
      - apps/nshlib: Fix parsing of empty strings when CONFIG_NSH_CMDPARMS
        is not defined. Problem noted by Juha Niskanen.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - All configurations that use NXIMAGE or NXHELLO must select
        NX_MULTIUSER.  All configurations that use examples/nxterm must
        enable CONFIG_LIB_BOARDCTL.
      - All configurations that use NXLINES must select NX_MULTIUSER.  All
        configurations that use the NX server need to have larger POSIX
        messages.
      - apps/examples/adc:  Fix g_adcstate.count initialization.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/examples/elf:  Remove low-level interfaces and replace with
        call to exec().
      - apps/examples/nxflat:  Remove low-level interfaces and replace with
        call to exec().
      - examples/ostest:  Works around a bug in printf() when cancellation
        points are enabled.  printf() is a cancellation point because it
        calls write().  This is correct according to OpenGroup.org.
        However, printf holds the stdio library semaphore when it is
        canceled and this leaves the semaphore in a bad state.  No fix for
        the printf bug yet.
      - apps/examples/nx:  The NX example no longer supports single user
        mode.
      - apps/examples/nxtext:  The nxtext example no longer supports single
        user mode.
      - apps/examples/nxhello now supports only multiuser mode.
      - apps/examples/nximage now supports only multiuser mode.
      - examples/nxlines:  Now supports only multiuser mode.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/ftpc:  Fix some crazy comparisons to determine is a
        file is an absolute path.  Noted by Anthony Merlino.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - apps/system/i2ctool: Fixed i2ctool write operation in `no restart`
        mode (flag `-n`).  It seems that I2C driver has changed a bit since
        i2ctool was written, so now i2ctool sends repeated start even if
        `no restart` flag (-n) was passed to it.  From Dmitriy Linikov.

NuttX-7.24 Release Notes
------------------------

The 124th release of NuttX, Version 7.24, was made on March 2, 2018,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.24.tar.gz and
apps-7.24.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - SMP: Introduce spin_lock_irqsave() and spin_unlock_irqrestore().
        These APIs are simplified version of enter_critical_section()
        and leave_critical_section() to protect data (e.g. registers) in
        SMP mode.  By using these APIs inside drivers, performance will
        be improved.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - System Timer:  Replace critical section APIs with spinlock APIs.
        (64bit only).  If SMP=n or SMP=y && SPINLOCK_IRQ=n, this works
        in the same way as before.  If SMP=y && SPINLOCK_IRQ=y, performance
        will be improved.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - POSIX Timers: Replace critical section APIs with spin lock APIs in
        clock_gettime.c.  This change will improve performance for SMP
        systems but nothing changes for non-SMP systems.  In SMP mode,
        the running TCB is not always at the g_readytorun.head.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - SMP: Introduce spin_lock_wo_note() and spin_unlock_wo_note().  These
        APIs are used in sched_note.c to protect instrumentation data.  The
        difference between these APIs to exsiting spin_lock() and
        spin_unlock() is that they do not perform instrumentation to avoid
        recursive call when SCHED_INSTRUMENTATION_SPINLOCKS=y.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Interrupts:  Add a configuration option to show interrupt
        information via a procfs file.

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - VFS:  Add support for truncate() and ftruncate().
      - FAT, SmartFS, UserFS, UnionFS, TmpFS, NFS: Add truncate() support.
      - FAT.  Effectively handles the situation when a new file position is
        within the current sector.  Accelerates the work of the FS with a
        multitude of operations to write small pieces of data within the
        current sector.  From Aleksandr Vyhovanec.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - HiletGo OLED:  Add configuration support for HiletGo SSD1306 OLED.
      - lcd/ft80x:  This commit adds an FTDI/BridgeTek FT80x GUI driver.  It
        is untested (I don't even have hardware yet) and, hence, it is
        marked as EXPERIMENTAL).

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - 6LoWPAN:  Adds configuration options for specifying preloaded
        address contexts for compression  From Anthony Merlino.
      - TCP:  Introduce tcp receive window control based on I/O buffer.
        NOTE:  The algorithm is still experimental but useful for http
        streaming.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - UDP:  Add an implementation of UDP write buffering.
      - Routing Tables:  Adding ftruncate() support eliminates an issue
        in file-based routing table management system.
      - Telnet:  Add support for Telnet character mode  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - drivers/input/ft5x06.c:  Add a driver for the FT5x06 capacitive,
        multi-touch, touchscreen controller.
      - drivers/input/ft5x06:  Add a polled mode of operation for the FT5x06
        in attempt to work around the fact that the LPCXpresso-LPC54628
        chose a non-interrupt pin for the FT5x06 interrupt.  Driver is still
        not yet functional.
      - drivers/power/bq2429x.c:  Add trickle charging mode  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - drivers/sensors:  Add support to MAX44009 ambient light sensor.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/sensors:  Added support for LIS3DH accelerometer sensor.
        From Matt Thompson.
      - drivers/eeprom:  EEPROM driver for AT24xx compatible EEPROMs.
        From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Simulation

      - sim:  Add support for a RAM MTD driver and initialization for use
        with SmartFS.
      - sim:  Add support for testing NXFFS.

    * ARM:

      - ARMv7-A, ARMv7-R, ARMv7-M:  Add atomic read-add-write and
        read-subtract-write functions.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx:

      - XMC4xxx:  Refactor PLL setup, refactored PLL/CLK config, easier,
        checks for correctness, call go_os_start if STACK_COLORIZED, smarter
        config of EXTCLK output freq.  From David Alessio.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - Add FPU to xmc4 ostest.  Remove +x from makefiles, preserve
        .gdbinit across make clean, add FPU support to ostest on xmc4,
        add FPU test to ostest on xmc4  From David Alessio.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD/L Drivers:

      - SAMD: SAMD External Interrupt Controller (EIC) support  From Matt
        Thompson.
      - SAMD/L:  Added Analog Comparator basic initialization  From Matt
        Thompson.
      - SAMD/L:  Added FDPLL clock support.  Fixed sequence of OSC32K
        calibration setup.  From Matt Thompson.
      - SAMD/L: Added loading factory USB calibration data from NVRAM.
        From Matt Thompson.
      - SAMD/L: Added experimental DMA support to SPI driver.  spi_exchange()
        uses a pair of DMA channels for TX and RX.  From Matt Thompson.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAM3/4 Boards:

      - Flip&Click SAM3X:  Add board support for the Mikroe Flip&Click
        SAM3X.
      - Flip&Click SAM3X:  Adds basic board support for the HiletGo OLED.

    * Microchip PIC32MZ

      - PIC32MZEF:  Add architectural support for the PIC32MZEF family.

    * Microchip PIC32MZ Boards

      - Flip&Click PIC32MZ:  Adds board support for the Mikroe Flip&Click
        PIC32MZ board.
      - Flip&Click PIC32MZ:  Add board support for HiletGo OLED.
      - Flip&Click PIC32MZ:  Add an nxlines configuration for use in
        testing the custom HiletGo Click board.

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx:  Adapt LPC176x RTC driver for the LPC43xx.  From Gintaras
        Drukteinis.
      - LPC43xx:  Add Windowed Watchdog Timer (WWDT) driver.  Tested on
        LPC4357 but should be compatible for all LPC43xx MCUs.
        From Gintaras Drukteinis.
      - Leverage the LPC54xx SD/MMC back to the LPC43xx (where it came from
        originally).

    * NXP Freescale LPC43xx Boards:

      - Bambino-200e:  Add LPC43 SDMMC board support to Bambino-200E.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP Freescale LPC54xx:

      - LPC546xx:  Added basic architectural support for the LPC546xx
        family.

    * NXP Freescale LPC54xx Drivers:

      - LPC546xx:  Basic NSH configuration includes support for UARTs,
        SysTick timer, GPIOs, LEDs, and buttons
      - LPC546xx:  Additional drivers include EMC, I2C, Ethernet
      - LPC546xx:  Implement GPIO interrupt support.
      - LPC546xx:  And unverified SPI driver is included.
      - LPC546xx:  Ported LPC1788 LCD driver to use the LPC54xx pin.
      - LPC546xx:  Bring in LPC43xx SD/MMC driver from
        https://github.com/Smoothieware/smoothie-nuttx/tree/master/nuttx/arch/arm/src/lpc43xx
        and adapt for use with the LPC43xx
      - LPC546xx:  Add DMA driver ported from the LPC43xx GPDMA driver.
      - LPC546xx:  Bring in WWDT driver from LPC43.
      - LPC546xx:  Add an RTC driver and a RTC character driver lower half.
      - LPC546xx:  Add support for a random number generator.
      - LPC546xx:  Add an Ethernet driver.

    * NXP Freescale LP54xx Boards:

      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Added support for the LPCXpresso-LPC54628
        board.  The initial bring-up used a basic NSH port.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  On-board SDRAM is also supported
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add support for I2C2 and for the I2C tool to
        the NSH configuration.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add support for the USER button.  Enable the
        apps/examples/button test in the NSH configuration.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add the fb configuration for testing the LCD.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add support for the the FT5x06 touchscreen
        controller.  Enable the driver as well as the apps/examples
        touchscreen test.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add an NxWM configuration.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add logic to bring up SDMMC.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add logic to register the RTC character driver
        if it is enabled.  Enable the RTC and RTC character driver in the
        NSH configuration.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add a netnsh configuration that was be used to
        test the Ethernet driver.
      - LCXpresso-LPC54628:  Add LittlevGL graphics demo configuration.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450

      - LC823450 SMP improvements:  (1) Apply irq_spin APIs to
        modifyregXX, (2) Do not use modifyreg32() to enable Mutex, (3)
        Modify IRQ control for i2s.  Apply irq_spin APIs to
        dma/syscontrol/usbdev.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450:  LC823450 http streaming improvements: (1) Use spinlock
        APIs in lc823450_gpio.c.  (3) Fix a potential race condition in
        up_enable_irq(), (3) Use spinlock APIs instead of critical section
        APIs, (4) Enable HRT_TIMER in lc823450_timerisr.c. (5) Use spinlock
        APIs instead of critical section APIs. (6) Fix race conditions in
        dma/usbdev.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450: Introduce DVFS.   This version only supports manual mode
        and Vdd1 is fixed to 1.2V.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450 Drivers

      - LC823450:  Refactor timer driver.  Add MTM timer APIs for DVFS.
        Introduce up_rtc_gettime() for CONFIG_RTC_HIRES.  Introduce idle
        time calculation in DVFS.  Also, DVFS autonomous mode based on CPU
        idle time is supported.  NOTE: voltage control is still disabled.
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450 Boards

      - LC823450-XGEVK:  I2S interrupt will be handled on CPU0 with this
        change.  Assign CPU1 to lpwork.  This change will improve load
        balancing for networking with RNDIS.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK: Enable SPINLOCK_IRQ and NXPLAYER in rndis.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK: LC823450 http streaming improvements: (1) In SMP
        mode, H/W interrupts should be handled on CPU0 to avoid deadlocks.
        (2) Call up_enable_irq() to assign CPU0 for IRQ handling.  (3)
        Enable HRT_TIMER, LC823450_MTM0_TICK, SPINLOCK_IRQ, (4) Enable
        NET_TCP_RWND_CONTROL, NXPLAYER_HTTP_STREAMING_SUPPORT (rndis only)
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Enable DVFS in lc823450_bringup.c.  Enable DVFS
        in audio and rndis. Add Telnet character mode to rndis.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Explicitly assign I2S IRQ handling to CPU0.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Enable RTC_HIRES instead of RTC_DATETIME (audio/
        rndis).  Disable TCP_WRITE_BUFFERS and change SCHED_LPWORKPRIORITY
        (rndis). Update SMP and DVFS related part.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F7:  Add support for the STM32F72x/73x family. From Bob
        Feretich.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add interface to change outputs SET/RST configuration.
        From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add interface to get timer clock frequency,
        calculation, add compare/capture registers significant bits
        checking.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add interface to set timer frequency, fix slave timers
        reset configuration, change POWER_INFO to TIMER_INFO  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add repetition support and fix enum overflow  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Add HRTIM push-pull mode configuration.  From
        raiden00pl.
      - STM32 FLASH:  Add progmem support for STM32L15XX From Juha Niskanen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - configs/photon: Adds BOARD_TIMn_FREQUENCY macros  From Anthony
        Merlino.
      - configs/indium-f7:  Adds support for the RAF Research Indium-F7
        board.  From Bob Feretich.
      - Rename the configs/stm32f0discovery board directory to
        configs/stm32f051-discovery.  There are others stm32f0discovery
        boards with different MCUs and different peripherals on the board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f072b-discovery:  Adds support for stm32f072b-disco
        board. This is the board. I added the LEDs of this board and tested
        the compilation.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f103-minimum:  Add AT24 EEPROM support on STM32F103-
        Minimum board  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f103-minimum:  Add support to BMP180 on BluePill
        (stm32f103-minimum) board.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f334-disco:  Add buck converter and boost converter
        logic.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - configs/stm32f103-minimum:  Add zerocross support to STM32F103-
        Minimum board  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f103-minimum:  Add OLED SSD1306 support to
        STM332F103-Minimum  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f103-minimum: Add board support to MAX6675 Thermocouple
        sensor  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/stm32f746g-disco: Add stm32f746g-disco Ethernet configuration.
        Add USART1 support (connected to the USB virtual serial port)  From
        Louis Mayencourt.
      - configs/viewtool-stm32f107:  Add support for FT80X initialization.
        Add ft80x configuration that will eventually be used for testing the
        ft80x if I ever receive hardware.

    * Tools:

      - tools/logparser:  Add a tool which will help me to convert git logs
        to ChangeLog format.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  Add support for a truncate command.  This will be used
        to test the new ftruncate file system support.
      - apps/nshlib:  Add support for Telnet character mode.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - apps/nshlib: Add support for '-n' option to the echo command.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/nshlib:  Add irqinfo command.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/userfs:  Add truncate() support for userfs.
      - apps/examples/lvgldemo:  Add lvgldemo example for LittlevGL.
      - apps/examples/veml6070:  Add VEML6070 Application Example.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/bmp180: Add BMP180 application example.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/ft80x:  Add a test of the FT80x based on FTDI
        SampleApp.  Includes tests of GPU primitives and graphics co-
        processor commands.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/netlib: Add default route in netlib_set_dripv4addr().
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * Graphics: apps/graphics:

      - apps/graphics/littlevgl:  Add littlevgl library.  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - apps/graphics/ft80x:  Add the FTDU FT80x GUI support library.
        Consists of some display list helpers, audio helpers, touch helpers,
        RAM access, register access etc.

    * System Utilities (apps/system)

      - apps/system/nxplayer:  Add support for HTTP streaming in nxplayer.
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/system/setlogmask:  Adds 'setlogmask' application that allows
        you to set the syslog priority via a simple command.  From Anthony
        Merlino.
      - apps/system/usbmsc: Added Kconfig options to configure write
        protection for each LUN.  From Fabio D'Urso.
      - system/stackmonitor:  Re-design the stack monitor so that it does not
        make forbidden calls directly into the OS, breaking the portable POSIX
        OS interface.  It now properly uses the PROCFS file system to glean
        information about stack usage.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - System Timer:  Change the way that the 64-bit time is sampled.
        Previously, we disabled interrupts before sampling the 64-bit
        timer since the uint64_t access is not atomic on most CPUs.  However,
        disabling (local) interrupts does not work in the SMP case.  In that
        case, the timer interrupt may be running on only one of the CPUs;
        disabling interrupts on a different CPU will provide no protection
        from timer rollover.  To work around this, logic was added that
        samples 64-bit timer is sampled twice and if 32-bit rollover was
        detected between samples, then loops until there is no rollover.
      - POSIX Timers:  In SMP mode, running TCB is not always at the head of
        the g_readytorun list.  This change removes DEBUGASSERT() to avoid
        this condition.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Spinlocks:  Add memory barrier operations in spin_unlock().  In ARM
        document regarding memory barriers, SP_DMB() must be issued before
        changing a spinlock state to SP_UNLOCKED.  However, we found that
        SP_DSB() is also needed to ensure that spin_unlock() works
        correctly for network streaming aging test.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Sporadic Scheduler:  Fix compiler error in Sporadic Scheduler when
        priority inheritance is enabled.  Noted by eunb.song@samsung.com
      - Priority Inheritance:  Fix some priority inheritance related issues
        noted during review of logic.  Also add some REVISIT comments for some issues noted in the design.
      - boardctl:  Remove the BOARDIOC_TSCTEST_TEARDOWN and
        BOARDIOC_TSCTEST_SETUP boardctl() commands.  Remove all
        implementations of board_tsc_teardown().  Each board now initializes
        the touchscreen controller as a normal part of its board  bring-up.
        board_tsc_setup() is gone; the touchscreen controller is now treated
        like any other on-board device.
      - configs:  CONFIG_MAX_TASKS must be a power of 2.
      - SMP: Introduce a new global IRQ clearing logic and tasklist
        protection.  The previous implementation of clearing global IRQ in
        sched_addreadytorun() and sched_removereadytorun() was done too
        early. As a result, nxsem_post() would have a chance to enter the
        critical section even nxsem_wait() is still not in blocked state.
        This patch moves clearing global IRQ controls from
        sched_addreadytorun() and sched_removereadytorun() to
        sched_resumescheduler() to ensure that nxsem_post() can enter the
        critical section correctly.  For this change,
        sched_resumescheduler.c is always necessary for SMP configuration.
        In addition, by this change, task_exit() had to be modified so that
        it calls sched_resumescheduler() because it calls
        sched_removescheduler() inside the function, otherwise it will cause
        a deadlock. However, I encountered another DEBUGASSERT() in
        sched_cpu_select() during HTTP streaming aging test on LC823450-XGEVK.
        Actually sched_cpu_select() accesses the g_assignedtasks which might
        be changed by another CPU. Similarly, other tasklists might be
        modified simultaneously if both CPUs are executing scheduling logic.
        To avoid this, I introduced tasklist protection APIs. With these
        changes, SMP kernel stability has been much improved.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - SMP:  Fix this_task() to be an atomic operation.  In the previous
        implementation, this_task() was defined in sched.h by using just a
        macro current_task(this_cpu()).  However, I found that this is not
        atomic and actually sometimes switching CPU happened in executing
        the macro when we tested audio steaming plus executing commands via
        Telnet.  This change resolves this issue by implementing atomic
        this_task()in sched_thistask.c which is newly introduced.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - SMP:  Implements a global scheduler lock capability as part of SMP
        support.  This allows the scheduler to be locked with no knowledge
        or access to the TCB of the currently running task.  This is
        necessary because accessing the TCB of the currently running task
        is, itself, a non-atomic operation.  This global scheduler lock
        capability was add just to support that atomic access to the TCB.
      - SMP:  Extend the last global lock change to work with the
        LC823450-XGEVK which does not support the atomic fetch add but
        does support disabling interprocessor interrupts.  Disabling
        interprocessor interrupts will also guarantee that the TCB address
        calculation is atomic.
      - SMP:  Fix a infinite recursion problems that a recent changes
        introduced into the i.MX6 SMP implementation.  This is not seen
        with the LC823450 because you can disable inter-processor interrupts
        in that architecture; but you cannot in the ARMv7-A/GIC architecture.
      - SMP:  Remove SMP related logic in sig_dispatch.c.   This change
        prevents from a deadlock in up_schedulesigaction.c where inter-CPU
        signal handling is actually implemented.  arch/arm/src/armv7-m: Fix
        signal handling for SMP. In previous implementation, signal handling
        for SMP was incorrect.  Thus, for example, if an inter-CPU signal
        happened an incorrect tcb was signaled and caused ASSERT().  This
        change fixes the issues and works for both inter-CPU signal handling
        and signal handling on the same CPU.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Tasking:  Add nxtask_create().  Kthread_create() and nxtask_create()
        are internal OS functions and should not modify the errno variable.
        Convert legitimate uses of task_create() to nxtask_create().
        Review handling of returned values from all uses of kthread_create()
        (as well as nxtask_create()).
      - Tasking:  Threads started by board bring-up logic should be kernel
        threads, not user tasks.
      - Tasking:  Threads started by drivers should be kernel threads, not
        user tasks.
      - Semaphore Usage:  Added ECANCELED condition to DEBUGASSERT's
        checking sem_wait result  From Dmitriy Linikov.

      - errno:  Add new internal OS function nxsched_setaffinity() that is
        identical to sched_isetaffinity() except that it does not modify the
        errno value.  All usage of sched_setaffinity() within the OS is
        replaced with nxsched_setaffinity().
      - errno:  Internal functions sched_reprioritize() and
        sched_setpriority() no longer modify the errno value.  Also renamed
        to nxsched_reprioritize() and sched_setpriority().
      - errno:  Add new internal OS function nxsched_getscheduler() that is
        identical to sched_getscheduler() except that it does not modify the
        errno value.  All usage of sched_getscheduler() within the OS is
        replaced with nxsched_getscheduler().
      - errno:  Add new internal OS function nxsched_setparam() that is
        identical to sched_setparam() except that it does not modify the
        errno value.  All usage of sched_setparam() within the OS is
        replaced with nxsched_setparam().
      - errno:  Add new internal OS function nxsched_getparam() that is
        identical to sched_getparam() except that it does not modify the
        errno value (actually, the previous value erroneously neglected to
        set the errno value to begin with, but this fixes both issues).  All
        usage of sched_getparam() within the OS is replaced with
        nxsched_getparam().
      - errno:  wd_start() is an internal OS function and should not set the
        errno value.  Reviewed and updated every call to wd_start() to
        verify if return value is used and if so if the errno value is
        accessed.
      - errno:  Fix several inappropriate accesses to get_errno() that were
        missed in previous changes (some going back to nuttx-7.23).  Add new
        nxsched_setscheduler() and nxsched_getaffinity() which are
        equivalent to their counterparts without the nx on front.  These
        versions do not modify the errno value.  Changed all calls within
        the OS to use these newer versions of the functions.
      - errno:  binfmt/, configs/, grahics/, libc/, mm/, net/, sched/:  OS
        references to the errno variable should always use the set_errno(),
        get_errno() macros.
      - drivers/, fs/ and libc/:  OS references to the errno variable should
        always use the set_errno(), get_errno() macros.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - FAT:  CONFIG_FAT_MAXFNAME may not exceed NAME_MAX (CONFIG_NAME_MAX)
      - NFS:  Correctly infer file type.  The file type is in struct
        nfs_statinfo_s's ns_type field, not in the ns_mode field.  From
        Michael Jung.
      - NFS: Fix buffer corruption.  In case multiple read requests to the
        NFS server are required to fill up the user provided buffer,
        nfs_read() might write behind the end of said buffer.  This is fixed
        with this change.  From Michael Jung.
      - VFS:  reopen() should return NULL when oflags is less than 0, not
        equal to 0. Because negative value is returned on failure of
        lib_mode2offlags() which converts the mode string into file open
        mode flag.
      - ProcFS:  Fix an error in a common function that manages read data.
      - drivers/mmcsd:  Respect SDIO_CAPS_DMABEFOREWRITE on CMD25.  From
        Evgeniy Bobkov.
      - AT24xx:   Correct page size for AT24C02 part.  From Alexander
        Oryshchenko.
      - mtd_config.c:  Add still more error handling (to detect bad
        underlying flash implementations).  Remove MTD_ERASE that was
        erasing data block instead of erase block.  This is a partial
        revert of 4f18b4. Reported-by: Pascal Speck <iktek01@yahoo.com>

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - drivers/lcd:  Fix the default I2C address of SSD1306 OLED display
        (7- vs 8-bit addressing)  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - drivers/lcd:  lcd_framebuffer.c does not need to include board-
        specific board.h.
      - include/lcd:  Eliminate a warning from an SSD1306 header file by
        adding a forward reference to struct i2c_master_s.  From Sebastien
        Lorquet.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - ARP:  Fix an error introduced when ICMP and ICMP6 socket support was
        added in NuttX-7.3.  A gratuitous ARP (or solicitation) was being
        sent after receive of the ECHO replay (advertisement).
      - ARP:  Fix IGMP multicast address computation on Nuttx network stack.
        This change fixes the IGMP address computation to allow multicast
        UDP messages. The destination address was created with the incorrect
        bytes of the given IPv4 address.  From Louis Mayencourt.
      - ioctl:  The existence of the network driver ioctl() method should
        depend on CONFIG_NETDEV_IOCTL rather than CONFIG_NETDEV_PHY_IOCTL.
        The former enables the method, the later enables a subset of
        possible driver IOCTLs.
      - TCP:  Write buffering logic should not wait for a free buffer if
        the socket was opened non-blocking.
      - TCP:  Fixed bad return value handling in psock_tcp_send().  send()
        expects psock_tcp_send() to return a negated errno value, not -1
        with the errno set (GN: I added same change for tcp_send_buffered.c
        which has the same issue as tcp_send_unbuffered.c)  From Pelle
        Windestam.
      - TCP:  Fixes hardfault when network goes done and network monitoring
        is in place.  From Gianpaolo Ferroni Ariani.
      - TCP: tcp_send_[un]buffered.c:  Check routing table in
        psock_send_addrchck().  Previously only ARP table was considered
        when determining if the data will actually be sent.  From Juho
        Grundstrom.
      - TCP:  Generalize Juho Grundstrom's IPv4 change for IPv6 as well.
      - UDP:  Remove some conditional logic that was true if there is only a
        single network device, but not true in the multi-device context.
      - UDP:  In sendto(), return EHOSTUNREACH if the network is down.

    * Common Drivers:

      - drivers/pipes:  In poll logic, fix off-by-one error in calculation
        of bytes in the buffer.  Buffer calculation in pipe poll setup is
        off-by-one when read index is larger than write index. This causes
        poll() not getting POLLIN when buffer has one byte as calculation
        gives zero bytes in buffer.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - drivers/audio:  Improve stability of the WM8776 driver in SMP mode.
        Apply irq_spin APIs to improve performance.  Repeat to process a
        message to avoid deadlock.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - drivers/ioexpander:  Fixed build of PCF8574 driver when its
        interrupts aren't enabled by config.  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - drivers/syslog:  Fixes LOG_UPTO macro to include specified log level.
        From Anthony Merlino.
      - drivers/sensors:  Fix HTS221 sensor reset with BOOT bit  From Jussi
        Kivilinna.
      - drivers/loop:  If we want to open read-only in losetup.c, flags
        should be O_RDONLY not O_RDWR.  From Fabio D'Urso.
      - drivers/timers/ds3231.c:  Correct some debug statements.  From
        Alexander Oryshchenko.
      - drivers/sensors/lis2dh:  Use realtime clock if monotonic is not
        available  From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/i2c and drivers/spi:  Fix compile error if
        CONFIG_DISABLE_PSEUDOFS_OPERATIONS, fix bad NULL checks  From Juha
        Niskanen.

    * ARMv7-A:

      - Data Cache:  Fix cp15_invalidate_dcache.  In cases where more than
        one dcache line was to be invalidated, a missing branch label
        would result in a false branch target into cp15_flush_idcache.  Also
        the .size macro was fixed for both cp15_invalidate_dcache.  From
        Michael Jung.
      - SMP:  Port the signal-related SMP change by Masayuki Ishikawa to the
        ARMv7-A family.

    * Extensa:

      - SMP:  Port the signal-related SMP change by Masayuki Ishikawa to the
        Xtensa family.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Drivers:

      - XMC4xxx:   Only setup USB clock when USB PLL is enabled  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - XMC4xxx: Fix USIC_BRG_SCLKCFG definition  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.

    * Microchip PIC32MZ

      - MIPS32:  In up_idle, the kludge that was conditionally enabled if
        the work queue was enable appears to be needed even when he work
        queue is not enabled on the PIC32MZ.
      - PIC32MZ:  Fix some typos in debug instrumentation in pic32mz-gpio.c;
        fix some typos related to UART5 configuration in pic32mz-serial.c.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD/L:

      - SPI:  In sam_spibus_initialize(), the pinmux configuration was
        smashing the previous CTRLA register configuration. There are
        also some typos in samd_spi.h  From Matt Thompson.
      - SPI:  Fixes g_spi2ops and g_spi2dev using incorrect values  From Matt
        Thompson.
      - SPI:  SPI must be disabled before changing the mode bits in CTRLA
        register  From Matt Thompson.
      - DMA:  Fix DMA controller support.  From Matt Thompson.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC17xx:  Disable LPC17 FDR when not used.  If a boot loader set the
        fractional divider (FDR) the baud rate in nuttx will be wrong
        (multiplied by this fraction).  So if it is not used, it should be
        disabled. From Harald Gutsche.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis:  Correct some Ethernet PHY register bit tests for the
        KSZ8081 PHY.  From Stewart.

    * On Semiconductor LC823450

      - arch/arm/src/LC823450: Add SP_DMB() into lc823450_testset.c.
        In LC823450, ldrex and strex are not supported. So we implemented
        up_testset() with H/W Mutex. However, there was a bug in memory
        access order. This change ensures correct memory access order in
        up_testset() for LC823450. From Masatoshi Tateishi.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F3 RCC:  A flash wait state configuration.  Flash latency must
        be fixed according to sysclk frequency.  If this operation is not
        done or done after PLL configuration, the STM32 fail to continue
        boot operation if the frequency if greater than 24MHz according to
        the board variable STM32_SYSCLK_FREQUENCY.  Tested on stm32f334-disco
        board.  From Gwenhael Goavec-Merou.
      - STM32 RTC:  Make STM32 usable with an external RTC.
      - STM32 SPI:  Removed unnecessary (and incorrect) speed limitation.
        From Alexander Oryshchenko.
      - STM32 SPI:  I have a SPI bus with both Mode 0 and Mode 3 devices
        on it.  After performing SPI I/O to a Mode 0 device, switching to a
        Mode 3 device locked up the SPI interface.  Only zeroes would be
        read.  I traced the reason for the lock-up to arm/arm/src/stm32f7/stm32_spi.c function spi_setmode().  Changing
        the mode causes a spurious SPI clock transmission that confuses the
        stm32f7 SPI input hardware.  This problem is solved by (1) changing
        the SPI mode with SPI (and perhaps DMA) disabled, and (2) flushing
        the receive FIFO if the mode change results in garbage in the FIFO.
        From Bob Feretich.
      - STM32 and STM32 F7:  Remove confusing, redundant, and misleading
        definitions of STM32_BKP_BASE from the F2, F3, and F4 memory
        maps.  Unlike the F1, these parts do not have a separate BKP address
        region.  The BKP registers are with the RTCC address regions.
        stm32_bkp.h should only be used for STM32 F1. stm32_rtcc.h should be
        used to access BKP registers on F2, F3, and F4.
      - STM32 and STM32 F7:  Architecture-specific code is not permitted to
        modify the errno variable.
      - STM32 F4 I2C:  Correct some recent changes to STM32F4 I2C that broke
        poll mode of operation.  From Alexander Oryshchenko.
      - STM32 F4 I2C:  Corrections to STM32 F4 I2C to restore functionality.
        From Alexander Oryshchenko.
      - STM32 F4 I2C:  Corrections to STM32 F4 I2C to fix the NORESTART
        flag.  From Alexander Oryshchenko.
      - STM32 F7:  Fixes a bug in multi-block SD-card operations on the
        STM32F7 platform.  DBLOCKSIZE must be the size of SD-card block, not
        the total amount of transferred bytes.  From Evgeniy Bobkov.
      - STM32 F7:  Fix undefined variable when using USART1 for other
        purposes than UART (e.g. SPI).  From Frank Benkert.
      - STM32 F7:  Backport RTC alarm setting changes from STM32L4.  Most
        notably this fixes RTC getting stuck issue when both alarms were
        used.  Root cause was writing RTC ISR register contents to RTC CR
        register.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 Flash:  Change flash programming to use page buffer for
        unaligned writes.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Nucleo-L432KC:  Fix some bogus logic noted by Fanda.
      - configs/nucleo-* and configs/stm32l476vg-disco:  Fix more
        stm32_userleds.c bogus logic  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Nucleo-L432KC:  Fixed nucleo-l432kc broken build when
        CONFIG_USERLED_LOWER defined  From Fanda.
      - Nucleo-L432KC:  Issue #85: /dev/userleds is not working for
        Nucleo-L432KC fixed  From Fanda Vacek.
      - STM32F429I-Disco:  Separate SPI4 from MTD init.  I was trying to
        attach a non-MTD peripheral to an STM32F429I Discovery Board's SPI4
        port and was hitting compilation problems, since CONFIG_MTD and
        thus 'struct mtd_geometry_s' was not defined.  This patch separates
        SPI4 initialization logic from MTD initialization logic.  From
        Michael Jung.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Remove CONFIG_NX_LCDDRIVER dependence from
        stm32_ssd1306.c  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc/stdio:  In dtoa(), up_interrupt_context() is used in a debug
        assertion.  up_interrupt_context() is not available in the user-mode
        phase of the PROTECTED or KERNEL build configurations.  In those
        configurations, enabling libc floating point support and debug
        assertions will result in an undefined reference to
        up_interrupt_context().
      - libc/netdb:  Fixed parsing of DNS response packets having compressed
        names ending with pointer.  There were troubles parsing response
        packets which have compression of QNAME/NAME field when only
        trailing part of the name (not the whole name) is replaced with
        pointer to another part of the packet.  This commit fixes parsing of
        such packets.  Also I added checks to keep parsing only in bounds of
        the read part of DNS response packet.  From Dmitriy Linikov.

    * Tools

      - tools/*.c:  Add #define _GNU_SOURCE to all C files that call
        asprintf() to eliminate a warning.
      - tools/cvsparser.c:  Add a check to avoid access past the end
        of a fixed size array

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  Fix compile error when CONFIG_NSH_DISABLESCRIPT is not
        defined.  The field np_flags does not exist if scripting is disabled.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/touchscreen:  Eliminate BOARDIOC_TSCTEST_SETUP.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/ftpc:  Fix some corner-cases that could cause FTP to
        access past the end of valid data.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless/ieee802154/i8shark: Fixes special XBee compensation
        by purposely chopping off the FCS.  From Anthony Merlino.

NuttX-7.25 Release Notes
------------------------

The 125th release of NuttX, Version 7.25, was made on June 3, 2018,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.25.tar.gz and
apps-7.25.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - fs/cromfs:  Added CROMFS file system.  CROMFS is a commpressed, in-
        memory, read-only file system based on LZF.
      - fs/vfs:  Added support for checking if a descriptor is a socket in
        fstat().  From Pelle Windestam.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - drivers/lcd:  Remove support for the Nokia6100 LCD.  That LCD uses a
        9-bit SPI interface (the 9th bit being the command/data bit that is
        normally a discrete).  That communication was never successfully
        integrated.  I now believe that it would would require some special
        support from the low-level, MCU SPI driver to manage that 9th bit.
        The deleted code is still available in the Obsoleted repository.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - net/tcp:  Added support for TCP Keepalive, add SO_KEEPALIVE socket
        option.  Added socket options needed to manage TCP-keepalive and TCP
        state machine logic to detect if that the remote peer is alive.
      - net/tcp:  In tcp_input(), add the logic to detect, decode, and
        respond to TCP Keep-Alive packets.
      - net/tcp:  Extended support for sending to non-blocking tcp sockets.
        From Pelle Windestam.
      - net/bluetooth:  Added support for AF_BLUETOOTH sockets.
      - drivers/net:  Added TAP (network bridge) mode to tun.c.  In the
        previous implementation, TAP mode did not handle a packet correctly.
        Also, the driver did not set the link layer type and could not
        assign the interface name. This change fixes such issues and supports
        TAP mode correctly.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * Wireless/Wireless Drivers:

      - wireless/ieee802154:  Added basic MAC support for RX-ENABLE.request
        primitive  From Anthony Merlino.
      - wireless/ieee802154:  Added MAC ackreq flag to TX descriptor for use by
        radio driver.  The radio layer is responsible for a full "transaction".
        Because of differences in radio capabilities, the radio must be
        responsible for the handling of acks and retransmissions. This commit
        simply passes the ackreq meta-data flag along to the radio.  Also
        Fixes bug where primitive was freed when it shouldn't have been,
        causing double free call.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - wireless/bluetooth:  Bring in the Bluetooth stack from the Intel/
        Zephyr arduino101_firmware_source-v1.tar package.
      - drivers/bluetooth:  Added re-architected version of the Bluetooth
        UART driver from the Intel/Zephyr arduino101_firmware_source-v1.tar
        package.
      - include/nuttx/wireless:  Added a setbaud() method to the HCI UART
        lower half interface that can be used to change the default BAUD
        selection.
      - wireless/bluetooth and include/nutt/net:  Added support for Bluetooth
        IOCTL commands.
      - drivers/wireless/bluetooth:  Added a NULL device to support some very
        low level testing on the Simulator.
      - drivers/wireless/cc3000:  Eliminate support for the CC3000 wireless
        part because it doesn't use the USRSOCKET.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.
      - drivers/wireless/ieee80211:  Added BCM43428 support.  From hhuysqt.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - drivers/1wire:  Added 1-wire subsystem and ds28e17 driver  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - drivers/1wire:  Added PM hooks and unlink support to sht21 sensor
        (allowing hot-swappable I2C bus from 1-wire converter).  Unlike most
        other unlink implementations in NuttX drivers, this one does not
        allow any I2C operations after unlink, making it possible to
        deallocate the I2C bus.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/i2c:  Added support for the pca9540bdp i2cmultiplexer.  From
        Giorgio Gro.
      - drivers/power:  Added pm_unregister  From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/power:  Added generic upper-half motor driver  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - drivers/rgbled:  Added support for multichannel PWM (multiple PWM
        channels on a single timer)  From Anthony Merlino.
      - drivers/sensors:  Added support for Sensirion SHT2x humidity sensor.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/sensors:  Added LSM330 SPI and ADXL372 drivers along with the
      - drivers/sensors:  Added support for INA3221 power sensor. This has a
        3 channel bus/shunt voltage pairs.  From Anthony Merlino.
        cluster driver infrastructure.  From Bob Feratich.
      - drivers/sensors:  Added multiple MAX31855 sensors feature support.
        From Tiago Almeida.
      - drivers/wireless/cc1101.c:  Driver improvements from from lihaichen.
      - progmem interface:  Discern r/w and erase page sizes.  Introduce new
        up_progmem_erasesize architecture API to be able to communicate the
        read/write page size independently from erase page size.  Implement
        up_progmem_erasesize for all architectures that already support
        progmem, assuming that for those architectures the sizes of both
        read/write and erase pages are identical.  From Michael Jung.

    * Simulation

      - configs/sim:  Added a configuration that will support some limited
        testing of the Bluetooth stack.

    * ARM:

      - ARM:  All ARM architectures now support CONFIG_ARCH_IDLE_CUSTOM.

    * MIPS:

      - MIPS:  All MIPS architectures now support CONFIG_ARCH_IDLE_CUSTOM.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Drivers:

      - XMC4:  Added SPI support for Infineon XMC45xx microcontroller. From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500-Relax: Added board support for SPI.  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * Nordic NRF52:

      - NRF52:  Initial support for the NRF52 including UART, Timer, and
        GPIO support.  From Janne Rosberg.

    * Nordic NRF52 Drivers:

      - NRF52:  Added watchdog timer drivers.  Includes significant
        updates from Levin Li.
      - NRF52:  Added nRF52 Flash PROGMEM support  From Alan Carvalho de
        Assis.

    * Nordic NRF52 Boards:

      - configs/nrf52-pca10040:  Added support for the NRF52-PCA10040 board
        including LEDs and buttons  From Janne Rosberg.
      - configs/nrf52-pca10040:  Added support for starting the watchdog
        timer on the nRF52.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - configs/nrf52-pca10040:  Added a configuration for testing the
        watchdog timer.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX RT:

      - i.MX RT:  Brings in basic support for the i.MX RT 1050 'crossover'
        SoC.   Includes timer and UART support.  This port was the joint
        effort of Janne Rosberg, Ivan Ucherdzhiev, and myself.  I give
        credit to Ivan for the kill because he is the one to held on to
        the end.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX RT Drivers:

      - i.MX RT:  Added power management hooks.
      - i.MX RT:  Added eDMA support (unverified).
      - i.MX RT:  Added Ethernet driver.  From Jake Choy.
      - i.MX RT:  Added cache operations to permit the Ethernet driver to
        work with the D-Cache enabled, at least in write-through mode.
        Added support for PHY interrupts and PHY IOCTLs.

    * NX FreescaleP i.MX RT Boards:

      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Added support for booting from the on board HYPER
        Flash.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.
      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Added logic to support the board's user LED.  From
        Jake Choy.
      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Added procfs auto-mount support in imxrt_bringup.c.
        From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.
      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Added LIBCXX test configuration.
      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Added support for the imxrt1050-evk button.  From
        Jake Choy.
      - MXRT1050-EVK:  Added support for on-board NOR FLASH boot.  From
        Ivan Ucherdzhiev.
      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Disable LED support because pins conflict with PHY.
        Enable device statistics.  Enable NSH ifup and ifdown commmands.
        Added an NSH configuration for testing Ethernet.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - K28F:  Added architecture support for the Kinetis K28F.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - SDHC:  Make Kinetis SDHC pullups work the same as the STM32 SDIO
        pullups.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - Freedom-K28F.  Added support for the Kinetis Freedom-K28F board.

    * NXP LPC17xx:

      - LPC17xx:  Added support for ARMv7-M run time stack checking on NXP
        LPC17xx MCUs based on CONFIG_ARMV7M_STACKCHECK. Basically copied
        from STM32.  From Michael Jung.

    * NXP LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC17xx:  Added a configurable option to allow using a part of
        LPC17xx's internal flash memory as a Memory Technology Device via
        NuttX' mtd_progmem infrastructure. Tested with LPC1769.  From
        Michael Jung.

    * NXP LPC17xx Boards:

      - Olimex-LPC1766STK:  Remove support for the Nokia6100 LCD.  That
        LCD uses a 9-bit SPI interface (the 9th bit being the command/data
        bit that is normally a discrete).  That communication was never
        successfully integrated.

    * NXP LPC43xx Boards:

      - configs/bambino-200e:  Added support for multiple MAX31855 sensors
        to the bambino-200e.  From Tiago Almeida.

    * OpenRISC

      - arch/or1k/src.  Added basic architectural support for the OpenRISK
        mor1kx architecture.  The initial commit was verified on a Qemu
        simulation but is otherwise untested.  From Matt Thompson.

    * OpenRISC Board

      - configs/or1k.  OpenRISK mor1kx Qemu simulation.  From Matt Thompson.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32:  Added support for the STM32F401xB and STM32F401xC families.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 HRTIM:  Added HRTIM software capture trigger, added software
        reset trigger, added outputs polarization configuration  From
        raiden00pl.
      - STM32 ADC:  Added ADC injected channels configuration.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 HCIUART:  Added a Bluetooth HCI UART lower half driver for the
        STM32.
      - STM32 HCIUART:  Implement the setbaud() method for the STM32 HCI
        UART interface.
      - STM32 SDIO:  Added support for SDIO card to SDIO driver.  From
        hhuysqt.
      - STM32 SDIO:  Added internal pull-up option for SDIO pins.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32 F2/F4 ADC:  Added Vbat measurement to ADC driver for
        STM32F20xx and STM32F4xxx.  As with the MCU temperature and VREFINT
        measurement, this change requires user to enable the corresponding
        channel first.  For Vbat channel the ioctl cmd is
        IO_ENABLE_DISABLE_VBAT_CH, and its arg should be a pointer to bool
        which must be true to enable and false to disable the Vbat channel.
        Moreover, since Vbat input contains a built-in voltage divider, it
        is highly suggested to disable Vbat input channel after measurement
        is done in order to prevent battery drain through the divider.  From
        Dmitriy Linikov.
      - STM32, STM32L4 1WIRE:  Added one bit read and write to 1-wire
        interface.  This is needed for devices that require single bit
        timeslot generation and for 1-Wire search algorithm triplets.  From
        Juha  Niskanen.
      - STM32 F3 SPI:  Enable DMA for SPI on stm32f30xxx MCUs.  From Michal
        Lyszczek.
      - STM32 L4 1WIRE:  Ported 1wire driver from STM32.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4 I2C/SPI/1WIRE:  Added PM hooks to I2C, SPI and 1-wire  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 RTC:  Added CONFIG_RTC_PERIODIC support.  Also makes the RTC
        lowerhalf more like in STM32L4.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 ADC/I2C/SPI:  Added PM hooks to ADC, I2C and SPI.  From
        Juha Niskanen.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - Indium-F7:  Removed support for the Indium-F7 board.  This was done
        for two reasons:  (1) The board support was just clone of the
        Nucleo-144 board support with naming changes.  There has been no
        support and no further development for the board support.  (2) There
        does not seem to be any available Indium-F7 board available to the
        public anywhere on the Internet.  There is not even a reference to
        the board on the rafresearch.com web stie.
      - Nucleo-L452RE:  Added buttons example  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Nucleo-L476RG:  Added support to Nokia LCD PCD8544 on nucleo-l476rg.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Nucleo-L476RG:  Added nxdemo configuration to nucleo-l476rg using
        PCD8544.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Added a zmodem test configuration.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Added the module configuration.
      - Photon:  Added RGB led support  From Anthony Merlino.
      - STM32F103-Minimum:  Added support for DFU bootloader  From Simon
        Piriou.
      - Spark:  Removes Spark board configuration.  Still available in the
        Obsoleted repository.  If there is no CC3000 support, then there is
        no purpose in supporting the Spark either.
      - STM32F334-Disco:  Added buck/boost converter example configuration.
        From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Added support for multiple MAX31855 sensors to the
        STM32F4 Discovery  From Tiago Almeida.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Added support in bring-up logic to initialize the
        HCI UART and register the HCI UART network device.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Added MAX7219 support to STM32F4Discovery board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Added board configuration for CS43L22 audio
        example.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4 Discovery:  Added a module configuration for testing the
        kernel module example with the STM32F4Discovery board.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F429I-DISCO:  Added a LittlevGL configuration for stm32f429i-
        disco.  From seyyah.
      - STM32F746G-DISCO.  Added clang support to stm32f746g-disco board.
        From Goran Mekic.
      - STM32L1 Discovery:  Added support for the STM32L152RCT6 version of
        the board.

    * TI TMS570:

      - TMS570:  Added support for the TMS570LS3137ZWT.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.

    * TI TMS570 Boards:

      - configs/tms570ls31x-usb-kit:  Added support for the TI Hercules
        TMS570LS31x USB Kit  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.

    * TI Tiva:

      - CC3200: Remove all support for the CC3200.  This was a port that was
        started but never completed.  What good is partial CC3200 support
        with no wireless support?.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - EEPROM:  Implements an EEPROM driver in compliance with MTD driver
        as provided by NUTTX for TM4C1294.  The EEPROM driver currently
        supports only two functionalities - read bytes(multiple of 4) and
        write bytes (multiple of 4).  From Shirshak Sengupta.
      - FLASH:  Implemented Flash CONFIG_MTD_BYTE_WRITE for TM4c1294.
        Implemented the tiva_write function which will write an arbitrary
        number of bytes to flash (in multiple of 4).  From Shirshak Sengupta.
      - Serial:  Added TERMIOS IOCTL support to the Tiva serial driver.
        From Dmitry Sharihin.

    * TI Tiva Boards:

      - CC3200-Launchpad:  Remove all support for the CC3200-Launchpad.
        This was a port that was started but never completed.  What good is
        partial CC3200-Launchpad board support with no wireless support?.

    * Libraries/Header Files:

      - libs/:  Moved all of the libraries under a common directory called
        libs/ (libc, libnx, and libxx).  This almost certainly break libcxx
        for now.
      - libs/libc/time:  Added an implementation of clock().
      - libs/libc/lzf:  Added a modified version of Marc Alexander Lehmann's
        LIBLZF3.6 library  From Boris Astardzhiev.
      - libs/libc/unistd:  Initial, minimal implementation of sysconf().
        Only sufficient to support the functionality of less standard
        getdtabilesize().  From Michael Jung.
      - libs/libdsp:  Added DSP support library.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - include/sys:  Added resource.h.
      - include/nuttx/video:  Add overlay support to framebuffer interface
        definition. From Marco Krahl.

    * Tools:

      - tools/gencromfs.c:  Added tools/gencromfs.c, a tool that can be used
        to generate CROMFS file system images.
      - tools/mkromfsimg.sh:  Include an option in mkromfsimg.sh to ignore
        FAT/RAMDISK. This permits you to build tiny systems with ROMFS but
        with the rather large FAT FS support.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - tools/nxstyle.c:  Added check for blank lines before and after single
        line comments.  From Bob Feretich.
      - tools/sethost.sh:  Added support for macOS.
      - tools/uncrustify.cfg:  An initial cut at an uncrustify C formatting
        script from Gregory Nutt. Updated, corrected, and verified.  From
        Bob Feretich.

    * Build System:

      - Makefile:  Added support for nconfig frontend for 'make nconfig'.
        From Michal Lyszczek.
      - configs/:  Added definition of strip to many Make.defs files.
      - staging/:  Remove fixed lib/ subdirectory and its content.  Replace
        with new directory called staging/ that is created dynamically when
        building and removed when 'make clean' is done.  This both improves
        the naming and eliminates a garbage directory from the repository.
      - tools/:  Move all build-related files (except the top-level Makefile)
        into the tools/ sub-directory.  This really cleans up the top-level
        directory.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  Added the mkfatfs -r option which can be used to
        specify the number of entries in the FAT12/FAT16 root directory.
        From Boris Astardzhiev.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/adxl372_test and lxm330spi_test:  Added ADXL372 and
        LSM330 tests.  From Bob Feretich.
      - apps/examples/cc3000:  Removed the CC3000 example.  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/cromfs:  Added an example of how to build a CROMFS
        file system image.
      - apps/examples/elf:  Extend the ELF program module demo so that you
        can use compressed ELF programs with CROMFS.
      - apps/examples/elf:  Use strip command to make ELF binaries MUCH
        smaller. Added an option to strip debug symbols even if the debug
        symbols are enabled in the base code.
      - apps/examples/max31855: Added an example to read multiple max31855
        sensors.  From Tiago Almeida.
      - apps/examples/netloop:  Update network loopback example so that it
        can be used to test TCP KeepAlive.
      - apps/examples/nxdemo:  Added nxdemo application  From Alan Carvalho
        de Assis.
      - apps/examples/powerled:  Added arch initialization.
      - apps/examples/uavcan:  Removed because apps/canutils/libuavcan is no
        longer available.

    * System Utilities: apps/system

      - apps/system/lzf:  Added the test case from Marc Alexander Lehmann's
        LIBLZF3.6 librrary  From Boris Astardzhiev.
      - apps/system/embedlog:  Support for embedlog data loggin package from
        https://embedlog.kurwinet.pl/  From Michal Lyszczek.
      - apps/system/zmodem:  Added an option to enable hardware flow control
        via termios.  Allow stack size and priority to be configured.
      - apps/system/zmodem:  Call tcflush() before closing the serial port.
        This is necessary because that close operation may hang if hardware
        flow control is enabled.  Consider this scenario:  After the host
        sz runs on the host, it exits and leaves CTS high.  The target rz
        completes, and tries to close the serial port.  But if there is
        buffered Tx data, then the close will hang when it tries to drain
        the buffered Tx data since there is no where it can go.  tcflush()
        discards the buffered data and permits the close to continue.
        There is additional logic in nuttx/drivers/serial needed to work
        with this.

    * CAN Utilities:  apps/canutils:

      - apps/canutils/libuavcan.  Removed! libuavcan has not built for a
        year or so.  The basic problem is that as NuttX advances, the old
        frozen version of libuavcan has become absolute because it violates
        the portable POSIX OS interface.  No one is maintaining the port so
        there is no alternative but to remove it.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/tftpc:  Modified the TFTP client functions to use a
        data read/write callback instead of a file.  This allows TFTP to
        write to arbitrary destination (in my case, a MTD device - for
        firmware update).  Two new functions are introduced for this, named
        tftpget_cb and tftpput_cb. They are just made of most of the
        existing code.  The previously existing tftpget/tftpput functions
        are now wrappers on the new ones, with callbacks that read/write
        from files, so my modifications are backwards compatible with
        existing applications, eg the associated nsh commands dont need to
        be changed.  From Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless/bluetooth/btsak:  Added a Bluetooth debug tool.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - sched/sched: Fix a deadlock in SMP mode.  Two months ago, I
        introduced sched_tasklist_lock() and sched_tasklist_unlock() to
        protect tasklists in SMP mode.  This change works well for HTTP
        audio streaming aging test with lc823450-xgevk.  However, I found a
        deadlock in the scheduler when I tried similar aging tests with DVFS
        autonomous mode where CPU clock speed changed based on cpu load. In
        this case, call sequences were as follows.  To avoid this deadlock,
        I added sched_tasklist_unlock() when calling up_cpu_pause() and
        sched_addreadytorun(). Also, added sched_tasklist_lock() after the
        call.  Also added critical sections to lib_filesem.c, mm_sem.c, and
        net_lock.c for SMP for SMP.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - sched/sched:  Change ordering of round-robin time slice check
        (sched_process_scheduler()) and processing of wdog timers
        (wd_timer()).  wd_timer()'s callback function can change current
        running task and, hence, must be done after the time slice check.
        The time slice check will decrement the currently running task's
        time slice allotment.  If such a context switch occurs, then the
        newly started task will lost one could of that allotment before it
        even has a chance to run.  From EunBong Song.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - fs/fat: In fs_stat(), when stat'ing the root directory, avoid
        calculating the address of the root directory entry.  The
        calculation is bogus (but not harmful) because the root directory
        does not have a directory entry.  Noted by Boris Astardzhiev.
      - fs/fat:  Avoid calculating the bogus directory entry address for
        the FAT root directory (since it has no directory entry).  This
        change should have no effect, other than making the logic clearer.
        From Boris Astardzhiev.
      - fs/mount:  Fix wrong size reported by df -h.  Reason is that size
        in bytes is calculated always on uint32_t types and cards bigger
        than 4GB will overflow uint32_t type. Solution is to use uint64_t
        where possible.  From Michal Lyszczek.
      - fs/smartfs:  Fix a hardfault in SmartFS.  Problem occurred when
        opening a file with O_CREAT (only) when the file arelready exists
        but has a size of zero.  From Michal Lyszczek.
      - fs/vfs:  Fix negative errno set in fs_open.c  From Michal Lyszczek.
      - drivers/mtd:  Fixed a W25 driver w25_cacheflush sector bug.  From
        lihaichen.
      - drivers/mtd:  mtdconfig_register() returned OK instead of -ENOMEM on
        failed allocation.  From Michal Lyszczek.

    * Graphics/Display Drivers:

      - drivers/lcd/ft80x:  ACTIVE host command appears to be formatted
        differently than other host commands; Fix ROM CHIPID.  Appears to
        be big-ending, BCD.  Fix some compile issues when debug features
        are enabled.
      - drivers/lcd/ft80x:  Fix a typo that caused the driver to fail to
        recognize the ft801 chip version. From Gregory Nutt.
      - Review all board implementations of board_lcd_initialize().  The
        NuttX convention is that all internal functions that return errors
        as an 'int' must return a negated errno value on failure and a non-
        negative value on success.  Most were right but eight of them had
        cloned logic that returns 1 on success and zero on failure. both
        of which are interpreted as success by the caller since they are
        non-negative.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - net/tcp:  Fixed problem with send() retrun value when using
        nonblocking I/O over buffered tcp socket  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - net/sixlowpan:  Fix a nasty, byte-ordering/endian-ness problem.
        The root cause has been found and corrected.  And a half dozen
        or so bandaid fixes were reverted.
      - net/sixlowpan:  Preserve big-endian (network order) when
        uncompressing address.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - net/sixlowpan: TCP send should have PSH and ACK flags set when
        sending.  This matches the standard network (Ethernet) TCP send
        logic.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - net/udp:  Fix several issues using connected UDP sockets:  sendto()
        should not accept an address.  Normally send() should be used with
        connect UDP sockets instead.  recvfrom() is no longer necessary.
        recvfrom() and poll() should not reset to accept any addresses but
        should, instead, only accept inputs and events from the connected
        remote peer.  On of these issues was noted by ???
        <liguiding@pinecone.net>.  Changes were made as summarized here:
        http://www.masterraghu.com/subjects/np/introduction/unix_network_programming_v1.3/ch08lev1sec11.html
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - net/udp: Resolve race condition in connection-less UDP sockets with
        read-ahead buffering.  In connection-mode UDP sockets, a remote
        address is retained in the UDP connection structure.  This
        determines both there send() will send the packets and which packets
        recv() will be accepted.  This same mechanism is used for
        connection-less UDP sendto:  A temporary remote address is written
        into the connection structure to support the sendto() operation.
        That address persists until the next recvfrom() when it is reset to
        accept any address.  When UDP read-ahead buffering is enabled,
        however, that means that the old, invalid remote address can be left
        in the connection structure for some time.  This can cause read-
        ahead buffer to fail, dropping UDP packets.  Shortening the time
        between when he remote address is reset (i.e., immediately after the
        sendto() completes) is not a solution, that does not eliminate the
        race condition; in only makes it smaller.  With this change, a flag
        was added to the connection structure to indicate if the UDP socket
        is in connection mode or if it is connection-less.  This change
        effects only UDP receive operations:  The remote address in the UDP
        connection is always ignored if the UDP socket is not in connection-
        mode.  No for connection-mode sockets, that remote address behaves as
        before.  But for connection-less sockets, it is only used by sendto().

    * Wireless/Wireless Drivers:

      - drivers/wiresless/ieee80211:  Correct some initialization problems
        with BCM43362 chip.  From hhuysqt.
      - drivers/ieee802154/xbee:  Added a timeout to send logic to handle
        case where XBee module fails to respond to a Transmit request with
        a Transmit Status  From Anthony Merlino.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Per OpenGroup.org, syslog -- and, hence, nonstandard vsyslog, and
        debug wrappers -- does not return a value.  Rename _vsyslog to
        nx_vsyslog.  Use internal nx_vsyslog in the few cases where a
        return value is required.
      - drivers/leds:  Fixes RGB LED issues caused by uninitialized memory
        with CONFIG_RGBLED_MULTICHAN.  The uninitialized pwm_info_s struct
        caused a rogue channel to be started causing errros in the pwm
        driver  From Anthony Merlino.
      - drivers/sensors/lis2dh:  Clear INT1 at SNIOC_WRITE_INT1THRESHOLD
        ioctl.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - drivers/sensors/sht21:  Changed I2C_TRANSFER return value so that
        it return on zero on success, not the count of bytes transferred.
        From Juha Niskanen.
      - drivers/serial:  Per Matias Edlund:  I recently used the tcflush
        function and found that it failed with ENOTTY. The reason is that
        the TCFLSH case in the function uart_ioctl in the file
        drivers/serial/serial.c does not update the ret value."  On
        success, the TCFLSH IOCTL logic needs to explicitly set the return
        value (ret) to zero.
      - drivers/serial:  Added a timeout to uart_tcdrain().  Even if
        tcflush() is used to discard buffered data, the close() can still
        hang if (a) hardware flow control is enabled, (b) CTS == 1, and
        (c) there is data stuck in the hardware Tx FIFO.  tcflush() does
        not currently clear the MCU serial drivers' hardware Tx FIFOs.
        This is a workaround for that.
      - drivers/sensors:  Fix APDS9960 work queue BUG found by Kyle Lei.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Simulator:

      - arch/sim:  Various fixes necessary to build the simulator under
        MSYS2.

    * ARMv7-R:

      - ARMv7-R:  Corrected several ARMv7-R issues.  From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500-Relax:  Call xmc4_spidev_initialize() in xmc4_boot.c.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC17xx Drivers:

      - LPC17xx USB: Fix USB device endpoint allocation bookkeeping.  From
        Michael Jung.
      - LPC17xx USB:  Freeing endpoints should be set the same allocations
        as when endpoint was allocated.
      - LPC17xx USB:  Fix loss of RX initiatives.  USB bulk endpoints are
        double buffered on LPC17xx MCUs.  This means that up to two packets
        might be received on an OUT endpoint that can not be handled
        immediately if the receive request queue is empty.  Thus,
        rxpending must be a counter not a boolean flag.  From Michael Jung.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis USG:  USB device fixes:  Use correct CONFIG OTG control,
        Fix interrupt storm when cable is disconnected.  The DM, DP state
        were incorrect because the pulldowns were not enabled.  Also the
        pending asynchronous resume interrupt needed to be re-armed after
        the suspend is in effect. This is now done in the isr.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis Serial:  In kinetis_lowputc.c, fix esBRFA calculation
        effecting baudrate.  Previous BRFA was not cleared and or-ed into
        new BRFA, hence, buadrate was wrong.  Where Baud Rate Fractional
        Divisor (BRFD) UART baud rate = clock / (16 * (SBR + BRFD)).  From
        David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis Serial:  In kinetis_lowputc.c, fixed parity settings.
        Kinetis UART must be placed in 9 bit mode (M=1) with when 8 bit data
        with parity is required. If left in 8 bit mode (M=0) with parity
        then D7 of the TX/RX register becomes parity bit.  Hence what is
        called 9-bit or 8-bit Mode Select is a misnomer.  8 bit mode when
        parity is enabled is realy 7 bit with parity.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Boards:

      - configs/teensy-3.x:  Remove CONFIG_USBDEV_DUALSPEED from the usbnsh
        configuration.  Hardware supports only FS.

    * NXP i.MX6 Drivers:

      - i.MX6:  Bring in a few i.MX6 fixes that were committed to similar
        files for the i.MX RT.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F3:  Problem: stm32f30xx hangs waiting for LSE to initialize.
        Reason for hang is that operation of setting LSE_ON does not take
        effect because there is no clock on PWR peripheral.  This is
        initialized later in the code  From Michal Lyszczek.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 and STM32 L4 1WIRE:  In 1wire driver, do not write useless
        WRITEBIT zero return value to const buffer  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 HRTIM:  Fixed capture_get function,.  From raiden00pl.
      - STM32 F3 ADC:  Fixed bug in RCC reset logic that resets ADC1
        configuration when both ADC1 and ADC2 are in use  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 Ethernet:  In case of PHY failure, usually because of the
        lack of 25/50 MHz REFCLK input, the Ethernet block would lock up
        in a while loop waiting for readiness, which will never happened.
        This prevented the board from starting at all in the case of a PHY
        failure.  This commit adds a retry loop to avoid bricking the board
        if the Ethernet block is unable to start.  From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - STM32 F7 SDMMC:  Added support for the second SDMMC device.  The
        second SDMMC device was already supported but the clock was never
        enabled.  This fixes that.  From William Douglas.
      - STM32 Serial:  Fix UART glitch when lowputc is enabled.  From
        Simon Piriou.
      - STM32 USB:  Skip recipient check for descriptor related
        requests  From Simon Piriou.

    * TI Tiva Drivers:

      - Tiva ADC: Fix compilation errors on Tiva ADC code when ADC is
        enable.  From Vinicius Maciel.
      - Tiva Serial:  Allow building of Tiva platform with no serial
        console.  From Dmitry Sharihin.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - lib/libc/netdb:  Fixed boundary conditions in dns_recv_response().
        Fixed typos in include/nuttx/net/dns.h.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - libs/libc/modlib:  Fixed backward test for an error in
        modlib_verify.c.

    * Build System:

      - Makefiles:  Eliminate the spurious errors reported by 'make
        savedefconfig'.
      - Makefile(s):  There is a sort command in the 'make savedefconfig'
        file.  I found that sort behaves differently on different platforms
        based on the environment variable LC_ALL.  Now, Makefile.unix will
        force LC_ALL=C just for the sort command so that we can all generate
        equivalent defconfig files.
      - Makefile(s):  The clean_context target needs to invoke a
        corresponding clean_context target in the apps/Makefile in order to
        remove linkages.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - LibTargets.mk, tools/Config.mk:  Drop executable bit on installed
        libraries. The rules to install libraries under lib/ were modified
        to use mode 0644 instead of the default 0755.  From Andrey Zabolotnyi.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/ft80x:  Fix some size calculations.  Added option to
        disable primitive tests. just too boring to have to watch over and
        over again. Fix a typo in backlight fade logic; Fix error in
        formatted display light debug dump output.
      - apps/examples/ft80x:  Text is handled by the coprocessor and, hence,
        must use RAM_CMD, not RAM_DL.
      - apps/examples/ft80x:  Fix some errors in co-processor demos.  Correct
        an error in the spinner demo.
      - apps/examples/nsh and posix_spawn:  Must not call exec_setsymtab()
        directly.  That is a non-POSIX internal OS interface.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Do not call AIO test without
        CONFIG_EXAMPLES_OSTEST_AIO  From Juha Niskanen.
      - apps/examples/smps:  Fix typos in Kconfig.  All power, voltage,
        current values were strings with no default.  I assume they should
        be 'int' with what default?.
      - apps/examples/smps:  Fixes in some printf and in Kconfig  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - apps/system/zmodem:  Fix Makefile.host.  It was broken when zmodem.h
        was moved to apps/include/system.  Fix an incompatibility with the way
        that CRCs are calculated.

    * System Utilities: apps/system:

      - apps/system:  Applications should use the standard clock() interface,
        not the internal NuttX clock_systimer() interface.
      - apps/system/stackmonitor:  Fix comparison between pointer and zero
        character constant.  From Juha Niskanen.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/netlib:  Various fixes needed to get a clean netlib
        build with Bluetooth only.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless:  Applications should use the standard clock()
        interface, not the internal NuttX clock_systimer() interface.

NuttX-7.26 Release Notes
------------------------

The 126th release of NuttX, Version 7.26, was made on September 8, 2018,
and is available for download from the Bitbucket.org website.  Note
that release consists of two tarballs:  nuttx-7.26.tar.gz and
apps-7.26.tar.gz.  These are available from:

    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/downloads
    https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/apps/downloads

Both may be needed (see the top-level nuttx/README.txt file for build
information).

Additional new features and extended functionality:

    * Core OS:

      - General: Eliminate use of the non-standard type systime_t and
        replace it the equivalent, standard type clock_t  From Gregory Nutt.
      - General:  Replace non critical PANIC with DEBUGPANIC to save the
        code space From Xiang Xiao.
      - General: Replace all ASSERT with DEBUGASSERT to save the code
        space  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Initialization:  Add option to mount block device for
        INIT_FILEPATH case.  From anchao.
      - clock():  clock_systimer() is no longer a system interface.  It has
        been replaced with the equivalent, standard interface clock().
        Moved the implementation of clock() from the C library into the OS
        core.  This is necessary because it calls the (now) internal OS
        function clock_systimer().  clock() is now accessed only via a
        system call in certain configurations.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - clock Utilities:  Move clock_timespec_[add|subtract] to
        include/nuttx/clock.h  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Binary Loader:  Add binfmt_initialize().  All binary formats are
        now registered centrally vs. in board-specific logic.  This
        simplifies the usage of the binfmt subsystem.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Binary Loader:  Reference default symtab name to binfmt  From anchao.
      - mm:  Add mm_heapmember function and reimplement kmm_heapmember base
        on mm_heapmember since this function is very useful if multiple
        heaps exist.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - mm:  Add {kumm/kmm}_calloc API.  Add calloc API for manage user
        memory and kernel memory in Flat Build/Kernel Build without kernel
        heap.  From zhuyanlin.
      - pthreads:  Add support static pthread stack.  Add standard
        pthread_attr_setstack() and pthread_attr_getstack().  In all cases
        where the stack is released, add check to see which allocator must
        be used to free the stack:  The user or the kernel allocator.  From
        xuanlin.
      - Semaphores:  Apply the semaphore wait function
        nxsem_wait_uninterruptible().  This function is a wrapped version
        of nxsem_wait() that is uninterruptible and convenient for use.
        From liuhaiyang.
      - Signals:  Add default signal action to SIGKILL.  From ligd.
      - Signals:  Update the signal default action logic to support
        sigaction().  signaction() must be able to handle and input action
        of SIG_DFL to setup the default signal action; it mast also return
        SIG_DFL it is replacing the default action.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals: Default Signal Actions.  Change some types to
        superficially simplify.  Add configuration options to enabled
        default signal behaviors on a per-signal basis.  I don't think
        users are prepared for SIGALRM to terminate the task (which is the
        correct default behavior if you don't change it).  Extend the
        implementation of default signals so that it is totally table
        driven and extensible by simply mondifying the content of const
        tables.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals:  Add support for SIGINT in addition to SIGKILL.
      - Signals:  Add logic and an interface to determine if a signal can
        be caught or ignored.  sigaction now correctly returns EINVAL on
        any attempt to catch or ignore such signals (only SIGKILL for now
        and only if CONFIG_SIG_DEFAULT=y).  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals:  Add support for default signal actions for SIGSTOP,
        SIGSTP, and SIGCONT.  Add procfs support to show stopped tasks.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals:  Add nxsig_action() to solve a chicken and egg problem:
        We needed to use sigaction to set default actions, but sigaction()
        would refuse to set actions if the default actions could not be
        caught or ignored.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals:  Add configuration option to selectively enabled/disable
        default signal actions for SIGSTOP/SIGSTP/SIGCONT and SIGKILL/SIGINT.
      - Signals:  If a task/thread was already blocked when
        SIGSTOP/SIGSTP was received, it will restart in the running state.
        It will appear that to the task/thread that the blocked condition
        was interrupt by a signal and returns the EINTR error.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Signals:  Update signal default STOP action.  If waitpid was
        called with the WUNTRACED then wake up waitpid().  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - IRQs:  Monitor the irq execution time.  This is very useful for
        measuring the interrupt latency.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - IRQ Dispatch:  Add support interrupt chains in NuttX.  IRQ chain is
        very useful in these cases:  (1) Multiple hardware connect to the
        same request line(e.g. PCI), (2) Need multiple driver to support
        one hardware block (like Linux MFD)  From zhuguangqing.
      - Work Queue:  Modify high priority work queue to support multiple
        threads.   From ligd.
      - System Calls:  Add support for getpeername() and get_sockname()
        system calls.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - System Calls:  svcall/sycall logic needs to get the ucontext
        argument from R4 instead of stack since all syscall parameters pass
        from registers in syscall.h  From Xiang Xiao.
      - CPU Load Measurement:  Support the CPU load measurement using
        timer_lowerhalf_s interface  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Assertions: Change CONFIG_BOARD_RESET_ON_CRASH to
        CONFIG_BOARD_RESET_ON_ASSERT, arch/: Implement call to
        board_reset() if in all implementations of up_assert() when
        CONFIG_BOARD_RESET_ON_ASSERT=y.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - boardctl():  Add support for board_app_finalinitialize() From ligd.
      - Architecture Interface:  Add prototype for an architecture-specific
        up_trigger_irq function.  From dongjianli.
      - Architecture Interface:  Add the garbage collection hook so each
        architecture can do custom memory cleanup if necessary.  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - Architecture Interface:  Add architecture-specific prototypes for
        conversions between physical and virtual address.  From ligd.

    * File Systems/Block and MTD Drivers

      - ProcFS:  Add support for a procfs entry that will permit examining
        the environment of any task.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - ProcFS:  Add support for proc/self/, a convenient way for getting
        information about the currently running task.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - HostFS:  Add support for open() append mode  From anchao.
      - HostFS:  Add ftruncate support.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - HostFS:  Remove ARCH_SIM dependence since other architectures
        (e.g., arm semihosting) could support hostfs too  From Xiang Xiao.
      - HostFS:  Support remote directory names without a trailing '/'
        From ligd.
      - HostFS:  Add re-try when hostfs mount() fails  From ligd.
      - NFS:  Update NFS client mount to VER3  From zhangyuan7.
      - Partitions:  Add PTABLE parser fs/partion:  Add a partition parser
        framework fs/driver/fs_blockpartition.c:  Add
        register_blockpartition for block partition  From Xiang Xiao.
      - MTD:  Add gd25 driver  From wangyanjiong.
      - MTD:  In MTD partitions, copy the partition name to internal
        buffer so that the caller can free the name argument  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - MTD:  Support initialization of an FTL block device with a custom
        name  From Xiang Xiao.
      - MTD:  FTL:  Reduce size of stack buffer from 64 to a maximum size
        as determined from NAME_MAX.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - VFS poll():  Send poll() notification when the Tx buffer is flushed
        From ligd.
      - VFS fstat():  Add file_fstat() function for internal OS use. From
        ligd.
      - VFS fcntl():  Add file_fcntl, psock_fcntl, and psock_dupsd for use
        within the kernel.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - VFS dup2():  Addpsock_dupsd for use within the kernel.  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - VFS poll():  Add poll use in kernel space.  From dongjianli.
      - VFS select():  Make select be more consistent with Linux man page:
        'The timeout ... Some code calls select() with all three sets
        empty, nfds zero, and a non-NULL timeout as a fairly portable way
        to sleep with subsecond precision.'  From anchao.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - Sockets:  Add getpeername() support  From ligd.
      - sockopt():  Move psock check from [get|set]sockopt to
        psock_[get|set]sockopt From Xiang Xiao.
      - getsockname():  Add psock_getsockname function  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Netlink Sockets:  This brings in a fragmentary, experimental
        implementation of NETLINK sockets.  There is not too much to that
        socket support on this initial commit, just the netlink socket
        framework.  However, I decided to bring it into master because
        there is a enough that I would not want to lose what is in place.
        And since it is dependent on CONFIG_EXPERIMENTAL, its presence on
        master should be innocuous.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Interface Indexes:  Add driver interface index support.  Add
        implementation of if_nametoindex() and if indextoname().  Raw
        AF_PACKET sockets now depend on CONFIG_NETDEV_IFINDEX.  Add syscall
        support for if_nametoindex() and if_indextoname(). Includes an
        algorithm to prevent an interface index from being reused until all
        network interfaces have by assigned once.  The prevents removable
        devices from being removed, unregistered and re-installed,
        re-registered and keeping the same interface index.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - Driver Interface:  Add devif_loopback() to check the loopback
        case where a packet is being sent to itself.  Modify the net driver
        to call this function in this case.  This function will simply
        re-inject the packet back into the network and the network driver
        will not put anything on the wire.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Network Devices:  Remove all references to CONFIG_NET_USER_DEVFMT.
        That feature is now unconditionally enabled.  This was done because
        (1) the feature does not require very much additional memory, and
        (2) it causes confusion in the configuration due to the additional
        complexity.  Any network drivers that fail to zero the device
        structure interface name field (d_ifname) because calling
        netdev_register() will, however, get a nasty surprise.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Network Devices:  Add support for Microchip LAN91C111 driver  From
        Xiang Xiao.
      - Network Devices:  netdev_findby_ipv[4|6]addr return
        netdev_default() as last resort but don't return loopback device
        if another network device is in the UP state.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Network Device IOCTLs:  Add si_ioctl callback and net_ioctl_arglen
        so usrsock could forward the ioctl to the remote end/  From
        dongjianli.
      - IPv6:  Rename g_ipv6_allzeroaddress with the more meaning
        g_ipv6_unspecaddr since the all-zero address is the IPv6
        unspecified address (sometime IN6_ADDR_ANY).  Replace more inline
        tests for IPv6 multicast with common net_is_addr_mcast() macro.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - ARP:  arp_find() now checks if the target IP belongs to one of the
        local network devices.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - ARP:  Make the function arp_find() thread-safe.  It now returns a
        copy of the MAC address from the ARP table entry, rather than a
        potentially unstable reference to the ARP table entry.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - TCP:  Re-work of TCP receive window size algorithm.  The new logic
        is based only on the ability to buffer TCP read-ahead data. From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - UDP:  Add support for the UDP_BINDTODEVICE protocol socket option
        From Sebastien Lorquet.
      - Slip:  Uncomment the prompt of NET_SLIP_PKTSIZE in Kconfig file.
        From Xiang  Xiao.
      - USRSOCK:  Combine some the duplicated logic.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - USRSOCK:  Optimize option dependence  From Xiang Xiao.
      - USRSOCK:  Add the listen/accept/getpeername/ioctl support  From
        dongjianli.

    * Other Common Device Drivers:

      - Analog DAC:  Add driver for digital to analog converter DAC7571.
        Nucleo-L422KC:  Add support for a connect DAC7571 converter. From
        Daniel Pereira Carvalho.
      - Audio Interface:  Change member samp of apb to pointer so driver
        can customize sample buffer allocation  From ZhongAn.
      - Audio Interface:  Add ioctl cmd 'AUDIOIOC_SETBUFFERINFO' so user
        space could config the buffer  From ZhongAn.
      - Audio Interface:  Add hardware format support  From anchao.
      - I2S Interface:  Add i2s_rxchannels and i2s_txchannels methods to
        the I2S lower half interface.  From ZhongAn.
      - Audio:  Move the I2S character driver to a dedicated folder. From
        Xiang Xiao.
      - Audio:   Add audio_i2s device driver.  From ZhongAn.
      - Audio:  Add the composite audio driver  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Crypto:  Move dev_urandom.c into new crypto folder.  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - GPIO driver:  Add gpio_pin_unregister function to GPIO driver
        driver/ioexpander:  Add pinset struct to GPIO driver for interrupt
        pins larger than 64.  Initialize pintype/inttype when registering
        ioexpander device.  Add SETPINTYPE ioctl command to the GPIO
        driver. From zhuyanlin.
      - I2C Interface:  Add a definition to distinguish a new START of
        messages from a repeated start.  No lower-half I2C drivers actually
        implement this new flag bit, however. In I2C write/read logic use
        new repeated START definition where appropriate.  Rename
        I2C_M_NORESTART to I2C_M_NOSTART since it may be used in other
        contexts than a repeated start.  Add comments to clarify setup for
        repeated start.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - I2C:  Add the standard speed macros.  From dongjiuzhu.
      - Leds:  Add support to MAX7219 to control 7-segment displays.  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Power: PM: Add pm_stay and pm_relax function so special apps(e.g.
        mediaplayer) could disable suspend during playback much like linux
        kernel counterpart  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Power:  PM: Add pm_querystate function  From zhuguangqing.
      - Power: PM: Don't update the power state in work thread: (1)
        Simplify the code logic and remove the work queue dependence, (2)
        Power calculation is too simple to delay into the work queue From
        Xiang Xiao.
      - Power: PM: Decrease the power state in the reverse order.  Since
        the child driver need power off before parent driver.  From
        zhuguangqing.
      - Power: PM:  Make power manager service available as soon as
        possible:  (1) Initialize g_pmglobals at the definition, (2) skip
        hold the lock if OS isn't ready  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Power: PM:  Add PM_RESTORE to notify driver that device exit WFI
        so the driver could restore state.  For example, WDT may stop
        counting before enter low power state and restore the counting
        again in PM_RESTORE notification  From zhuguangqing.
      - Power: PM:  Add timer to decrease PM level automatically.  From
        ligd.
      - PTYs:  Add support so that a PTY can poll for both IN/OUT event
        simultaneously.  From ligd.
      - PWM:  Move pwm.c into pwm folder  From Xiang Xiao.
      - RTC Interface:  Extend struct rtc_time by adding.  From Xiang
        Xiao. tm_nsec if RTC supports hiresolution time.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Sensors:  Add support for Telair T6713 carbon dioxide sensor.  From
        Juha Niskanen.
      - Sensors:  Add support for LSM303AGR and LSM6DSL sensors  From
        DisruptiveNL.
      - Sensors:  Add driver for DHTxx sensor.  From Ouss4.
      - syslog:  Enable a partial, crippled version of syslog_flush();
        Call syslog_flush() from assertion handling logic of all
        architectures.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - syslog:  Channel configuration.  Decouple SYSLOG_SERIAL_CONSOLE and
        ARCH_LOWPUTC.  Since some hardware can output log to the special
        debug channel not serial. From anchao.
      - syslog: Support pre-pending a prefix string to log output if
        enabled.  This very useful to identify which CPU send out the log
        in AMP SoC. From anchao.
      - Serial:  Add Ctrl-C/Ctrl-X support.  From ligd.
      - Serial: Support UART direct write for non console device  From
        xuanlin.
      - Serial:  It is no longer necessary to restrict Ctrl-C handling to
        the FLAT build sched/signal:  Add a new configuration option to
        select signal default actions, separate handling of signal default
        actions from both task startup logic and from the serial TTY
        Ctrl-C logic.  Add a signal set in the group structure to keep
        track of what signals have been set to the default action.  In
        dispatching signals in PROTECTED or KERNEL mode, use this signal
        set to determine if the default signal handler is attached and
        dispatch the signal in kernel mode for the default actions.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Serial:  Integrate new Ctrl-C logic with the ISIG flag in the
        termios c_lflag. From Gregory Nutt.
      - Serial:  Use SIGINT instead of SIGKILL when control-C is pressed.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - Serial:  Add support for Ctrl-Z.  This works just like the
        recently added Ctrl-C support except that SIGSTP is sent when the
        Ctrl-Z characters is encountered vs. SIGINT.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - 16550 UART:  Add a configuration, analogous to the STM32
        configuration option, to suppress the NuttX standard re-ordering
        for /dev/ttySN for special case of the 16550 UART.
      - 16550 UART:  Add CONFIG_SERIAL_UART_ARCH_MMIO option so the a
        memory mapped device doesn't need to provide uart_getreg() and
        uart_putreg() implementations.
      - 16550 UART: Add stub implementations of DMA-related methods in the
        16550 UART v-table.  From ligd.
      - 16550 UART:  Add serial termios handling  From anchao.
      - 16550 UART:  Support 16550 auto hardware flow control
        drivers/serial/uart_16550.c:  Add configuration option
        CONFIG_16550_SUPRESS_INITIAL_CONFIG.  This is identical to the
        standard configuration in arch/Kconfig
        CONFIG_SUPPRESS_UART_CONFIG, but with scope of only the 16550
        driver.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - syslog: Make timestamp output same as linux kernel.  It's very
        useful if NuttX syslog retarget to Linux syslog. From Xiang Xiao.
      - Timers:  Add maxtimeout method to the struct timer_ops_s interface
        From Xiang Xiao.
      - Timers:  Add a new method to the struct oneshot_operations_s
        interface to get the current time from a oneshot timer driver (if
        it is available from the lower half)  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Timers:  Implement timer arch API on top of timer driver.  From
        Xiang Xiao.
      - Timers:  Implement alarm arch API on top of oneshot driver
        interface.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Timers:  Implement RTC arch API on top of RTC driver interface.
        From Xiang Xiao.
      - CDC/ECM:  Adds USB device support for CDC/ECM  From Michael Jung.
      - USB Host:  Add support for the Maxim M3421E USB host driver.  Not
        yet fully tested.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * General Architecture-Specific:

      - All architectures:  Make sure the up_irq_enable() is available on
        all architectures.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Simulation

      - Simulator Configurations:  Add dsptest configuration.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - Simulator:  In network driver (1) Remove up_comparemac() check for
        matching MAC address. Let's trust that the tap device just return
        the packet which belong to us like other real network device
        hardware. (2) Add network device statistics support.  From Xiang Xiao.

    * ARM:

      - ARM (all):  Add CONFIG_DEBUG_MEMFAULT to Kconfig.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - ARM:  (1) Add semihost support for syslog, (2) Add semihost support
        for HostFS  From Gregory Nutt.

    * ARMv6-M:

      - ARMv6-M: Introduce CONFIG_DEBUG_HARDFAULT_INFO to up_hardfault.c
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - ARMv7-M:  Removes support for the dedicated vector handling from the
        many older architectures. Only common vectors are now supported.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - ARMv7-M: Introduce CONFIG_DEBUG_HARDFAULT_INFO to up_hardfault.c
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - ARMv7-M:  Implement SYSTICK timer driver  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Simulator:  Add loadable demo for arch sim.  From anchao.
      - ARMv7-M:  Add logic to trigger ARMv7-M interrupts and exceptions.
        From Gregory Nutt (from sample logic by Xiang Xiao).
      - ARMv7-M:  Add NVIC definitions needed by up_trigger_irq().  From
        Gregory Nutt.

    * ARMv7-R:

      - ARMv7-R:  Add general interrupt controller.  This is based on
        ARMv7-A gic controller code.  From EunBong Song.
      - ARMv7-R:  Add invalidate dcache in arm_head.S.  From EunBong Song.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Drivers:

      - XMC4 GPIO:  Add a specific bit encoding to GPIO driver for
        opendrain GPIO pin.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Boards:

      - XMC4500-Relax:  Add support to MAX6675 on XMC4500-Relax board.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Microchip PIC32MX Boards;

      - PIC32MX:  Update some PIC32MX configurations so that either the
        MPLAB or Penguino toolchains may be used.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD2x/L2x:

      - SAMD2x/L2x:  Rename all usage of samdl/SAMDL to samd2l2/SAMD2L2 to
        make room in the name space for samd5e5/SAMD5E5  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD5x/E5x:

      - SAMD5x/E5:  Add a port to the SAMD5x/E5x MCU family.  From Gregory
        Nutt.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD5x/E5x Drivers:

      - SAMD5x/E5x SPI/I2C:  Bring in untested SPI and I2C drivers from
        SAMD2L2.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - SAMD5x/E5x DMA:  Leverage the SAMD2L2 DMA controller.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - SAMD5x/E5x USB:  Bring the SAMDL2 USB driver into the SAMD5E5
        port.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMD5x/E5x Boards:

      - Metro M4:  Add support for the Adafruit Metro M4 board.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Metro M4:  Add an option to build the Metro M4 image to run out of
        SRAM.  This ought to be a safer and quicker way to do the initial
        bring-up (having bricked the first Metro M4 due to a bad FLASH
        image).  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Metro M4:  Add a configuration option to use OSCULP32K instead of
        XOSC32K.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Metro M4:  After some final fixes related to the SERCOM console,
        the basic NSH configuration appears fully functional.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Metro M4:  Verify the CMCC and enable it by default in the NSH
        configuration.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7 CAN:  Add ability for CAN BUS_OFF autorecovery according
        ISO11898-1:2015.  With this change we added an ioctl for triggering
        the autorecovery sequence for BUS_OFF to the CAN-driver and the
        SAMV7 low-level driver.  According the datasheet: If the device
        goes Bus_Off, it will set MCAN_CCCR.INIT of its own accord,
        stopping all bus activities. Once MCAN_CCCR.INIT has been cleared
        by the processor (application), the device will then wait for 129
        occurrences of Bus Idle (129 * 11 consecutive recessive bits)
        before resuming normal operation. At the end of the Bus_Off
        recovery sequence, the Error Management Counters will be reset.
        During the waiting time after the resetting of MCAN_CCCR.INIT, each
        time a sequence of 11 recessive bits has been monitored, a Bit0
        Error code is written to MCAN_PSR.LEC, enabling the processor to
        readily check up whether the CAN bus is stuck at dominant or
        continuously disturbed and to monitor the Bus_Off recovery
        sequence. MCAN_ECR.REC is used to count these sequences.  From
        Frank Benkert.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX RT Drivers:

      - i.MXRT RTC:  Add support for the i.MXRT RTC.  This is code complete
        (with limited features and options) but untested. The HPRTC is
        functional.  However, if the LPSRTC is enabled, then there is a
        hang during LPSRTC initialization.  It appears that there is some
        problem in providing clocking and initializing the LPSRTC domain.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - i.MXRT SNVS:  Add trivial SNVS from Rev 1. of the Reference Manual.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - i.MXRT LSPI:  IMXRT1050 LPSPI register and bit definitions added.
        From Ivan Ucherdzhiev.
      - i.MXRT Serial: IMXRT1050 LPUART TERMIOS support added.  From Ivan
        Ucherdzhiev.

    * NXP Freescale i.MX RT Boards:

      - IMXRT1050-EVK:  Add knsh configuration. PROTECTED mode NSH build.
        From Gregory Nutt.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis:

      - Kinetis: Add DMA support.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - Kinetis:  Use circular DMA as an option to augment the RX FIFOs in
        the Serial driver.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP LPC54xx:

      - LPC54xx:  The LPC54608 can only run at a maximum frequency of
        180Mhz.  This configuration requires uses the clk_in, external
        crystal clock, to drive the PLL.  When that input was selected, the
        board bootup failed waiting for the PLL to lock.  After referring
        the driver from NXP, we should turn on power sources for the ext
        clock if system pll input select clk_in.  NOTE that the LPC54628
        did not require this step... perhaps because the system oscillator
        power was already enabled.  From kxjiang.
      - LC823450:  Add support for mpu and userspace LC823450-XGEVK: Add
        kostest PROTECTED build LC823450-XGEVK: Add knsh PROTECTED build
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * NXP LPC54xx Boards:

      - Lpcxpresso-LPC54628:  Update lvgl board config to use the new
        version  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * On Semi LPC23450 Drivers:

      - LC823450 Bluetooth:  Add lc823450 Bluetooth support.  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.
      - LC823450 I2S:  Add tx start threshold to lc823450_i2s.c In
        addition, lc823450_i2s_send() now accepts byte-aligned stream.
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450 SPI:  Add SPI flash driver for lc823450.  NOTE: Only bus
        accelerator mode is supported.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450:  Change C-Buffer under-level control.  The under-level
        setting was changed from 1KB to 55KB.  In previous implementation,
        the setting can be changed by the tx threshold but it is fixed at
        startup. Also, check write size and adjust alignment if needed.
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * On Semi LPC23450 Boards:

      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add loopback test for digital MIC on lc823450 via
        i2schar driver.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add lc832450 elf test.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Add posix_spawn configuration  From Masayuki
        Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 L4:  Add initial support to STM32L4+ chips  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 H7:  A partial port to the STMicro STM32H7 by Simon Laube was
        brought in from the PX4 repositories.  Numerous changes were
        make(by Mateusz Szafone).  The basic STM32 H7 NSH configuration is
        now functional, thanks to Mateusz Szafoni.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F0, F1-F4, F7, L4, H7:  Added Single Wire Kconfig variable.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 DAC:  Set OUTEN bit for DAC1CH2 and DAC2CH1 power/motor.
        Direction parameter is now int8 + add overload fault.  From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - STM32 F1-F4 ADC:  Allow multiple channels without DMA on
        STM32L15XX.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F1:  Add FLASH register definitions for F1 parts that have
        dual banked FLASH.  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - STM32 F2:  Added progmem interface support for STM32 F2 From
        Dmitriy Linikov.
      - STM32 F4:  Ports STM32 LTDC and STM32 DMA2D to use the
        framebuffer interface  From Marco Krahl.
      - STM32 F7:  This change ports Marco Krahl's STM32F4 framebuffer
        overlays for the LTDC and DMA2D into the STM32F7.  That driver was
        same as the STM32 F4 driver.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32 F7:  Port input capture from stm32.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 FLASH:  Ported the STM32 F2/F4 driver to the STM32 F7
        platform.  From Evgeniy Bobkov.
      - STM32 F7 SDMMC:  Add SDIO card support to SDMMC driver.  From
        Ramtin Amin.
      - STM32 F7 Serial:  Previous logic would invalidate the data cache as
        each byte was read from the DMA buffer.  This change adds logic to
        invalidate the data cache less frequently by monitoring the state
        of the Rx DMA buffer cache coherency and invalidating only regions
        as necessary.  From Evgeniy Bobkov.
      - STM32 F7:  Add up_stackcheck.c  From Daniel Agar.
      - STM32 F7:  Port the low-level PM functions to STM32 F7. From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  STM32L4 has fetchadd and testset  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4: Added custom pin mapping for STM32L4X2XX processors.
        From Daniel P. Carvalho.
      - STM32 L4 FLASH:  stm32l4xrxx: allow board to override flash wait
        states  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Some updates to analog peripherals ADC, COMP and DFSDM
        for STM32L4XR  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 L4:  Add getstatus and getperiod() method to the timer
        driver (includes coding standard changes made prior to commit)
        From Goden Freemans.
      - STM32 H7:  Remove old references to RXDMA.  Add configuration
      - STM32 H7:  Remove old references to RXDMA.  Add configuration
        option to select the Rx FIFO threshold level.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F103 Minimum:  Add blackpill LED support  From Russ Webber.
      - Viewtool-STM32F107:  Add a TCP performance test using
        apps/examples/tcpblaster.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Viewtool-STM32F107:  Add support for the MAX3421E to the
        Viewtool-STM32F107 board support  From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32F334-DISCO:  Use a PID controller from libdsp in the BuckBoost
        driver. From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32F4-Discovery:  Remove STM32F4BB dependence from RNDIS; add
        RAMDISK support.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4-Discovery  Add board support for MAX7219 as numeric display
        controller.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Add kernel ELF (kelf) configuration. From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Add a kmodule configuration that can be used
        for testing installation of kernel modules in the protected build.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Add logic to support initialization of the
        kernel module symbol table installed in the pass1/ directory during
        the application phase of the build.  The kmodule configuration
        appears to be fully functional.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Olimex-STM32-P407:  Add board support for the DHTxx sensor.  From
        Ouss4.
      - STM32F476G-DISCO:  Add support for STM32F746G-disco board LCD.
        From Marcin Wyrwas.
      - STM32F476G-DISCO:  Add a configuration to build working nxdemo
        application  From Fanda.
      - STM32F476G-DISCO:  Add support for STM32F746G-disco board SDRAM
        Changed fb config to use SDRAM.  From Marcin Wyrwas.
      - STM32F476G-DISCO:  Add touchscreen support and a LittlevGL demo for
        STM32F746G-DISCO  From Marcin Wyrwas.
      - Nucleo-L476RG:  Add support for an external SPI-driven SD card on
        the Nucleo-L476RG.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Nucleo-L476RG:  Add support for LSM303AGR and LSM6DSL sensors  From
        DisruptiveNL.
      - Nucleo-H743ZI:  Use Nucleo Virtual console as default console in
        the NSH configuration  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - STM32L4R9-DISCO:  Add stm32l4r9ai-disco support.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A:  Add timer driver support.  From Goden Freemans.

    * Libraries/Header Files:

      - libc endian:  Add support for endian.h. From Gregory Nutt.
      - libc net:   Add inet_aton()  From Juha Niskanen.
      - libc netdb:  Add getaddrinfo() and friends.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - libc termios:  Add lib_cfmakeraw.c  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - libc stdlib:  Add implementation of random() and srandom().  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - libc unistd:  Add a crippled version of daemon().  From Gregory Nutt.
      - libdsp:  All floats with f-sufix libdsp: (1) add precision option
        for library, (2) add debug option for library and assertions in
        functions, (3) add current samples correction for SVM3, (4) add
        some motor control specific functions, (5) add basic speed
        observer, (6) fix phase shift in SMO observe, (7) add more logic to
        FOC.  From Mateusz Szafoni.
      - include/nuttx/compiler.h, include/poll.h:  Add logic to determine
        if the compiler supports anonymous structures and unions.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - include/nuttx/mutex.h:  Add inline wrapper functions to more
        clearly support semaphores when used as mutexs.  From QianWenfa.
      - include/nuttx/nuttx.h:  Added nuttx.h header file which is
        analogous to the linux.h header file.  Currently, it contains on
        the definition of the container_of() macro.  From zhuyanlin.
      - include/queue.h:  Add dq_tail marco  From zhuguangqing.
      - include/stdio.h:  Add prototypes for popen() and pclose().  Actual
        implementation is in apps/system/popen()  From Gregory Nutt.
      - include/sys/param.h:  Add a dummy sys/param.h header file.  This is
        not a standard file but is used by other systems and having the
        dummy file may minimize some porting efforts.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Tools:

      - nuttx/tools/kconfig2html.c:  Due to new usage, tool needs to be
        able to handle configuration files with names other than Kconfig.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/kconfig2html.c:  Update tool to handle tristate types.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/Config.mk:  Add function CATFILE definition.  Currently
        only used in apps/builtin/Makefile.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/Config.mk:  Add the recursive wildcard function,
        RWILDCARD, to Config.mk.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/testbuild.sh:  Add an option to specify the location of
        nuttx directory.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/refresh.sh:  Add a --prompt option that will let you
        use --silent but will prompt before overwriting the original
        defconfig. From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/link.sh.  Update link.sh per suggestions by Mark so
        that it can be used with MSYS vs copydir.sh.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/mkexport.sh:  Save the System.map file and User.map
        file (if it exists) in the export package so that it can be used to
        extract addresses.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/mkexport.sh:  Save the name of the STRIP tool too.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - nuttx/tools/nxstyle.c:  Add capability to detect multiple blank
        lines. Single spacing required by the coding standard.  Also coding
        standard fixes to server .c files for problems found during testing
        nxstyle.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/tools:  Add +x to mksymtab.sh.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/tools/define.sh and define.bat:  Move a copy of define.bat
        and sh from nuttx/tools to apps/tools so that they will be
        available for the import build.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Build System:

      - Apps/ Build System.  The apps/ build system has undergone a major
        renovation to better support building applications as ELF modules.
        Module selections have changed from 'bool' to 'tristate' types.
        This means that building an ELF now is as simple setting the value
        to 'm'.  This effort required many changes, too many to summarize
        here.  The solution was contributed by Masayuki Ishikawa, Anchao
        An, and Xiang Xiao (and myself to a lesser extent).
      - NuttX/ Build System:  This change extends support for the two-pass
        build.  Its primary purpose is to incorporate source logic
        generated by applications into the kernel phase of the build.
        In the two pass build, the application logic is built during the
        first phase, pass 1.  In that phase, the application may generate
        and install source files in the pass1/directory.  The operating
        system is built during phase 2 of the build.  At that time, those
        source files in the pass1/ directory will be built and incorporated
        into the kernel address space.
        The primary purpose of the pass1/ directory is to such
        application-generated kernel symbol tables.  For an example of the
        use of this feature, look at
        apps/examples/module/drivers/Makefile.  Kernel symbol tables are
        needed to support kernel modules.  Of course, addition
        board-specific logic in, say, configs/<board>/src would have to be
        included to make use of the application-installed symbol tables.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - Remove CONFIG_ARCH_CALIBRATION.  It is awkward to use and no longer
        necessary now that we have apps/examples/calib_udelay.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - Build System:  With recent changes to apps/ all configurations that
        build applications as modules must now also select
        CONFIG_APPS_LOADABLE.  From anchao.
      - Build System:  Add dynamic application loadable support.  From
        anchao.
      - Build System:  Add configuration CONFIG_ARCH_GNU_NO_WEAKFUNCTIONS
        to suppress use of weak functions.  Some gnu derived toolchains do
        not support weak symbols.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Kconfig:  Move 'option modules' from NSH_FILE_APPS to
        BUILD_LOADABLE From anchao.
      - apps/ Build System:  Introduce a build system for loadable apps
        for nsh.  Add 'option modules' to NSH_FILE_APPS so that a user can
        change an application configuration to tristate (y/n/m)
      - apps/import:  Add Makefile.symtab which can be used to compile the
        dynamically created symbol table C file.  Also adds
        tools/mksymtab.sh.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * NSH: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  Add parsing support for back-slash quoted
        characters. Currently only implemented properly if
        CONFIG_NSH_ARGCAT is also selected.  This commit is in response to
        Bitbucket Issue 11 opened by Maciej Wjcik  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/nshlib:  Add inverted logic support in the form of 'if !
        <cmd>'  From  Beat Kng.
      - apps/nshlib:  Expand reboot and poweroff commands to include a
        second, optional mode argument  From ligd.
      - apps/nshlib:  Add a force flag (-f) to mksmartfs command.  SmartFS
        will be formatted only if (1) the FLASH does not already hold a
        SmartFS, or (2) the force flag is set.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/nshlib: NSH prompt string is now configurable. nsh> is
        still the default.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/nshlib:  Add control-C support for terminating built-in and
        exec'ed file tasks.  From ligd.
      - apps/nshlib: Call BOARDIOC_FINALINIT after start-up script (or
        immediately after BOARIOC_INIT is there is no start-up script).
        From ligd.
      - apps/nshlib:  When using waitpid() to wait for a built-in
        application or a file application to exit.  Add the WUNTRACED
        options to so the the waitpid() call will also be awakened if the
        waited-for task is stopped as well.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * NSH Builtins: apps/builtin:

      - apps/builtin/Makefile.  This commit changes apps/builtin to search
        the registry recursively. By supporting directories, external
        projects can install the hooks into the registry and easily clean
        them up and reinstall if something needs to be updated.  Based on
        an idea from Anthony Merlino.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples/calib_udelay:  Add tool for calibrating
        CONFIG_BOARD_LOOPSPERMSEC  From Juha Niskanen.
      - apps/examples/dhtxx: Example for the DHTxx sensor.  From Ouss4.
      - apps/examples/dsptest:  Add unit test for Nuttx DSP library  From
        Mateusz Szafoni.
      - apps/examples/elf:  CROMFS and ROMFS configuration currently only
        usable in FLAT build.  Add configuration to use ELF objects on
        external media like SD card or USB drive instead.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - apps/examples/elf:  If the test ELF files are on media in
        removable media such as SD or USB FLASH, the wait until the media
        has been installed and initialized before starting the test.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/fb:  Adds example to test framebuffer overlay  From
        Marco Krahl.
      - apps/examples/gps:  Add GPS example using MINMEA lib  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/i2sloop:  Add i2sloop application.  This application
        can be used to test I2S loopback like: ' nsh> i2sloop &'. From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/examples/lvgldemo:  Update LVGL to version 5.1.1  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.
      - apps/examples/module:  Add support for CROMFS and for stripping
        symbols from ELF module binaries.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/module:  Add support for automounting removable media.
        This involves a wait for the block driver to become available
        before performing the mount.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/module:  When built in the PROTECTED or KERNEL
        modes, the symbol table is not built by the application.  That is
        because the build will fail since the kernel module depends on
        internal OS symbols thar are not available to the application
        build.  With this change the examples does not attempt to build
        the kernel symbol table in these modes.  Instead it just copies
        the kernel module symbol table into the nuttx/pass1 directory
        where it can be build directly into the OS during pass2 of the
        build.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Add a small test for SIGSTOP, SIGCONT, and
        SIGKILL actions.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/popen:  Add a test of popen/pclose.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - apps/examples/powerled:  Add arch initialization. From Mateusz
        Szafoni.
      - apps/examples/tcpblaster:  Add TCP performance measurement test.
        From Gregory Nutt.

    * System Utilities: apps/system

      - apps/system/cle:  Usage improvements including command line
        history (taken from readline) and support for addition control
        characters. From mst.
      - apps/system/i2c:  Adapt to rename I2C_M_RESTART->i2C_M_START.
        I2C_M_NOSTOP should be in flags of first message in every
        write-read and write-write mesage sequence.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/i2c: Allow registers besides 0x00 in the dev command.
        From Jakob Haufe.
      - apps/system/nsh:  Add logic to automatically register an
        application symbol table as part of NSH initialization.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/system/nsh:  The symbol table name and size variable names
        can now be configured.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/nsh:  Move apps/examples/nsh to apps/system/nsh.  It
        has become so entrenched that it is hardly an example these days.
        May as well formalized it as a system task.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/nxplayer:  Refactor nxplayer.c.  Apply
        netlib_parsehttpurl() and
        remove unnecessary usleep().  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/system/nxplayer:  Release buffer before session and release
        semaphore in nxplayer_setvolume system/nxplayer/nxplayer.c:
        Remove & for apb->samp reference. It is already a pointer.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - system/nxplayer/nxplayer.c:  Add playraw command  From ZhongAn.
      - apps/system/nxrecorder:  Add nxrecorder application  From ZhongAn.
      - apps/system/popen:  Add an implementation of the standard popen()
        and pclose() OS interfaces.  These are implemented as applications
        vs. part of the OS because they depend on NSH.  Untested on
        initial commit.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/system and popen:  Adapt so that these can be used in
        the KERNEL build mode.  In this case, simply replace task_spawn()
        with posix_spawn().  This depends on the existence of some
        environment where /bin/sh exists and can be used to execute one
        NSH command.  For the case of system(), this change was more
        complete because it previously used task_create().  Now it uses
        either task_spawn() or posix_spawn(), depending upon the
        configuration.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/taskset:  Add taskset command for SMP systems.  This
        command can be used to retrieve or set a process's CPU affinity.
        For example,

        nsh> taskset -p 4
        pid 4's current affinity mask: 2

        nsh> taskset -p 3 4
        pid 4's current affinity mask: 3

        nsh> taskset -p 1 busyloop &

        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/system/zmodem:  Support -p <path> for rz to change the folder
        for the received file.  Switch debug output from printf to
        syslog.  Send the next packet for ZME_ACK in ZMS_SENDING to avoid
        rz on the host side stuck make send work reliable even without
        hardware flow control.  From Xiang Xiao.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/dhcpc:  Activates BINDTODEVICE if available.  From
        Sebastien Lorquet.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless/i8sak:  i8sak daemon now gets shutdown if not in use.
        Previously, once the i8sak daemon was started, by running any
        command, it would stay running. This means that if you want to use
        i8sak to setup your network, but then want exclusive access to the
        char device, or network device, you have to manually shutdown the
        i8sak daemon.  Now the daemon stays active as long as required to
        finish any commands, or stays open if a new command keeps it on,
        but when all work is finished, it shuts down.  From Anthony Merlino.

    * Filesystem Utilities: apps/fsutils:

      - mkfatfs:  Clean up some name BS_ and MBR_ refer to the same record
        and should use the same naming (MBR_).  From Gregory Nutt.
      - mkfatfs:  Add definitions for the FAT boot record (FBR).  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - mksmartfs:  Add a check to see if the SmartFS is already
        formatted.  From Xiang Xiao.

    * Graphic Utilities:  apps/graphics:

      - graphics/littlevg/:  Update LVGL to version 5.1.1  From Alan
        Carvalho de Assis.

    * Test Utilities:  apps/testing:

    - testing/unity: add Unity - unit testing library from
        ThrowTheSwitch.org. From Mateusz Szafoni.

Bugfixes.  Only the most critical bugfixes are listed here (see the
ChangeLog for the complete list of bugfixes and for additional, more
detailed bugfix information):

    * Core OS:

      - Signals:  Signal handlers maybe run with interrupts enabled or
        disabled, depending on how the task the received the signal was
        blocked. (i.e.: If sem_wait() is called, then we disable
        interrupts, then block the currently running task).  This could be
        dangerous, because user code would be running with interrupts
        disabled.
        This change forces interrupts to be enabled in up_sigdeliver()
        before executing the signal handler calling up_irq_enable()
        explicitly.  This is safe because, when we return to normal
        execution, interrupts will be restored to their previous state when
        the signal handler returns.  From Gregory Nutt (Based on a
        recommendation by Mark Shulte).
      - Signals:  Lock the scheduler while while killing the children so
        that we do not lose priority and let the task group continue to
        run in an indeterminate state.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Groups:  Fix a deadlock when loading an ELF  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Groups:  In some circumstances, group_killchildren() could have
        called pthread_cancel() to kill a task.  Also, the behavior would
        not be as expected if a pthread had cancellation disabled.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - Posix Message Queues: mq_notify() fix - only part of struct copied
        to internal structure.  As source address the address of the struct
        member sigev_value was used, and it is not located the start of the
        struct. This leads to invalid data being copied to internal
        structure.  Both source and destination should be of type struct
        sigevent* .  From Simon Liedl.
      - vfork():  vfork operation needs to allocate and copy the task
        argument too.  Also correction of the address correction cannot
        depend on the stack pointer since it is not available in all
        architectures.  Rather calculate the offset from the stack
        allocation pointer  From Xiang Xiao.
      - IRQ Dispatch:  Ensure vector never points to NULL since interrupt
        may happen before irq_initialize()  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Work Queue:  workqueues don't need set global data to zero since
        .bss is cleared automatically.  Removing this unnecessary
        initialization also avoids the loss the work items queued before
        initialization.  From ligd.
      - Work Queue:  Remove work queue polling delay to simplify the code
        logic and save the power.  From xuanlin.
      - syslog: Fix syslog crash on 64bit simulation. From anchao.
      - Pipes: Write to a pipe when there are no readers from the pipe
        should return -EPIPE.  From ligd.
      - System Calls:  Fix 6th parameter type of posix_spawnp in
        syscall.csv From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - System Calls:  Remove unused SYS_nnetsocket from syscall.h.  Because
        SYS_nnetsocket is not implemented so far, it should be removed so
        that SYS_prctl can work correctly.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Binary Loader:  Refactor binfmt_exec.c.   This change also fixes an
        argv issue for CONFIG_SCHED_ONEXIT=n or CONFIG_SCHED_HAVE_PARENT=n
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Binary Loader:  Re-architect the way that loadable ELF or NXFLAT
        modules are unloaded.  Memory resources must be recovered when the
        task loaded into memory exits.  The original implementation used
        the death-of-child SIGCHLD signal to perform the unload.  There are
        several problems with this:  It is overly complex, it requires that
        the parent task stay resident while the loaded task runs, and it
        has fatal logic flaws in the protected and kernel model builds
        because the user signal handler attempts to run in the kernel
        address space. This corrects the issue using a mindlessly simply
        BINFMT callback when the task exits.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - ELF Binary Loader:  Set priority level to default if parent has no
        priority.  From anchao.

    * File System/Block and MTD Drivers:

      - Auto-mounter:  Ignore return values from work_cancel(). From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - SmartFS:  Fixed filesystem corruption when writing to small file
        after open(... O_APPEND).  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - SmartFS stat():  A previous change added support for checking if a
        descriptor is a socket in fstat().' but it changed sys/stat.h in
        way that breaks smartfs file-type stat flags. CROMFS is similarly
        broken, as tools/gencromfs.c was not updated to match the
        sys/stat.h changes.  This commit fixes both issues.  It probably is
        not a good idea to use NuttX sys/stat.h bit-field values directly
        in stored structure of filesystem.  From Jussi Kivilinna.
      - HostFS:  Update duplicated definitions in HOSTFS that must match
        NuttX values.  From ligd.
      - HostFS: Ensure f_type is equal to HOSTFS_MAGIC.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - ROMFS:  Make romfs_devread32 more portable  From anchao.
      - TmpFS:  Correct logic in tmpfs_ioctl() that extracts the priv state
        structure from the file system structures.  It was not getting the
        right value and causing mmap() to fail.  Noted by Jesse. From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - ProcFS network statistics:  Was not handling the output correct for
        the case of an IEEE 802.11 device.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - ProcFS IRQs:  Fix occasional computation error when fracpart >=
        1000  From Xiang Xiao.

    * Networking/Network Drivers:

      - TAP/TUN: Fixed custom tun devname formatting.  From Dmitriy Linikov.
      - Network Drivers:  This change attempts remove some long standard
        confusion in naming and some actual problems that result from the
        naming confusion.  The basic problem is the standard MTU does not
        include the size of the Ethernet header.  For clarity, I changed
        the naming of most things called MTU to PKTSIZE.  For example,
        CONFIG_NET_ETH_MTU is now CONFIG_NET_ETH_PKTSIZE.  This makes the
        user interface a little hostile.  People think of an MTU of 1500
        bytes, but the corresponding packet is really 1514 bytes (including
        the 14 byte Ethernet header).  A more friendly solution would
        configure the MTU (as before), but then derive the packet buffer
        size by adding the MAC header length.  Instead, we define the
        packet buffer size then derive the MTU.
        The MTU is not common currency in networking.  On the wire, the
        only real issue is the MSS which is derived from MTU by subtracting
        the IP header and TCP header sizes (for the case of TCP).  Now it
        is derived for the PKTSIZE by subtracting the IP header, the TCP
        header, and the MAC header sizes.  So we should be all good and
        without the recurring 14 byte error in MTU's and MSS's.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - netdev:  Fix.. Too many calls to net_unlock()  From Gregory Nutt.
      - IPv6:  There are many different checks for IPv6 multicast
        addresses. Most of the checks are different.  RFC 3513 clearly
        specifies how to detect an IPv6 multicast address:  they should
        begin with 0xffxx.  I did not change some of the checks in
        ipv6_input.c, however.  In that file, the comments indicate that
        the code should only pick of certain multicast address that begin
        with 0xff02.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - ARP:  Fix some backward logic in an if condition.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - TCP Re-assembly:  Rename CONFIG_TCP_REASSEMBLY to
        CONFIG_IPv4_REASSEMBLY.  Add some fixes to get a clean compile with
        CONFIG_IPv4_REASSEMBLY enabled.  There are several problems with
        the current implementation:  It is untested (and depends on
        CONFIG_EXPERMIMENTAL).  It uses some Ethernet specific definitions
        (and depends on CONFIG_NET_ETHERNET).  There is only a single
        reassembly buffer.  The last two issues prevent use of this feature
        in any context where IPv4 packets may be reassembled for multiple
        network devices concurrently).  From Gregory Nutt.
      - TCP:  Set the default TCP MSS to the value required by RFC 879 and
        never change it under any circumstance unless the remote host
        requests a larger MSS via an option the TCP header.  From Gregory
        Nutt.
      - TCP:  Fix a deadlock condition that can occur when (1) all network
        logic runs on a single work queue, (1) TCP write buffering is
        enabled, and (2) we run out of IOBs.  In this case, the TCP write
        buffering logic was blocking on iob_alloc() with the network
        locked.  Since the network was locked, the device driver polls that
        would provide take the write buffer data and release the IOBs could
        not execute.  This fixes the problem by unlocking the network lock
        while waiting for the IOBs.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - TCP: Remove g_netstats.tcp.syndrop++ from tcp_data_event()  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - TCP Monitor:  Fix net unlock issue when tcp close.  This bug could
        leave the net locked.  From zhangyuan7.
      - UDP:  When sending a broadcast (or multicast) packet do not attempt
        to look up the device by the destination IP address.  Rather, use
        the locally bound address for these cases to select the correct
        network device.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - UDP:  Restore some legacy behavior that was lost with the
        implementation of CONFIG_NET_UDP_BINDTODEVICE:  If no device has a
        local address when the broadcast packet is sent and the UDP socket
        is not bound to a device, there select some arbitrary device.  This
        is certainly lunacy in the case where there are multiple network
        devices registered because the wrong device will probably be
        returned.  It works find, however, for the legacy case where only a
        single network device is registered.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - UDP:  Fix for network byte-order issue when checking if an address
        is a multicast address.  From Jake Choy.
      - USRSOCK:  Correct of semaphore usage issues.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - USRSOCK:  Fix re-definitions of struct iovec.  From ligd.
      - ICMP/ICMPv6 Connection:  Change the type of id in
        icmpv[6]_findconn to uint16_t  From Xiang Xiao.
      - ICMP/ICMPv6:  Fix failure to poll ICMP socket issue.  From
        dongjianli.

    * Wireless/Wireless Drivers:

      - XBee:  Fixes issue with timeouts.  Timeouts were in ticks but
        should have been in ms.  This caused false triggers of timeout
        causing redundant packets, etc.  From Anthony Merlino.
      - BCM43xx:  Add missing logic to the BCM43xx IEEE 802.11 driver to
        poll for more Tx data after the last transfer completes.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - BCM43xx:  Bring in some fixes from the 'Haywire' branch.  From
        Ramtin Amin.

    * Common Drivers:

      - Audio:  Fix compile error in i2schar.c (CONFIG_DEBUG_ASSERTIONS=y)
        From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Audio I2S:  Fix bad NULL pointer check  From Juha Niskanen.
      - Input:  Fixed FT5x06 driver to correctly close (previously it
        unregistered interrupt handler during close).  From Marcin Wyrwas.
      - MMC/SD:  Fix an error that was causing SDIO multiple block
        transfers from achieving full performance.  From Bob Feretich.
      - Sensors:  Increases SPI frequency in MAX6675 from 400Khz to 4MHz.
        From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - Sensors:  Remove comment references to touchscreens from ADXL345
        driver. From Russ Webber.
      - Serial: Don't overwrite nwritten unconditionally on UART write
        failure.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Serial DMA:  Move head/tail pointer reset to uart_recvchars_dma
        since dma may be still transferring in the background.  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - Serial DMA:  In DMA mode, the use of uart_disablexinit() is
        insufficient to protect a critical section.
        enter/leave_critical_section() must be used in those cases if
        CONFIG_SERIAL_DMA=y  From Xiang Xiao.
      - Serial DMA: Fix typo error in uart_recvchars_dma() From Xiang Xiao.
      - 16550 UART: u16550_txempty() should check UART_LSR_TEMT to avoid
        some data left in the transmit FIFO  From Xiang Xiao.

    * ARMv7-A:

      - ARMv7-A (and i.MX6):  Add support for per-CPU IRQ and FIQ interrupt
        stacks (bugfix).  Add support so that up_assert will print the
        correct interrupt stack on an assertion (FIQ stack is still not
        printed).  From Gregory Nutt.

    * ARMv7-R:

      - ARMv7-R:  Fix some wrong configuration of program status
        register.  PSR_E_BIT bit should be set for big endian system.
        PSR_A_BIT bis is set automatically as arm cortex-r4 reference
        manual 3.7.4. So we don't need to set this bit.  From EunBong Song.
      - ARMv7-R: Fix some wrong MPU register definition. Change
        MPU_RBAR_ADDR_MASK and MPU_RACR_TEX_SHIFT mask as arm cortex-r4
        reference manual.  Region Base Address Register 0-4 bits are
        reserved.  MPU Region Access control register type 3-5 bits.  From
        EunBong Song.

    * ARMv7-M:

      - ARMv7-M, Cortex F7:  Add a configuration to enable workaround for
        r0p1 Errata 837070: Increasing priority using write to BASEPRI does
        not take effect immediately.  This update is required to be
        serialized to the instruction stream meaning that after this update
        completes, it takes effect immediately and no exceptions of lower
        priority than the new boosted priority can pre-empt execution.
        Because of this erratum, the priority boosting does not take place
        immediately, allowing the instruction after the MSR to be
        interrupted by an exception of lower priority than the new boosted
        priority. This effect is only limited to the next instruction.
        Subsequent instructions are guaranteed to see the new boosted
        priority. This was raised in Bitbucket issue 113 from Vadzim
        Dambrouski.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - ARMv7-M:  MPU: mpu_log2regionceil needs take into account the
        offset too  From Xiang Xiao.
      - ARMv7-M MPU:  The prototype of mpu_log2regionfloor() changed; an
        additional parameter was added.  However, none of the calls to
        mpu_log2regionfloor() were updated to pass the new, additional
        parameter.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Infineon XMC4xxx Drivers:

      - XMC4 SPI:  XMC4 SPI was working only for the first transfer  From
        Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Microchip/Atmel SAMv7 Drivers:

      - SAMv7 MCAN: Correct an error in the BUS_OFF reporting.  In case of
        BUS_OFF the old implementation was leading to a package storm.  Now
        it reports the error condition BUS_OFF only once.  From Frank
        Benkert.

    * NXP/Freescale LPC43xx Drivers:

      - LPC43xx CAN:  Fix lpc43 CAN configuration.  Configuration settings
        were used and documented in README.txt files, but never in any
        Kconfig file.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - LPC43xx:  Make WWDT usable again.  LPC43xx WWDT driver was not
        updated when irq_dispatch grew an argument parameter.  Also fixes
        two typos and a naming inconsistency (WWDT vs. WWDG).  From Jakob
        Haufe.

    * NXP/Freescale Kinetis Drivers:

      - kinetis:  USB0 fix interrupt storm on error.  The ERROR bit of
        USBx_ISTAT needed to be cleared once an error occurs.  From David
        Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  SDHC fix SDIO driver so that DMA works. There were 2
        problems. The first was that the interrupt did test DINT and raise
        a completion events. But since DINT is just an indication of DMA
        completion, TC is a valid way to determine that the transfer is
        complete.  The second problem is that Software Reset For DAT Line
        SDHC_SYSCTL[RSTD] clears the bits 24-0 in SDHC_PROTO this looses
        the wide bus setting DTW  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  (1) PIT add Liftime and Chaining, (2) flexcan fix
        duplicate line and ordering, (3) kinetis_lowput.c LPUART data
        format with parity fix.  The 9-bit data mode is typically used with
        parity to allow eight bits of data plus the parity, (4) lowputc
        LPUART_BAUD_INIT has to be defined.  Build fails with test case
        enable LPUART0 and make UART1 console.  If HAVE_LPUART_DEVICE is
        defined then LPUART_BAUD_INIT has to be defined even if the LPUART
        is not the console  From David Sidrane.
      - Kinetis:  I2C ensure timeout on bus error.  The code had a dead
        wait on I2C_S_BUSY. Noise on the bus would cause the driver to
        hang.  Add timeout on invalid states of I2C_S_BUSY to allow the
        upper layers do deal with restart or abort.  From David Sidrane.

    * NXP i.MXRT Drivers:

      - i.MXRT Ethernet:  I finally got the Ethernet CRC32 to work properly
        after the FAE pointed me in the right direction:  (1) Added CRC32
        functions for multicast address filtering, (2) Do not reset PHY
        settings when doing an ifup, (2) Use chip's unique id as the device
        MAC, and (4) Enable discard enet frames with errors at PHY layer.
        From Jake Choy.

    * On Semi LC823450 Boards:

      - LC823450-XGEVK:  Fix parallel build on lc823450-xgevk.  This change
        fixes an archive file (*.a) corruption by locking $(TOPDIR).
        Please note that locking the current directory is insufficient
        because some archive files such as libapps.a are specified with
        absolute path.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - LC823450-XGEVK: Change IOB related params for rndis.  Since TCP
        flow control scheme was changed, HTTP audio streaming has not been
        working. These IOB params are not optimized but HTTP audio
        streaming now works.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * STMicro STM32:

      - STM32 F7:  Fix compile error caused by intentional use of fall
        through From Daniel Agar.

    * STMicro STM32 Drivers:

      - STM32 F1-F4:  Port Bob Feritich's change to STM32 F2 and F4 which
        appear to have identical SD support and I/O compensation
        requirements.
      - STM32 F1-F4, STM32 F7, and STM32 L4:  The STM32 RTC driver was
        being selected by the global CONFIG_RTC option.  That is in
        correct.  For example, if you want to disabled the STM32 RTC and
        use an external RTC you cannot because the external RTC also
        depends on the global CONFIG_RTC.  The solution is to add a new
        CONFIG_STM32xx_RTC configuration option the permits to you select
        or deselect the STM32 RTC but still be able to selecte the external
        RTC.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32 F3 I2C:  Fix compile error with I2C reset.  From Juha
        Niskanen.
      - STM32 F7 Serial:  Fix ioctl TIOCSSINGLEWIRE The TRM notes that UE
        must be disabled in order to write HDSEL in USART_CR3. This was not
        being done, so calls to TIOCSSINGLEWIRE were silently failing.
        This change checks the state of UE in USART_CR1, clears the UE bit
        before writing HDSEL, then re-enables it if neccesary.  From Kurt
        Kiefer.
      - STM32 F7 DMA:  DMA macros did not account for the increase from 8
        to 16 DMA channels.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32 F7 I2C:  I2C reset Configure I2C pins as GPIO output.  Pins
        were reset to inputs in the deinit(). This resets them to outputs.
        From David Sidrane.
      - STM32 F7:  All of the SDMMC pins were set to 50 MHz, but not the
        clock. This sets the clock to 50 MHz also.  This combined with
        turning on I/O compensation makes intermittent failures go away.
        From Bob Feritich.
      - STM32 F7:  Port Bob Feritich's change to SDMMC2 and to all other
        STM32 F7 architectures.  Also add a configuration option to
        automatically enable I/O compensation.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32 F7 SDMMC:  Fix data timeout errors with multi-block
        transfers.  From Bob Feretich.
      - STM32 L4:  Corrects some mistakes in pin definitions for the
        STM32 L4 family.  According to datasheet of STM32L496xx, STM32L475xx
        and STM32L443XX the AF2 of PE14 is  TIM1_BKIN2 not TIM2_BKIN.  From
        Daniel Pereira Carvalho.
      - STM32 L4:  Avoid using redundant CONFIG_STM32L4_STM32L4X2.  This is
        almost always same as CONFIG_STM32L4_STM32L4X3. Avoid duplication
        to reduce macro clutter.  This patch limits
        CONFIG_STM32L4_STM32L4X2 usage to dependency tracking and pinmap.
        Also enable ADC for CONFIG_STM32L4_STM32L4X5 (untested, but same
        RM).  From Juha Niskanen.
      - STM32 H7 Serial: don't include stm32_dma.h  From raiden00pl.

    * STMicro STM32 Boards:

      - STM32F4-Discovery:  Fix pca9635pw LED driver compilation on
        STM32F4-Discovery.  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.
      - STM32F4-Discovery:  Krassimir Cheshmedzhiev claims that sys/types.h
        needs to be included in the RGB LED file to avoid undeclared 'OK'
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32F4-Discovery:  Missing EXTERN(_vectors) in linker script.
        From Gregory Nutt.
      - Nucleo-L422KC:  Fix RAM size; STM31L4x2xx has only 64Kb of RAM.
        Remove references to I2C and SDIO:  There is no I2C2 or SDIO on the
        STM32F4x2xx.  From Daniel P. Carvalho.
      - Nucleo-L422KC:  Fix stm32_userleds.  After change LD2 to LD3 in
        board.h stm32_userleds.c was broken.  From Daniel P. Carvalho.
      - Nucleo-L422KC:  Fix TIMx clock configuration.  Also removes
        definitions related to timers not available in the STM32L432KC.
        From Daniel Pereira Carvalho.
      - Nucleo-L452RE:  Fix TIMx clock configuration.  This is cloned from
        similar change to the Nucleo-L422KC.  Also fixes DAC build
        failure.  From Juha Niskanen.
      - B-L475E-IOT01A:  Fix copy paste errors in names:
        stm32_bringup->stm32l4_bringup.  Noted by Freemans Goden.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - STM32VL-Discovery:  Changed the status LED to be the green one as
        mentioned in the README file. Removed the global array for buttons
        and replace it with the only button. Improve defconfig for the nsh
        configuration.  From Ouss4.

    * C Library/Header Files:

      - libc audio:  Call nxsem_destroy in apb_free.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - libc netdb:  The 'port' argument to the static alloc_ai() function
        is always in network byte order.  However, that static function was
        still calling HTONS() on the port, incorrectly converting it back
        to host byte order.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - libc netdb: Fix a link error in lib_gethostbynamer.c with protected
        build.  NOTE: g_lo_ipv4addr also exists in
        net/loopback/lo_globals.c which can be linked with kernel build
        only. From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - libc unistd :  Fix backward conditional logic in Kconfig.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - include/nuttx/compiler.h:  Fix warning: __cplusplus is not defined.
        Some gcc derived compiler do not define __cplusplus  From Xiang
        Xiao.
      - include/nuttx/fs/binfs.h:  Fix warning:  Type defaults to 'int' in
        declaration of 'mountpt_operations'  From Xiang Xiao.
      - include/nuttx/net/ethernet.h:  Remove CONFIG_NET_ETHERNET guard
        From Xiang Xiao.
      - include/nuttx/semaphore.h: don't include nuttx/fs/fs.h.  (1) Avoid
        nested loops if CONFIG_SIG_EVTHREAD enabled, (2) semaphore.h
        doesn't depends on fs.h.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - include/crc64.h:  Fix warning: integer constant is too large for
        its type  From Xiang Xiao.
      - include/limits.h and include/sys/types.h:  Fix warning about
        'SIZE_MAX' redefined.  include/nuttx/usb/audio.h: Fix warnings due
        to '-' used whete '_' intended.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - include/spawn.h:  Fix posix_spawnattr_destroy warning:  'the
        address of attr will always evaluate as true'  From Xiang Xiao.
      - include/sys/types:  Move wint_t and wctype_t from wchar.h to
        types.h.  This change is compatible as before since wchar.h
        include types.h indirectly.  This fixes a compilation error with
        newlib's math.h:  'unknown type name wint_t'  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/include/netutils/netlib.h:  Eliminate a warning about
        AF_UNSPEC and AF_INET not defined.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Build System:

      - Build System:  Fix parallel build in making context.  This change
        avoids running $(MKSYSCALL) and .context in parallel and ensures
        that tools/mksyscall is built before it is actually used.  From
        Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - Kconfig files:  Fix several errors noted by Alex Denisov in
        Bitbucket issue 115.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps Build System:  Fix an error when building apps/ without
        nuttx/, using only the NuttX export package and assuming that the
        nuttx/ directory in not even present.  In this case, the problem
        fixed where the apps/Make.defs file was selecting tools from the
        /tools directory which does not exist because TOPDIR=apps/import.
        Instead, for this build case, I have not thought of any option but
        to duplicate scripts as necessary in the apps/tools directory.
        Also added a top-level target to compile the symbol table.  Misc
        fixes: quoting in scripts, some errors in script syntax.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/Application.mk:  If a loadable module is generated the we
        need to add logic to remove the loadable module in the 'make
        clean' logic.  From Gregory Nutt.

    * Tools:

      - nuttx/tools/Makefile.unix:  Was not cleaning up export directory
        if it was left from a failed export.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/tools: Fix an error in mksymtab.sh  From Masayuki Ishikawa.

    * NSH Library: apps/nshlib:

      - apps/nshlib:  Fix 'while' and 'until' loop condition The loop
        condition logic was inverted:  'while true; do echo "test"; done'
        would exit immediately, while using 'until' would stay in the
        loop.  This is the opposite of how it is supposed to work.  The
        reason is that 'state' was set wrong because 'whilematch' is a
        bool.  From Beat Kng.
      - apps/nshlib:  I was able to cause an assertion with some typos in
        testing the 'fi' command.  Not an important thing, but this will
        protect against the assertion.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/nshlib:  Increase the default configuration for the maximum
        number of command line arguments to 7 (CONFIG_NSH_MAXARGUMENTS).
        This is needed for 'mount' with the -o option.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/nshlib:  Do not dereference NULL 'pstate' in nsh_console.c.
        From Juha Niskanen.

    * Examples/Tests: apps/examples:

      - apps/examples:  Remove illegal calls into OS to initialize BINFMT
        support.  This must be moved to the board initialization logic
        within the OS. From anchao.
      - apps/examples/nettest:  Fix typo: NET_LOOPBACK ->
        CONFIG_NET_LOOPBACK nettest: Fix compilation error. Should enable
        NET_SETSOCKOPT for preventing compilation error.  From EunBong Song.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Signal handling tests should use the same
        configurable stack size as used in other tests, not
        PTHREAD_STACK_DEFAULT.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/ostest:  Attempt to make the nested signal test
        compatible with the suspend/resume test.  Some signals cannot be
        caught when the suspend/resume configuration is in place.  From
        Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/examples/smps:  Fixes in some printf and in Kconfig. From
        Mateusz Szafoni.

    * System Utilities: apps/system:

      - apps/system/cu: (1) Protect from possible re-definition of signal
        values, (2) Fix CU ctrl-C hand when remote core hang.  From ligd.
      - apps/system/i2c:  Fix a backward comparison in i2c_main.c.  Noted
        by Jakob Haufe.  From Gregory Nutt.
      - apps/system/nsh: Fix compile errors with
        CONFIG_EXAMPLES_NSH_SYMTAB=y.  From Masayuki Ishikawa.
      - apps/system/ping and ping6:  Send ID and seqno in network byte
        order.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/system/ping and ping6:  Change dependency in ping and ping6
        Kconfig.  These may be implemented in users sockets and, hence,
        may need to be avaiable even if ICMP and ICMPv6 sockets are not
        support.  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/system/system:  Add 'const' to make function prototype
        compatible with OpenGroup.org requirement  From Xiang Xiao.
      - apps/system/zmodem:  Fix error "sz_main.o: No such file or
        directory"  From Xiang Xiao.

    * Network Utilities: apps/netutils:

      - apps/netutils/ftpc:  Fix handling of url-encoded strings  From
        Dmitriy Linikov.
      - apps/netutils/ping:  Remove unsupported ping.  netutils/ping is not
        supported anymore.  It's better to remove this folder for
        preventing confusing.  ping is supported by system/ping.  From
        EunBong Song.

    * Wireless Utilities: apps/wireless:

      - apps/wireless/wapi:  Remove dependency on CONFIG_EXPERIMENTAL from
        Kconfig  From Gregory Nutt.

    * GPS Utilities: apps/gpsutils:

      - apps/gpsutils/minmea:  Include wchar.h in minmea.c file to fix
        wint_t error  From Alan Carvalho de Assis.

    * Interpreters:  apps/interpreters:

      - Remove apps/interpreters/micropthon.  There are several reasons
        for this.  (1) the current version 1.3.8 is very old and no one is
        supporting it.  (2) the port only includes the core micropython
        logic and none of the Python libraries.  As such it is useless in
        any real application.  (3) There have recently been compile
        failures reported.  It looks like this is due to changes in newlib
        based toolchains that now bring in incompatible newlib header
        files.  See issue 104 at
        https://bitbucket.org/nuttx/nuttx/issues/104/build-micropython-138-error.
        With no one dedicated to the support of micropython, it can no
        longer be carried in the NuttX apps/ repository.  From Gregory Nutt.
